For the culinary-minded traveler, any visit to Tokyo should include a dinner of unagi — tender, unctuous grilled freshwater eel. There are genteel eel specialists, like the memorable Yama-no Chaya , which opened in the early 20th century on the leafy grounds of Hie-Jinja Shrine . By contrast, there's Unagi Kabuto, at 35 a relative newcomer: a friendly, charcoal-smoke-scented storefront in Tokyo's Ikebukuro neighborhood, whose lively streets are peopled more by touts in skinny suits than by elegant women in kimonos.Two decades ago at Yama-no Chaya, my wife and I had our very own tatami room. At Kabuto, we shimmied onto two of the 11 chairs at the counter, the pair at the end, with no space for our knees (the others are somewhat roomier). There are also two small tables, but that counter is the place to be: you'll want to watch the chef and owner, Kazuo Iwai, haul live eels out of a basin, spike them to his cutting board and speedily fillet them just before skewering and grilling. He's mesmerizingly deft.Dinner started with a salted cabbage appetizer, then kushiyaki hitotoori, a sequence of skewered grilled eel parts, including delicate silky-textured livers and lightly crunchy heads. At some point each customer was offered the minuscule still-beating heart of a just-dispatched eel, perhaps as a good-natured challenge. Even following instructions and not chewing, and even with a quick beer chaser, these left a bitter taste in the mouth. But for the intrepid eater, it was a challenge not to be declined.The main course options include the familiar sweet-savory glazed eel (okabayaki) and something you don't see as often: unglazed eel (shirayaki), simply grilled over charcoal and served with salt on the side. Each is offered in small, medium and large portions (medium — toku — was just right). The grilling is done with keen attention, and the result is as impeccable as the surroundings are informal; the shirayaki, in particular, was a revelation in its clarity of flavor. Rice, homemade pickles and a clear soup with eel liver end the meal.If you don't speak Japanese, you'll need help making a reservation. We did it through our hotel, the Park Hyatt, whose concierge also printed out a local map and previewed the menu. But once you're there, the welcome is warm; one staff member speaks some English, and the goal is to make sure that everyone has a good time. We certainly did.Unagi Kabuto, 2-53-2 Ikebukuro, Toshima-ku, Tokyo; (81-3) 3983-8608. Dinner for two without drinks (tipping is not customary) is 9,500 yen, or $115, at 83 yen to the dollar. Cash only.
For the culinary-minded traveler, any visit to Tokyo should include a dinner of unagi — tender, unctuous grilled freshwater eel. There are genteel eel specialists, like the memorable Yama-no Chaya , which opened in the early 20th century on the leafy grounds of Hie-Jinja Shrine . By contrast, there's Unagi Kabuto, at 35 a relative newcomer: a friendly, charcoal-smoke-scented storefront in Tokyo's Ikebukuro neighborhood, whose lively streets are peopled more by touts in skinny suits than by elegant women in kimonos.Two decades ago at Yama-no Chaya, my wife and I had our very own tatami room. At Kabuto, we shimmied onto two of the 11 chairs at the counter, the pair at the end, with no space for our knees (the others are somewhat roomier). There are also two small tables, but that counter is the place to be: you'll want to watch the chef and owner, Kazuo Iwai, haul live eels out of a basin, spike them to his cutting board and speedily fillet them just before skewering and grilling. He's mesmerizingly deft.Dinner started with a salted cabbage appetizer, then kushiyaki hitotoori, a sequence of skewered grilled eel parts, including delicate silky-textured livers and lightly crunchy heads. At some point each customer was offered the minuscule still-beating heart of a just-dispatched eel, perhaps as a good-natured challenge. Even following instructions and not chewing, and even with a quick beer chaser, these left a bitter taste in the mouth. But for the intrepid eater, it was a challenge not to be declined.The main course options include the familiar sweet-savory glazed eel (okabayaki) and something you don't see as often: unglazed eel (shirayaki), simply grilled over charcoal and served with salt on the side. Each is offered in small, medium and large portions (medium — toku — was just right). The grilling is done with keen attention, and the result is as impeccable as the surroundings are informal; the shirayaki, in particular, was a revelation in its clarity of flavor. Rice, homemade pickles and a clear soup with eel liver end the meal.If you don't speak Japanese, you'll need help making a reservation. We did it through our hotel, the Park Hyatt, whose concierge also printed out a local map and previewed the menu. But once you're there, the welcome is warm; one staff member speaks some English, and the goal is to make sure that everyone has a good time. We certainly did.Unagi Kabuto, 2-53-2 Ikebukuro, Toshima-ku, Tokyo; (81-3) 3983-8608. Dinner for two without drinks (tipping is not customary) is 9,500 yen, or $115, at 83 yen to the dollar. Cash only.
TOKYO — The Japanese government approved emergency stimulus spending of more than $100 billion on Friday, part of an aggressive push by Prime Minister Shinzo Abe to kick-start growth in Japan's long-moribund economy.Mr. Abe also reiterated pressure on Japan's central bank to make a firmer commitment to stopping deflation by pumping more money into the economy — a measure the prime minister says is crucial to getting businesses to invest and consumers to spend."We will put an end to this shrinking, and aim to build a stronger economy where earnings and incomes can grow," Mr. Abe told a televised news conference. "For that, the government must first take the initiative to create demand, and boost the entire economy."Under the plan, the Japanese government will spend about 10.3 trillion yen (about $116 billion) on public works and disaster mitigation projects, subsidies for companies that invest in new technology and financial aid to small businesses.The government will seek to raise real economic growth by 2 percentage points and add 600,000 jobs to the economy, Mr. Abe said. The measures announced Friday amount to one of the largest spending plans in Japan's history, he stressed.By simply talking about stimulus measures, Mr. Abe, who took office late last month, has already driven down the value of the yen, much to the relief of Japanese exporters whose competitiveness benefits from a weaker currency.But the government's promises to spend its way out of economic stagnation also raise concerns over Japan's public debt, which has already mushroomed to twice the size of its economy and is the largest in the industrialized world.At the root of Japan's debt woes was a similar attempt in the 1990s by Mr. Abe's own Liberal Democratic Party to stimulate economic growth through government spending on extensive public works projects across the country.Mr. Abe said, however, that the spending this time around would be better focused to bring about growth through investment in innovation. He said the government would also invest in measures that would help mitigate the fall in Japan's population, by encouraging families to have more children."To grow in a sustainable way, we must help create a virtuous cycle where companies actively borrow and invest, and in so doing raise employment and incomes," Mr. Abe said."For that, it is extremely important that we adopt a growth strategy that gives everyone solid hope that the future of the Japanese economy lies in growth."
TOKYO — Japan's two largest airlines said Wednesday they would ground their fleets of Boeing 's new 787 aircraft, the Dreamliner , after one operated by All Nippon Airways made an emergency landing in western Japan.The 137 passengers and crew used emergency slides to exit the aircraft after possible battery trouble and smoke forced the ANA flight to Tokyo from Ube in western Japan to land at Takamatsu airport in southern Japan instead, according to the public broadcaster, NHK. One elderly passenger suffered a slight hip injury during the evacuation, NHK said.The emergency landing comes after a string of problems in the last month with the aircraft, including a battery fire, fuel leaks, and a cracked cockpit window.All Nippon said after Wednesday's incident that it was grounding all 17 of its Dreamliners for inspections. Japan Airlines said it would also temporarily ground the five Boeing 787s it still operates; two others are already undergoing safety checks.Akihiro Ota, Japan's transportation minister, said the emergency landing raised concerns over the Dreamliner's safety, and that he would dispatch safety officials to investigate. "I see this as a serious incident which could have led to a serious accident," Mr. Ota told reporters in Tokyo.All Nippon's vice president, Osamu Shinobe, told a reporters at a news conference at Tokyo's Haneda Airport, "I apologize for the grave concern and trouble we have caused our passengers, their families and others." He said the airline was still investigating.Federal authorities in the United States have also voiced concern about problems the new aircraft has faced but still endorsed it as a safe airplane.The Federal Aviation Administration last week ordered a comprehensive review of the 787's manufacturing and design, with a special focus on the plane's electrical systems. But in a news conference last Thursday, the Transportation Secretary, Ray LaHood, made no mention of a possible grounding of 787s.Still, the review is unusual and comes 15 months after the 787 entered service after a lengthy certification process by the F.A.A. It comes during a formal investigation by the National Transportation Safety Board into what caused a battery fire in a Japan Airlines plane that had flown to Boston from Tokyo last week.Late Tuesday in Tokyo, the N.T.S.B. said it was "currently in the process of gathering information about the B-787 emergency landing in Japan earlier today."Eight airlines now fly the 787: All Nippon Airways and Japan Airlines in Japan currently own 24 of the 50 delivered by Boeing since November 2011. The other operators are Air India, Ethiopian Airlines, Chile's LAN Airlines, Poland's LOT, Qatar Airways and United Airlines.Boeing has sought to ease concerns about the plane's design and reliability, and insisted it was no more trouble-prone than other new commercial airplane programs. The 787 relies more on electrical systems than previous generations of airplanes. Electrical systems, not mechanical ones, operate hydraulic pumps, de-ice the wings, pressurize the cabin and handle other tasks. The plane also has electric brakes instead of hydraulic ones.While problems are common with early models — including with the first Airbus A380, the Boeing 777 or even the first 747s — analysts say the issue could become a growing embarrassment for Boeing if travelers or airlines begin to lose confidence in the plane.So far, safety experts said that the problems with the 787 pointed more to teething problems than structural faults. But the problem is more than just one of reputation for Boeing: the plane maker has said it expects to sell 5,000 787s in the next 20 years, but analysts believe it will be years before it breaks even because of delays.
TOKYO — A top American diplomat called Thursday for "cooler heads to prevail" in an emotional quarrel over disputed islands that has raised tensions in Asia, and he urged the leaders of China and Japan to begin private consultations to avoid a potentially dangerous escalation.The diplomat, Kurt M. Campbell, the assistant secretary of state for East Asia and Pacific affairs, also urged Japan's new prime minister, Shinzo Abe, to hold behind-the-scenes talks with South Korea to defuse a separate territorial dispute as well as disagreements over history that have driven a wedge between the two countries, the United States' two closest allies in the region.Mr. Campbell led a delegation that included officials from the Pentagon and White House who are among the highest-ranking Americans to visit Japan and South Korea since conservative, pro-Washington leaders won elections in both nations last month. The delegation arrived here in Tokyo on Wednesday after a two-day visit to the South Korean capital, Seoul, where Mr. Campbell met the president-elect, Park Geun-hye.Mr. Campbell said the delegation took time to consult on the fast-moving crisis in Algeria that started when gunmen seized hostages at a gas plant, including Americans and at least three Japanese citizens. He said American and Japanese officials were "in very close, hourly consultations" on the issue.The main goal of the Asian mission appeared to be coordinating a mutual response to China's increasingly assertive claims in regional waters, as well to the recent launching of a long-range rocket by North Korea. Japanese officials said talks on Thursday focused on Japan's continuing standoff with China over the uninhabited island group, known as the Senkaku in Japan and Diaoyu in Chinese, that are at the center of the dispute.Tensions appeared to rise last week after fighter jets from both nations tailed each other in airspace near the islands, raising fears in Washington of a mishap growing into a full-blown military clash that could embroil the United States, which is obligated by treaty to come to Japan's defense."We've made very clear our desire to see cooler heads prevail and the maintenance of peace and stability over all," Mr. Campbell told reporters. At the same time, he said the United States would not serve as mediator — a sign, analysts said, that Washington wanted to avoid getting drawn too far into the thorny regional disputes.That stance has drawn criticism in Japan, China and South Korea that the United States is not taking enough responsibility for conflicts it helped create by drawing the current borders after breaking up the Japanese empire at the end of World War II.In Tokyo, analysts and politicians said the Americans' visit was also aimed at soothing ruffled feathers after the Obama administration turned down a request by Mr. Abe to visit Washington this month, in what was viewed by some Japanese as an embarrassing rebuff for the new prime minister. American officials said they had simply asked that the visit be delayed until new secretaries of state and defense had assumed their duties.Japanese officials said the Americans also made what amounted to a shopping list of requests before a summit meeting in Washington was possible, including progress on a long-stalled agreement to relocate an air base on Okinawa. The Americans were sent to Tokyo "to communicate the firm commitment of the Obama administration to continuing to strengthen the U.S.-Japan alliance," said another member of the delegation, Daniel R. Russel, the National Security Council's senior director for Asia.The delegation also praised the Abe administration's efforts to strengthen ties with the United States. At Japan's request, the two nations began talks on Thursday on updating guidelines that were written in 1997 to govern how the American and Japanese militaries would cooperate during a crisis, Japanese officials said.Another goal was to privately urge that the hawkish Mr. Abe not worsen ties with South Korea by revising official apologies made by Japan in the 1990s to victims of its early 20th-century militarism, analysts and Japanese politicians said.Those concerns were raised in September when Mr. Abe vowed during an internal party election to revise a 1993 apology to so-called comfort women from Korea and elsewhere who were forced into sexual servitude for Japan's wartime military. Like many on Japan's right, Mr. Abe rejects the claim by many historians and the South Korean government that the Japanese military had a direct role in coercing the women to become sexual slaves.The emotionally charged issue of the women helped lead to the recent deterioration of ties between Japan and South Korea. South Korean officials say anger at Japan's refusal to officially compensate the women was what drove President Lee Myung-bak to pay a visit over the summer to the islands controlled by South Korea but claimed by both countries, which in turn provoked outrage in Japan.When asked whether he raised the sexual slave issue in his talks with Japanese officials, Mr. Campbell said, "We support the efforts that the Japanese government has taken to reach out to South Korea," an apparent reference to a special emissary whom Mr. Abe sent to Seoul this month to mend fences by meeting with the incoming president.
TOKYO — Toyota Motor sold a record 9.75 million vehicles last year, the company said Monday, moving past General Motors and Volkswagen to reclaim its title as the world's top-selling automaker in 2012.G.M., which held the top spot in 2011, sold 9.29 million vehicles last year. It had been the top-selling automaker for decades before losing its lead to Toyota in 2008.Volkswagen sold 9.1 million vehicles last year, a record for the German automaker, which has expanded its presence in emerging markets. VW also outsold Toyota in 2011.Toyota estimated last month that it sold 9.7 million vehicles for the year, and final figures released Monday were slightly higher.By recovering its No. 1 title, Toyota cements a strong comeback from several years of tumbles.A sharp slowdown in exports during the global economic crisis led to the automaker's biggest loss in decades while controversy over its handling of recalls greatly tarnished its image for quality and reliability.In 2011, the earthquake and tsunami in Japan, as well as widespread flooding in Thailand later that year, disrupted production, weighing on sales in important markets like the United States and pushing Toyota to No. 3 in global sales.Toyota recovered in 2012, however, as production rebounded and the automaker went on an offensive to win back market share. Toyota sales in the United States surged 27 percent, to 2.08 million vehicles. In Japan, sales rose 35 percent, to 2.41 million vehicles, helped by government incentives for fuel-efficient cars.Those increases were enough to offset a decline in sales in China, where Japanese businesses have been hurt by consumer boycotts stemming from a bitter territorial dispute between the two countries. In Europe, sales of Toyota cars rose by 2 percent.
TOKYO — Japanese investigators studying the batteries that have grounded Boeing 's 787 fleet said on Monday that they had found no immediate quality control problems at the batteries' manufacturer.The investigators said they would now turn their inquiry to the maker of a device that monitors the batteries.Japan's Transport Ministry said it had wrapped up its eight-day on-site investigation at GS Yuasa, the maker of the lithium-ion batteries at the center of the inquiry. Officials stressed, however, that the cause of the recent battery malfunctions was still unknown, and that GS Yuasa remained under investigation.GS Yuasa made the batteries that overheated during an All Nippon Airways flight this month in Japan, prompting an emergency landing. That incident came just days after another GS Yuasa battery on a parked Japan Airlines plane caught fire at Boston's Logan Airport. The incidents prompted regulators worldwide to ground all 787s, and Boeing to halt deliveries.It is still unclear whether the mishaps were caused by the batteries or by another part of the aircraft's complex electronics. On Monday, the Ministry of Transport said inspectors would begin a review of Kanto Aircraft Instrument, outside Tokyo, which makes the unit that measures the battery's voltage, current, temperature and other parameters."We do not know where the problems lie, so we are simply doing checks in order," said an official at the ministry's Civil Aviation Bureau who spoke on condition of anonymity.He said it was too early to say that inspectors had ruled out GS Yuasa as the source of the battery's malfunctions or that they would not be back for further review."We have seen what we needed to see for now, and are moving on, but that does not mean that there was definitely no problem with the battery," the official said.He said that at Kanto Aircraft, officials would check manufacturing processes for quality control breaches.Kanto Aircraft officials could not immediately be reached for comment. GS Yuasa said it could not comment on ongoing investigations.The United States National Transportation Safety Board, which is also investigating the batteries, has already completed an examination of the monitoring unit at Kanto Aircraft.The American-led team examined the circuit boards that monitor the batteries, but found the boards were damaged and that limited the information the team could obtain. The team "found no significant discoveries," the board said in a news release.Plagued by production delays, the 787 Dreamliner finally went into service last year as Boeing's next-generation, state-of-the-art aircraft made of lightweight composite materials that greatly improve the jet's fuel efficiency. The 787 also relies far more than previous aircraft on electronic systems, including lithium-ion batteries, which are lighter but more prone to overheating.In a separate development, the Reuters news agency reported that Japan's government had eased the way for the new aircraft in 2008 by making concessions on safety regulations and fast-tracking the jet's rollout. The report cited records and participants in the process."I believe the request for the changes came initially from the airlines. Ultimately, it was a discussion of measures to lower operating costs for the airlines," Masatoshi Harigae, head of aviation at Japan's Aerospace Exploration Agency, told the news service.There was no suggestion, however, that looser regulatory standards contributed to the problems now facing the Dreamliner, the report said.
TOKYO — Prime Minister Shinzo Abe of Japan said Saturday that he would not immediately ask the Okinawan authorities for approval to begin constructing a long-stalled American air base, casting doubt on his government's hopes to show progress in a troubled base-relocation plan ahead of his planned trip to Washington later this month.In a meeting on Okinawa, Mr. Abe told the Okinawan governor, Hidekazu Nakaima, that his government still wanted to go ahead with the plan to relocate the base, the Marine Corps Air Station Futenma, to a site in northern Okinawa. However, in an apparent concession to Okinawa opposition, Mr. Abe said he would not ask the governor for a key construction permit before going to the United States, as some in Mr. Abe's government had hoped to do.The lack of progress in implementing the 17-year-old deal has strained ties between the United States and Japan, its largest Asian ally, at a time when both nations face the challenge of China's rising military might. Mr. Abe, who took office in December with promises to patch up ties with Washington, had apparently hoped to restart the stalled plan ahead of his first meeting with President Obama, now likely to be held on Feb. 20 or 21.Some members of Mr. Abe's government had hoped to do this by formally asking the Okinawan governor for permission to begin land reclamation, a crucial step toward building the new base near the coastal village of Henoko. But Mr. Abe, after a one-hour meeting on Saturday with the Okinawan governor, said he would not ask for that permission ahead of the summit meeting.Instead, Mr. Abe seemed to strike a more pragmatic tone, saying that he would work to regain Okinawan trust in the central government, which he said had been damaged when the previous prime minister, Yukio Hatoyama, reneged on his promises four years ago to relocate the base off the island. The governor, Mr. Nakaima, said that he still urged Mr. Abe to move the base off the island, citing the depth of local opposition.
TOKYO — The governor of the Japanese central bank, Masaaki Shirakawa, said on Tuesday that he had offered to step down on March 19, three weeks before the end of his term, under intense government pressure on the bank to take bolder steps to resuscitate the deflationary economy.Prime Minister Shinzo Abe is expected to replace Mr. Shirakawa, who has long preached caution on monetary policy, with a successor who is more open to printing money, stoking inflation and bringing an end to the falling prices that have weighed on Japan.During his five-year term, Mr. Shirakawa resisted calls from successive governments to be more aggressive, warning that loose money would only lead to unchecked government spending and runaway inflation. Mr. Shirakawa also argued that the government, not the Bank of Japan, needed to do more to encourage economic growth through structural reforms and other growth policies.Since late last year, Mr. Abe has taken the bank to task, singling out its tepid monetary policies as the root of Japan's economic woes. He successfully campaigned on a bolder monetary agenda ahead of nationwide elections in December, arguing that the central bank needed to set an inflation target of 2 to 3 percent. The strategy resulted in a decisive victory for his Liberal Democratic Party.Markets cheered Mr. Abe's monetary drive. The Nikkei 225-share index has surged almost 30 percent since mid-November, and the yen has weakened by 15 percent, an advantage for Japanese exporters.Mr. Shirakawa has found it increasingly difficult to hold his ground. In January, the bank agreed to issue a rare joint statement with the government that laid out a target for 2 percent inflation. It also agreed to pursue unlimited monetary easing through an asset purchase program until that target was met. Japan has been enduring deflation, or falling prices, since the late 1990s.But some economists have said that Mr. Shirakawa's policies remained too timid and that unless the Bank of Japan were even more aggressive, 2 percent inflation would prove to be an elusive target. The bank needed to expand its asset purchase program, now at about 101 trillion yen, or about $1.01 trillion, by a much bigger amount, the economists have said, and needed to step up its purchases of a wider range of assets including longer-term government bonds."After three five-year terms of dyed-in-the-wool conservatives, the Bank of Japan is finally likely to have a governor who is prepared to use the monetary armory at his disposal," Nicholas Smith, Japan strategist at CLSA Asia-Pacific Markets, said in a note.Even using tougher language than the soft-spoken Mr. Shirakawa would help, Mr. Smith said. "The more you do with threatening rhetoric, the less you have to do with real money," he said.Speaking to reporters Tuesday, Mr. Shirakawa explained that he had offered to step down early to time his departure from the bank with those of his two deputies, whose terms end March 19."I told the prime minister that I will resign on March 19 so that a structure with a new governor and two deputy governors can start simultaneously," Mr. Shirakawa said after a meeting of the government's top economic council. He said that Mr. Abe, who led the council meeting, had "listened carefully," but it was unclear late Tuesday whether the prime minister would agree to an early departure.Names circulated in the Japanese news media as possible candidates to succeed Mr. Shirakawa include the former economy minister Heizo Takenaka; the former Bank of Japan deputy governors Kazumasa Iwata and Toshiro Muto; the Asian Development Bank president, Haruhiko Kuroda; and the University of Tokyo economist Takatoshi Ito.
TOKYO — Lifted by strong sales in the United States and a weaker yen, Toyota Motor on Tuesday raised its profit forecast for the full financial year by 10 percent, to 860 billion yen, as the company, the world's largest automaker, recorded a return to profit levels it has not seen in years.Toyota said net profit was 99.9 billion yen, or $1.1 billion, in the three months through December, a 23.5 percent increase from results a year earlier, when the effects of the Japanese tsunami still weighed on its business.Sales for the quarter climbed 26 percent, to 16.2 trillion yen, helped by a surge of almost 50 percent in sales of the company's fuel-efficient vehicles in the United States.Cost reductions at the automaker, already known for its lean production, saved 320 billion yen during the quarter, the company said in a statement.Now Toyota, whose Super Bowl ad "Wish Granted" topped viewership rankings, is set to get a wish of its own: the weaker yen, brought about by the economic policies of Prime Minister Shinzo Abe, who took office late last year, is set to lift Toyota's bottom line even further.A weak currency helps Toyota because it lowers the cost of producing in Japan and inflates the yen value of overseas profits. Toyota is poised to get a particularly big lift from the weak yen because it manufactures more cars at home than its domestic rivals. Last year, Toyota made 53 percent of its vehicles in Japan and exported more than half of those cars.Toyota shares have risen by almost 50 percent since mid-November, when the yen started to weaken. The currency has weakened by about 15 percent during the same period.In 2013, Toyota expects to sell 9.91 million vehicles, improving on its record of 9.75 million last year, which helped it regain its crown as the world's top-selling automaker from General Motors. Those sales figures include Daihatsu Motor and Hino Motors, which are part of Toyota Group.Such a performance could help Toyota get closer to the 1.7 trillion yen in net profit it reported in 2008, before the global financial crisis decimated its earnings.Since then, a recall scandal, natural disasters and a strong yen have hindered a full comeback. But the combined challenges have also led executives at the 75-year-old automaker to revamp quality control, cut costs and take more risks with design."We believe that our efforts have been bearing fruit," Takahiko Ijichi, Toyota's senior managing officer, said in the statement on Tuesday. "We are finally on the road to sustainable growth."
TOKYO (AP) — Japan's economy remained mired in recession late last year, shrinking 0.4 percent in annualized terms for the third straight quarter of contraction on feeble demand at home and overseas.The government reported Thursday that growth for all of 2012 was 1.9 percent, after a 0.6 percent contraction in 2011 and a 4.7 percent increase in 2010 and a 5.5 percent contraction in 2009.The figures were worse than expected, as many analysts had forecast the economy may have emerged from recession late last year as the Japanese yen weakened against other major currencies, giving a boost to Japanese export manufacturers.Prime Minister Shinzo Abe, who took office in late December, is championing aggressive spending and monetary stimulus to help get growth back on track. He has lobbied the central bank to set an inflation target of 2 percent, aimed at breaking out of Japan's long bout of deflation, or falling prices, that he says are inhibiting corporate investment and growth.But the Bank of Japan was not expected to announce any major new initiatives from a policy meeting on Thursday. The current central bank governor, Masaaki Shirakawa, is due to leave office on March 19, and Mr. Abe is expected to appoint as his successor an expert who favors his more activist approach to monetary policy.Last year began on an upbeat note with annual growth in the first quarter at 6 percent as strong government spending on reconstruction from the March 2011 tsunami disaster helped spur demand. But the economy contracted in the second quarter and deteriorated further as frictions with China over a territorial dispute hurt exports to one of Japan's largest overseas markets.Despite the dismal data for last year, many in Japan expect at least a temporary bump to growth from higher government spending on public works and other programs. An index measuring consumer confidence, released this week, jumped to its highest level since 2007, the biggest increase in a single month.
TOKYO — The recent monetary push by Japan does not amount to currency manipulation and is a legitimate and much-needed effort to lift its economy out of deflation, the country's central banker said on Thursday after new figures showed an unexpected economic contraction in the fourth quarter."Monetary policy seeks only to stabilize the economy," Masaaki Shirakawa, the governor of the Bank of Japan, told reporters in Tokyo after the bank decided to stand pat on policy moves for now, maintaining its benchmark rate goal of zero to 0.1 percent and holding off on expansion of an asset-buying program. "It does not seek to influence currencies."Earlier Thursday, gross domestic product numbers from the government showed the Japanese economy remained fragile, shrinking at an annualized rate of 0.4 percent in the October-to-December quarter, the third consecutive quarter of contraction.Still, economists expect a Japanese economic recovery to gain steam later this year as Prime Minister Shinzo Abe of Japan pursues fresh fiscal stimulus programs while maintaining pressure on the central bank to stick to near-zero interest rates and continue to flood the economy with money.Markets have jumped since Mr. Abe began pushing his agenda in mid-November as part of a successful campaign that put his Liberal Democratic Party back in power for the first time since 2009. Over the last three months, the Nikkei 225-share index has risen 30 percent, while the yen has weakened by 15 percent against the dollar.Last month, the government and central bank promised to work together on monetary policies until Japan achieved 2 percent inflation, a lofty goal for the country, which has been mired for more than a decade in deflation, a damaging decline in prices.Mr. Shirakawa is set to end his five-year term next month, and Mr. Abe has signaled that he will appoint a successor who will be more aggressive in fighting deflation.But increasing the Japanese monetary supply to end deflation would also weaken the yen, which Japanese policy makers have openly welcomed as a boon to the country's exporters. That has led to grumbling from officials in the European Union and elsewhere that Japan was manipulating its currency to give its exports an unfair edge.On Tuesday, the Group of 7 advanced economies, which includes Japan, pledged to let markets determine the value of their currencies. The statement brought relief in Japan because it was not singled out for criticism and also signaled that the prospect of competitive currency devaluations would be up for debate at the meeting this week in Moscow of finance officials from the Group of 20 leading economies.The finance minister, Taro Aso, vowed to defend Japan against any claims of manipulation at the Group of 20, saying on Thursday on his Web site that "the world had been awed" by Japan's recent economic policy moves, which were "the subject of global attention.""Other countries want to know how we have done this. It is absolutely not a result of us intervening in foreign exchange markets," he said.
Last fall, two newly minted female lieutenants joined about 100 men in Quantico, Va., for one of the most grueling experiences that soldiers not in war can experience: the Marine Corps' Infantry Officer Course.During the 86-day course, candidates haul heavy packs and even heavier weapons up and down steep hills, execute ambushes and endure bitter cold, hunger and exhaustion. Uncertainty abounds: they do not know their next task, or even how long they will have to perform it. At I.O.C., calm leadership under duress is more important than physical strength, although strength is essential.One of the women — the first to enter the course — was dropped on the first day with about two dozen men during a notoriously strenuous endurance test. But the second woman lasted deep into the second week, when a stress fracture in her leg forced her to quit."She was tough," Gen. James F. Amos, the Marine Corps commandant, said of the woman, who is now at flight school. "She wasn't going to quit."General Amos hopes that the experiences of those women, and others to come, will provide crucial clues about the future of women in the infantry, a possibility allowed by the recent lifting of the 1994 ban on women in direct combat units.For the Marine Corps, probably more than any other military service, gender integration is a difficult affair. Not only is the corps the most male of the services, with women making up only about 7 percent of its ranks, but it is also a bastion of the infantry. Nearly one in five Marines are "grunts," proud of their iconic history of bloody ground battles, from Belleau Wood to Iwo Jima to Chosin Reservoir to Falluja.Not surprisingly, the idea of women in the infantry draws sharp questions from many active-duty Marines and veterans, who express concerns that standards will be diluted for women.In an interview, General Amos acknowledged hearing those worries and insisted that the corps would not lower its standards. To guarantee that, he plans to use the course, which Marines consider the gold standard of infantry training, to study the performance of potential female infantry officers and then use that data to develop requirements for enlisted infantry Marines.In March, two Naval Academy graduates will become the second set of women to enter the course. Over the coming years, General Amos is counting on dozens more female volunteers to provide him with enough information to decide whether women can make it in the infantry. The outcome, he says, is far from certain."I think there is absolutely no reason to think our females can't be tankers, or be amtrackers, or be artillery Marines," he said, referring to tracked amphibious assault vehicles. "The infantry is different."General Amos said that if too few women were able, or willing, to join the infantry, he or his successor might ask the secretary of defense to keep the infantry closed to women. The deadline for that request is January 2016."You could reach the point where you say, 'It's not worth it,' " General Amos said. "The numbers are so infinitesimally small, it's not worth it."Advocates for women in the military would almost certainly protest any effort to keep the Marines infantry male only. Those advocates acknowledge the harshness of infantry life: carrying heavy loads on foot for long distances and enduring spartan environments are requisite. But they say that properly trained women will make it through I.O.C. and, eventually, whatever program the corps creates for screening and training enlisted infantrywomen.Even if very few women pass I.O.C., enlisted women should still be allowed to join male-led infantry units, said Greg Jacob, a former Marine officer who is the policy director for the Service Women's Action Network, an advocacy group."Leadership is leadership," Mr. Jacob said. "You don't need a female leader to lead female Marines."General Amos, a fighter pilot, opposes doing that, saying enlisted female Marines will do best if they have female officers as mentors. "I'm not going to bring in 18-year-old females and put them in an infantry battalion when I've got no female officers," he said. "I can't do that."In the coming months, the most pressing task for all of the armed services will be establishing gender-neutral requirements for every combat job, known as military occupational specialties. Of the 340 job categories in the Marine Corps, 32 had been closed to women under the 1994 ban.The Marine Corps has set out a two-tiered process for creating those requirements: one short-term for armor, artillery, combat engineering and low-altitude air defense units, and a longer-term one for the infantry.
TOKYO — Since taking office less than two months ago, Japan 's outspokenly hawkish new prime minister, Shinzo Abe , has been in what some political analysts are calling "safe driving mode." He has carefully avoided saying or doing anything to provoke other Asian nations, while focusing instead on wooing voters with steps to revive the moribund domestic economy.So far, his approach seems to be working. His plans for public-works projects, stimulus measures called "Abenomics," have sent the Tokyo stock market surging along with Mr. Abe's own approval rating, which is now at 71 percent, according to the latest poll by Yomiuri Shimbun. On Friday, he will seek to build on his strong start when he meets President Obama at a Washington summit meeting aimed at improving relations with the United States, which regards Japan as its most important ally in Asia.Mr. Abe, 58, has said he wants to be what Japan has not seen in almost a decade: a steady-handed leader who lasts long enough in office to actually get things done. Analysts say his success hinges on whether he can lead his Liberal Democratic Party to victory in upper house elections in July, and end the split Parliament that undermined many of his predecessors.What is less clear is what he will do if he wins that election. One trait that makes Mr. Abe a bit of an enigma, some analysts say, is that he seems to have two sides: the realist and the right-wing ideologue. In analysts' view, if he does jettison some of his current caution, for instance by trying to revise Japan's antiwar Constitution to allow a full-fledged military instead of its current Self-Defense Force, he risks provoking a standoff with China over disputed islands, and possibly isolating Japan in a region still sensitive to its early-20th-century militarism."In his first six weeks, he has done everything he can to show he is a moderate," said Andrew L. Oros, director of international studies at Washington College in Chestertown, Md. "But after July, he might feel he has a freer rein to do things that he thinks are justified."Part of the problem, Mr. Oros and others say, is that Mr. Abe faces conflicting political pressures. His base in the governing party's most conservative wing expects bold steps to end what it sees as Japan's overly prolonged displays of contrition for World War II. But he must also convince the broader public that he is a coolheaded, competent steward of a declining nation that also depends on China for its economic future.There is also the ghost of his past failure. The last time he was prime minister, six years ago, he stepped down amid criticism that he had been "clueless" for having pursued a nationalistic agenda of revising the Constitution and history textbooks, and for not doing more to reduce unemployment and spur the economy.This time, Mr. Abe is acting with the determined carefulness of a man given a second chance. He has focused on extricating Japan from its recession with steps that have quickly buoyed the country's economy, the world's third-largest. Since being named prime minister after his party's election victory in December, Mr. Abe has promised $215 billion in public works spending to create jobs and promote growth.He has also publicly pressured the central bank, the Bank of Japan, to move more aggressively to end years of corrosive price declines known as deflation — threatening, for example, to amend the law on the bank's independence if it does not reach its target of 2 percent inflation. The bank's governor, Masaaki Shirakawa, announced this month that he would step aside to allow Mr. Abe to appoint a new chief who will work more closely with the government by pumping more money into the economy to prompt banks to lend more and companies to spend more."Mr. Abe has clearly learned the lessons of his past failure," said Norihiko Narita, a political scientist at Surugadai University, near Tokyo. "And the biggest lesson is that voters care more about the economy."
WASHINGTON — President Obama and Japan 's new prime minister, Shinzo Abe , met at the White House on Friday to show that their countries were putting relations back on solid footing after several years of friction, and at a time when the allies face the challenge of an increasingly powerful China.Their meeting yielded no announcements of major policy changes, and the leaders did not even address publicly whether Japan would speed the relocation of an important United States military base on Okinawa. But the summit suggested at least the potential for a warming, with the administration adding a White House luncheon including Vice President Joseph R. Biden to extend the leaders' time together.And a joint statement hinted at an opening that could give Mr. Abe political cover, once back in Tokyo, to push for Japan's participation in talks toward an Asia-Pacific trade agreement among democracies in the region struggling against China's growing economic clout.Japan is central to Mr. Obama's effort to shift America's focus toward the Pacific Rim after years of preoccupation with war and with counterterrorism efforts in the Middle East and North Africa. And Mr. Abe, whose country is embroiled in an increasingly nasty territorial dispute with China, signaled his eagerness to maintain a close relationship with the United States, reversing signs sent by one of his recent predecessors who suggested Tokyo should pull back a little from Washington.Mr. Abe is the fifth Japanese prime minister Mr. Obama has dealt with as president, a turnover reflecting the nation's years of economic and political instability that has, in turn, complicated relations between Washington and its biggest Asian ally."Japan is one of our closest allies, and the U.S.-Japan alliance is the central foundation for our regional security and so much of what we do in the Pacific region," Mr. Obama told reporters when they were allowed briefly into the Oval Office during a meeting with Mr. Abe.Mr. Abe, sitting beside him near the fireplace, said, "I think I can declare with confidence that the trust and the bond in our alliance is back."Both leaders said they had agreed on the need for what Mr. Obama called "strong actions" against North Korea's latest rebuff to the global community — last week's underground nuclear test. Mr. Abe spoke of possible financial sanctions, and also said that the two allies would press the United Nations for a resolution calling for further international penalties.With Japan also concerned about China's claims to a group of Japanese-controlled islands, Mr. Abe said: "When we look at the security environment in the Asia Pacific, it's becoming more and more difficult. And we need to create an order in this region based on cooperation between our two countries to secure the freedom of the seas and to secure a region which is governed based on laws, not on force."Mr. Abe also seemed to move closer to committing Japan to join the United States and other Pacific Rim nations in negotiating the regional free-trade agreement — and in a way that seemed intended to satisfy both leaders' separate domestic political concerns. The proposed Trans-Pacific Partnership has been a priority of Mr. Obama's economic and foreign policy agenda since late 2011.While Mr. Abe's advisers have said he has personally favored joining the talks, in keeping with his emphasis on an economic stimulus program that has become known as "Abenomics" in Tokyo, he faces domestic political risks: Mr. Abe regained office less than two months ago, and his party faces critical parliamentary elections in July, when it will need the support of rice farmers skeptical of more open markets.In a joint statement, the two governments agreed that if Japan does participate in the trade talks, there would be no exemptions stopping discussions on any products, a starting point the United States had insisted upon. But the statement also recognized "that both countries have bilateral trade sensitivities, such as certain agricultural products for Japan and certain manufactured products for the United States" and held that Japan would not have to commit to ending all tariffs upon joining the talks. Even so, the goal of the trade talks is a comprehensive agreement that eliminates tariffs.
TOKYO — Ayaka Okumura was barely pregnant when she began fretting over how she would hold on to the management job that would have been out of reach just a generation ago, when Japanese women were often relegated to dead-end "office lady" jobs pouring tea and greeting guests.From the start, Ms. Okumura had a crucial advantage over the many American women who despair of "having it all." The Japanese government subsidizes thousands of day care centers nationwide for families of all income levels, and it demands that caregivers pass rigorous exams in child care that usually require two years of special schooling.But the quality of the public day care network — and a growing shortage of slots as more women entered the work force — has created its own set of seemingly intractable problems. Increasingly desperate women are forced into an annual competition for day care slots that is grueling enough to merit its own name, "hokatsu," and is said by some to surpass the notorious, stress-filled job hunt endured by Japanese college students.Ms. Okumura is now a weary veteran of that day care campaign.For months, as her stomach grew larger, the mother-to-be, then 30, trudged from day care center to day care center, some public and some private, in what little time she could manage away from her job, putting her name on waiting lists that were sometimes more than 200 names long.By the time she gave birth to her daughter, Ayane, late last year, she had toured 44 sites in Tokyo — her last scheduled visit was on her due date, but she canceled when she started getting contractions."I'm going to lose my mind," she said as she walked one day from a child care center squeezed between two high-rises. "Why does finding day care have to be this difficult?"In rapidly aging Japan, such hand-wringing is no longer limited to parents. Some government officials have begun to label the shortage of day care spots a crisis that threatens to undermine attempts to re-energize Japan's listless economy by keeping its large pool of young, highly educated women from paychecks that could help increase domestic spending.More worrisome, experts say, is that a lack of openings — especially at more affordable public nurseries — could convince more women that they should forgo having more than one child or lead them to have no children at all, depressing a birthrate that is already among the lowest in the world.But with a public debt more than twice the size of its economy and a concentration of public spending on the growing ranks of elderly Japanese, it is unlikely that the problem will be fixed any time soon. A rapid succession of governments in recent years has not helped; in just five years, 13 different ministers have been responsible for dealing with the low birthrate.At the root of the problem, women's rights advocates say, is that working mothers now face two levels of hurdles: a new demographic trend that works against them and an old bias toward stay-at-home mothers. Like many women interviewed for this article, Ms. Okumura made most of her visits to day care centers alone because in Japan fathers generally consider finding child care to be a mother's responsibility."I get asked: Is your work so important that you have to put your baby in child care? Why are you being so self-centered?" said Mariko Saito, who works for a pharmaceuticals company in Tokyo and campaigns for more day care options. "But I'm not working for myself. I'm working to support my family, just like my husband."When Japan set up its modern public day care system after World War II, the authorities expected it to serve people who might have nowhere else to turn, like single mothers. For a time, analysts say, that was good enough, especially as well-paid "salarymen" were able to support their families alone.Then with the bursting of the "bubble economy" in the early 1990s, young men found it harder to secure stable, high-paying work. Wives who stepped into the breach began to push the boundaries of employment, finding jobs they were less willing to part with at the first sign of a baby bump.But unlike many American women, young Japanese mothers had few options unless their own parents could help out. Few families feel comfortable with baby-sitting shares in a culture in which inviting strangers into the home is unusual. And with the hurdles to immigration high, foreign-born nannies are a rarity.
TOKYO — Japan will begin restarting its idled nuclear plants after new safety guidelines are in place later this year, Prime Minister Shinzo Abe said Thursday, moving to ensure a stable energy supply despite public safety concerns after the Fukushima disaster.In a speech to Parliament, Mr. Abe pledged to restart nuclear plants that pass the tougher guidelines, which are expected to be adopted by a new independent watchdog agency, the Nuclear Regulation Authority, as early as July. He did not specify when any of the reactors might resume operation, and news reports have suggested that it might take months or even years to make the expensive upgrades needed to meet the new safety standards.Still, by making the promise in front of the Diet, Mr. Abe indicated in the strongest way yet that he planned to move ahead with a campaign pledge to reverse his predecessor's hopes that Japan would begin weaning itself off nuclear energy.The speech came as the World Health Organization published a comprehensive, two-year analysis on the health risks associated with the 2011 disaster suggesting that the chance of getting certain types of cancers had increased slightly among children exposed to the highest doses of radioactivity. But the report said that there would most likely be no observable increase in cancer rates in the wider Japanese population.The study's authors warned, however, that their assessment was based on limited scientific knowledge; much of the data on health effects from radiation is based on acute exposures like those that followed the bombings of Hiroshima and Nagasaki and not chronic, low-level exposure. Near the Fukushima plant, some densely populated areas are expected to remain contaminated with relatively low levels of radioactive materials for decades.The government's initial reaction to the report — saying it overestimated the risks by failing to fully take into account government evacuations of citizens — suggested that officials did not see it as a help for Mr. Abe's plans. Antinuclear sentiments in Japan are now strong, and the results could feed fears of any increased risks.The question of when, and whether, to restart the plants has dogged the country for two years, as politicians and ordinary Japanese try to balance their fears of a moribund economy when oil and gas costs have already hurt the balance of trade and worries over another environmental crisis, especially if the industry is not well regulated.Lax regulation and a cozy relationship between the nuclear industry and the government helped make Japan vulnerable to the Fukushima accident, the world's second-worst nuclear plant disaster.All of Japan's 50 operable nuclear reactors were shut down following the March 2011 triple meltdown, which spewed radiation across northern Japan after a huge earthquake and tsunami knocked out vital cooling systems. Two were later restarted as an emergency measure to avert power shortages in the heavily populated region that includes the cities of Osaka and Kyoto.Leaders from the previous Democratic Party government had vowed to slowly phase out nuclear power by the 2030s in favor of cleaner alternatives like solar and wind power. But Mr. Abe, who took power after his Liberal Democratic Party won national elections in December on a platform of economic revitalization, said the phaseout would keep Japan from the cheap electricity it needs to compete economically.On Thursday, Mr. Abe said that Japan had learned the need for tougher safety standards, and he said the new standards would be enforced "without compromise."Mr. Abe also said Japan would continue seeking energy alternatives to reduce its dependence on nuclear power.In January, the new nuclear agency released a list of its proposed safety regulations, which include higher walls to protect against tsunamis, additional backup power sources for the cooling systems and construction of specially hardened earthquake-proof command centers. The rules surprised many for their toughness, though skeptics worry that industry supporters in the government will manage to get around the regulations.According to a report by the newspaper Asahi Shimbun, none of Japan's 16 undamaged commercial nuclear plants would pass the new standards. The agency has said the new guidelines will be finalized and put in place by July 18.The W.H.O. study focused on cancer incidence, not deaths, and some of the cancers listed are serious but have good rates of survival.According to the study, girls exposed as infants to radioactivity in the most contaminated regions of Fukushima Prefecture faced a 70 percent higher risk of developing thyroid cancer than would be expected normally. The report pointed out, however, that the normal risk of thyroid cancer was just 0.75 percent, and that the additional lifetime risk would raise that to 1.25 percent.Girls exposed to radioactivity as infants in the most heavily contaminated areas also had a 6 percent higher risk of developing breast cancer, and a 4 percent higher risk of developing cancers that cause tumors. Meanwhile, boys exposed as infants had a 7 percent higher chance of developing leukemia.The study also said that about a third of the emergency workers who remained to try to stabilize the Fukushima Daiichi plant were estimated to have a slightly increased risk of developing leukemia, thyroid cancer and other types of cancer.The analysis was based on data available as of September 2011, and takes into account airborne contamination as well as contaminated food, water and other sources of contamination, the WH.O. said.Some local government officials in Fukushima criticized the report for identifying specific areas and their associated exposure estimates. Radiation exposure is a sensitive topic in Japan, where victims of the Hiroshima and Nagasaki bombings often experienced discrimination in marriage, for example, because of feared health effects."I feel extreme anger over this excessive analysis, which will plunge more residents into fear," Mayor Norio Kanno of Iitate Village, told N.H.K. Iitate was one of the areas identified in the W.H.O. report as heavily contaminated. Villagers there are among tens of thousands of evacuees who have not been able to return home.
The third World Baseball Classic begins Saturday in Fukuoka, Japan, and Taichung, Taiwan. All of the countries that have reached the championship game will be at those sites. Some of the players whom fans might expect will not.Japan has won both championship games, over Cuba in 2006 and South Korea in 2009. Yet none of the 16 Japanese players who appeared in the major leagues last season will participate this spring. The former Met Kaz Matsui, who last played in the majors in 2010, is one of the few players most American fans might recognize.This is part of the puzzle facing Major League Baseball as it stages its global showcase. Many players send mixed signals to fans about the importance of the event. Of all the starting pitchers from the United States, the only ones in the tournament will be R. A. Dickey, Gio Gonzalez, Ryan Vogelsong and Derek Holland.Asked by David Waldstein of The New York Times why the W.B.C. seemed to matter so much to fans in Japan, the Yankees' Hiroki Kuroda turned the question around: "Well, tell me this: Why don't people in the U.S. care more?"The United States has never played for the title, and the lack of enthusiasm of some players — many fearing injury, despite no evidence that participation leads to greater risk — is an obvious reason. But the American roster will still include the former most valuable players Ryan Braun, Joe Mauer and Jimmy Rollins, as well as other standouts like Giancarlo Stanton, Mark Teixeira and David Wright.Wright, who also played in 2009, said he looked forward to representing his country and believed he could honor servicemen by taking part. He also enjoys the company."You look around the field, you see M.V.P.'s, you see future Hall of Famers," Wright said. "It's nice to be able to be in the same clubhouse as those guys and soak it in. It's a fun atmosphere."Other countries are not as deep. Brazil is making its W.B.C. debut, but its lone major leaguer, Yan Gomes, is staying in spring training to compete for a spot with the Cleveland Indians. Jurickson Profar, considered the top prospect in baseball, declined to play for the Netherlands so he could try to make the Texas Rangers' roster.The event is a creation of Major League Baseball and the players union, but mandatory participation is not an option. Kuroda said that August would be a better time to hold it; others have suggested extending the All-Star break in July. While the tournament's imperfections are impossible to ignore, dwelling on them misses the point."There are challenges, for sure," said Paul Archey, baseball's senior vice president for international business operations. "But we've only had two of these tournaments. It's very young in its evolution. The objective is to give baseball a platform to help us grow the game globally."To that end, Archey said, the W.B.C. has been an overwhelming success. A stadium is under construction in Amsterdam. Attendance is booming in the Korea Baseball Organization. Major League Baseball now has television partners in China. Archey said the W.B.C. had generated more than $22 million for international federations.Past tournaments have featured several players who went on to make significant contributions in the majors. The M.V.P. of the 2006 event was Daisuke Matsuzaka, who signed with the Boston Red Sox the next year and won another M.V.P. award at the 2009 tournament.Cuba's 2009 team included Yoenis Cespedes, now starring for the Oakland Athletics, and Aroldis Chapman, an All-Star for the Cincinnati Reds. Japan's team featured three players who became standout rookies last season: Norichika Aoki of the Milwaukee Brewers, Hisashi Iwakuma of the Seattle Mariners and Yu Darvish, an All-Star for the Texas Rangers."They had Yu Darvish coming in just mowing us down to close out the game last time," Wright said. "They've got great players. It's not like the only reason they're beating us is because they start earlier than us. I don't think they get credit for the brand of baseball that they play. They play great fundamental baseball, they play great team baseball, and they play winning baseball."Wright planned to leave here Saturday to join Manager Joe Torre's United States team in Phoenix, where games begin Thursday in a first-round pool that includes Canada, Italy and Mexico. The top two teams from that group will advance to Miami, where they will meet the top two teams from a pool of the Dominican Republic, Puerto Rico, Spain and Venezuela.The championship round will take place in San Francisco, with a winner-take-all finale on March 19 at AT&T Park. That is where the World Series began in October. The World Baseball Classic is more accurately named, if not nearly as celebrated by American fans who have not seen their team win."We're 7-7 in this tournament after two events," Archey said. "We haven't played in a final. It'll be interesting to see how the fans react if we make a run."
TOKYO — A Japanese court sentenced two United States Navy sailors to lengthy terms on Friday after they pleaded guilty to the rape of a woman on Okinawa last year, a case that outraged local residents and forced the American military to impose a curfew on all its personnel in Japan .The court in Naha, the capital of Okinawa, sentenced one sailor, Christopher Browning, 24, to 10 years in prison, and the other, Skyler Dozierwalker, 23, a petty officer third class, to nine years for the October 2012 rape. The court also convicted Mr. Browning of robbing the victim of 7,000 yen, or about $75. The two will serve their time in a Japanese prison.The court ruled that the men had attacked the woman in a parking lot in central Okinawa, inflicting physical injuries that took two weeks to heal.In handing down the sentence, the presiding judge, Hideyuki Suzuki, called the Americans' actions "contemptible and violent."Fury when the rape occurred was on top of protests over the deployment of a new aircraft shadowed by safety concerns, the tilt-rotor MV-22 Osprey.Okinawa is the host to more than half of the approximately 50,000 United States military personnel in Japan, and residents have long complained that the American presence brings crime as well as noise pollution and safety hazards to their otherwise peaceful tropical island in Japan's southwest.
FUKUOKA, Japan — The iconic image of Japan's victory over South Korea in the final of the 2009 World Baseball Classic was of Ichiro Suzuki, the team captain, grinning as he hoisted the silver trophy amid a circle of teammates and a sea of confetti on the field at Dodger Stadium.Japan's quest to claim its third straight title, and its first without Suzuki, began Saturday with a 5-3 victory in Pool A over the tournament newcomer Brazil at Fukuoka Dome.The four-pool, three-round tournament Classic struggles for acceptance among fans and players in North America, where action begins next weekend, but it is a different matter in Asia. From the ceremonial first pitch, delivered by Sadaharu Oh, the Japanese home run champion, enthusiastic Japan supporters in a crowd announced at 28,181 wore white and blue (the team colors), beat noisemakers, pounded drums, played horns and waved flags. Brazil, managed by the Hall of Famer Barry Larkin, took a 3-2 lead in the fifth inning, but Japan rallied, thrilling its fans.At a boisterous Taichung Intercontinental Baseball Stadium in Taiwan, play began in Pool B, and the host team, led by Chien-Ming Wang, rolled to a 4-1 win over Australia. Later, the Netherlands upset South Korea, 5-0.Jim Small, Major League Baseball's vice president for Asia and venue manager for the W.B.C. in Fukuoka and Taichung, said the Classic meant more in Asia, largely because of the importance of the Olympics and the Asian Baseball Championship."The cultures here are much more used to their national teams than we are in the United States," Small said Friday after arriving in Taipei. "A great example is here in Taiwan. The national team is by far the most important baseball team in Taiwan, not the professional leagues."Joe Torre, the United States manager, has expressed concerns about motivating his squad of major league talent at this stage of spring training to play against teams, like Japan, that take the event more seriously.Japan's manager, Koji Yamamoto, offered no hint of such a problem when his 28-man roster was announced in February."I told them to get themselves into the best physical and mental condition as possible for the first game," Yamamoto said, "and then fight with real spirit."Notable stars like Suzuki, beginning his first full season with the Yankees, and Yu Darvish of the Texas Rangers are absent from Japan's roster. Both players made large contributions to the 2009 title. Also missing is Daisuke Matsuzaka, the most valuable player of the two previous Classics. Japan topped Cuba in the 2006 final.As usual, Japan is not focusing on individuals, relying instead on a team approach that emphasizes strong pitching, solid defense and timely hitting. But the injured right knee of the team captain, catcher Shinnosuke Abe, has been a concern. Abe, the Central League's most valuable player for the Yomiuri Giants in 2012, when his batting average was .340 and his on-base percentage was .429, compared himself to a "defeated soldier fleeing the enemy" if he could not perform like a samurai. It was a tongue-in-cheek acknowledgment that the fans were counting on him. He did not start on Saturday, but he pinch-hit and drove in the go-ahead run on a fielder's choice in a three-run eighth inning.A dozen or so Brazil fans shook their country's green, yellow and blue flag above their heads from seats near third base. For them and several others around the stadium, Brazil's arrival in Fukuoka was monumental, earned with an upset over Panama in a qualifying game in November."Just to get here was a miracle for us," said Felipe Ferrari, 26, a Brazilian student at Nagoya University in Japan. "The dream has already come true. To open a magazine and see the faces of the players — that was once a big wish."Two teams from each of Asia's two pools will advance to the second round next weekend at Tokyo Dome. The championship round will be March 17 to 19 in San Francisco.A schedule that overlaps with major league camps will probably prevent the Classic from being embraced more broadly. Masayuki Tamaki, a Japanese sports commentator and author of books on baseball, described the tournament as merely an extended tryout for the majors."The lack of big names is probably good for them," Tamaki said, referring to major league teams. "In this way, they will be very happy to discover new star players."But Japanese fans were looking forward to Sunday, when Japan faces China, the next step, they hoped, toward seeing a countryman raise the trophy as Suzuki did four years ago."Our pitching was not the best tonight," Oku Yoshioka, a 40-year-old sales engineer, said of Japan's starter, Masahiro Tanaka, who lasted only two innings. "But our staff is strong enough to get us back to the finals again."
TOKYO — The wedding was a fairy-tale affair, with flowing dresses and a three-tiered cake set in the most coveted of Japanese venues: the Tokyo Disney Resort.Koyuki Higashi and her partner of one and a half years tied the knot in front of 30 well-wishers on Friday, but much more of the country was in on the celebration, the first same-sex wedding at the theme park here.Ms. Higashi, a stage actress turned gay rights activist, and her partner, Hiroko, who has not revealed her full name, posted frequent social media updates of their wedding plans and from their Christian-style ceremony, with a romantic gondola ride."My partner Hiroko and I just held a gay wedding at the Tokyo Disney Resort. Even Mickey and Minnie are here to celebrate with us!" Ms. Higashi, 28, wrote in a Twitter post that also had a picture of the newlyweds posing with the big-eared Disney characters and a flower-festooned cake. Her entry was reposted more than 6,000 times, drawing largely positive responses."Congratulations," replied Masaki Koh, a Japanese gay porn star. "Your wonderful wedding will bring inspiration and hope to many people who still hesitate to take the first step. I was also encouraged that Tokyo Disney Resort was so understanding."But on the Naver Matome site, which collects and curates social media entries, a user who identified himself as Nizo Hakoda remarked: "I don't particularly mind homosexuality and same-sex marriage, but watching the news made me wonder why they had to hold their ceremony at a crowded place like Disney. It's fine for the people who accept it, but there are others who don't."The Walt Disney Company had long allowed same-sex celebrations in a limited way on its grounds, like in banquet halls. But in 2007, it began allowing same-sex couples to buy high-end wedding packages, which can include elaborate ceremonies, Disney characters and public displays at its theme parks and on its cruises.Despite that change in policy, Ms. Higashi found that no same-sex wedding had ever occurred at Tokyo Disney Resort. She reported on her blog and on Twitter that she had inquired about weddings at Tokyo Disney Sea, a part of the Disney Resort. But when it became apparent to the organizers that her partner was female, Ms. Higashi reported, she was asked if one of them could wear a tuxedo — so that other visitors to the park would not feel uncomfortable.Her posts set off the first stir on Japanese social media sites.A week later, the organizers at Milial Resort Hotels, a subsidiary of the company that runs Tokyo Disney, got back to Ms. Higashi with good news: both brides were welcome to wear wedding dresses (or both tuxedos, for that matter). "Mickey Mouse supports gay marriage!" Web headlines declared.Milial Resort Hotels issued an apology. "Initially, there was an incomplete understanding on the part of our staff over the requirement for dresses," said Jun Abe, a Milial spokeswoman. "If we caused them sadness and discomfort, we are sorry."Of course, their dream wedding did leave something to be desired for the couple: legal standing.Japan does not recognize same-sex marriages, though there is little in the way of religious opposition from Buddhism, imported from China, or Japan's native Shinto religion. Japanese historical texts contain references to same-sex relationships.Some local governments, including Tokyo, ban discrimination at work based on sexual identity, but even so, in this group-conscious, relatively conformist society, most gay residents remain in the closet. Gay public figures tend to be in TV entertainment, where gay men win laughs as flamboyant queens.Ms. Higashi came out less than three years ago after a short-lived stage career, while Hiroko says she cannot use her full name widely because some family members are not fully comfortable with her sexuality.Hiroko said, however, that she was emboldened by the response the couple had received from friends, family and social media, and that she hoped that her wedding helped create a public discussion."This could prompt Japan to question why it so often ignores or discriminates against minorities," Hiroko said. "Mostly we just want people to know that gay people exist for real, and we would like to throw weddings like everyone else."
TAHARA, Japan — Just two months into office, Prime Minister Shinzo Abe is showing an increasing willingness to take on some pillars of Japan's establishment — the central bank and the country's politically influential farmers — in an aggressive attempt to finally breathe some new life into Japan's listless economy.Mr. Abe has already forced the departure of the cautious head of the central Bank of Japan and nominated a replacement who vowed Monday to do "whatever it takes" to fight crippling deflation that has eroded profits and wages and stifled spending. Mr. Abe is also expected to announce soon that his nation will join negotiations on an American-led Pacific free-trade pact that the Obama administration hopes will offset China's growing economic and political might, but that could also force Japan to make painful, market-opening changes it has resisted for nearly two decades.Joining the pact risks alienating farmers, longtime staunch supporters of Mr. Abe's conservative Liberal Democratic Party, who would face more intense competition from cheaper imports.But the broader public appears more willing to embrace drastic economic measures at a time when Japan, the region's waning economic superpower, feels threatened by China, helping push Mr. Abe's approval ratings to around 70 percent in recent polls. That is a vast improvement from his disastrous first term in office six years ago, and from concerns that his hawkish views might alienate him once again from voters."The future of Japan's economic growth depends on us having the willpower and the courage to sail without hesitation onto the rough seas of global competition," Mr. Abe declared in a speech to Parliament last Thursday.Critics warn that his stimulus measures, including a new wave of public works projects, could increase Japan's already crushing public debt, or set off a currency war as the prospect of drastic easing by the central bank has caused the yen's value to plummet.They also worry that Mr. Abe's effort to combat deflation could include radical steps that they warn could disturb global financial markets by unleashing a flood of Japanese money into developing economies, causing dangerous, speculative bubbles.The many economists who support Mr. Abe's plans, however, have a different warning: that any economic benefits could prove short-lived unless they are accompanied by a longer-term growth strategy.The trade pact, they say, will be a good litmus test of Mr. Abe's willingness to force such deeper structural changes in Japan. It could also force the country to face a long-debated and difficult decision: whether it is willing to trade some of the egalitarianism it takes such pride in to embrace a freer form of capitalism that could break the grip of vested interests and reverse a long decline."The T.P.P. is a battle over what kind of country we want Japan to be," said Hisaharu Ito, a top official in Aichi Prefecture's Union of Agricultural Cooperatives, referring to the trade agreement, the Trans-Pacific Partnership. His organization represents some 10,000 full-time farmers who fiercely oppose the trade group.He added, "Do we want to turn into a harsh society of winners and losers, or remain a gentler society where benefits are shared?"Japan's joining the trade group could have an added advantage for the United States, possibly opening some of Japan's still impenetrable markets to American products.Here in Tahara, a city in central Aichi, where rice paddies and cabbage fields run up against a Lexus plant, Shigeaki Okamoto is the rare voice in the farming community pushing for change. He says Japanese farmers could compete without the tariffs they have been sheltered behind if they were allowed to become entrepreneurial.Mr. Okamoto tried to export rice to China, only to be told that a company controlled by a farm co-op has a monopoly on sales to that country. He says such restrictions are typical of government bureaucrats and farming co-op officials who have tried to block him every step of the way with arbitrary regulations and even attempts to ostracize him from others farmers."Japan is wrapped in an invisible web that prevents you from showing any sort of initiative," said Mr. Okamoto, 51.
TOKYO — The Netherlands quietly took batting practice at Tokyo Dome on Saturday. Its sluggers, in orange jerseys and caps, casually peppered balls into the blue seats in left, seemingly unaware that their team was once again sending shock waves through the baseball world.The afternoon before, Jonathan Schoop, a Baltimore Orioles prospect, hit a three-run home run and starter Diegomar Markwell pitched one-run ball over six innings to lead the upstart Dutch to a 6-2 victory over previously undefeated Cuba in the second-round opener of the World Baseball Classic."I think it's a great moment for our country," Netherlands Manager Hensley Meulens, a native of Curaçao and the current hitting coach for the San Francisco Giants, said after the game. "We have the momentum on our side right now."The victory puts the Dutch a win away from advancing to the tournament's final round in San Francisco, but next up on Sunday is two-time champion Japan, which outlasted Taiwan, 4-3, in a thrilling four-and-a-half-hour, 10-inning nightcap.To get here, the Netherlands won two games earlier in Pool B in Taiwan. The former major leaguer Andruw Jones, now a player for the Rakuten Golden Eagles in Japan, had two hits while Markwell and Orlando Yntema went seven innings in a 5-0 upset of South Korea. Against Australia, Schoop hit his first homer of the tournament, a two-run shot, to power the Dutch to a 4-1 win."I tried to put the ball in play, and I don't know, I just feel comfortable over the plate," Schoop, a second baseman, said of his driving in four runs Friday.Comfortable is what the Netherlands has been in its last two trips to the W.B.C. In the 2009 tournament, a team with only a few notable players, including Randall Simon and Sidney Ponson, advanced to the second round by stunning the mighty Dominican Republic twice.This year's team is similar, with 10 players returning from four years ago. But only outfielder Roger Bernadina of the Washington Nationals and infielder Andrelton Simmons of the Atlanta Braves are on major league rosters. For its part, Japan is missing the key players Ichiro Suzuki, Yu Darvish and Daisuke Matsuzaka from the 2006 and 2009 title teams; its roster is composed entirely of Nippon Professional Baseball talent.Possibly the greatest strength of the Netherlands is its defense. It turned five double plays against Cuba."We have great young talent on our team, and they know how to play defense," Jones, also a Curaçao native, said. "If we eliminate mistakes and errors, we have a good chance to advance."Bert Blyleven, the Netherlands' pitching coach, said his staff was familiar enough with Japan's lineup to have success. "We are going to stay with our strength, and that is to attack the strike zone and see what happens," the Netherlands-born Blyleven said. "We know who their number three, four, five hitters are, what they can do. We have to keep the one, two guys off the bases and continue to do what we are doing."The Netherlands is the obvious underdog, yet Japan's offense has done little in the W.B.C. so far. It did pile up 13 hits against Taiwan, to the delight of a sellout crowd, but Yoshio Itoi's double in the fourth inning off starter Chien-Ming Wang was only the second extra-base hit by Japan in four games.Two of the four teams playing in Tokyo will advance to the championship round, which begins next Sunday in San Francisco. A win over Japan will push the Netherlands beyond its finish in 2009, when it was ousted by Venezuela and the United States in the second round."It would give more awareness to the people of Holland that baseball is up and coming," Blyleven said of the impact of a potential victory. "It would be huge."For Meulens, this visit to Tokyo has been a return to past glories. In 1995, as an outfielder for the Yakult Swallows, he helped lead his team to the Japan Series title.Meulens is confident his Dutch team also has what it takes."The only way to win is to not be surprised," Meulens said, "and be sure of yourself that you're going to win, and that's what we are doing."CUBA 14, TAIWAN 0 Cuba shook off its loss to the Netherlands, hitting four home runs and staving off elimination Saturday in a game shortened to seven innings because of the tournament's mercy rule. Cuba's starter, Danny Betancourt, yielded three hits over six innings.Designated hitter Frederich Cepeda started the scoring with a two-run homer in the first. A three-run shot by outfielder Yasmany Tomas in the fourth put Cuba ahead by 6-0.On Monday, Cuba will play the loser of Sunday's game between Japan and the Netherlands.DOMINICAN REPUBLIC 6, SPAIN 3 Carlos Santana homered and the Yankees' Robinson Cano added three hits, leading the Dominican Republic past Spain in San Juan, Puerto Rico. The Dominican team improved to 2-0 in Group C.After 15 scoreless innings, Spain scored its first run of the tournament in the seventh.The Dominican team will conclude the first round Sunday against Puerto Rico, while Spain will face Venezuela. (AP)
Audiences familiar with the films of the Japanese animation house Studio Ghibli may be surprised to find no witches, forest spirits, wolf-goddesses or dragons in its latest production. "From Up on Poppy Hill" follows a more reality-based narrative — a budding romance between high school students, Umi (voiced by Sarah Bolger in the English-language version) and Shun (Anton Yelchin) — reflecting a place and time in Japanese history: the port city of Yokohama in 1963, as preparations for the 1964 Olympics in Tokyo are under way."Poppy Hill" is the second feature directed by Goro Miyazaki, the son of the Studio Ghibli co-founder and filmmakerHayao Miyazaki. And it is their most creative collaboration. The elder Mr. Miyazaki, with Keiko Niwa, adapted the screenplay from a 1980 graphic novel.Despite a story steeped in reality, the younger Mr. Miyazaki aimed to create a Yokohama outside of photorealism. "Initially I researched it quite a bit, intending to be very faithful to the historical details of the time," he said by phone from Los Angeles. "But I came to realize that simply re-enacting something of the time may seem real enough but may not necessarily be beautiful." He decided instead to show the locations as his characters see them: shimmering and bustling with life.Here Mr. Miyazaki explains the choices and inspirations involved in a Studio Ghibli film grounded in realism.One of the film's centerpiece locations is a giant clubhouse, known as the Latin Quarter, under threat of demolition. This dusty, dilapidated site is home to many of the high school's boys clubs. Here Umi and her sister Sora pay a visit and are overwhelmed by the degree and multiple levels of disarray. "I love what they've done with the place," Umi says.Mr. Miyazaki worked with a number of art directors who contributed ideas about the amalgamation of clutter in the house's many rooms. He said it was the kind of mess familiar from his younger days."When you have young men congregating like that, what you generally have are pretty filthy spaces," he said. "But it also represents the history behind that place. So what I tried to do with the design of the space was to look at the architecture of the building, but to also remember back to my college years and the clutter and filthiness that I lived through."In one scene Shun takes Umi on a bike ride into town as the sun is setting — one of their first extended moments together. Mr. Miyazaki said he recalled his younger days in painting Yokohama in warm tones."Of course we had certain archival materials to refer to, but the truth is that when I grew up, some of those sights still remained," he said. "I remember that when the sun was setting, how that hit the town and how beautiful it was. I remember how dark certain parts of the town were, or the fact that they didn't have fluorescent lights, but the more orange, warm glow of the lights at the time. I remember the way people were kind, instead of robotic."And Mr. Miyazaki did take some lessons from his father to heart for a scene like this."What Hayao Miyazaki often taught me is to not draw from photographs," he said. "Because all I would produce is mimicry. You have to draw from your mind."Home-cooked meals play a significant role in "Poppy Hill." Umi is usually the one responsible for making meals at the boardinghouse where she lives with her grandmother, siblings and other residents. In an early scene she prepares rice and eggs for breakfast. In other scenes she shops for food. And the lunches she takes to school are the envy of her classmates: mouthwatering concoctions like an obento box, including cod roe, pickled plum, Japanese omelets and spinach with sesame dressing."To eat is to live, and animated characters can't really come to life if they don't feel alive," Mr. Miyazaki said. "So eating was something I looked very closely at. How characters eat can tell you a lot about them. And while they're eating, what they're thinking at the time can be expressed too."Mr. Miyazaki included a number of eating scenes but said it wasn't until he finished the film that he fully realized the importance of food in it.
TOKYO — As the jubilant Tokyo Dome crowd roared, Japan's manager, Koji Yamamoto, stood on the field and raised his arms in triumph amid camera flashes.After a lackluster stroll into the second round of the World Baseball Classic, defending champion Japan validated the team's ticket to San Francisco, the final stop in its quest for a third title.Japan pounded out 17 hits, including 6 home runs, on the way to demolishing the Netherlands, 16-4, on Sunday in a game stopped after the seventh inning when the 10-run mercy rule was invoked."Japan is known for small ball," Yamamoto said. "But even I was surprised by six home runs."Yamamoto's team had struggled to generate offense all tournament, mustering two extra-base hits in its previous four games. After a stirring extra-inning victory over Taiwan on Friday, the Japanese were hoping to carry that momentum to the game against the Netherlands. They did, and then some.The first batter of the game, second baseman Takashi Toritani, drove starter Robbie Cordemans's second pitch into the seats in right — a blast that sent the crowd into a fever that seemingly never ended. In the top of the second, homers by third baseman Nobuhiro Matsuda and outfielder Seiichi Uchikawa ended the night for Cordemans."We saw a very good hitting team come out today," Netherlands Manager Hensley Meulens said. "Our pitchers left balls up, and they capitalized on all those mistakes, and the game got out of hand very early."The winning pitcher, Kenta Maeda, the Central League's leader in earned run average last season for the Hiroshima Carp, was strong through five innings, allowing one hit and striking out nine."I was conscious of not letting them get hits for extra bases by focusing on location," Maeda said. "But it was thanks to my offense, which scored first, that I was able to develop confidence."Maeda's repertory kept the Dutch off balance, including outfielder Wladimir Balentien, the Central League's home run champion the last two seasons for the Yakult Swallows. Maeda sent him down on strikes twice."He's a great pitcher," said Balentien, who did manage to drive in three runs with a double in the sixth. "I've faced him a lot during the season. I know he has a great slider and great command. He showed it again tonight."The Dutch are not done. They will face Cuba on Monday to determine the final spot from the Tokyo round; the winner will go to AT&T Park in San Francisco for the start of the semifinals Sunday.Cuba staved off elimination Saturday with a 14-0 thrashing of Taiwan. Monday's game will be a chance to atone for Cuba, which lost to the Netherlands on Thursday.With only two major league players on the Dutch roster, it would be easy to assume that the team that upset a powerful Dominican Republic team twice in the 2009 Classic is finally running out of magic. But that may not be the case."They are not a surprise anymore," said Koen Greven, a writer for the Amsterdam-based newspaper NRC Handelsblad, referring to the victory over Cuba and a first-round win over South Korea. "They deserve to be here.But to beat Cuba a second time, the Netherlands will have to play better defense. Against Cuba, the Dutch turned five double plays; on Sunday, they committed three errors.They will also have to find a way to stop a Cuban lineup that bruised Taiwanese pitchers with four homers."We have to pitch better tomorrow," Meulens said. "We have to keep the ball down and keep the ball in the ballpark. We gave up six home runs today. It's hard to win like that."Japan's next game is Tuesday, when it will play the Cuba-Netherlands winner to determine the top seed from Tokyo.The day before is the second anniversary of the 2011 earthquake and tsunami in Japan."I imagine the past two years have been tough," said Yamamoto, referring to the residents of the devastated Tohoku area. "But what we can do is play hard in hopes of bringing some smiles. I hope we can send some kind of positive message as a team."
Barcelona has become the pre-eminent club team in soccer in recent years but now stands on the brink of being ousted from Europe's annual Champions League without even making it to the quarterfinals. It trails A.C. Milan by two goals as it prepares for the second leg of their matchup, on Tuesday, before a stadium full of Barcelona fans who cannot quite believe their mighty team is in such a hole. Can they escape? Are they not as good as they used to be? Four of The New York Times's soccer writers weigh in with their thoughts.Like hungry children let loose at a buffet, Barcelona fans can often be guilty of overindulging. This is not altogether their fault, of course; the team is loaded with stars, and any struggles can often be assuaged by the promise of what tasty morsel might show up next.Take Tuesday, for example. If Barcelona is unable to come back from its two-goal Champions League deficit against A.C. Milan, it would be disastrous, calamitous, catastrophic and all the other doom-and-gloom adjectives that come with being perhaps the world's most celebrated team. But then, after a mourning period of a few minutes, attention would quickly shift to what might be needed to put Barcelona over the top in next year's tournament — and specifically whether the Brazilian star Neymar is that needed piece.Neymar is the prize. Despite his telling a number of news media outlets, including The New York Times, that he will probably remain with Santos in Brazil until 2014, speculation has increased recently that a move may be more imminent. Neymar's coach has suggested Neymar will eventually land at Barcelona. A Brazilian legend, Roberto Carlos, has said he has spoken to Neymar and such a move is "90 percent" certain to happen. And the Barcelona defender Dani Alves has been lobbying Neymar for months, telling FIFA.com that "I've been begging him to come to Barcelona for a long time, ever since the rumors of a move to Europe started."The possibilities are tantalizing. Imagine how Barcelona might play if it had Lionel Messi and Xavi and David Villa and Neymar. Surely a team like that could not be beaten. Could it? SAM BORDENWhere did Barcelona lose its edge? Perhaps it would help to retrace the club's steps. In 2009, it was on top of the world. Under its first-year manager, Pep Guardiola, Barcelona beat Athletic Bilbao to win the Copa del Rey, held off Real Madrid to win La Liga and topped Manchester United in the Champions League final in Rome.Those triumphs led to berths in the UEFA and Spanish Super Cups and in FIFA's annual Club World Cup, played in the United Arab Emirates that year. Barcelona swept those competitions as well. After repeating as Spanish league champion in 2010, Barcelona sent 14 of its players to the World Cup in South Africa, where the eight Spaniards on the club's books picked up winner's medals.On and on it has gone, sometimes more than 60 games a season. A third straight Liga title in 2011. Another win over United in the Champions League final, in London, which meant a return to the Club World Cup, this time in Japan.A semifinal exit from the Champions League last spring was a disappointment, but a Copa del Rey triumph — Barcelona's 14th trophy in four years under Guardiola — ensured that at least there would be some new silverware to polish. There was little time for reflection, however. Seven of Barcelona's Spaniards quickly packed their bags for Poland and Ukraine, where they helped their country repeat as European champion. More celebrations.But this year, there will probably be only one trophy. Two recent losses to Real Madrid have hinted at a power shift in Spain, even if Barcelona looks certain to reclaim its Liga title. And now it may be headed out of the Champions League much earlier than expected.Where did Barcelona lose the path? Abu Dhabi? Yokohama? Moscow? Glasgow? You choose. The players are probably too tired to look. But rest assured they will find it again. ANDREW DASLast Thursday, a Tokyo jeweler put up for sale a 55-pound pure-gold replica of Lionel Messi's left foot — veins, callused skin and all — and attached to it a price tag of $5.25 million.The object seemed artless, the metaphor so straightforward as to be uninteresting.Two days later in Barcelona, Messi scored his 40th league goal of the season, lengthening a run of mesmerizing individual play that has produced a wave of staggering statistics. Consider that Barcelona, as a team, has scored a total of 85 league goals this season and the second-highest individual yield belongs to David Villa, who has seven.Yet Messi's individual feats can also symbolize what few shortcomings his team can be thought to possess. Now, as before, there has emerged murmuring about whether Barcelona, the paragon of team play, has become over-reliant on one man.This was apparent three weeks ago. A.C. Milan applied the shackles to Messi, restricting his space, humanizing him and earning a gigantic 2-0 win at home. Barcelona held possession of the ball for two-thirds of the game, yet directed only two shots toward goal.Barcelona needs goals on Tuesday night, when the teams will meet for the second leg of the series. And it seems obvious that Messi, who has produced 16 of the team's 41 goals (counting the league and all cup competitions) since the start of the calendar year, will be the center of attention for both teams.All eyes will be trained on Messi's left foot. What sort of alchemy can it conjure?As amazing as Barcelona's run has been over the past 10 years or so, it is nearly as amazing how quickly the doubters, skeptics and haters (read Real Madrid fans) spring from the woodwork at the slightest sign of a misstep.There is no arguing that Barcelona has stumbled, losing the first leg of its Round of 16 Champions League series against A.C. Milan then back-to-back matches against Madrid (in Copa del Rey and in La Liga). But take a glance at the Spanish league standings. After last weekend's games the "slumping" team at the top maintains a 13-point lead over Real Madrid, which might be the hottest team in the world.With Barcelona, we are not talking about some Sunday beer-league team. Memories can be short, and there is no doubt that stars like Lionel Messi, Andrés Iniesta, Xavi and Gerard Piqué will be hellbent on stifling their critics by erasing the two-goal deficit against A.C. Milan on Tuesday at Camp Nou.Talent and skill will trump all, even an expertly organized Italian team that will probably try to thwart Barcelona with smothering tactics. One of soccer's old saws is that a 2-0 lead is the most dangerous. It is, and it will be. JACK BELL
TOKYO — Kalian Sams hit a ninth-inning sacrifice fly to cap a come-from-behind, 7-6 win over Cuba on Monday night at Tokyo Dome that sends the Netherlands to the World Baseball Classic semifinals in San Francisco next week."The better team won this game tonight," said Hensley Meulens, the manager of the Netherlands team, who labeled the game the biggest in Dutch history. "Cuba played a good game, but we played a better game."The Dutch advance to the championship round, on Sunday and Monday, for the first time. Cuba was eliminated.The teams entered the game going in opposite directions. Cuba battered Taiwan, 14-0, on Saturday, while the Netherlands allowed six home runs, which tied a World Baseball Classic record, in being pummeled by the two-time champion Japan, 16-4, on Sunday.This one was a nail-biter.After Cuba took a 6-4 lead in the top of the eighth, Dutch shortstop Andrelton Simmons belted a two-run home run into the seats in left field in the bottom half to even the score."I was looking at the pitcher and he was coming in with the same pitch," Simmons said. "He left one where I like it, and I didn't miss it."In the bottom of the ninth, the Dutch loaded the bases with one out. That brought Sams, an outfielder, to the plate."They were playing kind of in, and I thought, I can't miss this pitch," he said.Even before the fly landed in the glove of center fielder Yasmany Tomas, the Dutch players had congregated around the plate to welcome Andruw Jones. Once he crossed home, a jubilant sea of orange swept the field."The guys were resilient," Meulens said. "They stuck together. When we needed it more, they got together in the dugout. They weren't going to die."They were also without two of their top players. Outfielder Wladimir Balentien, who led Japan's Central League in home runs over the last two years, exited the game after his first at-bat with a leg injury. Also missing was Roger Bernadina, an outfielder with the Washington Nationals who was hit on the wrist by a pitch in the game against Japan.But the Netherlands struck first against Cuban pitcher Vladimir García. A sacrifice fly to left by Jones in the third inning gave the Dutch an early 1-0 lead. A single through the left side by catcher Curt Smith brought home Simmons to plate their second run.Dutch starter Orlando Yntema cruised until the fourth, when a double and a single brought home the first Cuban run. After a double play, first baseman Jose Abreu crushed an offering from the right-hander over the fence in center to even the score, 2-2.The teams traded two-run barbs until Cuba took its first lead in the eighth with a run-scoring single and sacrifice fly. That set the stage for Simmons and Sams to make Dutch history.A little luck also played a role in the ninth. An error by Cuban third baseman Yulieski Gourriel allowed Jones to get aboard."The way we played it was hard to win," said Manager Victor Mesa, whose Cuban team fell to the Netherlands twice in the second round. "We tried hard, we played hard, but we made some mistakes."Japan had clinched the other spot in the final round from Tokyo with its victory over the Netherlands the day before, but its presence was still very evident.Monday was the second anniversary of the earthquake and tsunami that caused the Fukushima Daiichi nuclear plant disaster in Japan. Before the game schoolchildren from Fukushima, the prefecture where the nuclear crises unfolded, served as flag bearers before a moment of silence for the victims of the disaster.As a player for the Chiba Lotte Marines in 1994, Meulens lived in an area that sustained extensive damage from the earthquake. "It was a terrible day in Japan's history," the manager said. "I feel for all of those people. My thoughts were with them a couple years ago and they are still with them today. It's a day that's never to be forgotten here."On Tuesday Japan and the Netherlands will square off to determine the top seed from Tokyo.This will be the fist trip for the Dutch to the W.B.C. championship round, and Meulens is looking forward to arriving in San Francisco, where he is the hitting coach of the Giants."I am so happy to be representing the Giants and the Dutch in San Francisco," Meulens said.
TOKYO — Seeking to remove a longstanding irritant in Japan 's ties with the United States, Prime Minister Shinzo Abe said on Friday that his government would ask local officials on the island of Okinawa for a key permit to begin construction to relocate an unpopular American air base to another part of the island.The decision to request the permit is an effort by Mr. Abe's government to restart a plan to move the American base, Marine Corps Air Station Futenma, to a less crowded area. Mr. Abe and President Obama agreed last month to proceed with the relocation plan, which was originally approved in 1996 but has been blocked because of opposition in Okinawa, where many people prefer the base be moved off the island.That opposition appears to be as stiff as ever, making it uncertain that the island's prefectural government will approve the permit. While the island's governor, Hirokazu Nakaima, is a member of Mr. Abe's Liberal Democratic Party, he is under intense public pressure to oppose the relocation."I cannot understand it; this is impossible" to approve, Mr. Nakaima said of the government's decision to seek the construction permit.For many Okinawans, the Futenma base has become a symbol of an onerous American military presence on an island that is home to more than half of the 50,000 United States military employees in Japan. Okinawan frustration turned to anger three years ago, when the prime minister at the time, Yukio Hatoyama, vowed while campaigning to move the busy helicopter base off the island but reneged once in power.Mr. Hatoyama's decision, under intense American pressure, reflected his fears once in power that canceling the earlier agreement with the United States risked damaging the critical security alliance between the two countries when Japan was facing a nuclear-armed North Korea and an increasingly assertive China.For Mr. Abe, whose conservative Liberal Democrats swept to power in December, progress on the Futenma issue would be a big step toward fulfilling campaign promises to mend relations with the United States, Japan's traditional protector. For many Japanese, the American military presence on Okinawa has taken on a new significance since last summer, when their nation became embroiled with China in a tense standoff over disputed islands in the nearby East China Sea.The governor will now have up to a year to decide whether to approve the permit, which could give Mr. Abe time to try to buy Okinawan acceptance with offers of generous financial support, as Tokyo has done in the past. In a nod to the depth of local opposition, Mr. Abe on Friday promised to do everything in his power to reduce the base's burden on Okinawa. Japanese officials have said this could mean speeding up a plan to move 9,000 Marines from Okinawa to other spots in the Asia-Pacific region, and return some base land to Okinawan authorities.Still, the decision to try to restart the deal carries political risks for Mr. Abe, who could find himself thwarted by Okinawan opposition. It is unclear if his government has the political will to force the island to allow construction, especially if that spurs Okinawans to stage sit-ins or other acts of civil disobedience.At the same time, Mr. Abe said on Friday, allowing the base to remain in its current location is "impermissible." That is also the official position of the United States government, which wants to move Futenma and its aircraft from their current location in the center of the crowded city of Ginowan, in southern Okinawa, to Camp Schwab, an existing Marine base on the island's jungle-covered northern end."I don't think it will be easy," Mr. Abe said of getting permission to start new construction. "We need to proceed while rebuilding a relationship of trust" with Okinawans.The land-reclamation permit is needed before work can begin on filling in parts of the coral-filled sea off Camp Schwab for the new air base's twin runways. The landfill plans are also fiercely opposed by many Okinawans, who say they would damage the island's fragile ecosystem, and particularly the feeding grounds of the dugong, a large, manateelike marine mammal.
TOKYO — Two lithium-ion car batteries produced by GS Yuasa, the same Japanese company that supplies batteries for the grounded Boeing 787 jetliner fleet, have overheated in recent days.Mitsubishi Motors said Wednesday that a lithium-ion battery for its i-MiEV electric car caught fire at an assembly plant on March 18. Three days later, a battery in a plug-in hybrid Outlander car overheated and showed signs of melting.No one was injured in either incident, Mitsubishi Motors said. It did not issue any recalls but said it would halt production and sales of the two models while it investigated the battery troubles. It also advised owners of the Outlander plug-in hybrid to drive only on gasoline mode for the time being."First we need to clarify the cause," Ryugo Nakao, the head of product and strategy development at Mitsubishi Motors, said at a news conference in Tokyo.Mr. Nakao stressed that the plane and auto batteries were "structurally different."And Marc Birtel, a Boeing spokesman, said in a statement that the aircraft maker had been assured "that the battery in question is fundamentally different from the 787 battery both in its construction processes, design, and chemistry."GS Yuasa, one of Japan's biggest battery manufacturers, makes hybrid and electric vehicle batteries with Mitsubishi at a factory in Shiga in central Japan. The batteries GS Yuasa supplies to Boeing are manufactured at a different plant in neighboring Kyoto, where the battery maker has its headquarters.While both the car and plane batteries use lithium-ion technology, their structures and composite materials are different. The GS Yuasa batteries aboard the 787 use lithium cobalt oxide, an older technology. The batteries in Mitsubishi Motors' electric and hybrid vehicles use lithium manganese oxide.On March 18, a battery aboard an electric vehicle, the iMiEV, being assembled at a Mitsubishi Motors plant in western Japan overheated and its casing caught fire, the automaker said. Workers had been conducting charging test on the vehicle, it said.Three days later, a representative at a dealer just outside Tokyo charged a plug-in hybrid Outlander but the car would not start, Mitsubishi Motors said. The representative then detected a strange smell, checked under the hood and found that part of the battery casing had melted.The battery problems come as a blow to Mitsubishi, whose sales of electric and hybrid vehicles have been disappointing. Since iMiEV's debut in 2009, Mitsubishi has shipped about 30,000 of the bubble-shaped electric vehicles worldwide. The model is known as the Mitsubishi I overseas. Mitsubishi has sold about 4,000 Outlanders, predominantly in Japan.The fresh incidents of overheating could be an even bigger blow to GS Yuasa. Its batteries have come under scrutiny by both American and Japanese air safety regulators in January after one caught fire on a parked 787 in Boston, while another overheated during a flight over western Japan.Boeing is in the midst of testing a redesigned battery system. It is hoping to complete those tests within the next week, a step toward persuading regulators to allow the planes back in the air. Still, neither the company nor regulators have pinned down the cause of the overheating in the 787 batteries.
TOKYO — The United States and Japan agreed Friday on a new timetable for the return to Japan of a Marine airfield and other military bases on Okinawa, moving to solve a long-festering issue that has bedeviled America's ties with its largest Asian ally.By agreeing to a clear timetable for the return of 2,500 acres, both nations are hoping to entice Okinawans to drop their opposition to the air base, which Washington and Tokyo want to move to another part of the island but which many Okinawans want to move off the island. Fierce local opposition has kept Japan from being able to follow through on a deal originally made in 1996 to allow the base and its noisy aircraft to be relocated to a less populated area of the island.Japan's hawkish new prime minister, Shinzo Abe, has been trying to revive the long-stalled deal at a time of increasing tensions with China that have led many Japanese to support strengthening the alliance with the United States, Japan's longtime protector. The deal on Friday could help Mr. Abe politically, by making clear what Okinawans stand to gain by agreeing to keep the base.It could also help the Obama administration if it finally leads to the end of an impasse that has left the future of the important air base in limbo, and that has undermined the Obama administration's strategic "pivot" to Asia.Announcing the new agreement in a room filled with American and Japanese flags, Mr. Abe called it a significant step toward reducing the huge American military presence on Okinawa, a legacy of the United States' occupation of that tropical island after World War II. The base relocation is the centerpiece of a broader deal to eventually move some 9,000 Marines to bases in Guam, Hawaii and Australia."We are able to make progress in reducing Okinawa's burden in a visible manner," Mr. Abe said, joined by a dozen American and Japanese officials. "I am extremely glad that everybody could sit down together today and reach a conclusion on this intractable issue."Friday's agreement tries to restart that plan by setting a target date of returning the Futenma base, in the center of the city of Ginowan, by as early as 2022, provided the replacement air base is operational. It also lays out a timetable for handing over five other American bases also in the crowded southern half of the island by the late 2020s.Under the timetable, the first parcel — an access road and surrounding land totaling 2.5 acres — would be turned over to Japan this year.In a bid to increase transparency and accountability, the new timetable also includes flowcharts outlining which government agencies in both countries need to take what steps for the land to be returned on schedule. American and Japanese officials said this was to prevent the deal from getting bogged down in murky bureaucratic proceedings, as happened in the past.For the Obama administration, the agreement is meant not only to shore up one of America's most important security relationships in Asia, but also to demonstrate to other regional allies, as well as rivals, that the United States has the willpower to maintain its security presence despite its budget difficulties and fatigue from wars in the Middle East."This sends a clear signal to the region that we are committed to making hard choices to keep our force posture in Okinawa," said Mark Lippert, assistant secretary of defense for Asian and Pacific affairs, who visited Tokyo to complete the agreement.For Mr. Abe, restarting the relocation plan would fulfill a campaign pledge to improve ties with the United States as his nation faces a growing challenge from China over disputed islands near Okinawa. Becoming a fuller military partner of the United States has been a centerpiece of the prime minister's bid to reverse his nation's declining stature in the region after years of economic stagnation and its relative eclipse by China's rise.However, he is also taking a political risk on an agreement that may fail to appease Okinawans' anger over what they see as an unfairly onerous American base presence.The Abe government has been trying to whittle away at Okinawans' opposition with offers of generous financial aid and other efforts to court the island's governor, Hirokazu Nakaima, a base opponent who is a member of Mr. Abe's conservative governing party. In a sign the government's tactics may be working, Mr. Nakaima offered uncharacteristic words of praise Friday, though he warned that the central government still had to win over other local leaders."I think it is extremely good that the government is buckling down to deal in concrete terms with the return of bases," Mr. Nakaima told reporters in Naha, the Okinawan capital. "But it is hard to evaluate the plan until I have had a chance to consult with mayors of the affected communities."One sticking point might be the timetable for moving the base, which is now pushed back another nine years. Under an earlier version of the deal in 2006, it would have been relocated next year. The original agreement to move the base was reached in 1996 after the gang rape of an Okinawan schoolgirl by American servicemen.
TOKYO — Workers at the stricken Fukushima nuclear power plant who were installing wire nets Friday to keep rats away from a vital cooling system instead tripped that system, causing it to fail for the second time in weeks.The spent-fuel pool at the site's No. 3 reactor went without fresh cooling water for almost three hours on Friday afternoon, said the plant's operator, the Tokyo Electric Power Company, or Tepco.Cooling was restored by late evening on Friday, and there was no imminent danger to the 566 nuclear fuel rods stored in the pool, according to the company. It would have taken at least two weeks for the pool to have risen above the safe level of 149 degrees Fahrenheit, Tepco said.Still, the recent power failures have raised concerns over continued vulnerabilities at the plant two years after a large earthquake and tsunami knocked out its vital cooling systems, resulting in multiple fuel meltdowns and forcing 160,000 people to evacuate.The debris-strewn plant still relies on makeshift cooling systems, some of which were hastily put together in the accident's frantic aftermath. The spent-fuel pools, which hold far more radioactive material than the reactor cores, have been a particular source of concern.A blackout disabled cooling at four fuel pools last month, an event the company traced to a rat that might have gnawed on power cables and caused a short circuit. Engineers found its scorched body in a damaged switchboard.Tepco has since installed mousetraps at the site and promised to plug holes through which rats and other rodents might enter buildings and gnaw on important equipment. It has also promised to speed up work to install backup power cables to the fuel pools.But Friday afternoon, four workers using wire meshing to seal a space around electric cables caused a ground fault, or the accidental flow of current to the ground. No one was injured, but the ground fault shut off electricity to the cooling system at the No. 3 reactor fuel pool."We were installing wire nets to keep the rats out. But the end of one of the wires may have momentarily come into contact with a live terminal," said Masayuki Ono, general manager at Tepco's Nuclear Power and Plant Siting Division. "The next moment, there were sirens."
TOKYO — Tens of thousands of gallons of radioactive water leaked from a large underground storage pool at Japan 's crippled nuclear plant, and thousands more gallons could seep out before the faulty pool can be emptied, the plant's operator said Saturday.About 120 tons, or almost 32,000 gallons, of highly contaminated water appeared to have breached the inner protective lining of the pool at the Fukushima Daiichi plant, said the operator, Tokyo Electric Power Company. It was unclear how much of the water had made it through two additional layers of lining to reach soil, but radiation levels outside the pool have risen, a sign that some water is getting out, said the company, known as Tepco.The leak highlights the daunting challenge of what to do with the huge amounts of contaminated water created by makeshift cooling systems at the plant, after a huge earthquake and tsunami knocked out its regular cooling systems two years ago in the worst nuclear accident since Chernobyl. Since then, Tepco has essentially been pouring water onto the damaged reactor cores and storage ponds to keep them from overheating.As it is used for cooling, the water becomes so contaminated that it must be safely stored at the plant. Tepco said it was already storing more than a quarter-million tons of radioactive water in hundreds of large silver or blue tanks that seem to fill every available space at the plant, or in underground pools like the leaking one. With the decommissioning of the Fukushima plant likely to take decades, Tepco has said it expects the amount of radioactive water to keep growing, and possibly more than double within three years. The company has said it is building more storage space and new filtering facilities to clean the water.The company said the leak appeared to be the biggest since the early months after the March 2011 disaster, when leaks allowed contaminated water to flow into the nearby Pacific Ocean. Tepco said that this time, it did not expect any of the toxic water to reach the sea, since the pool is half a mile from the coast.Still, Tepco said it had begun pumping the remaining 13,000 tons of water out of the faulty pool and into a similar pool. The pools are like large ponds dug into the ground, protected by multiple layers of plastic sheets and covered with dirt.Emptying the damaged pool could take five more days, the company said, during which time an additional 47 tons, or about 12,000 gallons, could leak.
Blanketed by haze and poised at the juncture of restless tectonic plates, Tokyo is unlikely territory for sky-high observation decks and city-viewing towers. But defiant Tokyoites insist on building them, and then, once they are in place, eagerly get in line to ride up and have a look.The latest addition to the city's soaring buildings, dizzying Ferris wheels and skyscraper-top restaurants is Tokyo Skytree, which at 2,080 feet, holds the title as the world's tallest free-standing tower. The Skytree, which opened last May, became an instant hot ticket.Its top viewing level, at 1,480 feet, is only the fourth-highest in the world, behind a couple of Chinese skyscrapers and the Burj Khalifa in Dubai. That is tall enough, though, for a head-clearing perspective on sprawling Tokyo, whose multiple city centers, odd block-based address system and reliance on underground transit foster confusion at ground level. One surprise in the Skytree vantage point is a sudden realization of how far the distorted subway maps depart from geographic reality.On a weekday morning last fall, an animated crowd waited 40 minutes to buy tickets, gasped at a rapidly ascending view through windows in the elevator shaft, and once on the observation deck, pointed out landmarks keyed on satellite maps and took turns on a patch of glass floor. Mount Fuji, the holy grail of Tokyo gazing, was out there somewhere, hidden by clouds and smog. (Chances of seeing it are best in winter, when winds blow the haze away.) When a window washer glided into view outside, everyone's cellphone came out to snap a picture. Nobody seemed at all concerned about the shaky ground below — even though some of the people had probably watched Tokyo's skyscrapers swaying like trees in the wind a couple of years ago, when the same earthquake that brought a devastating tsunami farther north hit Tokyo with a reduced but still impressive jolt.For 50 years before the Skytree reared its upstart mast, the iconic queen of the skyline was the Tokyo Tower, an Eiffel Tower knockoff and a frequent target of Godzilla and his monstrous ilk. Only about half the Skytree's height, marred at its base by tacky souvenir shops, the Tokyo Tower feels cramped and a little pathetic by comparison, although it's worth remembering that it still bests the Eiffel Tower by 28 feet. It is also cheaper to visit than the Skytree, less crowded, and the place to go for a certain perspective that is especially good at night.That is when the tower feels just right — above the city but still within it. Traffic streams by on nearby expressways in a blur of red and white light, the Ferris wheel at the Odaiba waterfront entertainment complex whirls with its own bright display, and Tokyo Bay glimmers beneath the illuminated Rainbow Bridge. The ambience seems to appeal to young lovers. Couples who appeared to be out on a date dominated the thin crowd on one warm autumn evening.Clusters of lighted skyscrapers mark the cities within the city: Shinjuku, Shibuya, Shinagawa, the old city center near the Imperial Palace. On clear nights, the view extends to Yokohama, identifiable by a glimpse of the Landmark Tower, Japan's tallest building (the much taller Skytree can't hold that title, since much of its height is a structure without floors to walk on) and the location of yet another observation deck.The Tokyo Tower was a symbol of the city's determination to remake itself after World War II on the model of Western capitals. The Skytree announces the intention to remain competitive as other Asian cities reach for dominance. All of Tokyo's places to look down at itself take seismic chances that those other cities' towers do not. But they also reflect something familiar: a great city's desire not to let a few quirks of nature hold it back.
Blanketed by haze and poised at the juncture of restless tectonic plates, Tokyo is unlikely territory for sky-high observation decks and city-viewing towers. But defiant Tokyoites insist on building them, and then, once they are in place, eagerly get in line to ride up and have a look.The latest addition to the city's soaring buildings, dizzying Ferris wheels and skyscraper-top restaurants is Tokyo Skytree, which at 2,080 feet, holds the title as the world's tallest free-standing tower. The Skytree, which opened last May, became an instant hot ticket.Its top viewing level, at 1,480 feet, is only the fourth-highest in the world, behind a couple of Chinese skyscrapers and the Burj Khalifa in Dubai. That is tall enough, though, for a head-clearing perspective on sprawling Tokyo, whose multiple city centers, odd block-based address system and reliance on underground transit foster confusion at ground level. One surprise in the Skytree vantage point is a sudden realization of how far the distorted subway maps depart from geographic reality.On a weekday morning last fall, an animated crowd waited 40 minutes to buy tickets, gasped at a rapidly ascending view through windows in the elevator shaft, and once on the observation deck, pointed out landmarks keyed on satellite maps and took turns on a patch of glass floor. Mount Fuji, the holy grail of Tokyo gazing, was out there somewhere, hidden by clouds and smog. (Chances of seeing it are best in winter, when winds blow the haze away.) When a window washer glided into view outside, everyone's cellphone came out to snap a picture. Nobody seemed at all concerned about the shaky ground below — even though some of the people had probably watched Tokyo's skyscrapers swaying like trees in the wind a couple of years ago, when the same earthquake that brought a devastating tsunami farther north hit Tokyo with a reduced but still impressive jolt.For 50 years before the Skytree reared its upstart mast, the iconic queen of the skyline was the Tokyo Tower, an Eiffel Tower knockoff and a frequent target of Godzilla and his monstrous ilk. Only about half the Skytree's height, marred at its base by tacky souvenir shops, the Tokyo Tower feels cramped and a little pathetic by comparison, although it's worth remembering that it still bests the Eiffel Tower by 28 feet. It is also cheaper to visit than the Skytree, less crowded, and the place to go for a certain perspective that is especially good at night.That is when the tower feels just right — above the city but still within it. Traffic streams by on nearby expressways in a blur of red and white light, the Ferris wheel at the Odaiba waterfront entertainment complex whirls with its own bright display, and Tokyo Bay glimmers beneath the illuminated Rainbow Bridge. The ambience seems to appeal to young lovers. Couples who appeared to be out on a date dominated the thin crowd on one warm autumn evening.Clusters of lighted skyscrapers mark the cities within the city: Shinjuku, Shibuya, Shinagawa, the old city center near the Imperial Palace. On clear nights, the view extends to Yokohama, identifiable by a glimpse of the Landmark Tower, Japan's tallest building (the much taller Skytree can't hold that title, since much of its height is a structure without floors to walk on) and the location of yet another observation deck.The Tokyo Tower was a symbol of the city's determination to remake itself after World War II on the model of Western capitals. The Skytree announces the intention to remain competitive as other Asian cities reach for dominance. All of Tokyo's places to look down at itself take seismic chances that those other cities' towers do not. But they also reflect something familiar: a great city's desire not to let a few quirks of nature hold it back.
TOKYO — A small amount of toxic water has leaked from an underground storage pool at the stricken Fukushima nuclear plant, the plant's operator said Sunday, two days after it reported a much larger leak from a similar storage pool.The operator, the Tokyo Electric Power Company, said that about three liters, or just over three quarts, of water was believed to have leaked from the No. 3 pool, where highly contaminated water is stored after being used to cool the damaged reactors and spent fuel of the Fukushima Daiichi plant. On Friday, the company said about 32,000 gallons of radioactive water had leaked from the neighboring No. 2 pool.While the newest leak is tiny by comparison, it has raised new public concerns about the company's ability to safely manage the plant, where three reactors melted down in March 2011 because their cooling systems were knocked out by a huge earthquake and tsunami. That accident forced the evacuation of 160,000 people in the Fukushima region of northeastern Japan.Last month, some of the makeshift cooling systems built after the accident were stopped for days by a partial blackout that was later blamed on a short circuit caused by a rat.Major Japanese newspapers published criticisms of the company over the weekend, saying it had tried to cover up the risks from the leak reported Friday and had understated the levels of radioactivity in the water. The company said it appeared that the water had seeped through holes in plastic sheets used to protect the large underground storage pools.Industry regulators came in for criticism as well. They were widely faulted after the 2011 meltdowns for having collusive ties with power companies and turning a blind eye to safety lapses. Newspapers quoted an unnamed official at the Nuclear Regulation Authority, a newly created watchdog, as saying officials from the authority's discredited predecessor had rubber-stamped the underground storage pools last fall without properly inspecting them.The leaks also raised worries about the apparently fragile state of the plant, where jury-rigged cooling systems connected by hundreds of yards of rubber tubing still pour water on the damaged reactor cores and fuel storage pools. Some experts say those cooling systems could fail in another large earthquake.Some experts say the plant will remain vulnerable for years, and the work of dismantling and cleaning up the damaged reactors is expected to take decades.
The operator of Japan's crippled nuclear plant halted an emergency operation Tuesday to pump thousands of gallons of radioactive water from a leaking underground storage pool after workers discovered that a similar pool, to which the water was being transferred, was also leaking.At least three of seven underground chambers at the site are now seeping radioactive water, leaving the Tokyo Electric Power Company with few options on where to store the huge amounts of contaminated runoff from the makeshift cooling systems at the Fukushima Daiichi nuclear power plant.Those systems were put in place after a large earthquake and tsunami damaged the plant's regular cooling systems two years ago, causing fuel at three of its reactors to melt and prompting 160,000 people to evacuate their homes. Since then, the Tokyo Electric Power Company, or Tepco, has been flooding the damaged reactor cores to cool and stabilize the fuel.But Tepco has struggled to find space to store the runoff water. It initially released what it said was low-level contaminated water into the Pacific Ocean, igniting furious criticism among neighbors and environmental activists. Traces of radioactive cesium were later found in bluefin tuna caught off the California coast.Prime Minister Shinzo Abe has stressed that he will not permit Tepco — which has effectively been nationalized since the disaster — to again release contaminated water into the ocean. But Tepco says that it already stores more than a quarter-million tons of radioactive water in hundreds of tanks at the site, or in underground pools, and that the amount of runoff could double within three years.The company has said it is building more storage space and also filters much of the runoff. But with its underground pools vulnerable to leaks, Tepco is being forced to hurriedly find alternatives.Workers at the plant had been emptying the No. 2 underground pool after Tepco found that about 120 tons of toxic water, or almost 32,000 gallons, had breached its inner plastic linings and seeped into the soil. Tepco said the leak appeared to be the biggest since the early months after the March 2011 disaster.But readings around the No. 1 pool, to which the remaining water from the No. 2 pool was being transferred, suggested that it, too, was seeping water, said Masayuki Ono, general manager at Tepco's Nuclear Power and Plant Siting Division. The No. 3 pool was also found to have sprung a small leak on Sunday.Mr. Ono said Tepco did not think that the contaminated water would reach the sea, since the pools lie about half a mile inland, but said he could not be sure.Workers will now empty both the No. 1 and No. 2 pools, and transfer them to other pools. Tepco will continue to use the No. 3 pool at less than capacity, because the leak there was minor, Mr. Ono said.Asked whether the plant's other underground pools might also be prone to leaking, Mr. Ono had no clear answer."We are still assessing the situation," he said.
TOKYO — Efforts to remove highly contaminated water from a leaking underground storage pool at the crippled Fukushima nuclear plant were delayed on Sunday when the plant's operator said it had found yet another leak, this time in the pipes that would be used to move the water to above-ground storage containers.The operator, Tokyo Electric Power Co., or Tepco, said it has found that almost six gallons of water leaked from a junction in the pipes that are currently used to move water between other storage pools. The company is struggling to find space to store the huge amounts of toxic water that are created by makeshift efforts to cool reactors at the Fukushima Daiichi plant, which was damaged two years ago by a large earthquake and tsunami.Since then, the operator has been essentially pouring water onto the melted reactors and nearby fuel storage pools to keep them from overheating again.While small, the newest leak will force Tepco to postpone removal of water from the No. 2 storage pool for several days while the company repairs the faulty pipe junction. The pool has spilled some 32,000 gallons of radioactive water, and appears to still be leaking.Some of that water may have been trapped in the multiple layers of lining in the pool, but an undetermined amount reached the soil below, Tepco said.The newest leak adds to a series of mishaps that have raised questions about Tepco's ability to safely manage the stricken plant. That included the temporary loss last month of power for the vital cooling systems after a rat apparently short-circuited part of the electrical system.
TOKYO — When he woke up to the news of a collapse in gold prices, Yujiro Yamashita, 63, made his way to the posh Ginza district of Tokyo to make his first purchase of the metal in 20 years.Mr. Yamashita and other contrarian, individual Japanese investors understand that gold is a volatile investment, but they say it is better than the alternatives.They cite worries that the new high-octane economic policies of Prime Minister Shinzo Abe, designed to shock the Japanese economy out of nearly two decades of deflation, might prompt a collapse in the yen, or that the recent rally in stock prices might fizzle; they also point to heightened tensions on the Korean Peninsula."Bank deposits generate virtually zero interest," Mr. Yamashita said as he bought two gold coins worth almost $5,000 on Tuesday with some of the money he had made from the recent sale of his house. "Stock prices have jumped like crazy, but there are concerns about the risk of war," he added. "So I try to buy gold when I can."Japan's demand for gold, amid a global slump in which prices tumbled about $125 an ounce Monday, is partly a result of the declining value of the yen against the dollar.Although global gold prices have been in retreat since October and are down about 20 percent this year — after an unbroken 12 years of gains — the weaker Japanese currency drove yen-denominated gold prices to near record highs last week.As a result of the currency effect, yen-based investors in gold who bought during the worst of the global slump in late 2008 would still be showing a 118 percent gain, even after the decline Monday, which was the biggest daily drop ever in dollar terms.By contrast, a dollar-based investor would have had gains over the same period of just 46 percent.Some Japanese also harbor fears that the expansionary monetary and fiscal policies known as Abenomics, coupled with a national debt more than twice as large as annual economic output, could set off a crisis.Those who are skeptical of the radical attempt to stimulate the economy — or those simply worried that the slide in the yen that began in anticipation of Mr. Abe's election victory last December will continue unabated — are still buying gold, dealers say."Investors in gold are convinced that Japan's fiscal position will get worse," said Wakako Harada, general manager of Japan's top bullion house, Tanaka Kikinzoku Kogyo."What I see at our counter is that more people are getting worried about Japan," he said. "That's why we are seeing a lot of buying."The Tokyo stock market has rallied hard in response the latest efforts to stimulate the stagnant economy, with the Nikkei 225-share index having risen about 30 percent this year.But Kazuko Ohide, a 64-year-old retiree, is one of the household investors who think the effects of Abenomics will not last long.Ms. Ohide used the proceeds of a matured term bank deposit to buy three 24-carat Japanese oval gold coins for a total of $3,000 at a Ginza district department store last week."I still own the shares of the company that I had worked for, but I didn't want to hold other company's shares," Ms. Ohide said as she showed off her gold coins. "Stocks go down quite a lot. They are very strong now, but I'm not sure how long that will last."Yuichi Ikemizu, branch manager for Standard Bank in Tokyo, said that a record high for gold two years ago had prompted heavy sales by retail investors."In contrast, this time we are seeing interest to buy on dips to take exposures to gold," Mr. Ikemizu said. "Investors are using this opportunity to buy gold to diversify beyond bonds, stocks and the yen currency, as Japan's fiscal situation could deteriorate."A week ago, as the yen-denominated price neared a new peak, jewelry stores and gold merchants across Japan saw long lines of mostly older Japanese looking to cash in on unwanted jewelry and other items that they had held for years.But on Tuesday, buyers outnumbered sellers by a wide margin.At Ginza Tanaka, the headquarters shop of Tanaka Holdings, gold buyers waited as long as three hours to complete transactions.Nearby at Ginza SGC, a gold merchant, buyers had taken about 6 kilograms, or 13 pounds, of gold home by early afternoon Tuesday. In one case, a 60-year-old man, who asked not to be identified, walked out of the store with 500 grams, or 18 ounces, of gold for about ¥2.2 million, or $22,500.At a special gold display organized this month at the Matsuzakaya department store, employees said that an 18-carat gold Buddhist bell used at a household altar to honor deceased relatives was selling well. It was priced at ¥4 million."You could buy it as a family treasure, as many of our customers do," one salesman said. "But if your house burned down and you lost everything, gold is fire-resistant, and you would still have it."
Boeing 's 787s could be flying again within weeks, a major milestone for the innovative passenger jets that have been grounded since January because of battery problems.The Federal Aviation Administration on Friday approved Boeing's plans to fix the plane's lithium-ion batteries after two erupted in smoke and fire on separate planes. Boeing has deployed teams of technicians around the world to quickly install the modified batteries on the 50 jets that have been delivered so far and return them to service as soon as possible.More important, the F.A.A.'s decision frees Boeing to resume deliveries of 787s in the next two months, a critical step for the plane maker and for airlines that have been eagerly awaiting the new, more fuel-efficient jets. Boeing said Friday that it would deliver all 787s that were planned this year.The battery problems have probably cost Boeing hundreds of millions of dollars, and airlines are likely to seek financial compensation for the delays. Still, Boeing has not seen an impact on the 800 orders it has booked for the plane, which promises fuel cost savings of 20 percent. The 787 is the first commercial aircraft built largely from lighter carbon-composite materials, and it uses more electrical systems than conventional airplanes.Investors appeared to have shrugged off the issue as well, possibly out of confidence that Boeing would fix the problem. The company's shares rose 2.14 percent, to $87.96, on Friday, and the stock is up $10 since the fleet was grounded.Investigators in the United States and Japan have still not been able to identify precisely what caused the batteries to overheat, and, in one case, ignite. Boeing's fixes include better insulation for the batteries' eight cells, and a stainless steel box designed to encase the batteries and contain fire and vent possible smoke or hazardous gases out of the planes. Mike Sinnett, Boeing's chief engineer for the 787, said that the tests performed in the last month showed the batteries were now much less likely to overheat.Boeing engineers have also made modifications to the plane's power panels and generators, including replacing some parts and bringing components "up to the latest standards," Mr. Sinnett said. Those changes were not linked to the battery system, and were not required by the F.A.A., he said, but they had failed in the past and caused problems before the planes were grounded.The F.A.A. administrator, Michael P. Huerta, and the transportation secretary, Ray LaHood, said they were satisfied that the proposed changes would eliminate concerns that batteries could erupt in smoke or fire.The changes "will ensure the safety of the aircraft and its passengers," Mr. LaHood said Friday.The F.A.A. will issue a final directive to effectively lift the grounding order and allow each plane operated by an American carrier to return to service as soon as it is modified. So far, United Airlines is the only airline in the United States with 787s in its fleet.Boeing said it takes just five days for the new system to be installed and has dispatched 300 mechanics around the world to perform the work.Aviation regulators in Japan and other countries must also weigh in and approve the system. Japan, in particular, is a critical market for Boeing. About half of all 787s delivered until now are operated by two Japanese airlines — All Nippon Airways and Japan Airlines — and Japanese companies manufactured about a third of the plane's components, including its wings. A Japanese company, GS Yuasa, built the battery.The Japanese transportation minister, Akihiro Ota, said Friday in Tokyo that Japan's own assessment of the safety of Boeing's battery changes was "in its final stages.""We're doing our best to ensure a safe and speedy return to service," he said.But Japanese regulators could ask Boeing for additional safeguards, the Nikkei business newspaper reported Friday. Those could include adding devices to transmit voltage and other vital data to controllers on the ground so the batteries can be routinely monitored for irregularities, according to the Nikkei report.
With Toyota 's announcement on Friday that it would build its Lexus luxury car for the first time in the United States, the automaker underscored how foreign companies are trying to capitalize on the country's robust automobile sales.Toyota has been eager to bolster its Lexus brand in the United States, the automaker's biggest overseas market, where luxury car sales now outpace sales of other autos. Toyota also wants to shift more production from Japan to overseas markets to better insulate itself from the currency gyrations that have wreaked havoc on its bottom line in recent years.For communities like Georgetown, Ky., Toyota's decision to expand auto production came as a vote of confidence in American auto manufacturing after years of painful cutbacks by domestic automakers. Despite that decline, the United States remains one of the top auto manufacturers and employers in the world, thanks to Japanese and other foreign companies that have expanded production here.Those foreign automakers are getting plenty of incentives. On Wednesday, the Kentucky Economic Development Finance Authority approved $146.5 million in state tax benefits to help Toyota expand production in Georgetown, in a sign of how aggressively states are wooing companies that will create and maintain local manufacturing jobs."I feel like the state has just won the Kentucky Derby," Gov. Steven L. Beshear of Kentucky said as cheers erupted in a broadcast streamed live in New York from Toyota's Georgetown plant. The site, which opened in 1986, was Toyota's first wholly owned factory in the United States and is its largest manufacturing plant outside of Japan. "We actually see Toyota as a Kentucky company," Governor Beshear said.Toyota said that it would invest $360 million to install a new production line that will build about 50,000 of its flagship Lexus ES 350 sedans a year at Georgetown. The move will increase annual production at the plant, which already assembles the Camry, Avalon and Venza models and employs about 6,600 people, to about 550,000 vehicles a year. Toyota is also investing $170 million in upgrades to the plant."For manufacturing, Kentucky is Toyota's home. It has some of the most experienced engineers in the world," Akio Toyoda, president of Toyota Motor, said in New York. He said that building the Lexus here would help Toyota better meet the needs of its American customers and would reduce the effect of the exchange rate on car prices for American consumers.Since 2008, a punishingly strong yen has weighed on Toyota's profitability, making it more expensive in dollar terms to produce in Japan and eroding the value of its overseas earnings in the home currency. Mr. Toyoda said a recent respite in the yen's strength would not affect the company's plans to protect itself from future ups and downs in currency.Toyota's new expansion follows brisk sales in the United States of the Lexus ES, a midsize luxury car that is selling twice as fast as it did in 2012. Though the car comes in conventional gasoline and gas-electric hybrid models, only gas-powered cars will be made in Kentucky for now, Toyota said.Toyota now builds the Lexus ES at a plant on the island of Kyushu in southern Japan. Seeking to soothe worries back home that Toyota is reducing manufacturing jobs there, the company said that it expected to announce soon that the plant would manufacture another model. The Kyushu plant will also make and export the hybrid version of the ES, Toyota said.Toyota's chief executive for North America, James E. Lentz, said the investment came on top of plans already under way to spend $2 billion to expand and upgrade Toyota factories in Indiana, Mississippi, West Virginia and Canada in the last two years. Those expansions have also created new jobs.Traditionally tightly controlled from its headquarters in Toyota City, Toyota has revamped its management structure in recent months to give more authority to regional managers, including a new team of executives in North America led by Mr. Lentz. Mr. Lentz said bringing Lexus production to the United States was the first decision made by his team, and he expected similar decisions to follow.
TOKYO — Members of the cabinet of Japan 's conservative prime minister visited a war shrine in Tokyo over the weekend, local news reports said Sunday, symbolic gestures that could anger South Korea and China at a time when Japan's relations with both nations have been rocky.The separate visits by at least four cabinet members, including the deputy prime minister, Taro Aso, were the first to the Yasukuni Shrine by members of the government of Prime Minister Shinzo Abe, an outspoken nationalist who took power in December. The large shrine of Japan's native Shinto religion honors the nation's war dead, including several who were executed as war criminals after World War II. This has made it a target of condemnation in China and South Korea, both of which suffered greatly as a result of Japan's empire-building efforts in the early 20th century.The Japanese news media said that while Mr. Abe refrained from visiting the shrine to avoid provoking China and South Korea, he did send a ritual offering of the branch of a cypress tree, used in traditional Shinto ceremonies. Sunday was the start of a three-day spring festival at the shrine when conservative politicians frequently visit and offer prayers.The quiet, wooded shrine in central Tokyo has become one of the most emotionally charged symbols of how history continues to divide Japan from the rest of Asia. Visits to Yasukuni can provoke angry reactions in South Korea and China, where they are often seen as proof that Japan remains unrepentant for its brutal wartime march across Asia. Japanese conservatives say the visits are necessary to show their respect for soldiers who died for their nation.It is unclear how South Korea and China will react to the offering by Mr. Abe, or to the visits by the members of his cabinet, which contains some prominent apologists for Japan's wartime behavior. Japanese prime ministers have made similar offerings in the past without riling their neighbors. But there has been intense attention on Mr. Abe, who also has a record of defending Japan's conduct during World War II.Before Mr. Abe took office, there had been widespread concern that he might say or do something to outrage victims of Japanese wartime aggression. But Mr. Abe has so far acted with restraint, apparently eager to avoid isolating Japan in the region. He has responded calmly to almost daily intrusions by Chinese ships into waters claimed by Japan around disputed islands in the East China Sea. Mr. Abe has also worked to mend relations with South Korea, which frayed last year when Lee Myung-bak, then the South's president, visited a different group of disputed islands.The weekend's first visit to Yasukuni was made Saturday by Yoshitaka Shindo, the minister of internal affairs and the grandson of the Japanese general who commanded the forces defending Iwo Jima when American Marines attacked in 1945. Most of the visits took place on Sunday, the first day of the festival. Mr. Aso, the deputy prime minister and a prominent conservative, was seen bowing in front of the shrine, but he left without answering questions.He was preceded by the deputy chief cabinet secretary, Katsunobu Kato, and Keiji Furuya, the minister in charge of the issue of Japanese citizens abducted by North Korea. Mr. Furuya is one of several conservative Abe supporters who dispute the position of South Korea, and also of many American scholars, that Japan's military forced foreign women into sexual servitude for its soldiers during the war."It is natural for a lawmaker to offer heartfelt condolences for the spirits of the war dead who sacrificed their lives for the nation," Mr. Furuya was quoted as saying by Kyodo News on Sunday.
PARIS — A widespread strike all but grounded the German flag carrier Lufthansa on Monday, affecting around 150,000 passengers around the world amid a battle over wages as the airline pushes ahead with a $2 billion restructuring program.The airline, Europe's largest by passengers carried, said it had to cancel all but 32 of its 1,700 scheduled flights worldwide after unions representing more than 33,000 ground crew and other staff, half its German work force, called the action. The full-day "warning strike" at Germany's biggest airports — including Frankfurt, Munich and Hamburg — was the second such action in a month by members of the country's powerful services union, ver.di. The union is seeking a 5.2 percent wage increase, job guarantees and a shorter, 12-month contract period.The contract talks come as Lufthansa, like other large network carriers across Europe, struggles to keep a lid on operating costs. In the European market, Lufthansa and its peers are losing market share to leaner and nimbler rivals like Ryanair, easyJet and Air Berlin. On long-distance routes, they are being squeezed by rapidly expanding Middle Eastern carriers like Emirates and Etihad.Lufthansa said it had managed to operate a small number of long-distance flights Monday, most of them to U.S. destinations. At Frankfurt, where Lufthansa is based, only 6 of 50 scheduled intercontinental flights took off: to Kennedy International Airport in New York, as well as Philadelphia and Atlanta in the United States; Madras, India; Nagoya, Japan; and Kuwait City. From Munich, only three trans-Atlantic flights — to Charlotte, North Carolina; Chicago and Miami — departed out of 17 scheduled. All three daily flights to the United States from Düsseldorf — to Newark Liberty International Airport, Chicago and Miami — operated as scheduled.The airline said it had managed to warn roughly 100,000 — or two-thirds — of its affected passengers over the weekend and was making arrangements to rebook them on other flights or refund their tickets.The delays for Lufthansa passengers came as some flights in and out of New York, Washington and other U.S. airports were delayed by several hours Monday as federal budget cuts led to furloughs of air traffic controllers. The U.S. Federal Aviation Administration has begun restricting air traffic at peak times because it has too few controllers to safely monitor busy air corridors.The walkout in Germany on Monday was the latest in a series of labor disputes at Lufthansa that began last year and has been fueled by a restructuring plan, announced last May, that seeks to shave more than €1.5 billion, or almost $2 billion, from annual costs by 2015. The plan foresees the elimination of around 3,500 jobs — about 2,500 of them in Germany — largely through attrition and voluntary, early retirements. Lufthansa's global work force currently stands at around 117,000.Staff costs have risen steadily at Lufthansa over the past decade and now represent more than 22 percent of the airline's total operating costs as a share of revenue — on a par with its fuel bill, which reached €7.4 billion last year.By contrast, labor costs as a share of revenue are less than 10 percent at Europe's largest low-cost carrier, Ryanair, and 12.4 percent at easyJet, according to the Center for Aviation in Brussels.Claudia Lange, a Lufthansa spokeswoman, said the strike, which was announced Friday and in which roughly 12,000 staff participated, was unexpected, given that the airline had improved its pay offer during the most recent round of negotiations, which ended April 17. She said management's latest offer included raises of up to 3 percent, but sought to extend the contract period to 29 months in order to provide more predictability in wage costs. Ver.di's most recent contract with Lufthansa was for 22 months."It is surprising that the union is going on strike at all," said Ms. Lange, who said she could not recall the last time Lufthansa had faced such a widespread labor-related disruption. "Until now, the negotiations have been fairly constructive."The airline's offer, she added, also includes a one-time bonus payment equivalent to 1 percent of annual wages if the company achieves an operating profit margin of 3 percent in 2014. The margin was 1.7 percent last year, down from 2.9 percent in 2011 and 3.9 percent in 2010.Martina Sönnischen, a ver.di spokeswoman, dismissed Lufthansa's offer as "scandalous," saying that it still represented a small fraction of what the union had demanded and failed to address the question of job guarantees."This is not a starting point for a serious discussion," she said.Ms. Sönnischen declined to say whether the union planned further work stoppages in the run-up to the next round of talks, slated for April 29-30.Tactical warning strikes of several hours' duration are commonly used by German unions during wage negotiations as a means of increasing the pressure on employers. Last month, a half-day warning strike by ver.di led to the cancellation of 700 Lufthansa flights after a previous round of talks ended without an agreement.The warning strike Monday was unusual in that it lasted a full day. Ms. Lange said the company predicted that the financial impact of the strike would be in the "two-digit millions" of euros.Lufthansa's restructuring efforts have begun to bear fruit despite a weakening European economy and stubbornly high fuel prices. The company reported a net profit of €990 million for last year, bolstered by asset sales, compared with a loss of €13 million in 2011. But it suspended dividend payments to shareholders in order to make more cash available to finance its turnaround.Lufthansa said that flights would resume Tuesday, but that passengers should expect significant delays until at least early afternoon.
TOKYO — Japanese lawmakers paid their respects at a shrine to those killed in war, including those executed as war criminals, in what the local news media described as the biggest group visit by Parliament members in recent memory.The visit threatens to exacerbate tensions with South Korea and China, which view the shrine as a symbol of a lack of repentance for Japan's brutal expansion across Asia. It took place as a territorial row with China flared, with boats carrying Japanese nationalists and Chinese paramilitary ships converging on a group of contested islands.The 168 mostly low-ranking conservative lawmakers visited the Yasukuni Shrine in central Tokyo just days after a visit by members of the cabinet of Japan's conservative prime minister, Shinzo Abe. Last year, a group of 81 lawmakers visited the shrine during the same three-day spring festival, when many nationalists say they feel obligated to recognize soldiers' ultimate sacrifice for their country.Analysts said the size of this year's visit was partly a byproduct of December's landslide victory by the conservative Liberal Democratic Party, which installed the hawkish prime minister and an increased number of rightists in Parliament. But the analysts also called it the latest example of how Japanese ultraconservatives have become more vocal in recent years, amid growing unease over China's rising power and its increasingly forceful stance on the long-simmering dispute over the islands, known as the Senkaku in Japan and the Diaoyu in Chinese.On Tuesday, the Japanese Coast Guard reported that eight Chinese patrol ships had entered waters near the islands, the largest number to appear at one time since the dispute surged last summer. The Coast Guard said the Chinese ships converged from several directions into waters near the uninhabited, Japanese-controlled islands.The Chinese ships appeared at the same time as 10 boats carrying members of a Japanese ultranationalist group. The boats were followed by Japanese Coast Guard ships apparently seeking to ensure that they did not try a landing, as some nationalists did last year.Those landings, and the decision in September by the Japanese government to buy three of the islands from their private owner, set off violent street demonstrations in China. Accusing Japan of disrupting the hazy status quo that prevailed before then, China has been sending armed ships from various coast-guard-like civilian agencies on an almost daily basis into or near waters around the islands, apparently to challenge Japanese control.The tensions were especially fraught earlier this year after several high-profile episodes, including the scrambling of fighter jets by both sides, that raised fears the dispute would continue to escalate.On Tuesday, the Japanese Foreign Ministry summoned the Chinese ambassador to lodge a formal protest over the latest intrusions, which the top Japanese government spokesman, the chief cabinet secretary Yoshihide Suga, called "unacceptable."Mr. Suga told reporters that while he did not know why China sent the ships, he did not think they were meant to protest the round of visits to Yasukuni over the weekend by leading members of Mr. Abe's government. On Monday, the Chinese government criticized those visits, and the South Korean foreign minister, Yun Byung-se, canceled a trip to Japan to talk about issues that included the nuclear crisis with North Korea.There was no immediate response by China or South Korea to the lawmakers' visit to the shrine. The leader of the group, which includes members of the governing Liberal Democrats as well as opposition lawmakers, said they had the right to honor Japan's war dead without causing an international incident."It is common in any country that a parliamentarian offers prayers for the souls of the departed war heroes who gave their lives in defense of their country," the leader, Hidehisa Otsuji, a Liberal Democratic lawmaker, told reporters after praying at the shrine. "The angry reactions are hard to comprehend."
TOKYO — Japanese lawmakers paid their respects at a shrine to those killed in war, including those executed as war criminals, in what the local news media described as the biggest group visit by Parliament members in recent memory.The visit threatens to exacerbate tensions with South Korea and China, which view the shrine as a symbol of a lack of repentance for Japan's brutal expansion across Asia. It took place as a territorial row with China flared, with boats carrying Japanese nationalists and Chinese paramilitary ships converging on a group of contested islands.The 168 mostly low-ranking conservative lawmakers visited the Yasukuni Shrine in central Tokyo just days after a visit by members of the cabinet of Japan's conservative prime minister, Shinzo Abe. Last year, a group of 81 lawmakers visited the shrine during the same three-day spring festival, when many nationalists say they feel obligated to recognize soldiers' ultimate sacrifice for their country.Analysts said the size of this year's visit was partly a byproduct of December's landslide victory by the conservative Liberal Democratic Party, which installed the hawkish prime minister and an increased number of rightists in Parliament. But the analysts also called it the latest example of how Japanese ultraconservatives have become more vocal in recent years, amid growing unease over China's rising power and its increasingly forceful stance on the long-simmering dispute over the islands, known as the Senkaku in Japan and the Diaoyu in Chinese.On Tuesday, the Japanese Coast Guard reported that eight Chinese patrol ships had entered waters near the islands, the largest number to appear at one time since the dispute surged last summer. The Coast Guard said the Chinese ships converged from several directions into waters near the uninhabited, Japanese-controlled islands.The Chinese ships appeared at the same time as 10 boats carrying members of a Japanese ultranationalist group. The boats were followed by Japanese Coast Guard ships apparently seeking to ensure that they did not try a landing, as some nationalists did last year.Those landings, and the decision in September by the Japanese government to buy three of the islands from their private owner, set off violent street demonstrations in China. Accusing Japan of disrupting the hazy status quo that prevailed before then, China has been sending armed ships from various coast-guard-like civilian agencies on an almost daily basis into or near waters around the islands, apparently to challenge Japanese control.The tensions were especially fraught earlier this year after several high-profile episodes, including the scrambling of fighter jets by both sides, that raised fears the dispute would continue to escalate.On Tuesday, the Japanese Foreign Ministry summoned the Chinese ambassador to lodge a formal protest over the latest intrusions, which the top Japanese government spokesman, the chief cabinet secretary Yoshihide Suga, called "unacceptable."Mr. Suga told reporters that while he did not know why China sent the ships, he did not think they were meant to protest the round of visits to Yasukuni over the weekend by leading members of Mr. Abe's government. On Monday, the Chinese government criticized those visits, and the South Korean foreign minister, Yun Byung-se, canceled a trip to Japan to talk about issues that included the nuclear crisis with North Korea.There was no immediate response by China or South Korea to the lawmakers' visit to the shrine. The leader of the group, which includes members of the governing Liberal Democrats as well as opposition lawmakers, said they had the right to honor Japan's war dead without causing an international incident."It is common in any country that a parliamentarian offers prayers for the souls of the departed war heroes who gave their lives in defense of their country," the leader, Hidehisa Otsuji, a Liberal Democratic lawmaker, told reporters after praying at the shrine. "The angry reactions are hard to comprehend."
YAKUSHIMA, Japan — A mysterious pestilence has befallen this island's primeval forests, leaving behind the bleached, skeletal remains of dead trees that now dot the dark green mountainsides. Osamu Nagafuchi, an environmental engineer with a passion for the island and its rugged terrain, believes he knows the culprit: airborne pollutants from smog-belching China , hundreds of miles upwind.For years, Mr. Nagafuchi's theory was ignored by fellow scientists and even mocked by bureaucrats in the national government who administer the forests on this southwestern island. But Japan has begun taking his warnings more seriously, as the nation has been gripped by a national health scare over rising levels of potentially dangerous airborne particles that have swept into other parts of Japan and that many now believe were produced by China, its huge and rapidly industrializing neighbor.These fears have reached a new level recently as China itself has issued more public warnings about the growing health risks from its cities' gray, soupy air. While Mr. Nagafuchi and a small number of collaborators say their research is not politically motivated, they admit that they may be finding more receptivity among a public that already resents China for supplanting Japan as Asia's largest economy, and for what is seen as its haughty attitude in a territorial dispute over islands both countries claim.Japanese officials still dispute whether airborne pollutants are responsible for killing the pine trees. But they and other scientists have at least begun to view Yakushima, which is far from Japan's own industrial centers, as a pristine laboratory for understanding how China's growing environmental problems could be affecting its neighbors.Many islanders are already believers, and they worry that the pollutants may be threatening their health."We are starting to feel like the canary in a coal mine," said the island's mayor, Koji Araki. "Our island is right downwind from China, so we get the brunt of it."Whatever the cause, the tree die-off is a worrisome turn for this small, mountainous island off Kyushu, the southernmost of Japan's main islands, whose moss-carpeted forests provide a rare patch of primitive nature in an otherwise densely populated nation. There are fears here that a growing smog problem could scare off the hikers and other ecotourists upon whom many of the island's 14,000 residents depend for their livelihoods.Most visitors come to see Yakushima's majestic cedar trees, which have so far been unaffected by the mysterious ailment killing the pines. The cedars won the island the distinction of a Unesco World Heritage site in 1993.The cedars were logged for centuries to build some of the great Buddhist temples in the ancient capital, Kyoto. The biggest remaining tree, the gnarled Jomon cedar, measures 16 feet around at the base and is estimated to be at least 2,600 years old.The dying trees are from an endangered species of pine that is found only on Yakushima and a neighboring island. Mr. Nagafuchi, a professor of ecosystem studies at the University of Shiga Prefecture in central Japan, said he noticed the problem when satellite photographs showed a large increase in the number of dead trees between 1992 and 1996.Mr. Nagafuchi, then a public employee for a city in Kyushu, had already found blackened snow while hiking to Yakushima's mountaintops in 1992. He started collecting and analyzing the snow as a sort of weekend hobby. To his surprise, he found it contained silicon, aluminum and other byproducts from the burning of coal, which is used to heat homes in China. Using maps of winds, he theorized that the pollutants were carried here from China, across the East China Sea.The discovery drove Mr. Nagafuchi to quit his city job and eventually become a university professor, doing much of his research on Yakushima. He has set up small monitoring stations around the island to measure levels in the air of ozone and sulfur emissions, which are typically the byproducts of burned coal or automobile exhaust.On a recent afternoon, Mr. Nagafuchi climbed to the highest of those stations, atop Mt. Kuromi, a windswept peak that rises 6,000 feet above the sea below. After hooking up his laptop to download data from the station's small digital recorder, he pointed out the thin, gauzy haze that clouded what he said should have been pristine air."The worst is when winds blow from Beijing and Tianjin," two Chinese cities about 900 miles to the northwest, said Mr. Nagafuchi, 62, who visits Yakushima once a month to collect the data readings. "This is proof that when such a big country industrializes, its effect will spread everywhere."
HANEDA AIRPORT, Japan — All Nippon Airways, the largest operator of Boeing's 787 Dreamliners, made its first test flight Sunday of a jet fitted with fortified batteries. The two-hour trip is expected to pave the way for a full resumption of flights three months after burning batteries on two planes grounded the entire 787 global fleet.A 787 carrying top executives from Boeing and All Nippon took off amid clear skies from Haneda Airport on Tokyo's waterfront Sunday morning and landed, apparently without incident, after a flight of about two hours. In the past week, regulators in the United States, Europe and Japan have all signed off on the battery fixes.Smaller airlines are already moving ahead in reintroducing the jet to their fleets, including Ethiopian Airlines, which used a 787 Saturday on a two-hour commercial flight from the Ethiopian capital of Addis Ababa to Nairobi, Kenya.But the resumption of 787 flights at All Nippon and Japan Airlines, which together own half the 50 Dreamliner jets Boeing has so far delivered, will prove the real test of whether the modified batteries will eliminate further mishaps, as well as passenger response. Both airlines have said they hope to resume scheduled commercial flights in June. All Nippon said it may introduce Dreamliners on some flights before then."The flight went as planned, with absolutely no problems," Shinichiro Ito, president and chief executive of All Nippon, told about 70 reporters and photographers who witnessed the plane land. "This is a big step toward flying again."Japanese and American regulators have been investigating the lithium-ion batteries aboard the 787 after a fire on Jan. 7 in a Japan Airlines 787 parked at a gate at Boston's Logan Airport. A second incident later that month, involving a similar battery on an All Nippon Airways plane on a Japanese domestic flight, triggered an emergency landing and led to the worldwide grounding of the planes.Boeing engineers say their fixes to the batteries — which include better insulation between the eight cells in the battery, gentler charging to minimize stress and a new titanium venting system — eliminate all potential causes of battery fire. But the engineers also acknowledged that they may never know what caused the batteries to overheat on the Japan Airlines and All Nippon aircraft because the battery cells were so damaged.Besides Boeing's repairs, Japan's Transport Ministry has requested that All Nippon and Japan Airlines also install improved battery monitoring systems on its planes, and put its 787 cockpit crews through additional flight training. Once the planes are back in service, the airlines will also take a sample of batteries every few months for tests to make sure the improvements are working."It was a perfect flight on a perfect day," said Ray Conner, executive vice president of the Boeing Company and chief executive of Boeing Commercial Airplanes. "The flight was just spectacular. I mean, just to have the airplane back in the air was a great feeling for a of us, quite an emotional feeling. To be down for three months is a very long time.""We are very confident in the solution that we've developed, the design changes that we've made, and the testing that we've used to validate the design," he added. "I speak for all of us that we would put our families on this airplane any time."
Much like a friend who can't let you get to the punch line of a joke without getting there first, the Twitter feed @HuffPoSpoilers takes away the fun of the teasing headlines that The Huffington Post sends out about its articles.On Thursday, for example, when The Huffington Post posted on Twitter, "City council may consider making rifle ownership mandatory," the HuffPoSpoilers Twitter feed included that original tease and appended the following: "City = Craig, CO (pop. 9,000)."Or on April 4, when it posted, " 'Mad Men' star hints at season six surprises," HuffPoSpoilers wanted it known that the star was not Jon Hamm or Elisabeth Moss but Ben Feldman, who plays the copywriter Mike Ginsberg.And then there is that deflating feeling produced when a post promising "3 foods that will give you amazingly smooth skin," is explained simply with "Avocado, honey and sugar."Twitter, with its strict 140-character limit, may not be great for capturing the nuances of complicated social changes but it seems ideally suited to a particular form of snarky journalistic criticism that grows brick by brick, post by post. HuffPoSpoilers uses example after example to expose the habit of sending out overpromising headlines.Similarly, the Twitter feed @NYTOnIt has sent out more than 400 posts, prompted when a trend article from The New York Times seems too obvious or too generic — for example, distilling an article about a study of Internet use among older people as, "GUYS, older folks don't use the Internet as regularly as younger folks, and The Times is ON IT." Other targets include articles about the arrival of fall, the use of staplers, and how night stands are becoming more crowded.Another style of journalistic criticism is more of a group effort — like the now nearly four-year-old hashtag #slatepitches. This acts as a clearinghouse for over-the-top "story ideas" that would seemingly fit the counterintuitive spin that Slate magazine favors, along the lines of, say, why Kobe Bryant's injury would be good for the Lakers in the N.B.A. playoffs. (These days, however, Slate and its contributors appear to be using the hashtag to promote themselves, showing that perhaps the worst thing is to be ignored on Twitter.)A more esoteric example of such Twitter mockery was the flurry of posts with the hashtag #BBCobituaries, which allowed fans of the cult movie "Withnail and I" to object to how one of its stars, Richard Griffiths, was identified by the BBC in an obituary. Mr. Griffiths was identified in the headline only for his work in the Harry Potter movie franchise, rather than for his turn as Uncle Monty in "Withnail."On Twitter, this emphasis was compared to writing, say, "Marilyn, ex wife of Arthur Miller, dies," or, "Bicycle shop owners Orville and Wilbur Wright have passed away." The message got through to the BBC, and the headline now begins, "Potter and Withnail Actor. ... "The creator of HuffPoSpoilers, Alex Mizrahi, says his Twitter feed came as a spur-of-the-moment reaction to reading the post "Guess who is the highest-paid celebrity" in August. Rather than guess, Mr. Mizrahi, 30, from Prospect Heights, Brooklyn, looked up the answer — Oprah Winfrey, $165 million in 2011 — and added it to the Huffington Post message. He quickly got 10 followers and remembers being excited."It kills me that there is a 40- or 50-character tweet where they could easily put in more information but choose not to, such as the person involved or the country," he said in a telephone interview on Friday. "I understand they want people to read," he added, but he said it was hard not to feel toyed with when a headline is sent out like this one on Thursday: "1 dead 20 injured as chef mistakes pesticide for sauce."You think, he said, "Oh my God, that might be New York," when, as HuffPoSpoilers revealed, this happened in the Inner Mongolia Autonomous Region of China.On Wednesday, for a reason he can't really explain, the Twitter feed suddenly got enough attention to cascade, with more than 11,000 followers as of Sunday — Mr. Mizrahi says he knew it was a big deal when he stumbled on HuffPoSpoilers in the feeds of people he follows. (He does not identify himself as the creator of the Twitter handle, but it was not hard to discover who it was.)Mr. Mizrahi works freelance trying to link social media to entertainment — and, in that way, his experience creating an online phenomenon could actually fit on his résumé. But he acts, he says, "out of love," simply to register his dislike of a practice that is not limited to The Huffington Post."The Huffington Post wouldn't have three million followers if people didn't like the content and like the articles and like what they are producing," he said, "but people like me get annoyed by their cryptic tweets that don't tell you anything, or just obvious click bait."Thus far, Huffington Post has not changed its tactics on Twitter, but it did give some publicity to those who would mock it. The very brief article about HuffPoSpoilers on Thursday says, "We don't know who's behind this account but it made us laugh, so we're sharing it with you too."Of course, Huffington Post also promoted that article on Twitter: "@HuffPoSpoilers ruins every tease-filled tweet from @HuffingtonPost for you."That message left Mr. Mizrahi at a bit of a loss. All he could append was, "can't ruin this one."
Japan's population may be skewing older, leading the global march to demographic gridlock, but Tokyo feels like a city powered by the young. Sophisticated and sprawling, with half a dozen city centers that long ago grew together, it combines the life force of a national capital of everything — politics, finance, culture, style — with a talent for change and renewal that it earned the hard way, bouncing back after repeated flattening by earthquakes, fires and war over its 400 years of existence. The skyscraper race of the '90s has slowed down, but a new romance with the city's waterfront is flourishing, spots for sushi and pâté de foie gras are always being added to its 160,000 restaurants, and the teenagers jamming anime-inspired shopping districts update the outlandish costume of the moment every few months.It's easy to forget while squeezing onto the subway or dancing to techno-pop, but Tokyo is still the seat of an emperor. At the Meiji Shrine (1-1 Yoyogi-Kamizono-cho, Shibuya-ku; meijijingu.or.jp), the deified spirit of the Emperor Meiji, the current emperor's great-grandfather, resides in a Shinto temple surrounded by 170,000 majestic trees. A 40-foot-high arched torii gateway marks your entry into this spiritual world, and a network of paths leads to the shrine. The forest feels peaceful and far from the busy city, even though this is one of Tokyo's most visited outdoor places.Abandon tranquillity with a short walk to the shopper-clogged streets of the Harajuku district. Shops selling everything to outfit the fashionable teenager crowd Takeshita Dori, a jam-packed pedestrian-only alley. Omotesando, a tree-lined boulevard, projects a more mature vision of chic with European designer outlets like Dior and Louis Vuitton; Paris-inspired cafes; LaForet, a boutique complex featuring up-to-the-minute styles; and Omotesando Hills, a Tadao Ando-designed shopping arcade devoted to high-end fashion.A favorite after-work stop in Tokyo is the izakaya, a pub selling small plates of bar food, typically with beer. The format gets a high-end twist at Izakaya Vin (1-5-7 Dogenzaka; 81-3-3496-2467) in Shibuya, where the plates (800 to 1,600 yen, or $8.25 to $16.50, at 97 yen to the dollar) feature selections like Parma ham, whitefish carpaccio and duck salad, and the libation is French wine from an extensive list. A glass is around 1,500 yen, but the sommelier closest to your table will also open a bottle for you, for a price ranging from 7,300 to 1 million yen. A well-dressed crowd munches, sips and chats at small tables spread over three floors.After-dinner coffee comes with a show at the Starbucks overlooking the Scramble Intersection (more properly called the Shibuya Crossing), a hub of busy streets. Instead of walking with traffic, pedestrians are held back until the traffic lights stop all vehicles simultaneously. Then, in a triumph of crosswalk choreography, hundreds of people surge out and completely fill Hachiko Square, walking in all directions yet never colliding. They're all just going from one place to another, but it's a scene reminiscent of both performance art and the maneuvers of a Big Ten marching band, and it has become a popular attraction. If all the second-floor window seats are taken, watch from the Mark City pedestrian passage at the Shibuya train station across the street, near "The Myth of Tomorrow," a haunting "Guernica"-like mural depicting the horror of an atomic bomb detonation.A latecomer to the notion of a recreational waterfront, Tokyo now looks to the water for more than seafood. From Hinode Pier at the edge of Tokyo Bay, take a cruise into the heart of the city on the Sumida River, passing riverside walkways and feeder canals. Commentary in Japanese and English focuses on the 13 bridges that slip by overhead, but the real point is the unusually open perspective on this congested city. Other cruises cross the bay to Odaiba, an island that has taken off as an entertainment district covered with amusement parks, museums, shopping malls and a spa that draws geothermally heated water from deep under the bay. (Tokyo Cruise; 81-3-0120-977311; suijobus.co.jp; 760 yen.)When your boat docks in the old riverfront district of Asakusa, join crowds pouring toward Sensoji, a Buddhist temple founded in the seventh century. This is a favorite spot with out-of-town Japanese tourists, and its paved courtyard and paths are likely to be crammed with happy, chattering sightseers who all know the ropes of cleansing, clapping and bowing. Not to mention shopping; the temple also has its own arcade of merchants' stalls. A Shinto shrine shares the grounds, a typical arrangement in a country whose two dominant religions often blur. Get into the festive spirit of worshipers catching wafts of supposedly curative incense and souvenir hunters buying cheap knickknacks. Then do your own shopping just outside on Nakamise Dori, a market street since Tokyo's earliest days. Amid the T-shirts and toy swords, look for traditional crafts and artfully wrapped packages of senbei, rice crackers often flavored with soy sauce.
TOKYO — In a story May 8 about the use of sex slaves during World War II, The Associated Press reported erroneously that then-Prime Minister Yohei Kono issued a 1993 statement expressing remorse for suffering caused to sexual slaves of Japanese troops. Kono was Chief Cabinet Secretary at the time, not prime minister.A corrected version of the story is below:Japan says it will honor apologies for war abusesJapan's gov't says it will honor apologies for wartime abuses, downplays vow to review historyTOKYO (AP) — Japan does not plan to revise past apologies to neighboring countries for atrocities committed by its Imperial Army before and during World War II, top government officials said Wednesday.The comments by the chief government spokesman and the foreign minister appear intended to allay criticisms of Prime Minister Shinzo Abe's earlier vows to revise the apologies, including an acknowledgement of sexual slavery during the war.Chief Cabinet Secretary Yoshihide Suga said that Japan recognizes the harm it caused during its invasion and occupation of much of Asia, and that it has repeatedly and clearly stated that position."The Abe government has expressed sincere condolences to all victims of the war, in and out of the country, and there is no change in that," Suga told reporters. "We have repeatedly said we have no intention of making this a diplomatic and political issue, but I'm afraid this may not be fully understood."Suga was responding to a question about a remark this week by South Korean President Park Geun-hye, published in The Washington Post, asserting that Japan should correct its view of its wartime history."The Japanese government has accepted the facts of history in a spirit of humility, expressed once again our feelings of deep remorse and our heartfelt apology, and expressed our feelings of profound mourning for all victims, both at home and abroad," he told reporters. "And Prime Minister Abe shares the same view."China and South Korea have reacted harshly to recent nationalistic events and remarks, including visits by several Japanese government ministers and nearly 170 lawmakers to Tokyo's Yasukuni Shrine, which memorializes 2.3 million war dead, including 14 wartime leaders convicted of war crimes. Rancor over territorial disputes has further strained relations between Japan and its neighbors.Only in the past two decades has Japan acknowledged many of its past brutalities, including medical atrocities, use of poison gas and forcing women in countries under wartime occupation into prostitution — a legacy that taints Tokyo's relations with its neighbors even today.Abe, whose conservative government took power after winning elections in December, had earlier advocated revising a 1993 statement by then-Chief Cabinet Secretary Yohei Kono expressing remorse for the suffering caused to the sexual slaves of Japanese troops.On Tuesday, Suga acknowledged a comment by former U.S. ambassador to Japan Thomas Schieffer, who reportedly said revising the "Kono statement" would harm Japan-U.S. ties."Regarding the Kono statement, we have never stated we are considering a revision," Suga said.Since taking office, Abe has said he prefers to leave historical issues up to historians and avoid comment. However, he has questioned the meaning of the word "aggression" and suggested his Cabinet does not necessarily support all of a 1995 apology by then-Prime Minister Tomiichi Murayama, which is seen as Japan's main expression of remorse for its wartime and colonial past.Associated Press writer Mari Yamaguchi contributed to this report.
TOKYO — Japan 's conservative government will abide by official apologies that the country's leaders made two decades ago to the victims of World War II in Asia, top officials said Tuesday, backing away from earlier suggestions that the government might try to revise or even repudiate the apologies.Japan formally apologized in 1993 to the women who were forced into wartime brothels for Japanese soldiers, and in 1995 to nations that suffered from Japanese aggression during the war. Both apologies rankled Japanese ultranationalists, and there were concerns that the hawkish current prime minister, Shinzo Abe, would try to appeal to them by whitewashing Japan's wartime atrocities, a step that would probably infuriate Japan's neighbors.The United States shared those concerns, and it urged the Abe government to show restraint on historical issues so that Japan would not further isolate itself diplomatically in the region.The concerns intensified last month when members of Mr. Abe's cabinet visited a Tokyo shrine that honors Japanese war dead, including some who were executed for war crimes, drawing angry reactions from China and South Korea. Those nations also responded strongly a few days later when Mr. Abe seemed to question in Parliament whether Japan was actually the aggressor during the war, saying that the definition of "invasion" was relative and suggesting that his cabinet might not stand by the 1995 apology in its entirety.On Tuesday, the Japanese foreign minister, Fumio Kishida, apparently sought to dispel those concerns, telling reporters that Mr. Abe shared the views expressed in the 1995 apology, which was made by a Socialist prime minister, Tomiichi Murayama. At a separate news conference, the chief cabinet secretary, Yoshihide Suga, said the Abe government would not revise the 1993 apology, which formally recognized the military's responsibility in forcing women into sexual slavery. Mr. Abe, whose political base is in the right wing of the conservative Liberal Democratic Party, had called for revising one or both of those apologies before he became prime minister after elections in December.This led to widespread concerns in Washington of a breakdown in ties between Japan and South Korea, two important allies whom the United States wants to cooperate as it faces a nuclear-armed North Korea and China's fast-growing military. Last week in Washington, a former American ambassador to Japan, Thomas Schieffer, said revising the 1993 apology to the women could damage Japanese ties to the United States.Such threats appear to have gotten the attention of the Abe government."The Japanese government has accepted the facts of history in a spirit of humility, expressed once again our feelings of deep remorse and our heartfelt apology," Mr. Kishida, the foreign minister, said on Tuesday. "Prime Minister Abe shares that view."
TOKYO — A leaner Toyota Motor roared back to health in its fourth quarter as a weaker yen and brisk sales in North America almost tripled its net income from a year earlier.The yen, which has weakened almost 30 percent since September, has also given Toyota's profit a major bump, driving up the value of its overseas earnings in the home currency and making production in Japan more cost-efficient. For every yen the currency loses in value against the dollar, Toyota estimates, its operating profit rises 35 billion yen.The financial results, Toyota's strongest in five years, offered the latest evidence that the automaker is finally shaking off the effects of some of the biggest crises of its 75-year history.President Akio Toyoda, who took the helm of the company in 2009, often spoke of the multiple problems facing the company — natural disasters, recalls, the strong yen, energy shortages and high costs of doing business in Japan. He would quip that he was not Toyota's top executive as much as the company's chief apologizer for blunders, mishaps and overall sluggish business.At a news conference in Tokyo on Wednesday, however, Mr. Toyoda had little to apologize for, but he avoided crowing. "We have faced many challenges since 2009 but have learned valuable lessons, including the need for Toyota to maintain sustainable growth," he said.Toyota, the world's largest automaker by sales, reported net income on Wednesday for the quarter that ended March 31 of 313.9 billion yen, or $3.17 billion, compared with 121 billion yen in the same quarter last year. Sales for the quarter totaled 5.8 trillion yen, or $58.6 billion.The automaker, based in Toyota City, sees further strong growth ahead. It expects net income for the current financial year to rise 42 percent to 1.37 trillion yen. A companywide cost-reduction drive, as well as strong sales — especially in the United States, its biggest export market — will continue to drive its profit rebound, Toyota said.Toyota reported net income for the year of 962.1 billion yen, or $9.7 billion, for the most recent fiscal year, compared with 283.5 billion yen the previous year. Sales were 22 trillion yen, up 18.7 percent."What an amazing turnaround for Toyota, which started last year after a couple of years of a roller-coaster ride dealing with numerous recalls and the Japanese earthquake," Alec Gutierrez, a senior analyst at Kelley Blue Book, an American automotive analysis service, said in an e-mail. "It's been a wild ride for Toyota, but we're seeing the fruits of its labor."Mr. Gutierrez said that Toyota faced tough competition from familiar competitors like Honda and Nissan in the United States as well as renewed competition from American and South Korean automakers. Gaining market share would be more difficult, he said. But the introduction later this year of a completely redesigned Corolla, Toyota's best-selling compact car, could help bolster sales, while the declining yen will continue to shore up its profitability, he said.Toyota had just started to regroup from a collapse in sales during the global financial crisis when reports of unintended acceleration prompted recalls involving almost 10 million vehicles. That recall dealt a heavy blow to the company's sales and reputation in the United States.Then in early 2011, Japanese auto parts makers suffered great damage from the earthquake and tsunami that ravaged the country's northeast coast, forcing Toyota to slash production while it scrambled to meet shortages of parts. Fears of an electricity shortfall after the Fukushima nuclear crisis added to Toyota's problems. Later that year, flooding in Thailand paralyzed manufacturing in the Southeast Asian nation, further disrupting Toyota's global supply chain.All the while, a strong yen ate into Toyota's profits, eroding the value of its overseas earnings and making its factories in Japan painfully expensive to maintain.Still, Toyota's series of setbacks has in many ways made it a stronger company. To shield itself better from currency fluctuations, Toyota has shifted more production from high-cost Japan to its overseas markets: In 2012, it made almost 20 percent fewer cars in Japan than in 2007, and Mr. Toyoda has said that the weaker yen will not alter that strategy.Last month, Toyota announced that it would spend $360 million to expand a factory in Georgetown, Ky., to bring production of its Lexus luxury sedans to the United States for the first time.The company has also started to buy more of its parts in the countries where it manufactures, a move aimed at making its supply chains more resilient after disasters and disruptions.Despite its rebound, Toyota's latest earnings remain far below the heights of its financial year that ended in March 2008, when net profit hit 1.7 trillion yen on record sales of 26 trillion yen. American consumers riding out the last of the credit boom helped lift global sales to a record 9.37 million cars in 2007. Toyota topped that record in 2012, with global sales of 9.75 million cars.In the measured tones that have become Mr. Toyoda's signature, he struck a cautious note. "Have we really turned into a company that will be profitable and continue to grow no matter what happens to its business environment?" he asked."I am not sure yet, is my honest answer. An unprecedented crisis even beyond the scale of the Lehman shock may happen again," Mr. Toyoda added. "We'll only know the answer when such events actually happen."
TOKYO (Reuters) - The government last month submitted legislation to parliament to overhaul Japan's electricity sector, which is dominated by regional monopolies that control all aspects of power generation and transmission, to try to cut costs and give consumers a choice of suppliers.The reforms will be carried out in three phases from 2015 to around 2020. Legislation will be needed at each stage but the bill before parliament lays out the plans or so-called roadmap.Below are the main points of the legislation, which was drawn up after the Fukushima nuclear disaster in 2011 exposed failings in the industry and led to a rise in electricity prices for many consumers.- To launch a nationwide power grid operator in around 2015, with the authority to monitor power demand/supply, and to order energy companies to provide electricity to the grid when necessary to ensure stable supply.- To establish a new electricity regulator in around 2015 to maintain steady supply and keep competition fair. Currently, the trade and industry ministry oversees the sector.- To submit legislation next year for opening up the retail power business in the second stage of reform around 2016. Regional power utilities are the sole providers of power to households and other small-lot users in their service areas at the moment. The large-lot power business has been liberalized.- To submit a bill in 2015 at the earliest, requiring regional monopolies to spin off transmission and distribution operations into separate subsidiaries in the third stage in around 2018-2020.- To abolish all price controls by around 2018-2020.- To review the timing of the complete liberalization of power bills if implementation is shown to undermine stability of supply, raise the risk of unfair competition or hurt the interests of users.
TOKYO (AP) — Japan's nuclear watchdog announced Wednesday that a trouble-plagued next-generation test reactor will not be allowed to restart due to safety violations, dealing a setback to the country's pro-nuclear government.The Nuclear Regulation Authority's decision is the latest blow to the Monju fast-breeder reactor and Japan's nuclear fuel cycle program. The government of Prime Minister Shinzo Abe is hoping that Monju will be a key part of Japan's plans for disposing of atomic waste and reducing the nation's plutonium stockpile.Also on Wednesday, a panel of geologists concluded that a seismic fault running underneath a separate commercial reactor near Monju is active, in a rare ruling that could force the scrapping of that reactor.Monju uses plutonium fuel instead of conventional uranium and produces radioactive substances that can be reused as fuel. After nearly 50 years in the works, the reactor, located in the city of Tsuruga in western Japan, is still struggling to get online.The watchdog's five commissioners unanimously agreed that the reactor's operator, the Japan Atomic Energy Agency, "is not ready to sufficiently secure the safety of Monju." They said the operator had repeatedly failed to conduct mandatory inspections on an array of equipment and come up with improvement plans.Many experts have said Monju is a basket case and that Japan should abandon plans to achieve a full nuclear fuel cycle. The previous government tried to terminate Monju under its nuclear phase-out plan, but Abe's government quickly reversed course as it pushed to restart commercial reactors that have been idle since a March 2011 earthquake and tsunami triggered a nuclear disaster at the Fukushima Dai-ichi plant.Only two of Japan's 50 commercial reactors are currently generating power.Monju's operator can appeal the watchdog's decision, but an official suspension order is likely to come by the end of May, regulatory officials said. The operator needs at least until January to catch up with the delays in safety checks, but it is unknown when the suspension order can be lifted."They repeated the same mistakes even though they said they were analyzing the root cause of the problem. I think they lack fundamental understanding about safety," Tanaka said. "Despite the lessons we learned from the Fukushima Dai-ichi accident, it seems a safety culture is still insufficient in Japan."Japan built Monju as a "dream reactor" to fulfill its energy needs, with the reactor meant to be a centerpiece of a self-sustainable fuel cycle. To complete the cycle, Japan has been building the Rokkasho fuel recycling plant in northern Japan to extract uranium and plutonium from spent fuel and fabricate hybrid fuel made from the two radioactive elements.But with both Monju and Rokkasho having technical problems, Japan has built up a large stockpile of plutonium extracted overseas and at home, causing international proliferation concerns.Monju successfully generated power using MOX — mixed oxide fuel, a mix of uranium and plutonium — in 1995, but months later, a massive leakage of cooling sodium caused a fire. Monju had another test run in 2010 but stopped again after a fuel exchanger fell into the reactor vessel.Regulators who inspected Monju said its top management lacked safety-first principles, and workers were demoralized without prospects for a startup. Their interviews with plant workers also revealed they had to keep inspection and maintenance records using massive amounts of paperwork instead of a computer database, and they were always on deadline to meet a test run schedule."It's too dangerous for Monju to start operation now," said Yasushi Morishita, the watchdog's director of nuclear regulation. "The plant was so poorly managed."Some experts also suspect that the Monju reactor sits on an active seismic fault. An independent team commissioned by the Nuclear Regulation Authority is to inspect possible faults at Monju later this year.Possible seismic faults are being investigated near several other plants, leaving some reactors in limbo as plant operators scramble to upgrade their equipment and emergency steps ahead of the July launch of new safety standards required for their resumption.On Wednesday, a watchdog-commissioned panel of geologists determined that the fault line underneath the Tsuruga No. 2 reactor was active and likely moved relatively recently — about 120,000-130,000 years ago.Japanese guidelines prohibit key parts of nuclear plants, including reactors, from sitting above active faults. The panel's finding means Tsuruga's No. 2 reactor will have to be scrapped unless its operator provides new data overriding the decision."It was truly fortunate that there was no accident at the plant. Today we took a first step to improve its safety," said watchdog commissioner Kunihiko Shimazaki. He praised the watchdog for making a decision against the interests of nuclear promoters, unlike its predecessors.Chief Cabinet Secretary Yoshihide Suga said the government respects the decision. "Safety comes first when it comes to nuclear power," he said.But Tsuruga's operator, the Japan Atomic Power Co., balked at the decision, accusing the watchdog of neglecting the utility's findings. Company officials say the decision will serious financial consequences for the utility."The judgment is truly regrettable and unacceptable," company president Yasuo Hanada said in a statement, demanding a re-examination by the watchdog.
TOKYO — In two stories May 8 and two stories May 14 and 17 about the use of sex slaves during World War II, The Associated Press reported erroneously that then-Prime Minister Yohei Kono issued a 1993 statement expressing remorse for suffering caused to sexual slaves of Japanese troops. Kono was Chief Cabinet secretary at the time, not prime minister.A corrected version of the latest story of May 17 is below:Japan mayor says his lack of sensitivity about US image of prostitution caused outrageTOKYO (AP) — An outspoken Japanese mayor who outraged many with remarks about Japan's wartime and modern sexual services stood by his comments Thursday, but said he may have lacked "international sensitivity."Osaka Mayor Toru Hashimoto said his lack of sensitivity to America's perception of prostitution might have caused outrage after his suggestion earlier this week that U.S. troops based in southern Japan should patronize legal adult entertainment establishments to reduce sex crime there.Hashimoto, co-leader of an emerging nationalist party, also has angered Japan's neighbors by saying the Japanese military's wartime practice of forcing Asian women into prostitution was necessary to maintain discipline and provide relaxation for soldiers.He claimed Thursday that the practice was widely used by many other countries during World War II and that Japan was being unfairly singled out.The U.S. State Department called Hashimoto's comments "outrageous and offensive."Historians say up to 200,000 women, mainly from the Korean Peninsula and China, were forced to provide sex for Japanese soldiers in military brothels. While some other World War II armies had military brothels, Japan is the only country accused of such widespread, organized sexual slavery.Hashimoto's comments added to recent anger in neighboring countries that suffered from Japan's wartime aggression and have complained about the lack of atonement for atrocities committed during that time.Hashimoto said Thursday that he had no intention of retracting any of his earlier comments. But he said his remarks might have seemed inappropriate to people outside Japan with different values."If there is one big mistake I made, that might have been my lack of understanding of culture behind the U.S. sex industry — if you mention adult entertainment in the U.S., everyone thinks of prostitution," Hashimoto said during a live TV talk show from Osaka, in western Japan. "I admit that my international sensitivity was quite poor when I had to operate beyond national borders."The ruckus started Monday when Hashimoto commented on the wartime "comfort women" who had to provide sex to Japan's Imperial Army. Hashimoto said that on a recent visit to the southern island of Okinawa he suggested to the U.S. commander there that the troops make use of the legal sex industry.More than half of about 50,000 U.S. troops based in Japan under a bilateral security pact are on Okinawa, where base-related crime has long triggered anti-U.S. military sentiment.U.S. officials rejected his proposal. "That goes without saying," Pentagon Press Secretary George Little said Tuesday in Washington.In a tweet Wednesday, Rep. Mike Honda, a Democrat who has urged Japan to take responsibility for wartime sex slavery, called Hashimoto's remarks that "comfort women" were necessary "contemptible and repulsive," and demanded Japan's government "apologize for this atrocity."U.S. State Department spokeswoman Jen Psaki said the trafficking of women for sexual purposes during that era was "a grave human rights violation of enormous proportions.""We hope that Japan will continue to work with its neighbors to address this and other issues arising from the past and cultivate relationships that allow them to move forward," Psaki told reporters Thursday.Hashimoto said Thursday that his comments were not intended to justify or whitewash Japan's use of prostitution for its wartime military and that Japan should apologize to the women whether or not they were forced into it.Hashimoto's comments came amid continuing criticism of Prime Minister Shinzo Abe's earlier pledges to revise Japan's past apologies for wartime atrocities. Before he took office in December, Abe had advocated revising a 1993 statement by then-Chief Cabinet Secretary Yohei Kono acknowledging and expressing remorse for the suffering caused to the sex slaves.Abe has acknowledged "comfort women" existed but has denied they were coerced into prostitution, citing a lack of official evidence. He also said recently that the definition of "aggression" was still not established, inviting criticism from Japan's neighbors.On Monday, a photo published in Japanese newspapers showing Abe posing in a fighter jet with the number 731 — the number of a notorious Japanese unit that performed chemical and biological experiments on Chinese in World War II — caught attention in Beijing, triggering criticism about a lack of sensitivity.The series of remarks and actions by Japanese political leaders could affect the way the world views Japan, experts say."I think it's really damaging. These are people who are noted and known. If this is the only way the Japanese news gets attention, instead of saying something groundbreaking or setting an example for humanity, that's not good for the country," said Koichi Nakano, a political science professor at Sophia University in Tokyo."Japan's far-right politicians have lost their minds," South Korea's JoongAng Daily said in a Thursday editorial, saying Abe and Hashimoto "have unabashedly brought up the ghosts of Japan's wartime past and irked neighbors that still bear bitter memories of its military aggression.""Their misbehavior resembles that of Nazi Germans who were swept up by militarist fervor under Adolf Hitler," the paper said.Hashimoto's follow-up Thursday provided little help to relieve anger among women in Japan."(His comment) has violated women and our human rights, and tarnished Japan's image and national interest," said opposition lawmaker Makiko Kikuta, demanding Hashimoto retract what he said and apologize. "It's extremely regrettable."Hashimoto, 43, is co-head of the newly formed Japan Restoration Party with former Tokyo Gov. Shintaro Ishihara, who is a strident nationalist. Hashimoto refused to step down as mayor or party executive.His fellow party members were sympathetic to Hashimoto, but his remarks dealt a blow to the new party when it desperately needed public support ahead of this summer's national elections.Politicians from other parties were not so measured in their response."Now his lack of human rights awareness is world-famous. What an embarrassment to Osaka!" said Kiyomi Tsujimoto, a liberal-leaning lawmaker representing the region.Associated Press writers Malcolm Foster in Tokyo and Matthew Pennington in Washington contributed to this report.
TOKYO — Japan's economy grew at a robust annualized pace of 3.5 percent in the first quarter, preliminary data showed, the first sign that the bold monetary and economic policies of Prime Minister Shinzo Abe were starting to bear fruit.Japanese growth came to 0.9 percent for the January-to-March period compared with a year ago, driven by higher household consumption and exports, government data showed. That beat market expectations of 0.7 percent for the quarter, or 2.8 percent for the annualized pace.Exports grew 3.8 percent, pushed higher by strong shipments of cars and other manufactured goods to the United States on the back of a weaker yen, offsetting a slump in exports to China and Europe.Personal consumption, which makes up the largest part of Japan's gross domestic product, grew 0.9 percent, as consumer sentiment brightened amid signs of an economic recovery.The solid pace, which came after two quarters of contraction and a quarter of just 0.2 percent growth, appeared to point to the beginnings of a long-awaited turnaround in the world's third-largest economy, after the United States and China. "It is a sign that the Abe administration's economic policies are starting to show results," the economics minister, Akira Amari, said.The latest numbers have come as early validation for Mr. Abe, who took office in December, and has used what has been called a three-arrowed bid to lift Japan out of its long deflationary slump. He has focused on an aggressive monetary policy that has flooded the economy with cheap money, major fiscal spending and reforms to make the economy more competitive.Under Mr. Abe, the central bank has sought to double its monetary base and to generate inflation of 2 percent by 2014. This first arrow has been accompanied by a devaluation of the yen by some 20 percent in the last six months, which has been a boon for exporters. Exporters from Toyota to Sony have reported a rebound in profit in the first quarter of 2013, thanks in good part to the policy.In recent days, however, concerns have grown over rising interest rates in the government bonds market, which could threaten Japan's monetary policy. Japan is vulnerable to rising borrowing because of its high public debt burden, which is twice the size of its economy.Still, investors have piled into Japan's stock market, emboldened by expectations of rosy corporate profits and an economic recovery. The Nikkei stock index has risen by an astonishing 46 percent since Mr. Abe took office.Japan is also getting a boost from the second arrow, more fiscal spending. Mr. Abe pushed through an emergency stimulus package of 10 trillion yen in February, and has followed up with a 92.6 trillion yen initial budget for 2013, which Japan's Parliament approved late Wednesday.Economists say that for the economy to keep growing, the third arrow will be crucial: mainly structural reforms that aim to make the economy more competitive, for example by making Japan's labor market more flexible and lowering barriers to trade."For the rally to continue and be fundamentally driven, Abe must convince the market that his 'third arrow' will benefit Japan's underlying economy," the UBS economists Daiju Aoki and Toru Ibayashi said.
TOKYO — Seismologists said Wednesday that a nuclear reactor in Tsuruga, in western Japan, stands above an active seismic fault, a finding that could lead to the first permanent shutdown of a reactor since the Fukushima crisis two years ago.Japan's newly installed Nuclear Regulation Authority also said Wednesday that it would issue an order that would effectively keep a separate unit, the Monju experimental fast breeder reactor, closed until its operator overhauled safety measures at the site.Any move to decommission the Tsuruga commercial reactor would deal a blow to Prime Minister Shinzo Abe's efforts to get the country's nuclear program back online. So would yet another delay in restarting the troubled Monju experimental reactor, which is a major part of Japan's longstanding goal of creating a system to recycle nuclear fuel.But those steps would show that the country's new nuclear regulator, put in place to bolster oversight of the nuclear industry after the 2011 disaster, has teeth. Its predecessor was criticized as having a lax approach to safety and close industry ties."It is really just a matter of luck that there hasn't been an accident" at Tsuruga, said Kunihiko Shimazaki, the head of a panel of seismologists assessing the fault that runs beneath it, according to Reuters.Still, both the Tsuruga and Monju plants in Fukui Prefecture, even if not operative, could continue to face risks from a possible earthquake along the active fault.Almost 3,000 spent uranium fuel rods are stored at the Tsuruga plant, while the Monju site stores plutonium fuel. Some experts suspect that Monju also sits atop an active fault.All of Japan's 50 commercial reactors were closed for inspections after the multiple meltdowns at the Fukushima Daiichi station, which forced the evacuation of more than 100,000 people. Since then, only two have been restarted.The fate of the country's reactors depends on safety assessments being carried out by the new regulator agency, which has been studying the safety risks at those reactors.The agency faces considerable pressure from Japan's power industry, businesses and pro-nuclear politicians in Mr. Abe's governing party to allow more reactors to restart.Keeping them closed has led to significant financial losses for power companies, which have been forced to make up for the power shortfall with expensive fossil fuel imports. The blow of a permanent closing could make some power companies insolvent.Several power companies have said that they intend to restart their nuclear reactors this year, providing that they pass safety checks.The Japan Atomic Power Company, which operates the two-reactor Tsuruga station, has contended that the fault is not active. The company could not immediately be reached for comment.Dozens of governing party lawmakers formed a group on Tuesday to push for the resumption of idled nuclear reactors, saying that the economic recovery depended on a stable power supply.Large manufacturers in Japan have warned that rising energy costs will hurt business.In Wednesday's announcement, seismologists directed by the regulatory authority to study a known fault that runs under the Tsuruga No. 2 reactor said that the fault showed signs of being geologically active, suggesting a high earthquake risk.The authority's chairman, Shunichi Tanaka, said last year that he would not allow the reactor to go back online if the fault was found to be active. But the authority does not have legal power to order a permanent shutdown, a situation that could leave the reactor in limbo.It was not clear how the other reactor at the Tsuruga site, and two more under construction, would be affected by the authority's decision on the No. 2 reactor.The authority is also assessing faults under five other reactors across Japan, and the results are expected in coming weeks.In a separate report released Wednesday, the Nuclear Regulation Authority said it was barring the operator of the Monju experimental reactor from beginning work to restart the unit until it overhauled its approach to safety. The authority said it believed that Monju's operator, the government-backed Japan Atomic Energy Agency, "could not sufficiently secure the safety of Monju," and added that it saw "a deterioration in its safety culture."Kyodo News quoted an unidentified official at the agency as saying that additional inspections at the plant would take at least until next January.Monju's operator revealed last year that it had not properly inspected more than 10,000 devices at the experimental reactor, including those deemed important to safety.The Monju reactor forms the cornerstone of a national project by Japan to reuse and eventually produce nuclear fuel. But the plant, a $12 billion project, has a history of safety lapses. It was closed for 14 years after a devastating fire in 1995, one of Japan's most serious nuclear accidents before the one at Fukushima.Monju was reopened in May 2010, but just three months later, a 3.3-ton fuel relay device fell into the reactor's pressure vessel, forcing it to close again. In the two decades since the reactor started tests in 1991, the atomic energy agency has managed to generate electricity at the reactor for only one full hour.
TOKYO — An adviser to Japanese Prime Minister Shinzo Abe ended a visit to North Korea on Friday but would not give details of his talks with leaders in Pyongyang.Isao Iijima's three-day visit came amid a slight easing of tension on the Korean Peninsula after weeks of threats from the North aimed at Washington, Seoul and Tokyo.Japan has not disclosed the purpose of Iijima's trip."I had serious and long hours of talks (with North Korean officials) during my visit," Iijima told reporters after he arrived in Beijing. He would not give details about the talks."I will not speak to any media," he said. "I plan to inform the prime minister about my talks."Japan is a participant in now-dormant six-nation talks aimed at ending North Korea's nuclear weapons program, and its failure to inform its ally the U.S., or South Korea, about Iijima's visit beforehand raised eyebrows.Glyn Davies, the top U.S. envoy on North Korea, who visited South Korea, China and Japan this week, said earlier he had hoped to learn more about Iijima's visit during his talks in Tokyo.He made no comment to reporters Friday, however, as he finished talks at Japan's Foreign Ministry.Japanese Foreign Minister Fumio Kishida on Friday said cooperation among Japan, the U.S. and South Korea is extremely important for resolving North Korean issues."We need to make effort in the future to ensure good communication among us," he told reporters when asked about complaints from South Korea over Iijima's visit.Iijima also was a senior aide to former Japanese Prime Minister Junichiro Koizumi, who met with late North Korean leader Kim Jong Il in 2002 and 2004.Tokyo officials hinted Iijima' visit was related to cases of Japanese kidnapped by the North decades ago.However, Kishida refused to comment on the outcome of Iijima's visit. He reiterated Japan's official line that all outstanding bilateral issues including abductions, missile launches and nuclear development must be resolved comprehensively.
TOKYO — An emerging Japanese nationalist political party whose co-leader outraged many with remarks about Japan's wartime and modern sexual services became embroiled in more controversy Friday when a party lawmaker accused ethnic Koreans of involvement in prostitution.The Japan Restoration Party urged the lawmaker, Shingo Nishimura, to retract his comments suggesting many ethnic Koreans are engaged in prostitution in Japan. Nishimura withdrew his remarks, but the party forced him out anyway.Osaka Mayor Toru Hashimoto, a founder and co-leader of the party, angered Japan's neighbors by saying this week that the Japanese military's wartime practice of forcing Asian women into prostitution was necessary to maintain discipline and provide relaxation for soldiers. He also angered the U.S. by suggesting that American troops based in southern Japan should patronize legal adult entertainment establishments to reduce sex crime there.The uproar over Hashimoto's comments, and Nishimura's predicament, typify the difficulties Japanese politicians can create for themselves when commenting on sensitive topics without considering how those outside their own circles might react.Nishimura made the comments during a Restoration Party meeting Friday that was discussing the remarks made by Hashimoto, who continues to insist that other countries also commonly impressed women into military brothels during World War II and that Japan is being unfairly singled out.Defending Hashimoto, Nishimura objected to media reports describing the women impressed into wartime military brothels as "sex slaves." Video footage of the meeting was broadcast by the TBS TV network."'Comfort women' is erroneously translated as 'sex slaves,' which might encourage anti-Japanese riots and conspiracies," Nishimura said. "We better fight back by telling them that the words 'comfort women' and 'sex slaves' are completely different and that there are numerous South Korean prostitutes roaming around Japan."Nishimura said jokingly that he might return to his hometown of Osaka, go to crowded entertainment districts and tell them, "'Hey, you South Korean comfort women!'""So, let's fight," he said, suggesting the party stand by Hashimoto.Even fellow lawmakers who usually support nationalist views appeared stunned."Please take back what you just said. Take back your comment. You should retract the word 'South Koreans,'" said party member Kenta Matsunami.Nishimura returned to the microphone and agreed to retract that part. He later said his remarks were inappropriate, but only because he had never conducted a survey to gather data to back up his comment, and because he singled out a particular country by name.Urged by other party members who demanded a tougher penalty than just a retraction, Nishimura submitted his resignation from the party, but party secretary-general Ichiro Matsui refused to accept it immediately and said the party wanted to expel him instead."I'm completely baffled by the comment. I don't think he should stay with our group anymore," Matsui said.The Restoration Party has so far not condemned Hashimoto. Government officials have avoided making comments on his remarks on the grounds that he is the leader of an opposition party.Hashimoto attributed the backlash against his comments to a lack of sensitivity on his part. The U.S. State Department called his remarks "outrageous and offensive."On Friday, Hashimoto lashed back at his critics through Twitter, insisting that organized sex services were needed to prevent sex crimes by American troops during the 1945-1952 U.S. occupation following Japan's defeat in World War II.Nishimura has raised various hooplas in the past.In 2005, the Democratic Party of Japan, an opposition party, expelled Nishimura for allegedly letting an unqualified employee do legal work on his behalf while taking a cut of the fees.In October 1999, Nishimura was forced to resign as parliamentary vice-minister of defense for suggesting Japan should be armed with nuclear weapons, after serving in the post for only 16 days.Japan, whose cities of Hiroshima and Nagasaki were razed by atomic bombs at the end of World War II, has rejected the use of nuclear weaponsAssociated Press writer Elaine Kurtenbach contributed to this report.
TOKYO — In the first sign that the bold policies of Prime Minister Shinzo Abe are gaining traction in the real economy, Japan's gross domestic product grew at a robust annualized pace of 3.5 percent in the first quarter, kindling hopes that recovery would finally take hold for the long-suffering economic power.Japanese growth came to 0.9 percent for the January-to-March period, driven by higher household consumption and exports, government data showed Thursday. That beat market expectations of 0.7 percent for the quarter, or 2.8 percent for the annualized pace.Exports grew 3.8 percent, pushed higher by strong shipments of cars and other manufactured goods to the United States on the back of a weaker yen, offsetting a slump in exports to China and Europe.Personal consumption, which makes up the largest part of Japan's G.D.P., grew 0.9 percent, as consumer sentiment brightened amid signs of an economic recovery. Capital expenditure fell 0.7 percent for the fifth consecutive quarter, though economists expect a rebound as the recovery takes hold. Public spending grew 0.8 percent.The solid pace, which followed two quarters of contraction and a quarter of just 0.2 percent growth, appeared to point to the beginnings of a long-awaited turnaround in the Japanese economy, the world's third-largest, after those of the United States and China."It is a sign that the Abe administration's economic policies are starting to show results," said the economics minister, Akira Amari.The latest numbers have come as early validation for Mr. Abe, who took office in December and has used what has been called a "three-arrowed" bid to lift Japan out of its long deflationary slump.He has focused on an aggressive monetary policy that has flooded the economy with cheap money, major fiscal spending and changes to make the economy more competitive.Under Mr. Abe, the central bank has sought to double its monetary base and to generate inflation of 2 percent by 2014.This first arrow has been accompanied by a devaluation of the yen by about 20 percent in the past six months, which has been a boon for exporters. Exporters including Toyota and Sony have reported a rebound in profit in the first quarter of 2013, thanks in good part to the policy.In recent days, however, concerns have grown about rising interest rates in the government bonds market, which could threaten Japan's monetary policy. Japan is vulnerable to rising borrowing because of its high public debt burden, which is twice the size of its economy. Bonds are also the main financial asset held by banks, pension funds and insurance companies, making a surge in debt yields perilous.Still, investors have piled into Japan's stock market, emboldened by expectations of rosy corporate profits and an economic recovery. The Nikkei stock index has risen an astonishing 46 percent since Mr. Abe took office.And though the improved fortunes of exporters and the surging stock market have yet to translate to higher wages, there are signs of brighter consumer sentiment and a recovery in spending, which will be critical to Japan's fight against deflation.Japan is also getting help from the second arrow, more fiscal spending. Mr. Abe pushed through an emergency stimulus package of ¥10 trillion, or $97 billion, in February and has followed up with a ¥92.6 trillion initial budget for 2013, which Japan's Parliament approved late Wednesday. That heavy spending is expected to push up growth next quarter.Economists at Nomura, the Japanese investment bank, said they now projected strong growth for three consecutive years, with an estimated 1.6 percent expansion for the whole of 2013 and even higher growth after that."Sentiment among companies and consumers has improved sharply of late as the yen has depreciated and the equity market has risen. We think this is likely to create a positive cycle in which improved sentiment underpins growth in private consumption and private capex," Nomura said in a research note after the figures were released, referring to capital expenditure, "and this growth in turn supports further improvement in sentiment."Beating deflation remains, for now, an elusive goal.The G.D.P. deflator, a measure of the average price of all of the goods and services produced in an economy, was negative 1.2 percent, year on year, though economists said they expected deflation to ease gradually as benefits from the weak yen were felt more widely throughout the economy.And economists warn that for the economy to keep growing, the third arrow will be crucial: mainly structural changes that aim to make the economy more competitive, for example by making Japan's labor market more flexible and lowering barriers to trade.But these changes will be far more politically difficult for Mr. Abe to push through."We expect Abe's first and second arrows to support domestic demand significantly in the next two years," the UBS economists Daiju Aoki and Toru Ibayashi said in a recent note."That said, the two policies can only stimulate short-term demand-side growth, not long-term fundamental growth," they added. "For the rally to continue and be fundamentally driven, Abe must convince the market that his 'third arrow' will benefit Japan's underlying economy."
TOKYO — An earthquake with a preliminary magnitude of 5.9 jolted northeastern Japan on Saturday, but no tsunami warning was issued, the Japan Meteorological Agency said.Tokyo Electric Power Co's two nuclear plants in Fukushima reported no new irregularities after the quake, Kyodo news agency said. Onagawa nuclear plant in Miyagi prefecture further north also detected no irregularities, operator Tohoku Electric Power Co said.In Miyagi prefecture, where the shaking was the strongest, there were no information on injuries, Kyodo added.The United States Geological Survey recorded the quake at 6.1, with a depth of 20.5 miles. The epicentre of the quake was off the coast of Fukushima prefecture, more than 200 km (125 miles) northeast of Tokyo, where buildings also shook.A magnitude 9 earthquake in March 2011 in the northeast triggered a tsunami which killed about 16,000 people, with a further 3,000 still missing. The disaster caused meltdowns and crippled the Fukushima Daiichi nuclear plant.
TOKYO — Hundreds of people living just outside Japan's Fukushima prefecture say they have been denied adequate compensation after the country's 2011 nuclear disaster despite suffering elevated radiation levels.Nearly 700 residents from Hippo district in Miyagi prefecture, just northeast of Fukushima, filed a claim Tuesday with a government arbitration office demanding that they be given the same compensation as residents of Fukushima.The government's basic compensation scheme only covers Fukushima residents, which critics say is an attempt to minimize costs.The Hippo residents said some radiation levels in their area exceeded those in Fukushima towns. Hippo district is about 50 kilometers (30 miles) northwest of the crippled Fukushima Dai-ichi nuclear plant.They demanded that the plant's operator, Tokyo Electric Power Co., pay them an additional 70 million yen ($690,000) in damages.Due to the huge costs of compensation and cleanup of the plant, TEPCO has declared bankruptcy and is under state control. The compensation money paid by TEPCO actually comes from the government.Radiation levels in Hippo district are comparable to areas in Fukushima subject to voluntary evacuation, where residents are entitled to receive up to 720,000 yen ($7,000) for every child and pregnant woman, and up to 120,000 yen ($1,180) per adult. After months of negotiations, TEPCO has agreed to pay Hippo residents about half the Fukushima amount."We in Marumori town have been exposed to as much radiation as our peers in Fukushima, or even more depending on the area," said Takeo Hikichi, 71, who represents the claimants. "We cannot accept the kind of compensation scheme that discriminates against us just because of the prefectural border."Residents of areas just outside of Fukushima say they also face discrimination in legal protection. They say health checks, radiation monitoring and cleanup projects in most cases do not go beyond the prefectural border."Damages from the nuclear accident do not stop at the border. We hope that the compensation program is carried out in a way that reflects the reality of people's lives," said Koji Otani, a lawyer representing the residents.Although the amount sought by each resident is small, the group hopes to be able to set a precedent, he said.A massive earthquake and tsunami hit the Fukushima plant, knocking out its cooling systems and causing the cores of three reactors to melt and release radioactivity into the air and water. The radiation level in Hippo exceeded the annual limit for nuclear workers.So far, TEPCO has paid 2.3 trillion yen ($22.5 billion), about half of it to companies and business owners. That amount includes 1.6 million individual claims, mostly from voluntary evacuees. Because the amount of claims is expected to exceed the initial estimate of 3 trillion yen ($29 billion), the government has injected an additional 154 billion yen ($1.5 billion) into the compensation fund.About 150,000 Fukushima residents are still displaced. Hundreds have filed claims seeking greater compensation.Most of Japan's nuclear reactors have been shut down for tightened safety checks or maintenance since the Fukushima accident. On Wednesday, Japan's nuclear watchdog is to rule on whether one reactor, Tsuruga No. 2, should be permanently closed because of a suspected active seismic fault nearby.On Tuesday, experts commissioned by the plant's operator asked that the decision be delayed, citing insufficient data. The watchdog's own panel said last week that the reactor most likely sits on an active fault and shouldn't be restarted.
TOKYO — After years of grinding malaise, Japan suddenly has some of its bling back.A humbled Sony — once a titan of Japan Inc. — recently sprang back into the black for the first year in five years, courtesy of a plunging yen. Honda, another corporate icon, triumphantly announced a return to Formula One racing, rejoining an exclusive club of high-performance carmakers after having slinked away when cash ran low.Even some of Japan's wary consumers are beginning to indulge. At the plush Takashimaya department store in Tokyo's financial district, a clerk reported that $20,000 watches had become hot sellers. And a cut-rate sushi chain, which flourished in difficult times, just started a line of upscale restaurants for customers newly able to afford "petite extravagances."The reason for the exuberance? Early — and some say deceptive — signs that new Prime Minister Shinzo Abe's economic shock therapy, called Abenomics, might just be working.His plan, one of the world's most audacious experiments in economic policy in recent memory, combines a flood of cheap cash (doubling the money supply in two years), traditional fiscal stimulus and deregulation of Japan's notoriously ingrown corporate culture. The hope is that this will yank Japan from a debilitating deflationary spiral of lower prices and diminished expectations, stirring what Keynes called the "animal spirits" of investors and consumers.And so it has. The stock market has soared more than 60 percent over the past year, and the yen has lost more than a quarter of its value, lifting corporate earnings in a country that is dependent on exports.Last week, Abenomics got an early report card. Japan's $5 trillion economy grew at a robust annualized pace of 3.5 percent in the first quarter, and — most important for Mr. Abe's notion that consumer confidence is key — household consumption accounted for the lion's share of that growth. Although there were some signs of weakness, most notably a drop in business investment, the numbers were a promising sign that the good news was not confined to financial markets."Young people even in their 40s don't remember Japan's good times," said Hiroshi Sato, a 64-year-old executive treating himself to one of Takashimaya's fancy watches. Choosing one from a black velvet tray, he explained his purchase as a bet on Mr. Abe's success after two decades of his predecessors' failures."I'm hopeful," he said, "that this one is finally the real recovery."So far, that optimism appears to be largely limited to the nation's well-to-do, including its tiny stock-holding class, and the weakening of the yen is creating tensions with its Asian neighbors. But if the optimism spreads, Japan will have taken a crucial first step toward recovery, persuading its famously cautious savers to spend their money to help revive the economy."This is Japan's best chance in 20 years to escape from its deflationary mind-set," said Hajime Takata, chief economist at Mizuho Research Institute in Tokyo.That Japan would try such a seemingly radical policy path after years of political paralysis reflects a newfound feeling of urgency. With China's economy and territorial ambitions growing, the Japanese have begun to see the potential dangers of resigning themselves to what many have called a "genteel decline."The fear has given Mr. Abe, who took office in December, some room to maneuver, even as he promises to take on entrenched interests through deregulation and to raise inflation. A pickup in the inflation rate would cause pain for Japan's legion of politically active retirees, but nudge people to spend before their money loses value — reversing the deflationary psychology of delaying purchases in anticipation of ever-lower prices.It has also thrust him into an unusual role for a Japanese prime minister, a generally colorless bunch who make decisions behind closed doors. Mr. Abe, 58, has become his country's cheerleader in chief, proclaiming to audiences that "Japan is back" and even sharing personal details most Japanese politicians eschew. Referring to his own humiliating departure from his first term as prime minister, brought on by a stress-related illness, Mr. Abe tells people that they, too, can recover."It is my job to awaken Japan from the spell of prolonged deflation and lost confidence," he declared in a recent speech to business leaders in Tokyo.Despite the signs of success for Abenomics, skeptics abound.
SAGAMIHARA, Japan — When Masayoshi Matsumoto joined the Japanese army in 1943 and was sent to occupied China as a medic, he thought he was taking part in a righteous war to free Asia from the yoke of Western imperialism.Seven decades later, the 91-year-old retired Christian pastor says it's his mission to speak out about the injustice of the war and the sufferings of women, mostly Asian and many Korean, forced to work in Japanese wartime military brothels."I feel like a war criminal. It is painful to speak of such things and I would rather cover it up. It is painful, but I must speak," the slender, white-haired Matsumoto told Reuters in an interview at his daughter's home about 40 km (25 miles) from Tokyo."I think that to speak out is the meaning of my being alive," added Matsumoto, who returned to Japan in 1946 and later became the pastor of a Christian church. He is one of a dwindling number of veterans with experience of the brothels.Outspoken Osaka Mayor Toru Hashimoto sparked a firestorm of criticism at home and abroad when he said last week that the military brothel system was "necessary" at the time and that Japan has been unfairly singled out for practices common among other militaries during wartime.The remarks outraged China, where many suffered under Japan's military occupation, and South Koreans, where bitter memories of Japan's 1910-1945 colonial rule run deep.They also sparked a backlash in Japan. Support for Hashimoto's right-leaning Japan Restoration Party, already sliding, has fallen further ahead of an upper house election just two months away and another small party has broken off ties with it.As a medic stationed in Yu County in China's Shanxi Province during the war, Matsumoto helped doctors examine a half dozen Korean women who provided sexual services for officers and non-commissioned officers, part of an effort to stem the spread of venereal disease among soldiers.Whatever the rationale at the time, Matsumoto said, the system and the treatment of the women - known euphemistically as "comfort women" - were inexcusable."It is not just Japan that did something wrong. But Japan also did something wrong ... Just because someone else is a thief, is it all right to be a thief? Because someone else kills people, is it all right to be a murderer? That is no excuse," Matsumoto said."The prime minister of Japan should apologize properly as the representative of the nation and compensate those who should be compensated."Prime Minister Shinzo Abe caused controversy during his first 2006-2007 term by saying there was no proof that Japan's military had kidnapped women for the brothels. Such doubts are common among Japanese ultra-conservatives.But Abe has sought to distance himself from Hashimoto's remarks, saying his government's stance is different."The stance of the government on this issue is that, as we stated previously, we are deeply pained when thinking of the women who experienced immeasurable pain and suffering. On this point, the Abe cabinet has the same position as prior cabinets," Chief Cabinet Secretary Yoshihide Suga told a news conference last week, although he declined direct comment on Hashimoto's remarks.The issue has often frayed ties between Tokyo and Seoul. Japan says the matter of compensation was settled under a 1965 treaty establishing diplomatic ties. In 1995, Japan set up a fund to make payments to the women from private contributions, but South Korea says that was not official and so not enough.Matsumoto said the women had no means of escape from the walled town where his military unit was headquartered and were in fact sex slaves. "No matter if they wanted to flee, there was no way to escape," he said.Recalling the conditions in which the women lived, Matsumoto said soldiers lining up for sex would unfasten their leg wrappings and lower their trousers so as to waste no time when their turns came. "It was like they were going to the toilet," he said.Only years later did Matsumoto come to believe his country had done something wrong. "We were taught that it was the mission of Japan, the mission of the Japanese people, to liberate Asian countries from European colonialism," he said."So we went to war gladly then. When I think of it now, it was monstrous, but I didn't think so then."
TOKYO — Japan's parliament on Wednesday approved joining an international child custody treaty amid foreign pressure for Tokyo to address concerns that Japanese mothers can take children away from foreign fathers without recourse.The upper house of parliament voted unanimously to join the 1980 Hague Convention on international child abduction following passage by the more powerful lower house last month. Japan is the only Group of Seven nation that has not joined the convention, which has 89 signatories.The convention will likely take effect later this fiscal year, which ends March 2014, as other steps, including passage of an implementation bill, are needed first, said Tatsushi Nishioka, a Foreign Ministry official.The United States, Britain, France and other countries have repeatedly urged Japan to join the convention. It seeks to ensure that custody decisions are made by the courts of the country where the abducted child originally resided, and that the rights of access of both parents are protected.Custody battles between parents of broken international marriages have become a growing problem in recent years, as Japanese mothers bring children home and refuse to let foreign ex-husbands visit or see their children. For years, Japan had resisted joining the convention, citing cases of Japanese women fleeing abusive foreign husbands.The issue has been an irritant in otherwise close relations between the U.S. and Japan. Secretary of State John Kerry called it a "huge issue" that needs to be resolved.It gained attention in 2009, when American Christopher Savoie was arrested in Japan after his Japanese ex-wife accused him of abducting their two children as they walked to school. He had been granted full custody by a U.S. court, and his ex-wife Noriko Savoie violated that decision by taking the children from Tennessee to Japan.Amid accusations of kidnapping from both sides, Christopher Savoie was eventually released and allowed to leave the country, on condition he leave his children behind.That phenomenon has given rise to this group identifying themselves as "left behind" parents.In 2010, the U.S. House of Representatives turned up the pressure on Japan by voting overwhelmingly for a nonbinding resolution that "condemns the abduction and retention" of children held in Japan "in violation of their human rights and United States and international law."Japanese law allows only one parent to have custody of children in cases of divorce — nearly always the mother. That's kept some foreign fathers and many Japanese fathers from seeing their children until they are grown.Adopting the Hague pact wouldn't lead to major changes in Japanese family law, such as allowing joint custody, Nishioka said.Under the pact, Japan's Foreign Ministry would set up a central authority to handle petitions by the foreign parent to locate or visit the child, and try to work with the parents to settle disputes through consultations. If those fail, family courts would take up the cases and issue rulings, Nishioka said.American Kevin Brown, whose Japanese wife fled with his 2-year-old son six years ago from where they were living in central Japan, says the decision won't affect his situation, and he holds out little hope for real change for overseas-dwelling "left behind" parents.Brown, who still lives in Japan, is allowed to see his 8-year-old son once a month for five hours. He has been pushing for Japan to revise its laws to allow joint custody, but that isn't going to happen when Japan officially joins the convention.Plus, the convention won't apply to past cases, only future ones.Brown is skeptical that the proposed Foreign Ministry office to handle petitions from foreign parents will have any power to grant them access to their separated children in Japan."I think it's just going to be, someone will be there to hear your complaints," he said.
LONDON — UEFA says its executive committee has agreed to introduce a 10-match minimum ban for racist abuse by players or officials.The committee also decided to raise the minimum ban for assaulting match officials from 10 to 15 matches. For insulting a match official, the minimum sanction will rise from two to three matches.The venues for the finals of the UEFA club competitions in 2015 were also approved — Berlin's Olympic Stadium for the Champions League and Warsaw's National Stadium for the Europa League.UEFA General Secretary Gianni Infantino says details on the format of the Europa League will be announced to its congress on Friday, with the winners set to earn a place in the Champions League.
TOKYO — Japan 's nuclear watchdog on Wednesday endorsed a conclusion by a panel of seismologists that a fault under a reactor at an atomic plant in western Japan is active, potentially blocking a restart of the reactor.The Nuclear Regulation Authority said it agreed with the panel that the fault underneath the Tsuruga No. 2 reactor could set off an earthquake and cause an accident. Japanese regulations prohibit reactors from sitting above active faults. The No. 2 reactor at Tsuruga, one of two there, now faces an indefinite halt or likely decommissioning unless its operator provides new data on the fault.It was the first time Japanese regulators had officially recognized an active fault underneath an existing reactor, virtually acknowledging that the risk at Tsuruga had been overlooked for decades by both the operator and regulators despite warnings by some experts. The watchdog is also investigating five other plants over suspected active faults.The case is a crucial test for the agency to prove if it can resist industry pressure just as Japan's pro-nuclear government moves to restart reactors suspended after the 2011 Fukushima disaster.Even before the announcement on Wednesday, the chairman, Shunichi Tanaka, had hinted that his agency would not open a safety review for Tsuruga's No. 2 reactor if its operator applied for an inspection ahead of a possible restart."Under the safety guidelines, we say a reactor should not be built on an active fault — it's self-explanatory," Mr. Tanaka said at a news conference. "We stand by our decision, no matter what kind of pressure we get from outside."Tsuruga's operator, Japan Atomic Power Company, said it would continue its own study in hopes of overturning the assessment.Mr. Tanaka said it was up to the operator to decide what to do with the reactor, because the watchdog did not have the authority to order that it be decommissioned.
TOKYO — The Bank of Japan stood pat on monetary policy Wednesday amid market anxiety over volatility in bond markets, which has threatened to undermine the country's battle to end deflation and stimulate growth in the giant economy.In a unanimous vote, the bank's board stuck to its strategy of expanding the monetary base at an annual pace of 60 trillion yen to 70 trillion yen, or $586 billion to $684 billion, through purchases of government bonds, commercial debt and other assets.Haruhiko Kuroda, the bank's new governor, pledged to "respond flexibly" to the recent moves in Japanese government bond yields, as markets "searched for a new equilibrium." He stressed that there was no cause for immediate concern."Yields are up, but at this stage there is no large impact on the real economy," Mr. Kuroda said at a news conference after the bank's decision.He said that the central bank would continue to make large bond purchases to "keep up the downward pressure on interest rates." He has also suggested that the bank would adjust the way it bought bonds in the market.At its first policy meeting under Mr. Kuroda last month, the bank unleashed what analysts have called a "shock and awe" monetary policy, a sea change for a bank that had come to be known in recent years for its caution and conservatism.Declaring he would do "whatever it takes" to combat falling prices, Mr. Kuroda announced that the bank would seek to double Japan's monetary base, as well as the bank's holdings of Japanese government bonds, by the end of 2014.In recent days, worries have grown about rising interest rates in the government bond market, which could threaten Japan's monetary policy. Japan is vulnerable to rising borrowing costs because of its high public debt, which is twice the size of its economy. Bonds are also the main financial asset held by banks, pension funds and insurance companies, making a surge in debt yields perilous.The scale of Japan's quantitative easing is striking. Assuming that the Japanese economy grows by 2 percent a year, the Bank of Japan would expand its assets to just under 60 percent of the country's gross domestic product, according to estimates from CLSA Asia-Pacific Markets.The assets of the Federal Reserve, which now total about 20 percent of the American economy, and the European Central Bank's assets, which come to about 28 percent of the euro zone's G.D.P., pale in comparison.Japan stands out in another important way. Under Prime Minister Shinzo Abe, who took office in December and has been the main champion of the bank's new boldness, Japan is coupling its monetary push with heavy government spending.Barely two months into office, Mr. Abe pushed through an emergency stimulus package of 10 trillion yen, and last week the Japanese Parliament passed an initial budget of 92.6 trillion yen for 2013, with heavy spending on public works.By contrast, the Fed and the European Central Bank have been forced to depend on monetary policy alone to stave off stagnation and bring about an economic recovery. In both the United States and Europe, a significant increase in government spending remains controversial.Still, critics have pointed to Japan's skyrocketing public debt as proof that such spending is not sustainable. The latest spending packages, they say, will be the final push that could send Japan plummeting into a Europe-like debt crisis. Defenders of the bank's monetary policy had argued that Japan's bold stimulus efforts would not push interest rates higher, because the central bank promises to buy bonds the government issues.But in recent days, yields have been volatile, with the key 10-year nominal government bond yield hitting five-year highs last week before later settling down. Traders blamed the central bank's purchases, saying they created a lack of liquidity in bond markets."We think Kuroda has done a great job in boosting asset prices by raising asset price inflation expectation, but he now has to calm down the sentiment in bond market," Masaaki Kanno, chief economist at JPMorgan Securities Japan, said in a research note. "This is quite challenging."
OSAKA, Japan — Two elderly South Korean women forced to work in Japanese war-time military brothels canceled a meeting on Friday with the mayor of the city of Osaka after he refused to withdraw remarks asserting the brothels were "necessary" at the time.The mayor of Osaka, Toru Hashimoto, an outspoken populist who has often stirred controversy, sparked a storm of criticism at home and abroad when he said last week that the military brothels had been needed, and Japan has been unfairly singled out for wartime practices common among other militaries.Victims of Japan's war-time aggression, including many people in China and South Korea, are sensitive to what they see as any attempt by Japanese politicians to excuse Japanese abuses before and during the war.Octogenarians Kim Bok-dong and Kil Won-ok said they had hoped their planned meeting with Hashimoto, who heads the small right-leaning Japan Restoration Party, would encourage him to change his mind but they had heard he planned to manipulate them by an "apology performance" in front of media."Indescribably heart-wrenching reality and history of the victims cannot be traded with his apology performance and sweet talk," the women said in a statement provided by the Korean Council for the Women Drafted for Military Sexual Slavery by Japan."We do not want to kill ourselves twice," they said. "If he truly feels sorry to us and regretful, he must take back his criminal comments and make a formal apology. He should hold himself responsible for his wrongdoing and retire from politics."Hashimoto also said there was no evidence the Japanese military directly abducted "comfort women", as they are euphemistically known in Japan, to work in the brothels before and during World War Two.Historians estimate that as many as 200,000 women were forced into sexual slavery in the Imperial Japanese Army's brothels before and during the war.On Friday, Hashimoto, who trained as a lawyer, told reporters he had not meant to imply that he personally approved of the wartime brothel system and said he was sorry that the women's feelings had been hurt by the misunderstanding.But he declined to withdraw the remarks."I believe at the moment there's nothing I should withdraw," he said during a news conference. "But I feel sorry if media coverage (of his remarks) hurt comfort women's feelings."Hashimoto also said that it was clear that the Japanese military ran the brothels, but it was necessary for scholars to study and clarify whether Japan's military and government were directly involved in abducting the women to work there."Whether Japan as a state abducted Korean women and trafficked them. That's the most contentious point between Japan and South Korea. The Japanese government has not made this point clear," he said."This should be debated rigorously among historians to make things clear and to restore relations between Japan and South Korea."Japanese Prime Minister Shinzo Abe caused controversy during his first term in 2006-2007 by saying there was no proof that Japan's military had kidnapped women - mostly Asian and many Korean - to work in the brothels. Such sentiments are common among Japanese ultra-conservatives.But Abe has sought to distance himself from Hashimoto's remarks and his government has drawn back from early signals that it might revise a landmark 1993 government statement acknowledging military involvement in coercing the women, and apologizing to them.The issue has often frayed relations between Tokyo and Seoul.Japan says the matter of compensation for the women was settled under a 1965 treaty establishing diplomatic ties. In 1995, Japan set up a fund to make payments to the women from private contributions, but South Korea says that was not official and therefore insufficient.
OSAKA, Japan — A former sex slave says a Japanese mayor's remarks about Japan's wartime sex slavery are "absurd."Kim Bok-dong, who is from South Korea, was referring Saturday to comments by Osaka Mayor Toru Hashimoto. He has angered many by saying Japan's wartime practice of forcing many Asian women into prostitution for its military was considered necessary.Kim said Saturday that anyone who makes such an "absurd comment" should quit politics. The 87-year-old and another victim, Kil Won-ok, were speaking to their supporters to share with them their painful past as so-called comfort women.The two canceled their planned meeting Friday with Hashimoto, citing his lack of remorse.Hashimoto's comments reignited longtime resentment in neighboring countries that suffered from Japan's wartime aggression and have complained about the lack of atonement for atrocities.
TOKYO — A delay in Japanese Prime Minister Shinzo Abe and his wife moving into their official residence, the site of past assassinations, has revived talk of ghosts in the corridors, prompting the government to deny any knowledge of hauntings.Abe has not moved into the prime minister's official residence for five months since he took power.Asked by an opposition lawmaker about the reported hauntings, the government issued a formal statement on Friday saying it was not aware of ghost sightings, Asahi newspaper and other media reported.The residence, formerly the prime minister's office, was built in 1929 and was the site of military rebellions, including in 1932 when then-Prime Minister Tsuyoshi Inukai was assassinated.Talk of ghosts has long haunted the building, remodeled in the early 2000s. It has served as the official residence for the prime minister and the premier's family since 2005.Abe has given no explanation for the delay in moving in, but it is not uncommon for the premier to take some time before taking up residence.
TOKYO — Two South Korean women who were forced during World War II to provide sex to Japanese soldiers canceled a meeting on Friday with a Japanese mayor who had caused an uproar by appearing to defend the system of wartime brothels .Earlier on Friday, the cabinet of Japan's conservative prime minister, Shinzo Abe, passed a resolution to support a 1993 apology that Japan issued to women forced into sexual servitude during the war. The motion was apparently intended to appease other Asian nations angered that Japanese leaders seemed to be seeking to whitewash the country's past.Those concerns were also apparently shared by the two women who canceled the meeting, Kim Bok-dong and Kil Won-ok. The women, now in their 80s, had hoped to explain how they and thousands of other so-called comfort women were forced to work in the brothels against their will, rebutting claims by Japanese nationalists that they were common prostitutes. However, the two decided that the mayor, Toru Hashimoto of the western city of Osaka, was just trying to use the planned meeting to repair his image and that he was not seriously showing remorse, the women said in a statement.Mr. Hashimoto, 43, who is also a leader of a populist party, angered South Korea and other Asian nations by saying last week that the comfort women were necessary to provide relief to soldiers who faced the dangers of enemy fire. The comments seemed to confirm fears of many in the region that Japanese political leaders were shifting to the right with a revisionist agenda.Seeking to control the diplomatic damage, Mr. Abe quickly distanced his government from the mayor's comments, which angered many Japanese voters, particularly women.The resolution by Mr. Abe's cabinet on Friday formally embraced the 1993 Kono Statement, which recognized that the Japanese military played a role, either directly or indirectly, in forcing the women into providing sex. Before becoming prime minister in December, Mr. Abe had openly disputed whether the military played a role.Faced with mounting criticism at home and abroad, Mr. Hashimoto also appeared to back away from the original comments by saying he merely meant that people at the time saw the brothels as necessary. But he also tried to deflect criticism by reiterating a view long held view by Japanese nationalists: that their nation has been unfairly singled out for criticism by the wartime victors, including the United States, which he said also ran or at least tacitly allowed brothels for its own soldiers.Mr. Hashimoto also angered American officials last week when he said American troops stationed on the island of Okinawa should patronize the island's thriving sex industry to prevent them from raping local women. The mayor later said the comment had been inappropriate.On Friday, Ms. Kim and Ms. Kil, the two former comfort women, said in a statement from Osaka that it was comments like that by Mr. Hashimoto that led them to cancel the meeting, which was supposed to take place later in the day. The women, who did not appear in public, said in the statement that they were heartbroken by the mayor's "outrageous comments," according to The Associated Press."We cannot compromise our painful past as victims and the reality that we still live today for Mayor Hashimoto's apology performance," the statement said, according to The A.P.The women also demanded that Mr. Hashimoto apologize and resign as mayor.
TOKYO — A U.S. Air Force F-15 fighter crashed off the southern Japan island of Okinawa early Tuesday after the aircraft developed problems in flight. The pilot ejected and was recovered safely.The F-15, flying out of Kadena Air Base, went down in the Pacific about 115 kilometers (70 miles) east of Okinawa, the military said in a statement.Lt. Col. David Honchul, the chief spokesman for the U.S. Forces, Japan, said the pilot was recovered safely after a search by U.S. and Japanese rescue crews. After he ejected from the plane the pilot remained in contact with the rescuers. He was rescued by a Japanese air force helicopter.The cause was under investigation. The pilot's name has not been released. The U.S. military said he was in stable condition and being evaluated at a military hospital on Okinawa.The U.S. military has about 50,000 troops based in Japan, about half of them on Okinawa. Kadena Air Base is one of the largest U.S. airbases in the Asia-Pacific region. The F-15 was attached to Kadena's 18th Wing.The crash was the first for an F-15 based at Kadena since January 2006.
TOKYO — An outspoken Japanese politician apologized Monday for saying U.S. troops should patronize adult entertainment businesses as a way to reduce sex crimes, but defended another inflammatory remark about Japan's use of sex slaves before and during World War II.Osaka Mayor Toru Hashimoto, co-leader of an emerging nationalist party, said his remarks two weeks ago rose from a "sense of crisis" about cases of sexual assaults by U.S. military personnel on Japanese civilians in Okinawa, where a large number of U.S. troops are based under a bilateral security treaty.Hashimoto also said he had not tried to condone a system of so-called comfort women, but meant to say military authorities at the time, not only in Japan but in many other countries, considered it necessary.He denied any intention to avoid Japan's responsibility over its wartime actions, adding he wanted to shed light on sex offenses in the battlefield and encourage open debate on the problem today."I understand that my remark could be construed as an insult to the U.S. forces and to the American people" and was inappropriate, he told a news conference at the Foreign Correspondents' Club of Japan in Tokyo. "I retract this remark and express an apology."Hashimoto, a lawyer and former TV personality, created an uproar with comments to journalists two weeks ago about Japan's modern and wartime sexual services, which he said were misquoted. The comments added to recent anger in neighboring countries that suffered from Japan's wartime aggression and have complained about a lack of atonement for the atrocities.Hashimoto said then that the practice of using women from across Asia to work in front-line brothels before and during World War II was necessary to maintain discipline and provide relaxation for soldiers. He added that on a recent visit to the southern island of Okinawa, he suggested to the U.S. commander there that his troops "make better use" of the legal sex industry "to control the sexual energy of those tough guys."On Monday, Hashimoto called the use of comfort women an "inexcusable act that violated the dignity and human rights of the women, in which large numbers of Korean and Japanese were included." He did not mention women from other countries, such as China, the Philippines and Indonesia, where many teenagers were forced into sex slavery.He said Japan must express deep remorse and apologize to the women. He repeatedly denied any intention to whitewash Japan's wartime responsibility.But he didn't apologize for those comments about Japan's wartime brothels, and insisted that the country's wartime government did not systematically force girls and women into prostitution.Historians say up to 200,000 women, mainly from the Korean Peninsula and China, were forced to provide sex for Japanese soldiers in military brothels. While some other World War II armies had military brothels, Japan is the only country accused of such widespread, organized sexual slavery."If only Japan is blamed because of the widely held view that the state authority of Japan was intentionally involved in the abduction and trafficking of women, I will have to inform you that this view is incorrect," he said.Hashimoto urged the government to clarify or revise Japan's landmark apology in a 1993 statement by then-Chief Cabinet Secretary Yohei Kono to clearly state that Japan did not systematically force women into prostitution for its wartime military.The Kono apology acknowledged the military's involvement, both direct and indirect, in the forced recruitment of the women.Hashimoto said the apology does not say whether the operation was run under "state will" and that such murkiness has contributed to longstanding disputes between Japan and South Korea over the issue. He raised doubts of accounts by some of the women who have come forward as victims of Japan's sexual slavery as reliable evidence of coercion.Before taking office in December, Abe advocated revising the Kono apology, but now says he stands by it.Hashimoto said he was quoted out of context in saying he believed that the use the system was necessary. He said he was trying to say that armed forces around the world "seem to have needed women" in past wars and had violated women's human rights during wartime.Singling out Japan was wrong, as this issue also existed in the armed forces of the United States, Britain, France, Germany and the former Soviet Union during World War II, he alleged, without elaborating."Based on the premise that Japan must remorsefully face its past offenses and must never justify the offenses, I intended to argue that other nations in the world must not attempt to conclude the matter by blaming only Japan and by associating Japan alone with the simple phrase of 'sex slaves' or 'sex slavery,'" Hashimoto said in a statement to journalists.Hashimoto's suggestion to the U.S. troops brought sharp criticism from Washington. The State Department called Hashimoto's comments "outrageous and offensive."Okinawa was invaded by U.S. forces in World War II and has had an American military presence since. The 1995 rape of a schoolgirl by two Marines and a sailor spread rage across the island, and more rapes and other crimes linked to U.S. servicemen over the years, along with military land use and aircraft noise, have caused longstanding anti-U.S. military sentiment there.Hashimoto, 43, has become well known in recent years for his outspokenness. Last year, he formed the Japan Restoration Party with former Tokyo Gov. Shintaro Ishihara, a strident nationalist. It is now an opposition party in parliament.
TOKYO — The U.S. Air Force grounded its F-15 fighters on the southern Japan island of Okinawa for a safety review Wednesday following a crash that forced a pilot to eject over the Pacific Ocean.All F-15s attached to the 18th Wing on Okinawa's Kadena Air Base are to undergo inspections during the one-day stand down to ensure that they are safe to fly, the military announced.An F-15 developed problems during training on Tuesday that forced the pilot to eject. The plane was lost in the ocean but the pilot was rescued by a Japanese military helicopter and taken to a military hospital, where he was listed in stable condition. No further details, including the pilot's name, have been released.Base officials said it was the first crash of an F-15 from Kadena since January 2006. The 18th Wing said in a statement that it is common practice to stand down training operations after a major mishap "to allow aircrews time and opportunity to reflect on what happened and re-focus on training requirements."Col. Brian McDaniel, 18th Wing vice commander, said the wing will make every effort to ensure aircraft operations at Kadena are safe. The statement said an interim safety investigation board will begin gathering facts to determine the cause of the incident.The U.S. has about 50,000 troops in Japan. More than half of them are based on Okinawa.Incidents involving the U.S. troops on Okinawa are particularly sensitive because many Okinawans oppose the U.S. military presence there and want it to be significantly scaled back.Opposition to the U.S. troops has been especially high in recent months because of the military's decision to deploy another aircraft, the MV-22 Osprey, to a Marine base that is located in a heavily populated area. Although the U.S. says the aircraft — which can fly like a helicopter or a regular airplane — has a solid safety record, past Osprey crashes have led many Okinawans to question that claim and demand it be moved elsewhere.Okinawa Gov. Hirokazu Nakaima said he was concerned by the F-15 incident and suggested a one-day stand down would not be sufficient."We are glad that there was no damage to our people and that the pilot was safely rescued," he said. "But this accident has caused grave fears among our people, who must live their daily lives right next to the U.S. bases."He said Okinawa would demand all F-15 flights be halted until the cause of the crash is determined and appropriate preventative measure have been taken to avoid any more accidents.
OSAKA, Japan — More than 70 years ago, at age 14, Kim Bok-dong was ordered to work by Korea's Japanese occupiers. She was told she was going to a military uniform factory, but ended up at a Japanese military-linked brothel in southern China.She had to take an average of 15 soldiers per day during the week, and dozens over the weekend. At the end of the day she would be bleeding and could not even stand because of the pain. She and other girls were closely watched by guards and could not escape. It was a secret she carried for decades; the man she later married died without ever knowing.Tens of thousands of women had similar stories to tell, or to hide, from Japan's occupation of much of Asia before and during World War II. Many are no longer living, and those who remain are still waiting for Japan to offer reparations and a more complete apology than it has so far delivered."I'm here today, not because I wanted to but because I had to," Kim, now 87, told a packed audience of mostly Japanese at a community center in Osaka over the weekend. "I came here to ask Japan to settle its past wrongdoing. I hope the Japanese government resolves the problem as soon as possible while we elderly women are still alive."The issue of Japan's use of Korean, Chinese and Southeast Asian women and girls as sex slaves — euphemistically called "comfort women" — continues to alienate Tokyo from its neighbors nearly 70 years after the war's end. It is a wound that was made fresh this month when the co-head of an emerging nationalistic party, Osaka Mayor Toru Hashimoto, said "comfort women" had been necessary to maintain military discipline and give respite to battle-weary troops.His comments drew outrage from South Korea and China, as well as from the U.S. State Department, which called them "outrageous and offensive."Hashimoto provided no evidence but insisted that Tokyo has been unfairly singled out for its World War II behavior regarding women, saying some other armies at the time had military brothels. None of them, however, has been accused of the kind of widespread, organized sexual slavery that has been linked to Japan's military.Historians say up to 200,000 women from across Asia, including China, the Philippines, Indonesia, Thailand, Burma, Hong Kong and Macau, as well as the Netherlands, were forced to provide sex for Japanese soldiers.To many people, even within Japan, Hashimoto's comments suggest that even after all these years, Japanese leaders don't want to fully acknowledge wartime wrongs and are out of touch with the sentiments not only of their neighbors and the international community, but also many of their own citizens."It's not a problem of the past. It's a continuing problem that involves people who are still alive," said Koichi Nakano, a Sophia University political science professor. "Japan is perceived as merely waiting for them to die while looking the other way and dragging its feet. That looks bad from a humanity point of view."According to a survey conducted over the weekend by the conservative Sankei newspaper and FNN television, more than 75 percent of Japanese said Hashimoto's sex slave remarks were inappropriate, while support for his party slumped to 6.4 percent — nearly half what it was last month.The comments come amid rising concerns in the region over the nationalistic shift in Japan's political leadership under Prime Minister Shinzo Abe, who has suggested he wants to revise Japan's past apologies for its wartime aggression and change its pacifist constitution.In 1993, Japan officially apologized to "comfort women" in a landmark statement by then-Chief Cabinet Secretary Yohei Kono, acknowledging "immeasurable pain and incurable physical and psychological wounds."But Kim and other women want a full apology approved by parliament and official compensation from the government. Tokyo has resisted that, saying war reparations with South Korea were dealt with in treaties restoring relations after the war. In 1995, Tokyo created a fund using private donations as a way for Japan to pay former sex slaves without providing official compensation.The fund provided 2 million yen ($20,000) each to about 280 women in the Philippines, Taiwan and South Korea, and funded nursing homes for Indonesian victims and medical assistance to about 80 former Dutch sex slaves.In South Korea, 207 women formally came forward and were recognized as eligible recipients. But only a fraction actually accepted the money because of criticism of the private fund. Instead they receive support from the South Korean government and a support group.In Japan, public sentiment has become less compassionate in recent years toward Asian victims of the country's wartime aggression. References to "comfort women" once in school history textbooks have disappeared.Much of the debate over "comfort women" still focuses on what role the government at the time played in organizing brothels, and if — or to what extent — the women were coerced. The Kono statement says the military was involved directly or indirectly in the establishment and management of front-line brothels and transfer of women, and that many women were in many cases "recruited against their own will through coaxing and coercion."Nobuo Ishihara, who was then deputy Cabinet secretary, said in March 2006 that interviews with 16 South Korean women in Seoul led to the conclusion that there was coercion though there were no official documents showing so."After interviewing the 16 comfort women, we came to believe that what they were saying could not be fabrication. We thought there was no doubt they were forced to become comfort women against their will," Ishihara said. "Based on the investigation team's report, we, as the government, concluded that there was coercion."The government investigation also found that many of the Dutch victims were selected from concentration camps and forcibly sent to brothels, while those in the Philippines and Indonesia were raped at battlefronts, kidnapped and forced to provide sex under confinement.Hashimoto, 43, sought to calm the uproar Monday, telling a packed news conference that he personally didn't condone using "comfort women," which he labeled a violation of human rights.But he repeatedly insisted that Japan's wartime government did not systematically force girls and women into prostitution, although he acknowledged that some may have been deceived and coerced. He said the historical record isn't clear, which is similar to Abe's view that there is no proof the women were coerced as a result of a state order. He said historians from both Japan and South Korea should settle the matter.Hashimoto acknowledged that this murkiness probably is the key stumbling block in Japan's ties with South Korea.Chuo University historian Yoshiaki Yoshimi, one of Japan's most respected experts on "comfort women," criticized the Japanese government for taking an extremely narrow interpretation of what constitutes coercion.He said documents show "comfort women" recruited in Japan were mostly adult professionals, although many had been sold into the sex industry by their poor families. However, in Asian countries invaded by Japan, there was no consideration of the rights of minors or the right to quit, which he said should constitute coercion by international standards."Neither Prime Minister Abe nor Mayor Hashimoto has tried to look at how those girls and young women were abused. Their view is worlds apart from the international view," he said.Kim was dragged across Asia, from Hong Kong to Singapore and Indonesia, until the end of the war in 1945. She was freed in Singapore and returned home in 1946. She later was married but — like most former sex slaves — was never able to reveal her past to anyone but her mother — until decades later."Even as I returned to my homeland, it never was a true liberation for me," she told listeners at the community center. "How could I tell anyone what had happened to me during the war? It was living with a big lump in my chest."She finally broke her silence several years after her husband died in 1981. Later she joined a group of women seeking official recognition as victims of Japan's sex slavery.Kim has since traveled around the world to tell her story and participates in weekly protests in front of the Japanese Embassy in Seoul.Kim and another former sex slave, 84-year-old Kil Won-ok, had been seeking a meeting with Hashimoto for some time when he made his comments this month. He then offered to meet with them, but they canceled, saying they didn't perceive that he was remorseful and didn't want to be used by him to rehabilitate his image. Instead, they spoke to the public in Osaka."We won't be around much longer," Kil said. "But we have to tell you our stories because we don't want the same mistake repeated again."
TOKYO — Japan pledged better safety practices for its troubled nuclear industry Tuesday after an accident at a government research facility that exposed 33 people to minor excess radiation and had not been immediately disclosed.Education Minister Hakubun Shimomura, whose agency oversees research at the facility in Tokaimura, north of Tokyo, said the government will tighten oversight."It is crucial for a nuclear research facility to give top priority to safety measures," Shimomura said. "Their lack of safety awareness and insufficient safety management systems apparently invited the problem."Japan's nuclear industry has been in crisis since the March 2011 accident at the tsunami-hit Fukushima Dai-ichi nuclear plant, the worst since Chernobyl in 1986. The government has revamped its regulatory regime and is drafting stricter safety standards as troubles mount.The accident occurred Thursday at the Hadron Experimental Facility of the Japan Atomic Energy Agency's Japan Proton Accelerator Research Complex in Tokaimura, where at least two previous radiation accidents have occurred. Shimomura said the government will set up a panel to discuss reform and safety compliance at the government-run JAEA.Researchers were trying to generate particles by directing a proton beam at some gold when their equipment overheated, causing the evaporation and release of radioactive gold, the JAEA said. The leak originally was thought to have been contained inside the lab, but it spread to other areas when a ventilation fan was switched on.Out of 55 people tested, 22 had no excess exposure and 33 received radiation dosages of up to 1.7 millisieverts. That is about as much background radiation as a person in Japanese typically receives over a year. Nuclear workers generally are limited to 100 millisieverts of exposure over five years.Japan's Nuclear Regulation Authority rated the accident as Level 1, or third from the lowest level on a nine-level international scale. The March 2011 accident at the tsunami-hit Fukushima Dai-ichi nuclear plant, the country's worst ever atomic energy disaster, was rated a 7, the top level on the scale.Some 150,000 Fukushima residents are still because of that disaster. A zoning reclassification that took effect Tuesday ended a "no-go zone" designation for areas contaminated with radiation from the Fukushima Dai-Ichi plant. However, most of the areas were re-zoned as "difficult to return to" and remain off-limits.No radiation was released to the outside environment in Tokaimura, but the accident's handling and a failure by the JAEA to report the leak until more than a day later has added to concerns over safety standards and transparency in the industry.Tokaimura was the site of Japan's second-worst nuclear accident, in September 1999, when two workers were killed by a radiation leak at a fuel-reprocessing plant when they tried to save time by mixing excessive amounts of uranium in buckets instead of using special mechanized tanks. Hundreds of people were exposed to radiation, and thousands evacuated due to that accident, which was assigned a Level 4 rating on the International Nuclear Event Scale.In March 1997, at least 37 workers were exposed to low doses of radiation in a fire and explosion at a different nuclear reprocessing plant in Tokaimura.Most of Japan's nuclear plants remain closed after they were shut down for safety checks after the Fukushima disaster, though Prime Minister Shinzo Abe and other top officials have said they intend to restart reactors that meet new guidelines due to be issued in July.On May 17, the president of the JAEA, Atsuyuki Suzuki, resigned after the country's nuclear watchdog announced that the Monju next-generation test reactor would not be allowed to restart due to safety violations. His resignation was followed by a decision by the watchdog to back expert research concluding that an active seismic fault runs underneath one of two reactors at an atomic plant in Tsuruga, western Japan.Associated Press writer Mari Yamaguchi contributed to this report.
TOKYO — Seeking to quell an uproar over his recent comments suggesting that sexual slavery was a necessary evil in Japan's imperial past, a populist party leader said Monday that he had not meant to justify wartime brothels or deny the women's suffering at the hands of Japanese soldiers.But the politician, Toru Hashimoto, who is a co-leader of the opposition Japan Restoration Association and the mayor of Osaka, Japan's third-largest city, also argued that Japan was being unfairly singled out for its use of so-called comfort women, and that other nations needed to examine the mistreatment of women by their own militaries before pointing the finger at Tokyo."We must express our deep remorse at the violation of the human rights of these women by Japanese soldiers in the past, and make our apology to the women," Mr. Hashimoto said, speaking to journalists at the Foreign Correspondents' Club of Japan. But, he added, "it is not a fair attitude to blame only Japan, as if the violation of human rights of women by soldiers were a problem unique to Japanese soldiers."The conduct of the Japanese military in Asia before and during World War II remains a highly charged topic in the region. Many of the country's neighbors say Japan has not properly atoned for its wartime atrocities, while segments of Japan's establishment feel that the country has been unfairly demonized.Some historians estimate that 200,000 women were rounded up to provide sex for the Japanese military. Other historians put that number in the tens of thousands and say the women served of their own will. Japan formally apologized to the women in 1993.Two South Koreans who served as "comfort women" canceled a meeting with Mr. Hashimoto last week, saying in a statement that they were heartbroken over his "outrageous comments." Historians say the women in Japan's military brothels came from the Korean Peninsula, China, Taiwan, the Philippines and Japan, among other places.South Korea's foreign minister, Yun Byung-se, called Mr. Hashimoto's latest remarks "embarrassing and shameful," and said they would "further isolate Japan in the international community."Mr. Hashimoto charged that Britain, France, Germany, the Soviet Union and the United States were guilty of similar violations of women's rights in World War II, as were South Korean soldiers who served in the Vietnam War. He urged those countries to acknowledge their past before scrutinizing Japan's wartime history.He also invoked a belief shared by many Japanese, including Prime Minister Shinzo Abe, that there was no evidence to suggest that Japan's wartime government directly forced women to serve in the brothels. He brushed aside, as unreliable, testimony to the contrary from a number of women who had been enslaved.Mr. Hashimoto's comments followed those of a string of Japanese politicians who had recently challenged what they said was a distorted view of Japan's wartime history. Last month, Mr. Abe said the definition of "invasion" was relative.But even Mr. Abe and his cabinet have distanced themselves from Mr. Hashimoto in recent weeks.Mr. Hashimoto's remarks — sometimes on Twitter — have incited a furor among human rights groups here and have alienated much of the public. About 400 human rights activists staged a protest outside the Osaka city office this month, calling on him to resign. After he made his initial remarks on "comfort women" on May 13, the State Department called them "outrageous and offensive."While the audience for Mr. Hashimoto's speech on Monday was made up of foreign journalists, his comments were as much a plea to domestic voters before parliamentary elections this summer as they were an attempt to sway global public opinion.Public approval ratings for Mr. Hashimoto, who was once seen as a possible contender for prime minister, have plunged. A smaller party has called off plans to cooperate with him in the elections, citing his remarks on women.During his speech, Mr. Hashimoto apologized for suggesting to a senior American military official stationed on the island of Okinawa that United States troops at bases there should make more use of the local adult entertainment industry to reduce sexual crimes against women."That was not what I meant," Mr. Hashimoto said. "My real intention was to prevent a mere handful of American soldiers from committing crimes. In attempting to act on my strong commitment to solving the problem in Okinawa stemming from crimes committed by a minority of U.S. soldiers, I made an inappropriate remark."Still, Mr. Hashimoto did not shy away from delving into his interpretation of wartime brothels.Many brothels were run not by Japanese, but by local brokers on the Korean Peninsula and elsewhere, he said. And though some brothels were run by Japan's military, he said, the military's main task was to prevent the spread of sexually transmitted diseases for the sake of the women.He stressed that while Japanese military boats and trucks were sometimes used to transport women to the brothels, the authorities themselves were not deeply involved in the coercion of women. He said he did not believe that Japan's actions amounted to human trafficking.Banri Kaieda, who leads the opposition Democratic Party, advised Mr. Hashimoto to stop talking before he made the situation even worse."There is a Chinese saying, 'You cannot wrap a fire with paper,' " Mr. Kaieda said at a news conference. With Mr. Hashimoto, he said, "it's as if he is trying to wrap it with oil instead."
TOKYO — Japanese Prime Minister Shinzo Abe said on Wednesday he believed North Korea's young leader was capable of making the right decision to resolve a dispute over kidnapped Japanese citizens, repeating he was open to a summit if it would settle the row.Abe made his remarks in a television interview two weeks after a surprise visit to Pyongyang by his aide, Isao Iijima. That visit upset South Korea and the United States, both of which feared Tokyo might do a deal on abductees without addressing North Korea's nuclear and missile programs.Iijima's visit to Pyongyang and talks with senior officials there fuelled speculation that Abe might seek a summit with Kim Jong-un to achieve a breakthrough ahead of a July 21 upper house election to boost his already high popularity ratings."The important thing is whether I can achieve results by going there and negotiating," Abe told Japanese TV station TBS."If the problem is resolved, holding a summit would be an option naturally. But if not, holding a summit for the sake of a summit would mean nothing."Ties with North Korea have long been fraught over Japan's 1910-1945 occupation of the Korean peninsula, Pyongyang's missile and nuclear programs and Japanese anger over the abduction of its citizens by North Korean agents decades ago."Kim Jong-un was not involved in kidnapping operations basically. It's true that his father did it, but he's got nothing to do with it," Abe said. "I think his administration will be capable of deciding to do the right thing as a new leader."Kim Jong-un's father, the late Kim Jong-il, admitted during then Prime Minister Junichiro Koizumi's visit to North Korea in 2002 that Pyongyang's agents had kidnapped 13 Japanese citizens in the 1970s and 1980s.Five abductees were later repatriated. Pyongyang says the other eight are dead, but Tokyo wants more information about them and others it believes were also kidnapped.
TOKYO — The 80-year-old Japanese mountaineer who last week became the oldest person to reach the top of Mount Everest says he almost died during his descent and does not plan another climb of the world's highest peak, though he hopes to do plenty of skiing.Yuichiro Miura, who also conquered the 29,035-foot (8,850-meter) peak when he was 70 and 75, returned to Japan on Wednesday looking triumphant but ready for a rest. He was sympathetic toward an 81-year-old Nepalese climber who on Tuesday abandoned his attempt to climb Everest, and break Miura's record, due to worsening weather.Min Bahadur Sherchan, the Nepalese mountaineer, faced difficult odds due to the brief climbing window remaining after delays in getting funding for his own ascent, Miura said."He is to be pitied," said Miura, who had downplayed any talk of a rivalry.Sherchan became the oldest Everest climber in 2008 at age 76 and held the record until Miura's ascent last week.The Nepalese climber said he slipped and fell just above the base camp three days earlier, hurting his ribs, so he was airlifted back to Katmandu, where he saw a doctor.He plans to try again to regain his record, perhaps next year."I still have a few more years to make my attempts. I will try until I reach 84 and then quit," Sherchan said.Wednesday was also the 60th anniversary of the conquest of Everest. It was marked in Katmandu, Nepal, with a ceremony honoring climbers who followed in the footsteps of Edmund Hillary and Tenzing Norgay.Miura and his son Gota, who has climbed Everest twice, said things went well during their expedition because they carefully paced themselves, walking only half-days and resting in the afternoons."We just beat the monsoon season, and the typhoons are coming," Miura said. "Thanks to good luck and careful preparation and planning, we all returned without any accidents.""We took our time. You get tired when you are old," he said.But Miura said he was dangerously weak at the beginning of his May 23 descent. Though he felt fine after he removed his oxygen mask on the summit to pose for photos and enjoy the view, he suffered for it on the way down."I lost strength in my legs," Miura said. "I could not move at all."Helped down by Gota and others, Miura revived after having some food and water at the team's 8,500-meter (27,887-foot) -high base camp."He just wouldn't give up. This is the real strength of Yuichiro Miura," Gota said of his father's recovery and persistence in traveling another 2 1/2 hours later in the day to reach their camp at 8,000 meters (26,247 feet).Miura was a daredevil speed skier in his youth, and skied down Everest's South Col in 1970, using a parachute to brake his descent. He also has skied down Mount Fuji.Though he says he does not plan another Everest attempt, Miura says he hopes to do plenty of skiing and to "live life to the fullest.""Before this mission, we held a family meeting, and I was really afraid they'd say 'No.' But they just said it couldn't be helped and went along with it," he said."When my father was 99 years old, we went skiing on Mount Blanc. Three generations of the Miura family. It would have been four, but the youngest was 5 and couldn't come," he said. "I hope to go skiing with three or four more generations of my family.""It isn't just about staying healthy, but it's about having goals," he said."You don't need to climb Mount Fuji or travel overseas. Just get out of the house. Enjoy good food. Those are the things we should do," said Miura, who dined on hot pot and hand-rolled sushi and enjoyed gourmet Japanese green tea during his climb.Miura expressed sadness over the disappearance Friday of Chizuko Kono, a 67-year-old female climber, while trying to summit Dhaulagiri, the world's seventh-highest peak."Apparently, Kono just exceeded her limits and lost her strength," he said. "It's a real shame. It only takes one misstep. It's really too bad."Associated Press writer Binaj Gurubcharya in Katmandu, Nepal, contributed to this report.
TOKYO — The mayor of Japan's second-largest city survived a censure motion Thursday over his inflammatory comments about Japan's wartime sex slavery, remarks that sparked an international uproar.The Osaka city assembly voted down the motion, which said Mayor Toru Hashimoto's comments earlier this month about Japan's so-called "comfort women" created confusion and tarnished the city's image.Hashimoto, also co-leader of an emerging nationalistic party, said he would stay on as mayor. He said that he took the motion seriously, but that he had no intention of retracting his remarks or apologizing over them."If I caused misunderstanding, I'm sorry. But I don't think what I'm saying is wrong. I still believe what I'm saying is right," Hashimoto said, referring to his comments about Japan's wartime practice that forced many Asian women into prostitution for Japanese soldiers.The outspoken mayor sparked controversy after he said May 13 that Japan's use of "comfort women" before and during World War II was necessary for military discipline and providing rest for troops.He sought later to clarify his comments, saying he meant that military authorities during that time must have deemed the practice necessary.The motion had been expected to pass, but was voted down because of a last-minute rejection by a main opposition party amid concerns that Hashimoto's possible resignation could drive municipal politics into further disarray. The vote was delayed for hours while opposition lawmakers debated what to do.Though a censure motion is not legally binding, Osaka Gov. Ichiro Matsui said ahead of the vote that Hashimoto would have to step down as mayor if it passed. Matsui also serves as secretary general of Hashimoto's Japan Restoration Party.Despite his survival Thursday, Hashimoto's political future remains uncertain. He already has hinted that he might step down as co-leader of his party if it suffers a major defeat in July's parliamentary elections.Since he came under fire, Hashimoto has largely lost the city assembly's backing for his projects promised in his campaign platform. A bill to combine city and prefectural water projects was voted down, and a privatization of a city-operated subway system was postponed.According to media polls, more than 70 percent of Japanese thought his remarks were inappropriate.Associated Press writer Malcolm Foster contributed to this report.
YOKOHAMA, Japan — Japan is wooing African nations, promising 3.2 trillion yen ($32 billion) as government and private-sector aid to foster growth in a region that is increasingly an appealing market and business partner.The package for the next five years, including 1.4 trillion yen ($14 billion) in government aid called ODA, or official development assistance, was announced at a three-day conference in Yokohama, near Tokyo, opening Saturday.Japan is eager to catch up with neighboring Asian rival China, which has a big head start in courting Africa, investing heavily in infrastructure projects.Prime Minister Shinzo Abe, who took office late last year, is bullish about investing in and exporting to Africa."What Africa needs now is private sector investment," he said in his opening speech, in between meetings with officials from African nations, including Zimbabwe, Ghana, Sudan and Kenya."If we recognize this as a new reality, then it will be necessary to revolutionize the way of providing assistance to Africa," he said.Among other measures, Tokyo will invite 1,000 people from Africa to study and work as interns at Japanese companies, according to the Foreign Ministry.Japan will also provide 650 billion yen ($6.5 billion) in assistance for infrastructure projects, including support for transportation in cities, it said. Aid for education, farming, energy projects and water sanitation is also being offered."Africa could be the next global growth pole," said Ethiopian Prime Minister Hailemariam Desalegn.Japan's conference for Africa, held every five years, began in 1993, and the latest is the fifth such gathering. Japanese companies have set up booths, to showcase their efforts to win business in Africa, such as Nissin Foods, the maker of Cup Noodles.U.N. Secretary-General Ban Ki-moon took part in the conference and urged the world to do more to ensure security in the region, noting the value of investing in Africa is now clear."But millions of Africans still lack jobs, health care and food. Too many suffer in conflict. To find solutions, we must address the links between peace, security and government," he said.
TOKYO — The president of Japan's Kyodo News agency has announced he will resign next month over inappropriate behavior by the company's former head of personnel toward a female job applicant.Satoshi Ishikawa, 68, said Thursday he will step down to take responsibility for "creating confusion" over the incident, said Shoji Mitsuchi, deputy managing director.A top deputy, Senior Executive Director Shuichi Ito, 60, will also resign. The resignations will be formalized during a June 20 regular general meeting of Kyodo's members, who are expected to select Ishikawa's successor.Kyodo's former head of personnel, Satoru Kondo, 51, was fired on May 20 after the company discovered he had helped a female university student on her application essay and went out drinking with her at a traditional Japanese bar in December, Mitsuchi said.Ishikawa became president in 2005, while Ito assumed his post last June.Founded in 1945, Kyodo News has a staff of 1,600, including 1,000 journalists, with bureaus throughout Japan and in 36 countries around the world.
HISANOHAMA, Japan — Dozens of crabs, three small sharks and scores of fish thump on the slippery deck of the fishing boat True Prosperity as captain Shohei Yaoita lands his latest haul, another catch headed not for the dinner table but for radioactive testing.Japan's government banned commercial fishing in this area, some 200 km (125 miles) northeast of Tokyo, after a devastating 2011 tsunami and the reactor meltdowns and explosions that followed at the nearby Fukushima Dai-ichi nuclear plant.The plant's operator, Tokyo Electric Power Co, or Tepco, has battled since then to keep radioactive water used to cool the crippled reactor from leaking into the ground and the sea.The walls of a once-bustling fish market that sold Yaoita's catch of flounder, rockfish, greenling and other sealife in the port of Hisanohama, about 20 km (12 miles) south of the ruined plant, remain in ruins.The fishermen of Hisanohama, forced out of work by the disaster, have had no choice but to take the only job available - checking contamination levels in fish just offshore from the destroyed nuclear reactor buildings."We used to be so proud of our fish. They were famous across Japan and we made a decent living out of them," said 80-year-old Yaoita, who survived the tsunami by taking on the waves and sailing the six-person True Prosperity out to sea."Now the only thing for us is sampling."Shoulders stooped from years of hard work, Yaoita is happy to be back pulling fish out of a 300-metre (330 yards) net. Like many younger fishermen, he's unsure how long he can stay at it.The fishermen and Tepco are in dispute over the utility's plans to dump 100 tons of groundwater a day from the devastated plant into the sea. The complicated clean-up plan for Fukushima could take 30 years or more.Tepco's challenge is what to do with the contaminated water that has been pooling at the plant at a rate of 400 tons a day - enough to fill an Olympic-size swimming pool in a week.So far it has been racing to build tanks to store the contaminated water on the grounds of the plant, in which all the water is kept at the moment.It has also asked fishermen to support a plan to build a "by-pass" that would dump groundwater into the sea before it becomes contaminated by flowing under the reactor's wreckage."We are staunchly against it," said Tatsuo Niitsuma, 71, who fishes with Yaoita.Representatives from fishing cooperatives met Tepco officials on Thursday to discuss the proposal, with Trade Minister Toshimitsu Motegi to instruct Tepco on what to do, although no final plans were announced.In addition to the "by-pass" Motegi, who also holds the energy portfolio, told Tepco to create "protective walls" in the ground by freezing the soil around the reactors to create an underground barrier to stop groundwater from flowing in and mixing with contaminated water inside the reactor building.The fishermen, however, worry the "by-pass" plan risks more contamination and delays, possibly ending any hope for the only job they know.Tepco officials have said it may take as long as four years to fix the problem, but have said they do not need outside help.The uncertainty and stress have become problems. Many former fishermen live in temporary homes next to people they barely know after losing not only their jobs, but also family members.Waves as high as 40 meters wrought havoc across several hundred kilometers of Japan's northeastern coast, damaging ports handling 7 percent of the country's industrial output, some 28,500 ships and 319 small fishing communities like Hisanohama.The total cost of damage to the fishing industry is estimated at around 1.26 trillion yen ($12.49 billion).About 40 Hisanohama fishermen survived the disaster. They could make a few thousand dollars a month each with good catches, but instead get by on handouts for tsunami survivors."For many middle-aged men, their work meant everything, so now they find it hard to mingle with others, cut themselves off and start drinking," said Hideo Hasegawa, who runs a support center in a 3,000-strong temporary housing settlement.The fishermen's opposition to Tepco's plans underlines deep distrust across radiation-contaminated areas towards Tepco and the government after their uncertain response to the disaster, and a lack of clear information about radiation risks since."They say it's safe, but they had always told us that the nuclear power is safe too - and just look what a mess we've gotten ourselves into because of that," Yaoita said.Many fish caught in the area test below Japan's limits on radiation, a figure of 100 Bequerels per kilogram of Caesium-137 and Caesium-134, according to the Japanese government. However, crews say fish that live near the sea-floor, such as cod, halibut or sole, often test for excessive levels of radiation.A large crab caught by Yaoita before the disaster could fetch as much as $30 on the Hisanohama market. A kilogram of flatfish could sell for about the same. Once he could catch dozens of both and many other fish on a single morning outing."The nuclear disaster destroyed our livelihoods and now we are like beggars," said Yaoita."Previously I never went to see the doctor. Now it feels like I down more drugs and medicine than actual food."
TOKYO — Japan inched closer to the end of deflation and factory output picked up, government data showed Friday, offering proof that the real economy is slowly catching up to the high expectations set by its recent bold economic policies.Industrial production rose by a better-than-expected 1.7 percent in April from a month earlier, as exports started to recover on the back of a yen that has weakened by almost 20 percent in the last six months. But exports were still down 2.3 percent from the same month a year earlier.Core consumer prices, which exclude fresh food, fell 0.4 percent in April from a year earlier, for the sixth straight month of declines, though the clip was slower than the 0.5 percent decline in the year to March.Prices were supported partly by rising energy costs, as the weak yen added to Japan's fuel import bills.Consumer prices in Tokyo for the month of May rose 0.1 percent from a year earlier, the first increase in more than four years, a sign that nationwide prices could soon follow suit, ending the deflation that has long weighed on Japan's economy.Household spending cooled slightly after a strong showing in the first quarter, rising 1.5 percent in April from a year earlier in price-adjusted real terms. That uptick fell short of a median market forecast of 3.1 percent, though economists still expect spending to gain traction as consumer sentiment continues to improve.The data offered a reprieve to recent market anxiety. A rally in the Japanese stock market, propelled by optimism over Prime Minister Shinzo Abe's efforts to overhaul the long-suffering economy, has faltered in the last week as investors became nervous over the effectiveness of those efforts, as well as their potential side effects.A 5.2 percent slide in Tokyo shares on Thursday took the Nikkei 225-share index to more than 13 percent below its peak last week. The sharp market correction followed a surge of more than 80 percent in the index from mid-November to mid-May, when trading suddenly turned volatile as investors took stock of the challenges that face Mr. Abe's economic turnaround program.Tokyo shares rebounded on Friday morning, with the Nikkei index jumping over 200 points, or 1.59 percent, in the opening minutes of trade.Still, it remains unclear whether Mr. Abe's agenda, nicknamed Abenomics, can bring about a goal, set by the Bank of Japan, to achieve 2 percent inflation over the next two years in a country where prices have fallen for over a decade.To jolt Japan out of its deflationary slump, the central bank unleashed an audacious stimulus program last month, promising to inject $1.4 trillion into the economy to kick-start growth. In addition, the government bolstered spending on public works projects. The stimulus has also driven the yen to a 4 1/2-year low against the dollar, a boon to Japan's exporters.But many economists have called the two-year time frame ambitious. A recent Reuters poll of analysts suggested that the Bank of Japan might have to pursue its program for up to five years before it stokes enough inflation.Some members of the Bank of Japan's policy board are also skeptical of the two-year time frame, according to minutes released this week.A spike in long-term interest rates, which poses high risks for Japan's highly indebted government, has added to the worries.Analysts and investors are also eager for progress on promised structural overhauls, which many see as crucial to the overall economy-lifting efforts of Mr. Abe's government."The falling share prices point to the dangers that are inherent in Abenomics," Ryutaro Kono, chief economist for Japan at BNP Paribas, said in a research note.The program "at first triggered an asset bubble and brought about an economic euphoria," Mr. Kono said. "But the endgame is a higher risk of financial ruin."Other analysts took a brighter view. "A lot of investors were sitting on the sidelines as the market soared, hoping for a pullback," Nicholas Smith, Japan strategist at CLSA Asia-Pacific Markets, said in a note to clients Friday. "They now have that opportunity."
TOKYO — Vending machines stocked with sodas are ubiquitous here, tucked away, it seems, in every nook and cranny of the country. They are found along Omotesando, the tree-lined shopping avenue known as the Champs-Élysées of Tokyo, and their glow lights up the back streets of hot spring towns like Hakone. They are even atop Mount Fuji, Japan's 12,000-foot, snow-capped mountain.The vending machines are also a symbol of the country's big economic problem: deflation. The price of a soda in a vending machine has stubbornly remained the same for 15 years. Now, as back then, a can of Georgia Coffee, Pocari Sweat sports drink or Kirin Lemon soda typically sells for 120 yen, roughly $1.20. Some discount machines sell cans for as little as 80 yen, less than the price they fetched in the 1980s.Since taking office in December, Prime Minister Shinzo Abe has made fighting deflation a priority, pumping the Japanese economy with cheap money and bolstering public spending in a bid to kick-start growth.Such moves have helped stoke the prices of luxury goods like Ferraris, golf club memberships, prime real estate and vintage wines. But so far, the government's efforts have not had much effect on everyday items, like a can of soda.Despite the rising cost of raw materials and energy, beverage companies cannot easily raise prices without risking profits. Competition is fierce and consumers remain reluctant to spend."If we raised prices first in this cutthroat market, we'd be finished," said Shigeo Katagiri, who runs the Japan Machine Service, a company that sells canned drinks for 80 yen at about 300 vending machines across Tokyo.It's a dynamic that's playing out in retail, consumer electronics and other industries — and one of Mr. Abe's biggest obstacles in his efforts to fight deflation.In theory, Mr. Abe's economic plan makes sense. More money circulating in the economy should lead to higher prices, and help generate a positive cycle of more investment, profits, wages, spending and growth. It also weakens the yen, which helps exporters sell more goods overseas and raises the price of imports. The prices of Apple iPads, for example, have jumped.While the early signs are encouraging, it remains to be seen whether such efforts are sustainable and his goals are achievable. Some economists doubt that he can really meet his target of 2 percent inflation in two years. It's an unspectacular rate for most countries, but a tall order for Japan. So far, the rally in Japan's stock market has not significantly rubbed off on wages or wealth in a country where just 15 percent of households hold shares, according to a recent Bank of Japan survey. And despite the rising economic sentiment, consumers remain thrifty; the government reported on Friday that consumer spending had cooled."Income is still rising only for just a limited number of people," said Kenichi Hirayama, chief fund manager at Tokio Marine Asset Management.In many ways, the evolution of vending machines represents the country's promise and its problems.In the 1960s, as Japan's postwar economy boomed and income rose, Coca-Cola brought the first vending machines to the country, selling cans for about 50 yen. In 1973, the Japanese upstart Pokka developed the first vending machine to sell hot drinks.After that, the price of a can jumped 10 yen each for three consecutive years, as surging oil prices caused inflation. By 1983, cans were selling for 100 yen, and by 1998, they went for 120 yen.Then Japan's economy burst, and the country fell into deflation and economic stagnation. Most drink companies did not lower prices, preferring instead to live with lower profits as consumers cut back on spending. But a flurry of third-party vending machine operators, like Mr. Katagiri's Japan Machine Service, started to source soda on the cheap and sell cans for less than the manufacturer's suggested price.By the mid-2000s, even the discount drinks market had become saturated. The beverage market research and consulting company Inryou Souken estimates that about 30 percent of vending machines in Tokyo currently sell cans for less than 120 yen.Today, some 3.8 million vending machines line Japan's streets, or about 1 for every 33 people, according to the Japan Vending Machine Manufacturers Association. About two-thirds of the machines sell drinks, and are maintained by the drink makers, or third-party sellers. (The rest sell items as varied as bananas and stationery.)With more than a dozen national drink makers and countless sellers, crippling rivalries and razor-thin profits have become the norm of doing business.
TOKYO — A sensor problem was found Sunday in one of the exchanged batteries for a Japan Airlines Boeing 787 jet but did not pose a safety risk, a Japanese broadcaster reported. The Boeing Co. jets had been grounded for four months until their safety could be reconfirmed.The problem emerged in a sensor that detects overheating in the modified version of the lithium-ion batteries used in the aircraft, NHK TV said. The batteries were encased to prevent overheating from spreading.JAL offices were closed for the weekend, and officials were not immediately available for comment."Dreamliner" batteries overheated on planes that were in flight in Japan and parked in a Boston airport. The jets resumed commercial flights last month at JAL and All Nippon Airways.
YOKOHAMA, Japan — Japan on Sunday announced a plan to provide 100 billion yen ($1 billion) in aid over the next five years to northern Africa for economic development and humanitarian efforts, including help with security and counter-terrorism measures.Prime Minister Shinzo Abe announced the assistance in a speech at a conference in Yokohama, near Tokyo, where officials from 50 African nations have gathered to talk about trade, growth and other issues.The $1 billion is part of the 3.2 trillion yen ($32 billion) in government and private-sector aid announced Saturday.Japan is eager to court Africa, which is rich in resources and is growing as a market, after having fallen behind Asian rival China in trade with and infrastructure projects in Africa.The three-day conference, which ends Monday, has been held every five years since 1993.
(Reuters) - Japan became the first side to qualify for the World Cup finals in Brazil when playmaker Keisuke Honda scored an injury-time penalty to claim a 1-1 draw with Australia in a dramatic finale in Saitama on Tuesday.The Blue Samurai dominated for most of the match but failed to convert that pressure into goals and Australia winger Tommy Oar looked to have made them pay when his 81st minute cross from the left looped over Japanese goalkeeper Eiji Kawashima, who flapped and failed to clear.But the Japanese were not to be denied and they poured forward with the equalizer inevitably coming via Honda, who only arrived in Japan on Monday after helping CSKA Moscow to the Russian Cup on Saturday.His cross was handled in the area by full back Matt McKay in stoppage time and the bleach blond attacker stepped up to leather the spot kick straight down the middle past Mark Schwarzer to send the crowd into raptures."It's a shame we could not get a win but I am glad we have sealed qualification for the World Cup," Honda was quoted as saying by Kyodo."It was a little bit unfortunate that we went behind and there was not a lot of time left. But I spoke to Shinji (Kagawa) and we said we should keep forcing it and try to create space."Lucky for us we were able to get a penalty and I was able to put it away."The result moved leaders Japan on to 14 points from seven matches in Asian qualifying Group B, meaning they are assured of top spot and reaching the 2014 finals with a game to spare.Japan lie five ahead of Oman - who beat Iraq 1-0 in Muscat - and seven ahead of Australia, who moved above Jordan on goal difference with both sides having played a game less.Japan finish their campaign against bottom side Iraq on Tuesday before they take on hosts Brazil in the Confederations Cup on June 15 with full back Yuto Nagatomo eyeing a bigger prize in South America."Keisuke showed how mentally strong he was today and I never doubted (he would score)," said the Inter Milan defender."I'm pleased but the real aim for all of us is to win the World Cup and this is just one step of that journey."Japan missed their first opportunity to qualify for the finals in March when they slumped to a shock 2-1 loss away to Jordan and they were roared on by 62,172 fans at the Saitama Stadium desperate for their side not to waste a second chance.Honda, back in the side after a thigh injury, and Kagawa caused the visitors all sorts of problems in the opening stages as Japan threatened to cut loose.The Socceroos recalled veteran defender Sasa Ognenovski to partner experienced captain Lucas Neill in the centre of defense and the duo sat very deep, inviting Japanese pressure.Honda, Kagawa and Yasuhito Endo all were close to scoring in the first 20 minutes but Ryoichi Maeda was quiet in attack as Japan's lack of a world class striker was evident again.The second half continued in the same fashion as Kagawa clipped the crossbar in the 60th minute and Nagatomo wasted a good break with a tame effort in the 80th minute from the left.The Socceroos made them pay for their wastefulness when Oar was the beneficiary of another error by Kawashima but Honda came to the rescue with a late equalizer that means they will take part in a fifth consecutive finals."I'm just relieved and happy," said Kawashima."It's a pity we conceded a goal like that but it happens in World Cup qualifying games like this. I'm just really happy that the team made it today at home in Japan."The result aided Australia's hopes of taking the other qualifying spot in the group, with the top two in Group A also reaching Brazil directly, but Socceroos coach Holger Osieck was slightly disappointed not to have snatched a smash and grab win."Before the game a draw would have been good but when you are that close ... of course a draw is a little bit disappointing," Osieck told Fox Sports.
TOKYO — Takafumi Horie, the Japanese dot.com celebrity imprisoned for nearly two years on securities fraud charges, is cooking up dozens of ventures and demanding the nation reduce regulation to give more opportunities to young entrepreneurs."It was as though I was set back 10 years," the founder and former chief executive of Internet service provider Livedoor said Wednesday when recalling his imprisonment.Before his 2006 arrest, his lavish lifestyle had drawn media attention, and he was known as "Horiemon" for his resemblance to a pudgy cartoon character. He went to prison in 2011 after an unsuccessful appeal of his 2007 conviction. He is out on parole since March, with nine months left of his term.Horie, now about 30 kilograms (66 pounds) lighter after 21 months in prison, told reporters that the Japanese government should stop getting in the way of entrepreneurs.Japan under Prime Minister Shinzo Abe has embarked on an ambitious attempt to break its economy out of two decades of stagnation. So far, though, the government has done little to encourage entrepreneurs and risk taking.Horie, 40, has already announced several new business plans, including most recently a social media app "7gogo," a celebrity group-talk platform similar to Google's Hangout services, except subscribers monitor conversations among famous people.He also plans to work on his past ideas, such as his rocket tourism project, which commercializes space travel for regular people, he said at the Foreign Correspondents' Club in Tokyo.He praised the recent growth of crowdsourcing and social media as ways young people's businesses could be nurtured.Horie also had praise for Osaka Mayor Toru Hashimoto, who recently attracted a storm of criticism for defending Japan's "comfort women" system in which women from South Korea, Japan and other Asian nations were forced to work as sex slaves for the Japanese military before and during World War II.Horie said Hashimoto is an advocate of smaller government and he supports Hashimoto's prime ministerial ambitions, which have now dimmed because of the comfort women comments."The best thing the government can do is to not get in the way," said Horie.
TOKYO — The operator of the wrecked Fukushima nuclear plant said it had found another leak of contaminated water on Wednesday, piling pressure on the utility to curb the problem as it seeks permission to release water to the sea.The Fukushima Daiichi Nuclear Power plant was hit by a 9.0 magnitude earthquake and tsunami more than two years ago, triggering nuclear reactor meltdowns and explosions.Tokyo Electric Power, or Tepco, said a worker patrolling the area spotted the leak just after noon, with droplets of contaminated water leaking out between the tank's circular steel structure.Shunichi Tanaka, chief of Japan's new nuclear regulator, set up after its predecessor was discredited in the 2011 disaster, told a news conference that Tepco should deal with the problem immediately. But he said the regulator did not regard the matter as serious.The latest leak was acknowledged after Tepco said earlier this week it had detected radioactive cesium in groundwater flowing into the plant -- overturning an early finding that contamination was negligible.A spate of similar incidents and power outages plagued the facility in March and April. The incidents represent another setback for the company as it tries to reassure the public and the government that it can manage the problem of tainted water.The plant's still precarious state also serves as a reminder of the poor management of the worst nuclear accident since Chernobyl in 1986 as Prime Minister Shinzo Abe's government presses ahead with a drive to export Japan's nuclear technology.The discovery that groundwater is being contaminated before it enters the damaged reactor buildings complicates efforts to persuade local authorities and fishermen that the groundwater is safe enough to be dumped into the ocean.About 400 metric tons (441 tons) of groundwater flow daily into the reactor buildings only to be mixed with highly contaminated water that comes from cooling the melted fuel.The government ordered Tepco last week to increase storage capacity of water tanks and construct a wall of frozen earth around the four reactor buildings to stem the flow of groundwater seeping into the plant.Leaks were found in underground storage pits in April, prompting Tepco to speed up the construction of sturdier above-ground tanks. The leak discovered on Wednesday was from one of the sturdier tanks.Tepco is also trying to construct a bypass that would route the water away from the plant and into the ocean. That plan requires the agreement of fishermen who oppose plans to dump 100 metric tons of groundwater a day from the plant into the sea.
(Reuters) - After experiencing the atmosphere that "sucked the ball into the net" in Saitama, Australia captain Lucas Neill has demanded local crowds emulate their Japanese counterparts at the Socceroos' final two World Cup qualifiers at home.Japan became the first team to qualify for the 2014 World Cup finals in Brazil on Tuesday courtesy of a 1-1 draw after Keisuke Honda converted an injury-time penalty to clinch one of the two automatic qualifying spots from Group B."That crowd helped them keep going," Neill said of the 62,000 passionate home fans at Saitama Stadium on Saturday."I think they proverbially sucked the ball into the net tonight to get them to the World Cup."I think we need the same. You get the noise, the colour and everybody willing the team on it makes a big difference and we have players who thrive on that."We need the Australian supporters behind us. We all want to go to Brazil and the supporters need to play their part."The draw against Japan moved Australia to seven points, two points behind second-placed Oman and with a game in hand.The Socceroos' hopes of qualifying for a third successive World Cup remain in their hands, but their campaign has stuttered in the final phase in Asia with four draws.Despite taking a valuable point from Saitama, Australia were disappointed not to take three after Tommy Oar put them ahead in the 81st minute."Before the game you will take the point. But as the game panned out I felt we deserved all three," Neill said."It's a bitter pill to swallow because (the penalty) happened in the last minute and it's a penalty and they didn't really trouble us in the second half."We felt we could have spoiled the party and three points is probably what we deserved."The Socceroos host Jordan, who beat a New Zealand 'A' team 1-0 in Auckland in a warm-up on Tuesday, in Melbourne on June 11 and Neill said the game could ultimately determine their World Cup future."The Jordan game is a must-win, or must-not-lose and ... we will know exactly what we need to do to get to Brazil," Neill added.The Socceroos' final World Cup qualifier is against bottom-placed Iraq (five points) on June 18 in Sydney.The team that finishes third in the five-team group can still qualify for Brazil, but must win a two-legged playoff against the equivalent finisher in Group A before another playoff against the fifth-placed team in South America.
IOTO, Japan — Iwo Jima is a training site like no other. The rugged volcanic crag was one of the most iconic battlegrounds of World War II, and is so isolated and barren it has almost never been inhabited by anyone other than military troops. But from the perspective of U.S. Navy fighter pilots who regularly train on the island's one functioning airstrip, it is unique in another way.If a plane finds itself in serious trouble and for some reason that lone airstrip on the island isn't viable, the only alternative is to eject and ditch in the Pacific. It's a problem that the U.S. Navy, which is now conducting training on the island to prepare pilots for deployment to the USS George Washington aircraft carrier, has been trying to fix for nearly 25 years.But, so far, Japan has failed to find a more suitable site.Briefing reporters on the tiny island Friday, Capt. Dennis Mikeska, the assistant chief of staff for operations, planning and operations for the U.S. Naval Forces, Japan, said Iwo Jima is the only place in the world where the Navy conducts crucial carrier landing practice without an emergency "divert" — an alternate location where a plane can go in an emergency.He said the Navy hasn't lost a plane on Iwo Jima yet, but added, "That's not to say there haven't been any close calls."Mikeska was quick to note that although the site is not so critically dangerous as to be unusable, it does not meet Navy safety standards and must be replaced as soon as possible.Japan is responsible for providing locations for all U.S. bases within Japanese territory that both countries agree are necessary. The Navy's plea has run up against the classic dilemma that faces all U.S. forces in Japan. Though the Japanese government is one of Washington's staunchest and most reliable allies, it is virtually impossible to find a city, town or village that will quietly accept having U.S. troops based near it.The not-in-my-backyard problem is most intense on the island of Okinawa, where about half of the 50,000 U.S. troops in Japan are based. Plans to simply deploy the Marine Corps' new transport aircraft, the MV-22 Osprey, have sent tens of thousands of Okinawans to the streets in protest.This week, the mere suggestion by the mayor of Japan's second-largest city that the U.S. should use a small suburban airfield there was met with an immediate outcry, and has become a national debate.For the Japanese leadership — who are rarely willing to risk such controversy — Iwo Jima is the perfect place to put the noisy U.S. fighters.Now officially called Ioto in Japan, the island is inhabited full time only by a few hundred Japanese troops. It is about 750 miles (1,200 kilometers) south of Naval Air Facility Atsugi, the base on Japan's main island where the George Washington aircraft carrier's air wing — the units that train on Iwo Jima — is stationed when not at sea.Local anger over the noise and dangers of a crash are what drove the wing to Iwo Jima to begin with.With little other choice, the Navy has been using the Iwo Jima facility for carrier landing practice since 1989, when the two governments agreed to move such operations there "on an interim basis" in response to the noise complaints, and costly lawsuits, from Atsugi residents.Carrier-based fighter pilots need to train intensely and are required to take qualification tests before deploying to sea. The strip on Iwo Jima has a mock-up of an aircraft carrier's deck. Veteran pilots stand nearby as the fighters approach, both to guide them in and to grade each landing.Iwo Jima has its advantages. Because there is no local population to worry about, fighters can fly at low altitudes and at all hours of the night. But according to the Navy, the nearest place a pilot can "divert," or make an emergency landing, is 600 miles (960 kilometers) away, or about six times farther than the 100 miles (160 kilometers) that is considered safe."We need a special waiver every time we train out there," said Jon Nylander, a spokesman for the U.S. Navy in Japan. "Moving it is a high priority for us."Tokyo has acknowledged Iwo Jima is only a temporary solution.Japan has suggested the Iwo Jima flight training be conducted on Mageshima, an island in Japan's southwest where Tokyo plans to build a military base to bolster its southern defenses and its preparedness for natural disasters. Mageshima was officially named a candidate in 2004 in a meeting between the U.S. and Japanese foreign and defense ministers.Mageshima would provide access to alternative landing sites, and would also be closer to the home base of the air wing when it moves to Iwakuni, about 250 miles (400 kilometers) away. That move was scheduled for 2014, but has also stalled.No progress has been announced on moving to that island, however.Mikeska said Mageshima is still officially a candidate site, but no firm plans have been agreed upon.
TOKYO — French President Francois Hollande called Friday for the release of two French journalists missing in Syria, saying their lives were at risk.Hollande, who is visiting Tokyo on a state visit, told reporters he could not give details about the two."Their lives are at risk, so I cannot say anything more," he said. "I want them released as soon as possible."The French radio broadcaster Europe 1 said in a statement on its website that it was unable to get in touch with reporter Didier François and photographer Edouard Elias, who had been headed from the Turkish-Syrian border for Aleppo. Europe 1 said it was keeping in touch with French authorities in an effort to gain more information.Hollande said it is essential that media be able to travel throughout Syria to help keep the world informed about the worsening humanitarian situation in the country, where civil war has killed tens of thousands of people.He and Japanese Prime Minister Shinzo Abe pledged to work together to resolve the Syrian crisis.Both urged a political resolution to the strife."Syria's future must be decided by the Syrian people," Abe said, pledging to increase humanitarian assistance for victims of the war.The 27-nation European Union has imposed punitive measures on the regime of Syrian President Bashar Assad and, led by France and Britain, has begun to open the way to start sending arms to moderate opposition forces.
TOKYO — Japan and France agreed Friday to deepen their cooperation on nuclear technology and to discuss joint development of military equipment, vowing to raise the tenor of their partnership.Visiting French President Francois Hollande and Japanese Prime Minister Shinzo Abe issued a joint statement pledging to prevent nuclear proliferation while raising safety standards for nuclear energy.The two sides also agreed to establish a regular dialogue between their foreign ministers and defense ministers, discussions that would include possible cooperation in developing and managing exports of defense equipment. Japan has similar arrangements with the United States and Britain."This visit had a new ambience," Hollande said after summit talks with Abe, pointing to closer security and political ties as evidence the two sides are taking relations to "a new level."Japan has expressed concern over French exports to China of equipment that potentially might have military uses, including the sale last year of equipment used to help helicopters land on ships. Providing China with such a capability alarms Tokyo given its tensions with Beijing over disputed islands in the East China Sea.Hollande said he reiterated France's insistence that the helicopters were not intended for military use. Asked about the strains between Japan and China, which the French president visited just weeks earlier, Hollande urged the two sides to pursue dialogue in resolving their disagreement and to above all observe international law.Japan has been easing its restrictions on its own exports of military equipment, though it is the co-sponsor of a landmark treaty regulating the multibillion-dollar global arms trade, signed earlier this week by more than 65 countries, including France.The pact, which must be ratified by at least 50 countries, requires countries to evaluate whether the weapons being exported could be used to violate international human rights laws or employed by terrorists or organized crime.The two leaders pledged a united front in fighting against proliferation of nuclear technology for non-peaceful means and in combating terrorism.Noting that 2015 will be the 70th anniversary of the atomic bombings on Hiroshima and Nagasaki, Hollande called on North Korea and Iran to abide by their international commitments on nuclear issues."We must all work together to prevent nuclear non-proliferation," he said in an address later to Japan's parliament.The two countries exchanged agreements on various joint projects, including nuclear fuel recycling and tourism promotion.Japan's Mitsubishi Heavy Industries and France's Areva are cooperating on construction of a reactor in Turkey, and Abe is eager to promote further Japanese exports of atomic technology despite the disaster at Fukushima following the March 11, 2011, earthquake and tsunami.Areva signed a series of agreements with Japan Nuclear Fuel Ltd. and ATOX, a company responsible for nuclear decontamination and agreed to cooperate with Japan's used nuclear fuel recycling plant at Rokkasho, Japan.Mitsubishi Heavy Industries and the European space consortium Arianespace signed a preliminary agreement on rocket services.Hollande praised Abe, meanwhile, for his efforts to end a long spell of deflation and revive Japan's stagnant economy."This is good news for us," he said. "If Japan succeeds, then France and Europe as a whole will benefit.""We have been in an unending crisis for far too long," he said. "First of all, we need to create a climate of confidence."France's annual exports to Japan total around 7.5 billion euros ($9.8 billion), while its imports are just over 9 billion euros. Both rank 11th as respective trade partners.The two sides also agreed to push ahead with talks on a free trade agreement between Japan and the EU and to cooperate on climate change, Syria and other world issues.Hollande said France was determined to pursue much closer economic ties between Asia and Europe.But in an apparent swipe at those who have been urging France and other European nations to abandon painful austerity programs in following Japan's example of aggressive government spending and monetary policy, he said: "The conditions are different.""Each deciding what is best for their own country is what we must do," Hollande said.
TOKYO — The Japanese government responded cautiously Friday to a spike in the yen, with top officials expressing concern about the violence of the move but no overt worries about the level of the recently weakening currency.The yen made its biggest one-day gain against the dollar in three years in overnight trading, underscoring the fragility of the early benefits from Prime Minister Shinzo Abe's aggressive policies for ending deflation.The currency shifted from 99.29 to the dollar to 96.61 within the space of a few hours before reversing somewhat. On Friday evening in Asia, the yen strengthened further to 95.77.The market moves reflect a global decline of the U.S. currency rather than any Japanese factors lifting the yen. Moreover, the yen remains at levels that Japanese companies have indicated they are comfortable with."We are watching these moves, but this is not about intervention, and I don't think we have to respond immediately," Finance Minister Taro Aso said after the dollar slumped to a seven-week low of ¥95.90 yen. "The moves in the market are rough."The U.S. currency, which had hit a four-year extreme of ¥103.74 last month, was being battered as investors unwound long dollar positions before the U.S. jobs report Friday, which was being closely watched to gauge the health of the U.S. economy.The yen's jump pushed Tokyo shares into bear territory for a time, with the Nikkei 225-share average slipping more than 20 percent below its late-May high. The index finished the day 0.2 percent lower, or 17 down from the peak.
TOKYO — Stock markets were mostly lower in early Asian trading on Tuesday, as investors awaited the outcome of a policy meeting by Japan's central bank, and Chinese markets remained closed for a national holiday.Japan's Nikkei stock index was almost unchanged, slipping marginally to 13,513.28 a day after the benchmark soared 4.9 percent following an upward revision of first quarter economic growth data for the world's No. 3 economy.The Bank of Japan issued a statement, just before the market's midday break, that called for no major policy changes but reiterated its expectation for a moderate recovery in coming months, noting an improvement in exports and resilient demand in Japan.An overnight decline on Wall Street further weighed on sentiment, while investors in Hong Kong were watching for the reopening of China's markets on Thursday, following the Dragon Boat festival."During the holiday the data from China was not so good. It was below market expectations, so investors are waiting," said Linus Yip, a strategist at First Shanghai Securities.Hong Kong's Hang Seng index was down 0.9 percent at 21,412.15, while Korea's KOSPI slipped 1.1 percent to 1,911.90. Shares were lower in Taiwan, the Philippines, Indonesia and Singapore but rose in Australia.Elsewhere, a decision by the Standard & Poor's ratings agency to raise its outlook Monday for its credit rating on the U.S. government's long-term debt did little to boost spirits, as the Dow Jones industrial average slipped 0.06 percent, or 9.53 points to 15,238.59. The broader S&P 500 index was down 0.03 percent at 1,642.81In Europe, the FTSE 100 index of leading British shares edge down 0.2 percent to 6,400.45 while Germany's DAX rose 0.6 percent to 8.307.69. The CAC-40 in France fell 0.2 percent to 3,864.36.Over recent weeks, investors have grown fearful that the Federal Reserve will reduce the amount of financial assets it buys in the markets — so-called tapering.The prospect of unchanged Fed policy in the near-term, which became more likely last week following the release of strong job numbers, has weighed on the dollar. The euro rose to $1.3274 from $1.3261 late Tuesday in New York. The dollar fell to 98.27 yen from 98.70 yen.Oil prices held steady, with the benchmark rate up 1 cent at $95.78 per barrel in electronic trading on the New York Mercantile Exchange. The contract fell 26 cents to close at $95.77 per barrel on the Nymex on Monday.
At the end of last year, after Alex Rodriguez had been pinch-hit for and benched in the playoffs, speculation raged that he would be traded, cut or somehow removed from the Yankees ' roster. The only problem with any of those possibilities was that no team was willing to take his enormous contract, or so it was thought.It turns out there was at least one, and if Rodriguez had been healthy and was willing to obtain an international work visa, he might be Japan's problem right now.Last November, the Fukuoka SoftBank Hawks reached out to the Yankees through an intermediary and expressed interest in obtaining Rodriguez, according to two baseball officials who were told of the informal inquiry.The Yankees never engaged the Hawks in discussions because they knew it could not work for two obvious reasons. At the time, the Yankees knew that Rodriguez needed extensive hip surgery that would sideline him at least half the season. They would have been obliged to inform the Hawks, and at that point, their interest would almost certainly have crumbled.But even more important, the Yankees knew there was no chance that Rodriguez would agree to the transfer at this point in his career. So the matter was simply dropped. A few weeks later, the Yankees announced that Rodriguez had a torn labrum in his hip and would require surgery and a lengthy rehabilitation.If the Hawks were wondering why they had not heard back before that, they finally had their answer.Brian Cashman, the Yankees' general manager, said he would not comment on the matter, and Itaru Kobayashi, the Hawks' general manager, did not return a telephone call. It is not known whether the matter was brought to Rodriguez's attention.The Yankees would be only too happy if they could get an American team to show similar interest.Going into this season, Rodriguez had $114 million remaining on his contract over the next five years, but he is experiencing a rapid decline in production. Since February, he has been at the center of an investigation into a Miami clinic that has been accused of dispensing performance-enhancing drugs to several professional baseball players.Only Rodriguez's staggering contract was known to the Hawks at the time of their interest. But if ever there were a team willing to make a splash by trying to lure a star of Rodriguez's magnitude to Japan, it would be the Hawks, a team owned by one of the most prominent technology companies in the country.Masayoshi Son, the chief executive of SoftBank, has earned a reputation as a maverick for investing early and enthusiastically in broadband and Internet technology. SoftBank is in the midst of trying to buy a stake in Sprint, a wireless carrier, a bold move by Japanese corporate standards.More than most, SoftBank has tried to innovate to turn a profit. The Hawks are regularly at the top of the attendance standings for their games at the Fukuoka Yafuoku Dome, which the team owns. Through May, the team was averaging almost 31,000 fans a game, the most in the Pacific League.Most parent companies in Japan consider their teams promotional vehicles for their brands, and many are willing to lose tens of millions of dollars a year for the privilege. Managed for many years by Sadaharu Oh, Japan's career home run leader, the team won the Pacific League pennant as recently as 2011.It is unclear, even if Rodriguez was healthy and was willing to play in Japan, if the Hawks' gambit would have worked. There is a long history of older major league stars going to Japan at the ends of their careers and fizzling out. Many Japanese clubs, burned by paying too much for declining stars, have shifted toward younger players and non-Americans, who are cheaper and often hungrier.Rodriguez has been working out in Tampa, Fla., but is still at least several weeks away from returning. He is also facing the possibility of a suspension from Major League Baseball over the Miami clinic investigation. He is not expected to return until at least after the All-Star break, in July.
The number of Chinese students taking the gaokao, the famously stressful exam that determines admission for almost all the country's universities, has fallen slightly for the fifth straight year.The exam, which was held from Friday to Sunday, was taken by 9.12 million students, or 30,000 fewer than last year. The number of test-takers peaked in 2008 at 10.5 million, according to the Ministry of Education.According to the ministry, nearly one million students who were eligible to take the gaokao in 2010 decided against it. Of those students, about one-fifth decided to study abroad instead.The state media have reported on continued problems with cheating. The Global Times reported that Jilin Province would use security checks to bar any metal gadgets or even clothing parts, because of past use of wireless digital devices. — CORINNE DILLONU.K. makes another change to testing with new I-levelsIf the "O" in O-levels — the exams that all British students used to take at age 16 — stood for "ordinary," and the "A" in A-levels, which they take at the end of high school, stands for "advanced," it figures that the "I" in the new I-levels stands for "intermediate."According to a consultation paper by Ofqual, the British exam regulator, the new tests will be phased in starting in the autumn of 2015 and will cover the core subjects of English, mathematics, physics, chemistry, biology, history and geography, The Times of London reported last week.I-levels will replace the General Certificate of Secondary Education, or G.C.S.E., which itself replaced O-levels in 1988. The changes, which will affect England, Wales and Northern Ireland, mark the second attempt by Education Minister Michael Gove to do away with the GCSEs. — D.D. GUTTENPLANJapan to host 1,000 interns and students from AfricaAddressing a delegation of visiting African leaders from 50 countries, Prime Minister Shinzo Abe has announced a plan to invite 1,000 African students to study and intern in Japan.At the fifth meeting of the Tokyo International Conference on African Development, held in Yokohama this month, Mr. Abe said that his government would extend ¥10 billion, or $100 million, over a five-year period to bring African students and trainees to Japan in what is being called the "African Business Education Initiative for Youth." It was unveiled as part of a wider economic aid package. — MIKI TANIKAWAA Singapore law professor convicted of trading grades for sexual favors and gifts from a student has been sentenced to five months in prison. Tey Tsun Hang, a former professor at the National University of Singapore, is expected to appeal the decision.Mr. Tey, 42, who was fired after his conviction and sentenced last week, was found to have had sexual relations with Darinne Ko, 23, and taken gifts that included an iPod and tailored shirts. According to media reports, Mr. Tey denied corrupt intent, saying the student would have obtained similar grades in any case.Chief District Judge Tan Siong Thye said in court that Mr. Tey had used a position of trust and "exploited the vulnerability" of his former student, according to The Straits Times. The judge cited what he said was Mr. Tey's "callousness" when he asked Ms. Ko to abort the pregnancy that resulted from their relationship. — KRISTIANO ANGTEDx's education event to be a first in Asia-PacificTEDxHongKong, a series of talks organized by a nonprofit organization, will hold its first education-themed conference in the Asia-Pacific region in Hong Kong on Saturday, organizers have said.The event, "School's Out," will feature 13 speakers, including Peter Kenny, founder of Branksome Hall Asia, a boarding school in South Korea, and Melissa Lee, founder of the Fairytale Project, a collaborative work with the artist Ai Weiwei. — YENNI KWOKThe University of Mumbai's first attempt to have students preregister online has run into trouble with complaints of the Web site crashing and being overloaded by the demand.Although the site is now functioning, students quoted by the Times of India said they had been unable to complete their online registration last week."We are expecting 200,000 students to preregister," Vinod Malale, a university representative, said by telephone last week. "Every hour, between 4,000 and 5,000 students are continuing to preregister. So with so many students there were some problems and our servers were slightly slow." The university was adding additional bandwidth to meet the demand. — GAYATRI RANGACHARI SHAH
(Reuters) - Basketball great Kobe Bryant, his mother and an auction house have settled a dispute over a proposed sale of some of the Los Angeles Lakers player's memorabilia including jerseys and championship rings, his representatives said on Monday.Ken Goldin, president of Goldin Auctions, said on Monday that six of the disputed items will be sold in an auction that begins June 17 and runs through July 19. Terms of the settlement were not disclosed.The NBA All-Star guard had opposed the auction with a lawsuit that said he had never granted his mother ownership of the property nor the right to auction it. He said he learned of the sale from a press release.A federal judge in May blocked the planned auction of more than 100 items following the dispute between Bryant and his mother, Pamela Bryant, who had submitted them to Goldin Auctions.The items that will be sold include two of Bryant's game-worn high school jerseys, a 1996 Magic's Roundball Classic All Star Medallion and Ribbon, a ring from the 2000 NBA All-Star game and 2000 Laker NBA championship rings issued to Bryant that he gave to his parents."On these six items, we expect them to go for in excess of $500,000," Goldin said in an interview. "It is certainly possible that any one of the three rings or two uniforms could exceed $200,000 on its own."Some 14 other Kobe Bryant-related items from collectors around the world are also included in the auction, which has more than 1,100 items, Goldin said.Bryant's representatives said he would not comment beyond a statement confirming that the dispute had been resolved. Joseph and Pamela Bryant apologized to Goldin Auctions "for their inadvertent involvement" in the dispute and to their son."We apologize for any misunderstanding and unintended pain we may have caused our son and appreciate the financial support that he has provided to us over the years," Joseph and Pamela Bryant said in the statement.Bryant had sought an injunction in California federal court to stop the auction and Goldin filed a lawsuit in federal court in New Jersey seeking to have the sale move forward.Goldin Auctions said in court papers that Bryant's mother had contacted the company in December with an offer to sell the items, and it had wired a $450,000 advance to Bryant's parents.
MELBOURNE — Robbie Kruse grabbed one goal and laid on two others as Australia thrashed Jordan 4-0 on Tuesday to move a step closer to a third successive World Cup finals appearance.The Bayer Leverkusen-bound winger set up midfielder Mark Bresciano and striker Tim Cahill in each half before scoring himself in the 76th minute.Captain Lucas Neill then put the icing on the cake by heading home six minutes from time on a chilly night at Melbourne's Docklands Stadium.The win put Australia second in Asia's Group B qualifying table on 10 points and victory over Iraq in their final match in Sydney next week would seal the second direct berth to Brazil 2014.Japan are already assured of top spot in the group."We played wonderfully tonight but we had a little meeting there and stressed that it's just half the job," the baby-faced Kruse told reporters after terrorising Jordan's defence down the right wing."It's a massive game next week so it's important we prepare and do everything we can to make sure we're feeling good."Jordan, on seven points, will need a home victory over third-placed Oman in their final qualifier and for other results to go their way to keep their hopes of a maiden World Cup appearance alive.Unchanged Australia, riding a wave of confidence after holding Japan to a draw in Saitama last week, pledged to take the game to the cagey Middle Eastern side and were as good as their word as they peppered the goal from start to finish.With former Serie A playmaker Bresciano in outstanding form, Australia went close in the ninth minute when defender Mark Milligan fired the ball over the bar.Goalkeeper Amer Shafi made an excellent save from a Brett Holman effort in the 14th minute although he could do nothing to stop Bresciano tapping the ball in a minute later from two metres out after a right-wing cross from Kruse.Kruse blew a gilt-edged chance for the Socceroos's second goal four minutes later but made amends by setting up Cahill on the hour mark, the New York Bulls striker heading in from close range.The 24-year-old Kruse slammed the door shut on 75th-ranked Jordan by turning the defence inside out after receiving the ball on the edge of the area and beating Shafi at the near post in the 76th minute.Neill scored his first international goal on his 91st appearance for the Socceroos, nodding in from close range to send a 43,000-plus crowd into raptures.Australia coach Holger Osieck had been under pressure after a stuttering campaign in the final phase of Asian qualifying but the German was all smiles after Tuesday's victory."It was a great team effort. We showed great unity ... definitely it will give us a lot of confidence for the last game against Iraq," he said.Jordan will have their fingers crossed that Japan can hold rock bottom Iraq to a draw overnight in Doha and then hope to defeat Oman in order to take third place in the group.That would offer the chance to qualify via a two-legged playoff against the equivalent finisher in Group A before a playoff against the fifth-placed team in South America."I think we had our chances," Jordan coach Adnan Hamad said. "We had problems in defence, that was because of the pressure."
TOKYO — Japan's central bank ended a two-day policy meeting on Tuesday with an upbeat assessment for the world's No. 3 economy and a pledge to persist with its aggressive monetary easing policies aimed at ending years of growth-sapping deflation.The Bank of Japan refrained, however, from taking further action to curb unusual volatility in the market for Japanese government bonds that has raised concern over the potential impact of Prime Minister Shinzo Abe's economic strategies on the country's rising public debt."Japan's economy has been picking up," the central bank said, supported by government and consumer spending.The stronger assessment followed a revision of data to show growth recovered to 4.1 percent in January-March, raising hopes that Prime Minister Shinzo Abe's heavy-spending recovery strategy may be helping end a two-decade-long slump.However, data remain mixed. Data released Tuesday showed machinery orders fell 7.4 percent in May from a year earlier. Orders by domestic companies fell 11.2 percent, while overseas orders dropped 5.7 percent.The central bank's assessment was that corporate fixed investment in factories and equipment "appears to have stopped weakening." A recovery in such investment, and in hiring and wages, would be crucial for a sustained recovery from over two decades of economic stagnation, but most businesses remain wary of sinking more money into Japan at a time when its population is aging and shrinking.To encourage more investment, the government plans to draw up plans for tax reform by the autumn, when it is due to decide whether the recovery is strong enough to endure the blow to demand from sales tax hikes due in 2014 and 2015.The tax increases are needed to cope with a growing public debt that already is more than twice the size of Japan's economy.While Abe's "Abenomics" economic policies have helped boost share prices and raised hopes for a sustained recovery, the central bank remains far from its target of achieving 2 percent inflation within the next two years.Prices have continued to fall despite aggressive efforts to counter deflation by doubling the monetary base, the central bank said, though it added it expects the rate of change in the inflation benchmark to "gradually turn positive."The bank noted, however, a "high degree of uncertainty" for Japan, as well as the U.S., Europe and emerging economies, and lackluster activity in Japanese manufacturing.
TOKYO — Investors raced back into the Japanese stock market Monday after upbeat data helped dispel some recent doubts cast on the government's aggressive pro-growth policies.The Nikkei 225 stock index jumped 636.67 points, or 4.9 percent, to 13,514.20, the biggest single-day gain in point terms in almost five years. The broader Topix index rose 55.02 points, or 5.2 percent, to 1,111.97.Earlier, the government's revision of gross domestic product data showed Japan's economy expanded at a rate of 1.0 percent between January and March, above a preliminary estimate of 0.9 percent, after estimates for corporate capital spending and stronger household spending were raised. That new clip came to 4.1 percent in annualized terms, up from 3.5 percent.Bank lending, which had stubbornly refused to grow despite years of easy money amid companies' weariness over growth prospects, rose a robust 1.8 percent in May from the same month last year. That uptick came as a victory for the Bank of Japan, which has embarked on a bold program to pump the economy with cheap money to get businesses to borrow and invest.Data released Monday also showed Japan's current account surplus doubled in April to ¥750 billion, or nearly $7.6 billion, far above market forecasts of slightly above ¥300 billion, as a weakened yen pushed up returns on overseas investments. Last year, Japan's current-account surplus shrunk to record levels as a strong yen hurt exporters, and an energy shortfall led to a jump in the costs of importing fuel. But a welcome drop in the yen — another consequence of the central bank's loose monetary policies — has eased some of the pressure on the balance of trade.The fresh data came as relief for investors who had become increasingly jittery over Japan's recovery amid signs of an economic slowdown in China, a major trading partner, and speculation that the U.S. Federal Reserve might soon start to scale back its stimulus. Mediocre U.S. jobs numbers released Friday, however, appeared to have eased concerns of a major rollback by the Fed.The latest numbers also provided encouragement for Prime Minister Shinzo Abe and his push to reinvigorate Japan's deflationary economy. The so-called Abenomics initially garnered a euphoric reception by the stock market, and shares surged by 80 percent. But a sudden end to the market rally put the spotlight on skeptics who questioned Mr. Abe's growth plans and voiced concerns over harmful side effects.An additional economic growth plan described by Mr. Abe last week underwhelmed many investors and economists who had hoped for a stronger commitment for structural reforms — for example, to overhaul a rigid, two-tier labor market. Meanwhile, the yen crept higher from its recent declines against the dollar, crossing over the psychologically important level of ¥100 to the dollar last week for the first time since early May.Foremost in investors' minds has been the specter of too fast a rise in long-term interest rates, which could pressure government finances by increasing the costs of servicing Japan's sky-high public debt. Yields on benchmark 10-year government bonds, however, have stabilized following a jump in early May, helping to alleviate those concerns. The Bank of Japan could announce steps to lessen volatility in bond markets at the end of a two-day policy meeting that ends Tuesday. Economists, meanwhile, point out that a rise is inevitable as inflation takes hold in Japan.Now, as investors take more measured stock of opportunities and risks in Japan, its stock market is likely to see a more tempered rise, said Nicholas Smith, Japan strategist at CLSA Asia-Pacific Markets. After the rally Monday, the Nikkei is still down 15 percent from a peak in mid-May, but up 30 percent since the start of the year."Growth from here is likely to be a lot less rapid — almost certainly a good thing for the longevity of the bull run," Mr. Smith said in a note to clients.
OKUMA, Japan — Damaged vehicles, twisted metal and other debris remain strewn about Japan's crippled nuclear power plant. Scores of black and gray pipes and hoses cover the ground, part of the makeshift system to pump water into the damaged reactors to keep them from overheating.Plant chief Takeshi Takahashi told journalists on a plant tour Wednesday that workers have cleaned up much of the debris in their work areas, but that the priorities are keeping the plant stable and working toward shutting it down — a process that operator Tokyo Electric Power Co. estimates will take 40 years."It's a long road, but we will tackle the decommissioning process by paying special attention to safety," he said.TEPCO showed off a massive, nearly completed steel structure designed to help workers extract more than 1,500 fuel rods from a damaged reactor building — Unit 4 — at the center of international concerns over the plant's safety.The potentially risky procedure, expected to begin in November and take about a year, would be the first major step in the decommissioning of the Fukushima Dai-ichi plant, where three reactors melted down after the March 11, 2011, earthquake and tsunami, spewing radiation into the surrounding soil and water and forcing about 160,000 people to evacuate.Concerns have focused on the fuel rods in the cooling pool of Unit 4 because the pool sits atop the damaged building and remains vulnerable to earthquakes. Currently, a jury-rigged system of pipes and hoses pumps water into the fuel pool to keep it cool, as well as into the reactor cores and fuel pools of nearby Units 1, 2 and 3.TEPCO built the 52-meter (170-foot) tall structure next to and partially over the remains of Unit 4, which suffered a hydrogen explosion after the disaster, to safely remove the 1,533 fuel rods. The rods will be transferred to a joint cooling pool inside a nearby lower building.After that project is completed, TEPCO will turn its attention to removing the melted fuel from the reactors of Units 1, 2 and 3. The company still isn't sure exactly where the fuel has fallen inside the reactors because radiation levels remain dangerously high inside the buildings.The Fukushima plant has been hit with a series of problems in recent months, including a rat-induced blackout, adding to concerns about TEPCO's ability to safely shut down the plant.Viewed from a bus that took foreign journalists — decked out in protective hazmat suits, masks and helmets — within about 20 meters (60 feet) of the four reactor buildings, the area closest to the ocean still was cluttered with tsunami debris, including an overturned car on top of a smashed truck.All around the plant, there are reminders of the tsunami. There's a clear dividing line between short and tall vegetation on a hill, marking the height of the 15-meter (50-foot) tsunami that walloped the plant, knocking out power to vital cooling systems. An empty building with blown-out windows stands next to Unit 1, which also had a hydrogen explosionRadiation readings immediately around the plant varied considerably depending on location, ranging from around 50 microsieverts an hour — about the dose of a chest X-ray — to a high of 1.24 millisieverts per hour in front of Unit 3.During the tour, only a small group of photo and video journalists was allowed off the bus at one point near the reactors. TEPCO officials said this was due to heavy construction activity in the area.Another major challenge facing TEPCO is storing water that becomes radioactive as it is used to cool the reactors.TEPCO says about 300,000 tons of water has been stored in about 1,000 tanks around the plant, an amount that will double within a few years. It plans to build more tanks to increase water storage capacity to as much as 800,000 tons by 2016.Some of the contaminated water is groundwater that has poured into reactor basements. The utility has drilled 12 holes nearby to try to suck up the water and lower the water table so that less pours in.
TOKYO — Japanese baseball league officials are being criticized for introducing a new ball this season without notifying players.With close to 60 games already played, Nippon Professional Baseball acknowledged for the first time that a new ball was being used. The new livelier ball has resulted in more home runs."We had an idea something was different this season," Rakuten Eagles catcher Motohiro Shima said Wednesday. "Here we are almost 60 games into the season and now they tell us? It's very unfortunate."NPB had previously denied that this year's increase in home runs had anything to do with changes to the baseball.NPB also instructed the ball's manufacturer, Mizuno Corp., to say no changes were made if anyone asked.NPB said the balls used last season did not meet certain standards and the new ball was introduced to conform to the rules.Before the start of the 2011 season, different balls were used by the Pacific and Central Leagues. In 2011, NPB introduced a uniform ball to meet international standards.
TOKYO — The Bank of Japan held its policy steady on Tuesday, brushing off recent market volatility and standing by an ambitious target to stoke 2 percent inflation in two years, despite skepticism from within its own ranks over how quickly it can lift Japan's economy out of its long deflationary slump.Stock market reaction was swift and negative. In Tokyo, the Nikkei 225 stock index fell almost 200 points, or 1.5 percent, marking another day of turbulent trade. European stocks picked up the pace, with the Euro Stoxx 50 down 2.1 percent in afternoon trading. Wall Street stock indexes opened with a loss of about 1 percent.David Hussey, head of European equities at Manulife Asset Management in London, said the equities drop was the result of concern about the potential end of economic stimulus in general."People are worried that the Fed would taper off quantitative easing," Mr. Hussey said about the United States Federal Reserve board. "It could go wrong if they do it too early, but I think at some point that stimulus will have to come off as the economy is starting its healing process. and that ought to be a good thing."In a unanimous vote at the end of a two-day policy meeting, the Bank of Japan's board decided to stay pat on a policy to grow its base money, or the cash and deposits the bank holds, by between 60 trillion yen and 70 trillion yen a year ($600 billion to $700 billion a year), which in turn increases the funds that flow through the Japanese economy and encourages companies to borrow and invest.The bank also raised its assessment of the Japanese economy, saying Japan's economy was "picking up," a slight improvement over its appraisal last month that the economy was "starting to pick up." The brighter outlook came after revised government data showed Japan's economy grew at a rate of 1.0 percent between January and March, faster than a preliminary estimate of 0.9 percent, due to stronger corporate capital and household spending"Japan's economy is expected to return to a moderate recovery path" thanks to resilient domestic demand and the effects of its aggressive monetary easing program, the bank said in a statement.Since April, the Bank of Japan has embarked on monetary stimulus of an unprecedented scale in a bid to jolt the Japanese economy out of 15 years of deflation, part of a wider economic growth push introduced by Prime Minister Shinzo Abe.Under Haruhiko Kuroda, its new governor, the central bank pledged to double Japan's money supply in two years through aggressive purchases of government bonds and other assets. It also committed to a target to hit 2 percent inflation over the next two years, a goal that some economists say is overly ambitious in a country that has seen prices fall for 15 years.In a sign of faltering confidence, one board member, Takahide Kiuchi, proposed replacing that two-year target with a less ambitious commitment to achieving 2 percent inflation "in the medium to long term." That proposal was voted down by the other eight members on the bank's policy board, according to the bank's statement."It's true that the road to 2 percent will be long," Mr. Kuroda said at a news conference following the decision. To get there, he said, other facets of Prime Minister Abe's economic growth program needed to kick in, bringing about a rebound in jobs, wages and demand. "Once the entire economy enters a positive cycle, we will see prices stabilize at 2 percent," he said, adding that for now, the bank's policy push was "on track."The central bank also held off from introducing measures to keep down Japan's long-term interest rates, a move expected by some economists ahead of the meeting.Yields on benchmark 10-year government bonds spiked in late May as prices of those bonds slumped, causing investor jitters over Japan's ability to keep funding, and servicing, its colossal public debt. Those fears helped end a spectacular rally in the Japanese stock market this year and brought several weeks of volatile trading.One measure floated by economists that might calm investor nerves had been to extend a low-interest loan program that would make it easier for financial institutions to buy government bonds even if interest rates started rising. But that runs counter to the bank's goal of shifting corporate investment out of low-interest bonds to higher-yielding equities and borrowing.Mr. Kuroda said that the board had discussed such measures, but ultimately decided fresh steps were unnecessary for the time being. He has said that the recent rise in long-term interest rates is a healthy reflection of inflation expectations, and does not pose an immediate threat to the Japanese economy.He stressed that the bank has had a measure of success in reducing volatility in bond markets by conducting its bond purchases more frequently, in smaller amounts. He said that the bank would sustain those efforts, and would watch financial markets closely."We continue to be wary of movements in long-term interest rates, especially undesirable spikes in volatility, and will keep up efforts to reduce that volatility," he said. "But the economy is on a solid path to recovery, and I expect financial markets to soon reflect that, and regain composure."
NAHA, Japan — A Japanese man who was the world's oldest living person, and the longest-lived man in recorded history, died Wednesday at the age of 116 at a hospital near the city of Kyoto.Jiroemon Kimura, a retired postal worker who was born in 1897, and who worked before World War II in what was then the Japanese colony of Korea, died of natural causes in the city of Kyotango, local media said. He had been hospitalized for a month for pneumonia and blood-sugar problems, the reports said.In his final years, Mr. Kimura was widely quoted as advising people to "eat light to live longer," attributing his own longevity to consuming only healthy food in moderate portions. Japanese media said he had seven children, 14 grandchildren, 25 great-grandchildren and 15 great-great grandchildren, though they did not say if all were still alive.With Mr. Kimura's death, the title of oldest living person goes to another Japanese, Misao Okawa, a 115-year-old women in the city of Osaka. Japan has the world's longest life expectancies, a fact that Japanese themselves often attribute to a low-fat diet heavy in fish, and also to affordable health care.Like Mr. Kimura, Ms. Okawa, who was born in 1898, is one of the last people who has lived through three different centuries. Both were born while Queen Victoria still reigned in Britain.According to the Guinness World Records, Mr. Kimura became the oldest living man in documented history on Dec. 27, when he surpassed the mark left by a Danish-born American, Christian Mortensen, who died in 1998 at 115 years and 252 days.
TOKYO — The Japanese baseball commissioner apologized on Friday for the confusion caused by introducing a new, livelier ball this season without notifying players.Nippon Professional Baseball commissioner Ryozo Kato held a meeting with representatives of the 12 teams and issued an apology for his handling of the situation."I've caused a lot of trouble for the fans, players and people connected to the game," Kato said. "Baseball is very important in Japan's sporting culture and I have to carefully reflect on my responsibility to the game."Japan's 12 teams agreed to have a third party investigate the issue of why NPB secretly made its baseballs livelier.Kato, a former Japanese ambassador to the United States, indicated he would not resign and vowed to work toward reform within his organization.NPB acknowledged this week for the first time that a new ball was introduced at the start of the season, resulting in a sharp increase in home runs.Many players in Japanese baseball have criticized NPB for a lack of transparency.There were 939 home runs in 2011 and 881 in 2012. This season's tally stood at 512 as of Tuesday, on pace for a season total of 1,297.NPB previously denied this year's increase in home runs had anything to do with changes to the baseball.NPB secretary general Kunio Shimoda said the issue was kept secret in order "to avoid confusion."
BRASILIA, Brazil — Neymar started to live up to the huge expectations of a demanding public only three minutes into the Confederations Cup on Saturday, scoring an early goal to help Brazil beat Japan, 3-0, in the opening match of the tournament.Neymar scored with a firm shot from outside the penalty area, connecting with the ball after Fred controlled a long cross from Marcelo with his chest. The ball bounced only once before Neymar fired it into the top corner.For the next two minutes, most of the 67,432 fans at the National Stadium chanted Neymar's name, relishing the knowledge that their poster boy was starting to deliver for the national team with one year to go before the World Cup.Paulinho added the second goal for Brazil in the 48th minute, deftly controlling a cross from Dani Alves before turning inside and shooting. Japan goalkeeper Eiji Kawashima got his hands to the ball, but it was too powerful for him to stop. Jo scored Brazil's third, latching on to a through ball from Oscar and sliding it past Kawashima in injury time.The win puts Brazil at the top of Group A with three points. Italy and Mexico will play in the other group match on Sunday.Neymar entered Saturday's match facing a minor wave of criticism. He has become something of an idol in Brazil, but a nine-match scoreless streak had heaped pressure on the 21-year-old striker heading into the Confederations Cup. With his hair long on top and short on the sides, Neymar has already started to transcend the game in Brazil, the way David Beckham has nearly everywhere else. His picture is plastered around the country in underwear and phone ads, to name just a few. He has also appeared on Brazilian TV, appearing as himself in one of the country's biggest soap operas.That's just off the field. On it, Neymar has earned himself a massive transfer from the Brazilian club Santos to Barcelona, where he will be teammates with Lionel Messi and a large contingent from Spain's national team next season.The match against Japan was most likely something Neymar was looking forward to. Japan has never beaten Brazil in 10 games, earning only two draws — both at the Confederations Cup, first in 2001 and then again in 2005.The last time they played, in a friendly in Poland in October, Neymar scored twice.
TOKYO — There are many ways to demolish a building, and some of them are spectacular: blowing it up from the inside so it collapses on itself, or smashing it to bits with a two-ton wrecking ball.But here in Tokyo, a cheek-by-jowl city with many outdated high-rises and tough recycling and environmental restrictions, Japanese companies are perfecting what might be called stealth demolition. Some tall buildings are dismantled from the top down, the work hidden by a moving scaffold, others from the bottom up, the entire structure being slowly jacked down.At times the techniques seem to defy gravity, or at least common sense, for although the buildings appear intact, they slowly shrink. The methods, which make for a cleaner and quieter work site, may eventually find favor in New York and other cities as aging skyscrapers become obsolete and the best solution is to take them down and rebuild.The latest Tokyo high-rise to get the stealth treatment is the Akasaka Prince Hotel, a 40-story tower with a distinctive saw-toothed facade overlooking one of the city's bustling commercial districts. Since last fall, its steel and concrete innards have been torn apart, floor by floor, starting near the top, by hydraulic shears and other heavy equipment. The building has been shrinking by about two floors every 10 days; this month it will be gone, to be replaced by two new towers.Hideki Ichihara, a manager with Taisei Corporation, which developed the system being used to tear down the hotel, said the technique had environmental benefits and allowed for more efficient separation of metal, concrete and other recyclable materials. Another advantage is visual: The vanishing building looks normal for as long as possible. "We want people not to really see the demolition work," he said.Mr. Ichihara was speaking in the bowels of the hotel on a late winter day while, about 250 feet above, workers were demolishing two floors, removing the exterior aluminum and glass, cutting up the steel beams and pulverizing the concrete slabs. But none of the work was visible to passers-by — the top four floors were shrouded in a scaffold that hung from the intact roof and was covered in panels that mimicked the facade.When the two floors are gone, the roof and scaffold cap slowly descends, thanks to computer-controlled jacks on each of 15 temporary columns. Then the columns are lowered into new positions, and the workers start taking apart the next two floors.The cap helps keep noise and dust down compared with more conventional methods of demolishing tall buildings, which involve erecting a scaffold all the way up and around the structure but leaving the top exposed. "All the work is inside the covered area," Mr. Ichihara said. "The noise level is 20 decibels lower than the conventional way, and there's 90 percent less dust leaving the area."Aside from the cap, though, the Taisei system is similar to other methods in that the structure is taken apart from the top down. Another Japanese company, Kajima Corporation, has developed a bottom-up approach, cutting a building's steel columns at ground level and jacking the entire structure down as each floor is removed. Since all the demolition work is done on or near the ground, there is no need to place heavy equipment, or workers, at the top of the building."The idea is to keep the building as intact as possible," said Ryo Mizutani, an official with Kajima, which in January finished demolishing a 24-story office tower, the Resona Maruha building, near the Imperial Gardens. Huge hydraulic jacks supported the building's 40 columns, and workers cut 30 inches from each column, over and over, to allow the structure to be slowly lowered.The Resona Maruha building was completed in 1978, the Akasaka Prince tower in 1982. Ordinarily, a building that is 30 or 40 years old should have many years of life left, if properly maintained. The Empire State Building, for example, is 82 and doing just fine after major renovation work.But the Tokyo buildings fell victim to the vagaries of commercial real estate here, where high property values, changing design standards and other factors have conspired to create a bull market for demolition."There are many ways to renovate," said Tsuyoshi Seike, an associate professor at the Institute of Environmental Studies at the University of Tokyo. "But with buildings in the middle of Tokyo, they think it's better to demolish." About a dozen high-rises have been torn down so far, Dr. Seike said.
TOKYO — The police said on Monday that eight people were arrested after fistfights broke out between ultranationalist Japanese shouting anti-Korean slogans and counterprotesters on the streets of Tokyo, where public violence is rare.Among those arrested was Makoto Takada, 41, better known by his pseudonym Makoto Sakurai, the leader of an anti-foreign ultraconservative group that has recently gained attention for staging repeated demonstrations in an ethnically Korean neighborhood. During those marches, members of the group have waved Japanese war flags and shouted slogans like "Kill Korean residents," raising calls for the creation of anti-hate-speech laws.The group is known in Japan as the Zaitokukai, but its full name translates as the Citizens Group That Will Not Forgive Privileges for Koreans in Japan. Claiming 12,000 members, it is the most visible of a new batch of ultranationalist groups known as the Net right because they use the Internet to organize. Though relatively small in size, they have gained public attention in recent years as the virulent side of Japan's anxiety over its declining economic and political position in Asia.The fights, in Tokyo's Shinjuku district, began on Sunday afternoon when about 200 Zaitokukai members, led by Mr. Takada, assembled to stage a demonstration in a Korean neighborhood, Okubo, the police said. The would-be marchers were intercepted by about 350 members of a counterprotest group shouting "Racists go home," the police said.The police said Mr. Takada spit on one of the counterprotesters, identified as Sei Yoshiaki, 46, who in turn knocked off Mr. Takada's glasses. Fights broke out between the two groups, the police said, and Mr. Takada and three other members of his group were arrested, along with four of the counterprotesters.
TOKYO — Days after Kaoru Shimada and other Japanese mothers rallied in Tokyo this year to press for more public daycare, she was shocked to read a local politician's blog blasting their "shameless" demands and asserting kids should be raised at home.Prime Minister Shinzo Abe has vowed to take steps, including expanding daycare, to help mobilize women power as part of his "Abenomics" plan to end economic stagnation and engineer growth in a country beset by an ageing, shrinking population.But that economic imperative is colliding with a conservative worldview, shared by many ruling party politicians as well as top business executives, that sees women's proper place as in the home, not in offices, factories or boardrooms."My first impression was that he was mocking us," said Shimada, a 29-year-old system engineer with a toddler son, referring to the comments by blogster Yutaro Tanaka, a local assembly member from Abe's Liberal Democratic Party (LDP)."He has no idea of the reality," Shimada - who found a daycare spot about a week before she had to resume work in April - told Reuters at a gathering of young parents exchanging information on day care options and related headaches.Opposition lawmakers, experts and even some from Abe's own party say such conservative views are common inside the LDP."Their view of women is basically as tools to boost the birth rate, reduce social security spending and increase growth. Women have a role because they are key to solving these three problems," said Mari Miura, a political science professor at Sophia University in Tokyo."But they have a strong idea of the traditional family as a core ideology of conservatives. That ideology and reasonable solutions do not match, so the policy is always schizophrenic at best."Experts and working women laud Abe's goal of mobilizing women power even as they note the moves are long overdue in a country where female board members account for only about 1 percent of the total and women's employment rate of 60 percent is among the lowest in developed nations.Abe has pledged to eliminate in five years daycare wait-lists - which official data put at 25,000 nationwide and private experts much higher. The plan is to provide fiscal support for non-government facilities and ease regulations to give private operators more scope.He has set a target of having women in 30 percent of leadership posts in all sectors of society by 2020 and also urged Japan Inc to put more women on corporate boards. His initial goal: one woman director per firm."At the end of the day. It's the first administration that I can think of that even mentioned women's participation. So that's a step forward," said Kathy Matsui, chief Japan strategist at Goldman Sachs. She estimates that raising female labor participation rates to the same 80 percent seen for males could boost Japan's GDP by as much as 14 percent."Obviously, this is going up against a tidal wave of potential opposition, but at the end of the day, what other choice do they have?"Critics, however, say parts of Abe's agenda send a different message and would have the opposite effect to his stated goal.Among the moves critics question is Abe's request for firms to increase childcare leave from a maximum of 1 1/2 years to three and an LDP proposal to make private nursery schools, which hold only morning sessions - free for pre-schoolers."They are saying: 'Stay home until the child is three, then put the child in nursery school and take care of him or her yourself in the afternoon,'" said opposition Democratic Party lawmaker Renho, a former TV announcer and mother of teenage twins, who goes by one name."The message is: 'Don't think about working full-time.'"While some women might welcome the prospect of three years' childcare leave, many say the notion is unrealistic given the need for double incomes and the likely damage to careers from a three-year gap. Currently, those taking childcare leave get a government allowance equal to half their salary."Practically speaking, three years would be tough," system engineer Shimada said. "I took off 18 months and there was a gap that made me feel like a rookie employee when I returned."Japanese firm Benesse Corp, where one-third of managerial staff are women, found that a three-year childcare leave program introduced in 1990 had the opposite effect to that intended: fewer female employees returned to their jobs."Some did return and what they said was that it was really difficult to catch up," said a company spokeswoman, Yuko Onizawa. Five years later, Benesse shortened the leave system to one year and has since found that more women return to work.Corporate attitudes also need to change for Abe's pitch to work. Although some major firms are taking diversity policies seriously as one key to boosting profits, business lobby Keidanren is blocking a proposal to require listed firms to disclose their gender statistics."Keidanren is greatly opposed - I think because it would be obvious how few women they have," Yuriko Koike, a former defense minister who heads the LDP's PR department and advocates bolder steps than those favored by many in her party, told Reuters.With public debt already twice Japan's $5 trillion economy, finding government funds to subsidize programs to promote daycare and advance women in the workforce could also be tough.The metropolis of Yokohama near Tokyo last month announced it had eliminated its daycare wait-list - three years ago the worst in the country - through deregulation and bigger spending.Abe has touted Yokohama as a model case others should follow, but the national government and other municipalities may be reluctant to follow through with similar spending rises."It's a kind of 'Silver Democracy' dilemma," said Hiroki Komazaki, founder of non-profit daycare provider Florence who sits on one of Abe's advisory panels."They have to cut spending on the elderly and invest in the future. But young people only vote at half the rate of the elderly."A basic lack of understanding of the issues among many politicians remains, the LDP's Koike says, a big barrier to change.Recalling a session of an LDP panel on policies concerning women, she said, ruefully: "I explained the notion of 'diversity' and one of the men asked me 'Where is that?' He thought we were talking about a place called 'Diver City'."
TOKYO — Japan's nuclear regulator announced an overhaul of the country's nuclear safety guidelines Wednesday, the first since a giant tsunami swept over a nuclear power plant in northeastern Japan two years ago and set off the world's worst nuclear accident since Chernobyl, even as signs of new trouble at the stricken plant underscored the hazardousness of the site's cleanup.Prime Minister Shinzo Abe has been pushing to restart some of Japan's 50 commercial reactors, all but two of which remain idle amid public anxiety over nuclear safety in the wake of the 2011 disaster, when a powerful earthquake and tsunami ravaged the Fukushima Daiichi nuclear power plant. The announcement of the new guidelines starts a process that could allow some of the country's idled reactors to come back online early next year.The new guidelines were announced by the Nuclear Regulation Authority, which was set up last year to replace the previous regulator amid outrage over its lax approach to safety and close industry ties. In the future, nuclear plant operators must bolster their tsunami defenses and check for active earthquake faults under their plants. They must also set up emergency command centers and install filtered vents to help reduce the discharge of harmful radioactive substances from the reactors.These safety standards are legally binding, unlike previous guidelines, which were not backed up by law and were adopted by nuclear operators on a voluntary basis. They also address, for the first time, the possibility of severe accidents like the Fukushima disaster, which set off multiple fuel meltdowns and forced more than 100,000 people from their homes.The regulator faces considerable pressure to reopen idled plants, but the difficult cleanup at Fukushima continues to cast a shadow over Mr. Abe's drive to revive Japan's civilian nuclear program. On Wednesday, the plant's operator, the Tokyo Electric Power Company, said it had detected high levels of radioactive strontium in groundwater at the site.Tokyo Electric said it had found strontium 90 at 30 times Japan's safety limit in groundwater near its No. 2 reactor, one of three at the plant, which suffered meltdowns after its cooling systems were knocked out by the tsunami. The operator has been struggling to store growing amounts of contaminated waste water at the plant, but had denied that the site's groundwater was highly toxic.The latest discovery, made during routine checks at the plant, has raised concerns that water is leaking — possibly into the ocean — from the plant's reactor turbine buildings, whose basements are flooded with radioactive water. If ingested, strontium 90 can linger in bones, emitting radiation inside the body that can lead, in time, to cancer.The Nuclear Regulation Authority said it would start accepting applications on July 8 from power companies seeking to restart their reactors. Seven companies have said they will apply to restart a total of 13 reactors across Japan."We have reached a milestone" in nuclear safety, Shinichi Tanaka, the authority's chairman, said Wednesday. He said the new guidelines brought Japan in line with the highest global safety standards for nuclear energy.It will take "many months" for the authority to conduct the necessary checks and approve bringing the reactors back online, authority officials said. Local news reports said the approval process would take at least six months.Separately, the nuclear regulator has been conducting studies of earthquake fault formations under six nuclear power plants across Japan. Last month, it concluded that a reactor in Tsuruga, in western Japan, stands above an active fault, a finding that could lead to the first permanent shutdown of a reactor since the disaster.It remains unclear whether the new standards go far enough to quell lingering public fears over nuclear power. In a nationwide poll of 1,781 people conducted by the newspaper Asahi Shimbun (excluding parts of Fukushima Prefecture) on June 8 and 9, 58 percent of respondents said they opposed restarting the country's reactors, while just 28 percent said they approved.The authority's meeting on Wednesday, which was open to the public, was disrupted several times by shouts of "Listen to the public!" and "No reactor restarts!" from the audience.Nevertheless, Japan's power industry, pronuclear businesses and Mr. Abe's governing party have been pushing to allow more reactors to restart. Japan relied on nuclear energy for about a third of its electricity needs before the disaster, and nuclear proponents argue that the ensuing energy shortfall and surging fuel import costs are hurting the economy.The problems at the Fukushima plant stem from groundwater that is pouring into the plant's damaged reactor buildings at a rate of almost 75 gallons a minute. That water becomes highly contaminated there, before being pumped out to store in tanks at the site.The latest discovery of strontium in the groundwater could signal that water is leaking from the tanks, or from the damaged reactor buildings themselves. Tokyo Electric said Wednesday that it would bolster nearby seawalls and take other measures to make sure contaminated groundwater did not reach the ocean."With the Fukushima disaster still front and center in the public's mind, it's critical that the government moves cautiously in restarting its nuclear program," said Kazuhiko Kudo, a professor in nuclear safety engineering at Kyushu University. "Otherwise, the public will remain highly skeptical of its approach to nuclear safety."Bringing the reactors back online would complete a reversal in Japan's energy policy, driven by Mr. Abe, a supporter of nuclear power who took office late last year. His predecessors had committed to phasing out Japan's nuclear power program by 2040.
TOKYO — The southern Japan island of Okinawa has marked the 68th anniversary of a decisive and bloody World War II battle that hastened Japan's surrender but left the island with a heavy U.S. military presence that is still the source of intense friction and frequent protests.Sunday's ceremony was attended by Prime Minister Shinzo Abe and other Japanese officials, along with U.S. Ambassador John Roos, who is the first U.S. ambassador to attend the ceremony in 18 years.More than 200,000 people are believed to have died in the 1945 battle for Okinawa.Roughly 50,000 U.S. troops are stationed in Japan under a mutual security pact. About half, including thousands of U.S. Marines and a major Air Force Base, are located on Okinawa. Protests against the U.S. troops are common on Okinawa amid concerns over crowding, troop-related crimes and the danger of accidents.
TOKYO — Japan's ruling party on Monday welcomed its sweeping gains in a Tokyo assembly election that was closely watched as an indicator of how the country's major parties will fare in parliamentary polls next month.The ruling Liberal Democratic Party became the largest single bloc after winning nearly half of the 127-seat Tokyo metropolitan assembly, according to final vote count by the Tokyo metropolitan government.The ruling party, led by Prime Minister Shinzo Abe, won 59 seats, up from 39 seats going into Sunday's election. Its coalition partner, a Buddhist-backed conservative group, maintained 23 seats, enough for the two parties together to have a comfortable majority.Chief Cabinet Secretary Yoshihide Suga, a member of the ruling party, told a news conference that the results "couldn't be better" with all ruling block candidates elected. "It was a blessing from the Tokyo voters to the Abe government."Abe, who has focused on strengthening Japan's economy and defense policies, has a high national approval rating. Since taking office in December, his wider agenda has included revising Japan's pacifist constitution to allow a stronger military and push for education to defend Japan's wartime actions.The major parties campaigned heavily in the run-up to the election, the biggest before the nation goes to the polls on July 21 to elect members of Parliament's upper house.Also being watched was the new Japan Restoration Party, led by Toru Hashimoto, the mayor of Japan's second-largest metropolis, Osaka.Though Hashimoto was hoping to build his party into a nationwide political power, he has been criticized for his recent remarks that sex slavery by Japan's Imperial Army before and during World War II was a "necessary" wartime evil, and for suggesting that the U.S. military patronize adult entertainment establishments in Japan to help reduce sex crimes committed by American troops.His party won only two seats, down from its current three, in the Tokyo assembly. The result puts heavier pressure on the party to do well in the parliamentary elections since Hashimoto has already indicated he would resign as party chief if it performs badly.Associated Press Writer Mari Yamaguchi contributed to the report.
TOKYO — Six of Japan's regional electricity monopolies have included plans to restart 20 reactors by September 2015 in applications for rate hikes that have to be signed off by the country's industry ministry.Industry observers say the assumptions are ambitious, as the country's new nuclear regulator, set up after the Fukushima disaster of March 2011, has said its review of Japan's nuclear fleet may take more than three years. The regulator has also said its standards will be the toughest in the world.All but two of Japan's 50 reactors are idled after the crisis, which highlighted lax oversight of the industry.The utilities are Tokyo Electric Power Co, Kansai Electric Power Co, Kyushu Electric Power Co, Shikoku Electric Power Co, Tohoku Electric Power Co and Hokkaido Electric Power Co.Chubu Electric Power Co is building anti-tsunami defenses and installing safety equipment on its sole Hamaoka station and says it may apply for restarts before March 2015. The other two listed nuclear operators haven't laid out plans to reboot their idled reactors.Kansai Electric's Ohi No.3 and No.4 reactors are the only ones in operation and both are due to be idled in September for routine maintenance followed by safety checks.The Nuclear Regulation Authority has said it will take about six months to carry out checks on individual reactors, but will simultaneously review similar model units at the same station. The authority will deploy three groups of inspectors for the safey checks.The table below lists the utilities and their assumed restart dates, based on documents submitted to the industry ministry's rate hike panel and company announcements.Tokyo Electric's rate hike request was approved last July, while Kansai Electric and Kyushu Electric were given the go ahead in April this year. The others are still being reviewed.Genkai No. 3 1,180 MW P Jan 2014 Shikoku Ikata No. 3 890 MW P July 2013 Hokkaido Tomari No. 1 579 MW P Dec 2013NOTE: "B" stands for boiling water reactor and "P" for pressurised water reactor.
From the portside window of the 19-seat passenger plane, the island of Niijima, 100 miles southeast of Tokyo, looked like any other tropical paradise. There were volcanic mountaintops wreathed in white clouds, valleys of verdant green jungle, and beaches filled with sand so bright and white the whole coastline looked as if it had been sketched out in chalk.But as seatbelt lights flashed, tray tables went up and the captain arced the plane toward the landing strip, the postcard-perfect scene dissolved and a distinctly industrial landscape came into view. What I thought, or imagined, was a quaint, thatch-roof village was a shabby-looking fishing port. We rode into Honson, Niijima's main town, in a shuttle van to find the stores were all closed and the streets empty. It felt less as if we'd landed on Fantasy Island and more like the Twilight Zone.Niijima, one of nine inhabited islands in Japan's Izu archipelago, has been a place of many faces. Around the 18th century, during Japan's Edo period, it served as an island prison for mainland exiles. By the 1960s, the Japanese defense department moved in and shot rockets and missiles from its coasts. For the last few decades, it has been a weekend escape hatch for harried city residents and college students looking for sun-drenched island life a 40-minute flight from Tokyo.More recently, Niijima has become one of Japan's top surfing destinations. In the summer months, Habushi-ura, a stunning stretch of Windex-blue water along the island's east coast, has some of the best surf in all of Japan and is host to a number of international surfing competitions. A handful of young Tokyo surfers have since made Niijima their year-round home and created a burgeoning surf scene.But getting around Niijima, I was warned, was not easy. Few locals spoke English. On some weekends the island was so crowded with college students that it was impossible to get a room. At other times, it resembled a ghost town where even the basics — eating, drinking, sleeping — could be a hassle. In its heyday in the 1980s, there were more than 240 places to stay on the island; now there are only 30.We checked into Minshuku Hamasho, a simple Japanese bed-and-breakfast, and set out at twilight to find dinner in Honson. While the town itself is small — only 10 or so blocks — the streets are narrow and dark and restaurants have no signs and no addresses and offer no indication that they are open, or even exist. (A menu on the wall outside? Forget it.) The way to find them, we discovered, was to walk quietly in the middle of the empty streets and listen for clues: a muffled conversation, a clink of plates, the creaking hinge of a quickly opened door.After a few false starts (knocking on the wrong doors, or, in one case, on a piece of wood that wasn't a door at all) we spied a family leaving through a brightly lighted doorway. We bolted in to find a 10-seat restaurant that was actually more like a family's living room. With the help of a semi-bilingual couple seated nearby, we ordered the local specialty called kusaya, salted, dried and fermented horse mackerel, which, we learned, has been prepared on Niijima in the same way for more than 300 years. When the dish arrived, the odor was overpowering and although we tried, neither of us could bear eating it. The couple next to us laughed and helped us order rice and vegetables with some local soju, a delicious fermented rice drink.The next day we moved on to Saro, a guesthouse about three blocks north in central Honson. Run by a young couple from Tokyo, Saro, with its warm wood finishes, soft ambient lighting and vintage bossa nova music playing softly from corner speakers, offers a splash of hip and stylish civility to an otherwise unremarkable neighborhood. The host, Shotaro Murakami, a 26-year-old who grew up on Japan's southern islands, met us in the lobby and led us upstairs along a low-ceilinged hallway to our room, whose furnishings consisted entirely of a tatami mat, a futon and a tiny tea table — all the necessities. That afternoon it was time to explore the island, coast to coast. At just seven miles long and one and a half miles wide, Niijima is too small to bother renting a car, and too big to comfortably explore on foot — in other words, a perfect place to ride a bike.
TOKYO — Japanese Prime Minister Shinzo Abe's ruling bloc swept to victory in a weekend Tokyo election, a sign it's on track for a hefty win in a July national vote that could strengthen Abe's hand as he aims to end economic stagnation and bolster defence.Politicians and pundits had been eyeing the outcome of the Tokyo Metropolitan Assembly election for clues to how well Abe's Liberal Democratic Party and its junior partner, the New Komeito, will fare in a July 21 election for parliament's upper house that opinion polls suggest they will win handily."We have received a good evaluation of our handling of the government over the past six months," Abe, who campaigned heavily for the local vote, told reporters. "We would like to do our very best so people can feel that the economy is recovering as soon as possible."All of the LDP's 59 candidates won seats in the 127-member Tokyo assembly to regain the top spot. It was the party's biggest victory in the metropolis since 2001, when it was buoyed by the popularity of charismatic leader Junichiro Koizumi.All of the New Komeito's 23 candidates also won, though with fewer votes than four years ago.In the latest sign of its faltering fortunes, the main opposition Democratic Party of Japan slid to 15 seats, fewer than the Japan Communist Party's 17 seats.Osaka Mayor Toru Hashimoto's right-leaning Japan Restoration Party won just two seats, reflecting his waning popularity after remarks that seemed to justify Japan's wartime military brothels. That could spell trouble for any LDP hopes of allying with Hashimoto to push constitutional reform, although another small conservative party, the Your Party, won seven seats.Voter turnout, however, was a near record low at 43.50 percent. Calculations by the Tokyo Shimbun daily showed the LDP won 46.5 percent of the seats with 15 percent of all eligible votes."This tells us that the LDP is likely to win the upper house primarily because the opposition is divided and there is no alternative," said Chuo University political science professor Steven Reed.Some pundits are calling that the "TINA" effect, borrowing a slogan of Margaret Thatcher of which Abe is also said to be fond.Pledging to revive growth in the world's third-biggest economy, bolster its defence posture and revise Japan's pacifist constitution, Abe returned to Japan's top job after the LDP's lower house election win in December. But the LDP and New Komeito lack a majority in the upper house, which can block legislation.That "twisted parliament" has been foiling policy implementation since the LDP's massive defeat in a July 2007 upper house election during Abe's first troubled 12-month term, which ended with his abrupt resignation two months later.Some analysts said the solid victory in Japan's capital spelled good news for Abe's pledges to implement structural reforms including deregulation, the so-called "Third Arrow" of his "Abenomics" prescription to end stagnation. The first two "Arrows" are hyper-easy monetary policy and spending."The election result proves that the LDP can win big in the cities. This proof gives PM Abe an alternative to relying on agriculture and other non-urban vested interest groups," said a report by Morgan Stanley MUFG in Tokyo.Others, however, worry that too big an LDP victory in the upper house could mean ballooning ranks of lawmakers with close ties to vested interests that oppose structural reforms.Surveys of voter preferences for the upper house vote show the LDP has a hefty lead over the demoralised opposition.A June 21-23 Nikkei business daily survey showed 47 percent plan to vote for the LDP versus 7 percent for the Democrats.Abe's support rates slipped marginally to 66 percent in the Nikkei poll, in line with recent declines that mirror a fall in Tokyo share prices reflecting concern over whether his "Abenomics" policy prescription to end stagnation will succeed.Financial markets applauded the first two "Arrows" in Abe's policy quiver but have grown sceptical about whether he means to keep pledges of structural reforms including deregulation.Steep falls in share prices or verbal gaffes by Abe could erode support ahead of the national vote. Even so, analysts say it would be almost impossible for the ruling bloc to lose.
TOKYO — A power plant has received the first shipment of reprocessed nuclear reactor fuel sent to Japan since the 2011 disaster that forced it to shut down reactors.The fuel, a mixture of uranium and plutonium oxide called MOX, arrived aboard a freighter from France on Thursday at the Takahama nuclear power station on the Sea of Japan coast. Operators of the plant are hoping to use the fuel once they get the go-ahead to restart their reactors.Virtually all of Japan's nuclear reactors have been closed for safety checks and upgrades since the tsunami and earthquake in March 2011 touched off meltdowns and explosions at a plant in Fukushima, northeast of Tokyo. The government recently announced new regulations that if met would allow nuclear plants to resume operations.
TOKYO — Will the real Shinzo Abe please stand up?Abe, back as Japan's premier in a rare second term, is expected to lead his ruling bloc to victory in a July upper house election, but what he will do with the mandate is a puzzle.Pessimists fear too decisive a win will weaken commitment to reforms needed to end the stagnation that has long plagued the economy.First, a massive victory by Abe's Liberal Democratic Party (LDP) could generate complacency even as swollen ranks of conservative lawmakers strengthen the hand of the vested interests that have long been the LDP's core constituencies.Second, Abe may use his mandate to push a conservative agenda centered on revising the pacifist constitution - recognizing Japan's right to maintain a military - and recasting its wartime history with a less apologetic tone, distracting from difficult economic reforms."If they win, the government will be very stable, but stability creates laxness," said former Economics Minister Hiroko Ota, a member of an advisory panel on deregulation - touted by Abe as a key component of his "Third Arrow" growth strategy.The first two "arrows" in the "Abenomics" policy prescription were hyper-easy monetary policy and fiscal spending, neither of which faced much political opposition."The issues that remain face strong opposition and that is why they were not possible so far," Ota told Reuters. "That is why we need to remain intensely on guard."Pledging to revive growth in the world's third-biggest economy, bolster its defense posture and alter the constitution, Abe took office after the LDP's general election win last December. That was just over five years after he abruptly resigned from the country's top job due to ill health and a humiliating loss in an election for parliament's upper chamber.But the LDP and its junior partner, the New Komeito, still lack a majority in the upper house, which can block legislation. Abe and his allies need a win there both to end the "twisted parliament" that has foiled policy implementation since 2007 and to wipe away the bitter memory of his earlier defeat.Buoyed by a stellar win in Sunday's Tokyo local election, the LDP and New Komeito look on track for a solid majority in the upper house contest. Some political sources say Abe's party may win a majority on its own.Pessimists fear that too big a win for the LDP would bolster the opposition to regulatory reforms from lawmakers with close ties to industries and sectors that would suffer from change."Winning the upper house election is not the key to pushing through the structural reforms that Japan needs because the vested interests are only going to get stronger," said Jeffrey Kingston, director of Asian studies at Temple University's Japan campus.Others, such as LDP lawmaker Kozo Yamamoto, said a big win would give Abe the clout to push unpopular economic reforms such as steps to make it easier to fire unproductive employees and downsize away from unprofitable sectors."We can't do it now, but if the LDP and New Komeito win a majority, we can do it," Yamamoto said.The party and Abe's advisers are divided between those who favor old-fashioned industrial policies with the government targeting winners, and a pro-deregulation camp that wants the government to get out of the way to spur innovation.Financial markets disappointed by the "Third Arrow" measures want to see signs the latter group is gaining the upper hand. "What markets will be looking for is a very clear commitment to specific medium-term, growth boosting structural reforms," said Alastair Newton, senior political analyst at Nomura Securities."There has to be more substantive delivery in the reform agenda once the election is out of the way to sustain the more positive sentiment about Japan."Abe aides say he has learned a harsh lesson from his troubled 2006-2007 term, when his focus on revising the U.S.-drafted constitution, promoting traditional values and fostering patriotism in education instead of pocket-book policies close to voters' hearts was a key reason for his early exit.Few believe, however, that the priorities of the 58-year-old grandson of a prime minister have fundamentally altered. Some still fear he will be tempted to spend political capital on contentious policies such as lowering the legislative hurdle to constitutional revision as a prelude to revising Article 9 to loosen limits on the military.Observers also wonder whether Abe will visit Tokyo's Yasukuni Shrine on the August 15 anniversary of Japan's World War Two defeat, a pilgrimage he avoided as premier the first time. A visit to the shrine, where Japanese wartime leaders convicted as war criminals by an Allied tribunal are honored with war dead, would inflame tensions with China and South Korea, which suffered under Japan's past militarism."Structural reform would be easier to promote (if the ruling bloc wins big) but the question is, what is his agenda?" Junji Annen, a Chuo University Law School professor who sits on the same deregulation panel as Ota, told Reuters. "Is it economic revitalization or constitutional reform? Only Abe knows."The two, however, may not be mutually exclusive. Abe's agenda also aims to boost Japan's regional and global security clout but exercising influence - especially in the face of a rising China - requires a strong economy."A country that has lost economic power cannot maintain its national power," Abe told a news conference on Wednesday, adding he would focus on reviving the economy after winning the poll."To ensure national power and pride, we need to regain a strong economy."
TOKYO — Sony's Xperia Z smartphone, which went on sale in February, has already sold almost a million units by some estimates. But NTT DoCoMo, Japan's largest mobile carrier, will soon stop selling it.The Xperia Z has not even hit the United States market yet: T-Mobile says the model will make its debut on its network in the coming weeks.But it is already a has-been in Japan. DoCoMo has turned its attention to a new phone, the Sony Xperia A — a model with fewer features that has not won the stellar praise showered on the Z."It's time for a new model," said Mai Kariya, a DoCoMo representative in Tokyo. "We're finished with the Xperia Z, and now focusing on the Xperia A."As Sony banks on smartphones to turn around its struggling electronics business, it faces an increasingly bothersome obstacle at home: the demands of Japan's powerful cellphone carriers, which remain obsessed with constant model updates.For years, Japan's three largest mobile network companies have pressed phone makers here to update their handsets every three or four months, providing Japanese consumers a dazzling array of newfangled phones and features each season. Phones with digital TV broadcast receivers were once all the rage; a phone without it was never going to sell. Then it was thumbprint scans; you'd be hard pressed to find those on many phones today. The same is true of swiveling screens, and to a lesser extent, electronic wallets.The fast-paced cycle is commonplace in Japanese marketing. Manufacturers deliver short runs of seasonal products to create buzz, analysts say. Pepsi Japan, for example, brings out limited-edition drinks each year: Salty Watermelon Pepsi or Pepsi Ice Cucumber. Nestle's KitKat candy bar has cycled through an eye-popping array of limited editions in Japan: green tea, pumpkin, strawberry cheesecake, wasabi and soybean to name only a few.Even Japan's best-selling pop group, AKB48, rotates through a cast of 67 members and on New Year's Day released 16 versions of new and repackaged records."This is the worst of Japanese companies' excessive obsession with the new," said Yuichi Kogure, an associate professor in information technology policy at Aomori Public University and the author of several books on Japan's cellphone industry. "But now the mobile phone makers are exhausted."Sony's Xperia Z got caught in this marketing buzz saw. DoCoMo started selling the Xperia Z in Japan on Feb. 9 as part of the carrier's spring 2013 collection, replacing the Xperia AX of the winter 2012 collection. A month later, on March 15, DoCoMo announced its summer collection of 11 new phones, with the Xperia Z replaced by the Xperia A, which went on sale last month.The constant feature roulette has helped carriers lure customers away from rival networks. But it taxes the research and development resources of Japan's phone makers, who must meet the constant demands from carriers for new high-end features and frequent handset renewals.Phone manufacturers here have found it impossible to achieve the economies of scale that would justify the high development costs and the slim profit margins. Because separate teams of designers at each handset maker race to build handsets from the ground up for each separate carrier, few phone makers have been able to develop a coherent global product strategy, analysts say.The unique pace of the Japanese cellphone market largely cuts it off from the rest of the world, making it difficult for one manufacturer to make and market phones for both the Japanese and global markets, said Kenji E. Kushida, an expert on Japan's information and communications technologies at Stanford."The Japanese market became somewhat like the Galápagos Islands. It had great biodiversity, but was so weak to outside species," Mr. Kushida said.He points to Vodafone, which moved into the Japanese cellphone market in the early 2000s. The British network operator tried to synchronize its Japanese product lineup to match its "global standard" handsets sold in other markets. But Japanese consumers were unimpressed by what struck them then as overly simple handsets that appeared to take a step back in functionality.Vodafone's Japanese market share started to slide, and in 2006, it sold its operations to SoftBank.Not every maker succumbs to this whirligig and, not surprisingly, those that don't aren't Japanese. Apple has announced a new iPhone model roughly once a year. Its iPhone 5 came out in September, and the company is not expected to introduce a new model until the fall. Samsung Electronics is focusing its resources on its sleek Galaxy S4 smartphone, which went on sale in April, a full year after its predecessor the Galaxy S3.
TOKYO — In the latest sign that Japan may be inching out of its deflationary slump, data on Friday showed that core consumer prices were flat in May compared with the previous year, though lackluster household spending signaled that the recovery still needed time to take hold in the wider economy.It was the first time in seven months that Japan's core consumer price index, which excludes volatile fresh food prices but includes energy, did not fall. The results were largely in line with economists' expectations. In April, prices fell an annual 0.4 percent.The data provide a further lift to Prime Minister Shinzo Abe's campaign to bring an end to 15 years of deflation in Japan, during which time the country's economy fell behind that of China's.In his six months in office, Mr. Abe has focused much of his energy on tackling Japan's falling prices — which he says are both a cause and a symptom of waning profits, wages and consumption — with a mix of aggressive monetary easing, government spending and economic reforms.But Mr. Abe's bid has reached a critical juncture in recent weeks, as initial investor enthusiasm over his economic programs gave way to a colder-eyed look at the difficulties of turning around an economy so entrenched in deflationary expectations.Japanese consumers have been the most wary of Mr. Abe's recovery pitch. Separate government data released Friday showed that household spending fell 1.6 percent in May from a year earlier, dashing economists' expectations of a 1.3 percent rise. A shortfall in consumer demand has been the biggest contributor to Japan's deflationary woes.And Japan's so-called core-core consumer price index, which excludes both food and energy, fell 0.4 percent in the year to May, after a 0.6 percent annual decline in April, underscoring continued weak consumer demand.Still, early data for consumer prices in Tokyo, seen as a precursor of nationwide trends, rose 0.2 percent in June, signaling that a turnaround could be near.Industrial production rose by a robust 2 percent in May from the previous month, showing corporations a step ahead of consumers in the economic recovery. A weakening yen, another outcome of Japan's bold monetary easing, has been a boon for the country's exporters, which have seen profits soar.Much hangs on how much corporate profit will trickle down to consumers in the form of higher wages and better job opportunities. Jobs data released Friday, however, showed the nation's unemployment rate in April unchanged, at 4.1 percent.Tokyo's benchmark Nikkei index reacted positively to the data over all, jumping 3.5 percent to 13,677.32. Japanese stocks surged 80 percent by mid-May in strong hopes for Mr. Abe's economic turn, but have since fallen by as much as 20 percent before starting to edge back up.
TOKYO — Daisuke Horii just collected his summer bonus. It was only slightly more than last year, but enough to compel the 34-year-old shopping mall clerk to Tokyo's electronics district to look for some high-end speakers."Things are generally looking brighter, aren't they?" Mr. Horii said, as he scrutinized, then dismissed, cheaper alternatives at the bustling Yodobashi Camera electronics store. The Bose ones he has his eye on, which he'll hook up to his TV, go for about $400."I don't really need it, but I want it," he said. "A good economy means you can buy things you don't really need."Prime Minister Shinzo Abe's bid to revive Japan's deflated economy hinges on consumers like Mr. Horii starting to feel flush enough to start splurging on the finer things in life.A wide recovery in consumer spending has been the weakest link in "Abenomics," the bold economic stimulus strategy that Mr. Abe has pushed since taking office in late December.Abenomics has already brought big profit bumps to the nation's exporters, thanks to a yen made weaker by Mr. Abe's aggressive policies. He found a kindred spirit in Haruhiko Kuroda, the Bank of Japan's new governor, who has committed the central bank to easing the money supply and reinflating the economy. Stock markets have rallied, as foreign investors jumped back into a country they had all but written off for its seemingly unshakable stagnation.Numbers released on Friday by the government provided more proof of Japan's corporate recovery. Industrial production rose by a robust 2 percent in May from the previous month. Tokyo's benchmark Nikkei index climbed 3.5 percent Friday on the strong showing.Reversing a 15-year-long slide in prices, which Mr. Abe has singled out as both a cause and a symptom of waning profits, wages and consumption, is a tougher order. For companies to feel confident enough to start raising prices, Japan's consumers have to start spending again, and data confirming that trend is still mixed.Separate figures released on Friday showed that household spending fell 1.6 percent in May from a year earlier, confounding economists' expectations of a 1.3 percent rise. Still, for the first time in seven months, Japan's core consumer prices in May did not fall compared to the previous year, staying flat for that month after falling 0.4 percent the previous month."We are comfortable with our view that the uptrend of consumption continues," Masamichi Adachi, Tokyo-based economist at JPMorgan Securities Japan, said in a note Friday. "An expected rise in summer bonuses, paid in June and July, and improvement in general sentiment are the main reasons," he said.There are some signs that after years of penny-pinching, conspicuous spending is on the rise again in Japan. But for now, it is starting at the very top, among the financiers, professionals and other well-to-do Japanese who have benefited from the recent stock market gains.Sales of Ferrari cars in Japan have jumped almost 20 percent so far this year, figures from the Japan Automobile Importers Association show, thanks to this newfound exuberance among the nation's rich."We've seen confidence start to explode over the last months," said Herbert Appleroth, chief executive of Ferrari Japan. "We're seeing some of the highest growth in the world here."At the Hankyu Umeda department store in Osaka, sales of luxury watches, jewelry and other luxury items are surging, which lifted overall sales in May by 63 percent compared with the previous year, the sixth straight month of double-digit increases."Japanese shoppers are tired of cheap," said Keiji Uchiyama, manager of the marble-floored store, brimming with imported fragrances, pastel macaroons and slick designer bags. "They've scrimped for so long, but now they've had enough," he said.
TOKYO — Apple Inc. has applied for a trademark in Japan for "iWatch" as rumors suggest it may be developing a smart wristwatch.A document obtained Monday from the Japan Patent Office's website said the application was made June 3 and made public June 27.It was not immediately clear when the application might be approved. Patent office and Apple officials in Japan were not available for comment late Monday.Apple is rumored to be working on a smart watch that would run on a version of the operating system used by its iPhone and iPad. The company has not confirmed those rumors, but CEO Tim Cook has hinted that it may be developing a wearable computing device such as a wristwatch.Applying for a trademark in Japan isn't proof of Apple's intentions. The company based in Cupertino, California, has many patents for devices it will never produce.
TOKYO — Four years after the Democratic Party of Japan swept to power in a historic election ending decades of one-party dominance, the DPJ looks set for defeat in next month's upper house poll, raising doubts about its future and prospects for a two-party system that spurs policy debate and weakens vested interests.The victory by the novice DPJ in 2009 was supposed to signal the coming of age of a two-party system in which two big parties swapped power, ending decades of nearly unbroken rule by the conservative Liberal Democratic Party (LDP).That in turn, optimists had hoped, would break the triangle of ruling politicians, bureaucrats and vested interests such as farmers, doctors and companies that had ossified over time, hampering Japan's response to global and domestic changes.Now, however, disillusioned voters appear likely to shun the Democrats in a July 21 upper house poll, mirroring the results of a December lower house election and a Tokyo vote last month."Four years ago, a candidate could get elected just by running on the DPJ ticket. This time, it was exactly the reverse," said Fumiyoshi Kadowaki, 59, who failed to win a seat in a Tokyo assembly election in which the DPJ won a mere 15 out of 127 seats."Whatever a candidate's ability and activities, it was not enough ... We can expect very tough results in the upper house and after that, it's hard to know what will happen."The LDP and its junior partner, back after a huge win in the December lower house poll and buoyed by hopes for Prime Minister Shinzo Abe's economic policies, look set to romp to victory in the upper chamber. That would cement Abe's grip on power as he strives to end prolonged stagnation and push a conservative agenda centered on revising Japan's pacifist constitution.The prospect has some pundits forecasting that the DPJ, founded in 1998 by a core of center-left lawmakers, might fade away or try to regroup under a new banner."The label has become so tarnished that those who are able to win ... may be tempted to found a new party," said Sophia University political science professor Koichi Nakano.Critics blame inexperience and weak leadership, disunity and an inability to keep pledges to change how Japan is governed by breaking bureaucrats' hold on policymaking and paying more heed to consumers than companies for the tainting of the DPJ brand.The fractious party had three leaders during its 2009-2012 rule, splitting last year after a band of defectors left to protest an agreement with the then-opposition LDP to double the 5 percent sales tax by 2015 to fix Japan's tattered finances."People decided they could not entrust the government to people who could not unify," DPJ policy chief Mitsuru Sakurai told Reuters in an interview. "In a word, people didn't want to see a fight between husband and wife."The LDP and New Komeito together will almost certainly win a majority in the upper house, which can block most legislation. That result would end the "twisted parliament" that has foiled policy implementation since 2007 when the LDP - then led by Abe in his first troubled term - suffered a humiliating defeat.The DPJ, which won just 57 seats in last year's election for the 480-member lower house, could win as few as 20 of the 121 seats up for grabs in the 242-member upper house, Nakano said.Abe wouldn't have a free hand even so, but meaningful opposition to his policies would come from within the LDP or from the more dovish New Komeito - a situation pessimists say bodes ill for Japanese democracy.But while some doubt Japan will ever have a true two-party system given a lack of deep social cleavages, others say Japan's electoral system still pushes in that direction. Most MPs are elected from single-member districts where big parties have an advantage over smaller rivals.With no guarantee that "Abenomics" will work a cure of what ails the world's third-biggest economy, dissatisfied voters may in a year or two be looking for somewhere else to cast their ballots. In contrast to Abe's focus on ending deflation with hyper-easy monetary policy, the DPJ wants to boost disposable income to increase demand and beef up social security to remove anxiety about the future that depresses spending, Sakurai said.Voters may also be put off if Abe shifts his focus from fixing the economy to conservative pet projects such as revising the constitution to ease restraints on Japan's military.Backing for the LDP is anyway less solid than its recent election wins suggest - the party won almost 57 percent of the lower house seats with less than a third of votes cast."We can recover," said DPJ upper house member Renho, who goes by one name. "It is not possible that the DPJ will simply collapse ... All we can do is put forth a proper opposing stance and prepare for the next election. There is no magic bullet."
YOKOTA AIR BASE, Japan — The secretary of state's plane headed east toward Washington Tuesday on the final leg of a 22,500-mile trip through Asia and the Middle East. But for John Kerry, sleepless and hoarse from days of diplomacy, the plane was flying in the wrong direction.Having gained traction on a fragile plan to coax Israel and the Palestinians back into peace talks, Kerry didn't want to go east. He wanted to go west — back to Israel and the West Bank to bring the two sides closer together.After four days of shuttling between meetings with both parties in Jordan, Israel and the West Bank, Kerry declared in Tel Aviv that with a little more work, he believed final status negotiations could be "within reach."Kerry said if he hadn't had to attend an Asian conference in Brunei, he would have stayed in the Mideast to try to hammer out an agreement to restart the talks aimed at finding a two-state solution to the decades-long conflict.It's a feat that has eluded many leaders and diplomats who have walked the mined path of Mideast diplomacy before, but it's one that would seal Kerry's legacy as secretary of state.There were other takeaways on his two-week journey through seven countries:He reported having inched U.S. and Russia closer together toward finding a political solution to the bloodshed in Syria. And he worked with U.S. allies in the Gulf to coordinate military and other aid streaming into Syria to help the rebels trying to oust Syrian President Bashar Assad.In Qatar, he expressed support for U.S. talks with the Taliban to help end the war in Afghanistan, while saying the militant group needed to prove its seriousness to negotiate. In New Delhi, he worked to strengthen already strong U.S. relations with India, despite disagreements over trade and commerce.At his last stop in Brunei, Kerry reaffirmed the Obama administration's so-called pivot toward Asia and reiterated the administration's tough stance against North Korea's nuclear ambitions.The nearly three-year civil war in Syria, which has claimed more than 93,000 lives, took the spotlight in Kerry's talks with Arab leaders and his sit-down with Russian Foreign Minister Sergey Lavrov Tuesday on the sidelines of the security conference in Brunei. Kerry said he and Lavrov talked about ways to organize an international conference in Geneva, which would follow up on one last year that called for the formation of a transitional government for Syrian.The U.S. wants to smooth over differences it has with Russia, a key backer of Assad, but many differences remain. Kerry offered no public comment about who would be represented at the so-called "Geneva II" conference, or what role the Assad regime would play in any transitional government that could be established.There was no public talk about Iran, which has been backing Assad's forces against the rebels, would attend the conference or how the opposition would be represented."We agreed that we are both serious, more than serious, committed to the Geneva process," Kerry said at the U.S. Embassy in Brunei. "We both agreed that our countries have an ability to be able to make a difference if we can pull together in that effort. ... We narrowed down some of the options with respect to the potential of that conference. We both agreed that that conference should happen sooner than later."He added, however, that scheduling difficulties probably delay any conference until August or later.But the main substance of the trip was the more than 19 hours of discussions Kerry and his advisers had with Israeli Prime Minister Benjamin Netanyahu and Palestinian President Mahmoud Abbas. Kerry bounced back and forth between the two sides at breakneck speed to try to get them to resume negotiations, which broke down in 2008. In the end, the two sides were closer together, but still apart.There is much skepticism that the Israeli-Palestinian conflict is on its way to resolution, but Kerry remains energized in the effort, and was on the phone with the staff he left behind in region during his flight to Brunei and home to Washington. While Kerry said he had narrowed the gaps between the sides, the lack of any visible progress has led to pessimism on both sides.In a rare upbeat assessment of U.S. mediation efforts, however, the Palestinian president said Tuesday that he is optimistic that Kerry will succeed in restarting Israeli-Palestinian peace talks. "We are optimistic because he is serious and determined to reach a solution," Abbas said at a joint appearance with visiting Italian Prime Minister Enrico Letta.The Palestinians have demanded that Israel stop building in Jewish settlements in the occupied West Bank and east Jerusalem before talks resume. The Palestinians claim both areas, captured by Israel in 1967, as parts of a future state. They also say that Israel should recognize its pre-1967 lines as the basis for borders with a future Palestine. Netanyahu has rejected both demands, saying all disagreements should be resolved in negotiations.After 20 years of intermittent talks with Israel, few believe there's a chance to strike a deal with Netanyahu, an ideological hard-liner whose government is dominated by politicians who oppose significant concessions. Several top officials have taken a tougher line than Netanyahu, speaking out against the establishment of a Palestinian state.In an interview with the Italian newspaper Corriere Della Sera, Netanyahu played down these comments, saying he was committed to seeing Kerry succeed and ready to start serious negotiations. Netanyahu was quoted as saying that if Kerry pitched a tent between his office in Israel and Abbas' office in Ramallah, he would get inside and stay there so serious effort could be expended to resolve the conflict.Kerry is ready to go back to the region and pitch that tent.
A meeting in Manhattan that lasted more than five hours failed to produce an agreement to send N.H.L. players to the Sochi Olympics in February. The three principal parties, however, said they were confident a deal is within reach."We're on a compact schedule, and everyone's working very hard," said N.H.L. Commissioner Gary Bettman, flanked by Donald Fehr, the executive director of the Players Association, and René Fasel of the International Ice Hockey Federation. "We seem to be pulling the oars in the same direction."Earlier this year, Fasel said he hoped a deal would be finalized by the end of May in order that national ice hockey federations could plan for the Winter Games."I think there are some agreements in principle, but we're not completely in agreement on everything yet," Bettman said. "But we're getting closer on the open issues."Bettman called the meeting constructive and said he thought a solution could be found "very soon."Fasel is the president of the I.I.H.F. and a member of the International Olympic Committee's executive board. He went directly from the meeting at the N.H.L. office to catch a flight to Switzerland, where he will meet on Tuesday with Olympic officials."I'm very happy," Fasel said. "I have also to go back to my federation and to our national federations, especially to go back to the I.O.C. to make a report, and I'm confident that we will have a solution at the end."Some national ice hockey federations are proceeding as if an agreement will be reached. On Saturday USA Hockey announced that Dan Bylsma would coach the United States and set dates in late August for its orientation camp for players in Arlington, Va.Last month, Sweden announced a preliminary roster of invitees, composed primarily of N.H.L. players, to its orientation camp in August."We're on track and things are moving along," Bettman said.If the league, union and Olympic officials reach an agreement, it will mark the fifth time the N.H.L. has suspended its schedule and sent its players to the Winter Games, a practice that began at Nagano in 1998.
TOKYO — Business sentiment among major manufacturers in Japan is at its highest in more than two years, a closely watched central bank survey showed Monday, in a sign that the economic policies of Prime Minister Shinzo Abe are continuing to lift Japan's corporate outlook.The Bank of Japan's "tankan" survey for the three months through June showed that the headline index for major manufacturers rose to 4 from negative 8 in the previous quarter, the second consecutive quarter of improvement.The index beat market expectations that it would rise to 3; the reading Monday was the highest since March 2011, and the first positive reading since September that year. It compares with a dismal result of negative 48 four years ago, in the depths of the global economic crisis.The Nikkei average climbed 1.3 percent to a one-month high after the upbeat tankan, finishing the day at 13,852.50, its third straight session of gains.The corporate improvement comes six months into Mr. Abe's bid to jump-start Japan's economy with a combination of aggressive monetary easing, government stimulus and a package of promised economic changes.An immediate effect of his policies has been a weaker yen, which has come as a boon to Japan's exporters by inflating the value of their overseas earnings. Earnings at Toyota and Japan's other big manufacturers have already gotten a big boost from the tumbling currency.The tankan also showed improved sentiment in the service sector, with the index for big non-manufacturing companies rising 6 points to 12.The survey "showed a broad-based improvement of corporate sentiment from March to June, as widely expected," Masamichi Adachi, a Tokyo-based economist at JPMorgan Securities Japan, said in a note.The reading fell short of Mr. Adachi's forecast of 9, however, thanks in part to cautiousness on the part of many manufacturers in assuming that the yen will remain weak in the longer run.Kyohei Morita, Japan economist for Barclays, wrote in a note that improved business sentiment was in line with expectations and set the stage for strong economic growth for Japan."We look for Japan to outpace its G7 peers" in economic growth, he said, referring to the conference of seven industrialized nations. Last month, government figures showed that Japan's gross domestic product grew at a robust annualized pace of 4.1 percent in the first quarter, by far the fastest clip among the Group of 7.Economists are now watching to see whether the positive turn in mood at Japan's big companies will trickle down to Japan's consumers. On that front, the evidence is mixed.The tankan measures sentiment by conducting a survey of Japan's largest companies and subtracting the percentage of respondents who say conditions are negative from those who say they are positive.
FUKUSHIMA, Japan — Japanese Prime Minister Shinzo Abe, riding high in opinion polls on hopes he can revive a stagnant economy, urged voters on Thursday to back his ruling bloc in this month's upper house election and end a six-year policy deadlock.Abe, back in power after his Liberal Democratic Party's big win in a December election for the powerful lower house, is expected to lead his coalition to a hefty victory in the July 21 poll, resolving a "twisted parliament" where opposition parties control the upper house and are able to block bills.He officially kicked off the campaign on Thursday in Fukushima in Japan's northeast, which was devastated by a massive earthquake and tsunami in 2011 that triggered the Fukushima nuclear disaster."Because of a twisted parliament, rebuilding has not progressed speedily, revitalization of the economy has not progressed speedily," Abe told a crowd of about 1,000 people near a train station in Fukushima city.Japan has suffered parliamentary gridlock ever since Abe led the LDP to a massive defeat in a 2007 upper house vote. He quit abruptly two months later due to the deadlock, plummeting support and ill health. The main opposition Democratic Party of Japan (DPJ) faced a similar headache after sweeping to power in 2009, only to lose a 2010 upper house election.Public support for Abe and the LDP now far outstrips any rivals, buoyed by hopes that his recipe of hyper-easy monetary policy, fiscal spending and structural reform to boost growth can end Japan's prolonged stagnation.An opinion poll by the Tokyo Shimbun published on Tuesday showed that 28 percent of respondents planned to vote for the LDP in districts where members are decided by proportional representation, dwarfing the 5.9 percent who intend to cast ballots for the DPJ.Voter support for the LDP in general contrasts with public antipathy towards nuclear power after the Fukushima crisis, the world's worst atomic disaster since Chernobyl. A huge earthquake and tsunami on March 11, 2011, caused reactor meltdowns at Tokyo Electric Power Co's Fukushima plant, spewing radiation and forcing 160,000 people to flee, many never to return home.The LDP has pledged to seek the understanding of affected communities to restart offline reactors that are found to meet new safety standards that take effect on July 8."Unless we have a party in power that can get things done in power, things won't change," said a 65-year-old woman who lives in a Fukushima apartment reserved for disaster victims."I haven't actually felt the economic recovery affecting my life just yet. But I support 'Abenomics'. At least they took one step forward," she said, adding however that she also opposed the restart of nuclear reactors.Abe, a deeply conservative hawk who wants to revise Japan's pacifist constitution to ease limits on the military, has vowed to maintain his priority on fixing the economy after the election. However, many wonder if he will shift gears to focus on his agenda that includes constitutional reform.Stress on his conservative agenda, including efforts to recast Japan's war-time history with a less apologetic tone, would further strain relations with China and South Korea, where bitter memories of Japan's past militarism run deep. Tokyo is already feuding with Beijing and Seoul over disputed islands.Abe, in a debate with rivals on Wednesday, declined to say whether he would visit Tokyo's Yasukuni Shrine, where Japanese leaders convicted as war criminals by an Allied tribunal are enshrined with Japan's war dead. He also declined to be drawn on questions whether Japan had engaged in a war of aggression against China in the last century.With a victory by the LDP and its junior partner, the New Komeito, widely expected, the focus will also be on whether the Liberal Democrats can win a majority on their own in the 242-seat chamber, where half the seats are up for grabs.A massive win for the party could be a mixed blessing: it would give Abe a mandate but also bolster the ranks of MPs who may oppose painful reforms many say are needed to revive growth.Whether the LDP-led coalition, together with smaller parties that favor revising the constitution, can win a two-thirds majority is another key question, although Abe has said he will not rush to attempt any constitutional changes given wary public opinion and a cautious stance by the more dovish New Komeito.Abe wants first to revise Article 96 of the charter, which stipulates that any change in the constitution requires approval by two-thirds of both houses of parliament and a majority of votes cast in a public referendum.He and the LDP want to change the parliamentary requirement to a simple majority in both houses before the public vote.Abe's resignation in 2007 began a series of revolving-door leaders - Japan has had seven since Junichiro Koizumi served a rare five-year term ending in 2006. A win on July 21 could set the stage for the first stable, long-term administration since then. No national election needs to be held until 2016.At the same time, an anticipated bashing for the Democratic Party, which surged to power in 2009 pledging to pry control of policymaking away from bureaucrats and pay more heed to consumers than companies, could call into question its future as well as hopes for a true two-party system in Japan.
FUKUSHIMA, Japan — Japanese Prime Minister Shinzo Abe, riding high in opinion polls on hopes he can revive a stagnant economy, urged voters on Thursday to back his ruling bloc in this month's upper house election and end a six-year policy deadlock.Abe, back in power after his Liberal Democratic Party's big win in a December election for the powerful lower house, is expected to lead his coalition to a hefty victory in the July 21 poll, resolving a "twisted parliament" where opposition parties control the upper house and are able to block bills.He officially kicked off the campaign on Thursday in Fukushima in Japan's northeast, which was devastated by a massive earthquake and tsunami in 2011 that triggered the Fukushima nuclear disaster."Because of a twisted parliament, rebuilding has not progressed speedily, revitalization of the economy has not progressed speedily," Abe told a crowd of about 1,000 people near a train station in Fukushima city.Japan has suffered parliamentary gridlock ever since Abe led the LDP to a massive defeat in a 2007 upper house vote. He quit abruptly two months later due to the deadlock, plummeting support and ill health. The main opposition Democratic Party of Japan (DPJ) faced a similar headache after sweeping to power in 2009, only to lose a 2010 upper house election.Public support for Abe and the LDP now far outstrips any rivals, buoyed by hopes that his recipe of hyper-easy monetary policy, fiscal spending and structural reform to boost growth can end Japan's prolonged stagnation.An opinion poll by the Tokyo Shimbun published on Tuesday showed that 28 percent of respondents planned to vote for the LDP in districts where members are decided by proportional representation, dwarfing the 5.9 percent who intend to cast ballots for the DPJ.Voter support for the LDP in general contrasts with public antipathy towards nuclear power after the Fukushima crisis, the world's worst atomic disaster since Chernobyl. A huge earthquake and tsunami on March 11, 2011, caused reactor meltdowns at Tokyo Electric Power Co's Fukushima plant, spewing radiation and forcing 160,000 people to flee, many never to return home.The LDP has pledged to seek the understanding of affected communities to restart offline reactors that are found to meet new safety standards that take effect on July 8."Unless we have a party in power that can get things done in power, things won't change," said a 65-year-old woman who lives in a Fukushima apartment reserved for disaster victims."I haven't actually felt the economic recovery affecting my life just yet. But I support 'Abenomics'. At least they took one step forward," she said, adding however that she also opposed the restart of nuclear reactors.Abe, a deeply conservative hawk who wants to revise Japan's pacifist constitution to ease limits on the military, has vowed to maintain his priority on fixing the economy after the election. However, many wonder if he will shift gears to focus on his agenda that includes constitutional reform.Stress on his conservative agenda, including efforts to recast Japan's war-time history with a less apologetic tone, would further strain relations with China and South Korea, where bitter memories of Japan's past militarism run deep. Tokyo is already feuding with Beijing and Seoul over disputed islands.Abe, in a debate with rivals on Wednesday, declined to say whether he would visit Tokyo's Yasukuni Shrine, where Japanese leaders convicted as war criminals by an Allied tribunal are enshrined with Japan's war dead. He also declined to be drawn on questions whether Japan had engaged in a war of aggression against China in the last century.With a victory by the LDP and its junior partner, the New Komeito, widely expected, the focus will also be on whether the Liberal Democrats can win a majority on their own in the 242-seat chamber, where half the seats are up for grabs.A massive win for the party could be a mixed blessing: it would give Abe a mandate but also bolster the ranks of MPs who may oppose painful reforms many say are needed to revive growth.Whether the LDP-led coalition, together with smaller parties that favor revising the constitution, can win a two-thirds majority is another key question, although Abe has said he will not rush to attempt any constitutional changes given wary public opinion and a cautious stance by the more dovish New Komeito.Abe wants first to revise Article 96 of the charter, which stipulates that any change in the constitution requires approval by two-thirds of both houses of parliament and a majority of votes cast in a public referendum.He and the LDP want to change the parliamentary requirement to a simple majority in both houses before the public vote.Abe's resignation in 2007 began a series of revolving-door leaders - Japan has had seven since Junichiro Koizumi served a rare five-year term ending in 2006. A win on July 21 could set the stage for the first stable, long-term administration since then. No national election needs to be held until 2016.At the same time, an anticipated bashing for the Democratic Party, which surged to power in 2009 pledging to pry control of policymaking away from bureaucrats and pay more heed to consumers than companies, could call into question its future as well as hopes for a true two-party system in Japan.
TOKYO — The former chairman of Olympus, the camera maker that has been embroiled in one of Japan's biggest accounting frauds, was found guilty of abetting a $1.7 billion cover-up by a Tokyo court on Wednesday.The executive, Tsuyoshi Kikukawa, received a suspended three-year sentence, however, meaning he is likely to avoid prison.Hideo Yamada, a former auditing officer, was also given a suspended three-year sentence, and Hisashi Mori, a former executive vice president, received a lesser suspended sentence.The Tokyo District Court ordered Olympus to pay 700 million yen ($7 million) in fines for falsifying its financial reports, which the company said masked large investment losses. For its financial year that ended in March, Olympus booked a net profit of 8 billion yen.The sentencing ends a scandal that pitted a former Olympus president, a Briton, against his Japanese colleagues, who eventually admitted to running a cover-up scheme that spanned two decades.Michael C. Woodford, Olympus's first foreign chief executive, was abruptly fired in October 2011 after he presented the company's board with evidence of accounting fraud and urged its directors to come clean.Mr. Kikukawa, the chairman at the time, took over as president and initially told the news media that Mr. Woodford's Western management style was not a good match for Olympus. But a campaign by Mr. Woodford to air his side of the story pressured the company into conducting an independent review.The investigation implicated Mr. Kikukawa and two other executives in an elaborate cover-up scheme that involved offshore money, inflated acquisition payouts and a network of obscure brokers.The scandal cast a pall over confidence in corporate governance at Japan's biggest multinational companies, as investors asked whether Olympus had been a bad apple or whether more Japanese corporations were hiding bombshells in their financial books.Its outcome has also been seen as a test of how vigorously white-collar crime in Japan would be investigated and punished by the authorities, who have been accused of being soft, especially with large, well-connected corporations.Olympus's treatment of Mr. Woodford also revealed the ineffectiveness of Japan's recent efforts to encourage and protect whistle-blowers in a business culture that has long advocated corporate loyalty and censured outspoken employees. Japan passed a law to protect whistle-blowers only seven years ago, and some legal scholars say the protections are not enough to encourage employees to report on corporate wrongdoing.Mr. Kikukawa, president at Olympus for a decade before Mr. Woodford took over, had pleaded guilty to the charges. But the defense argued that jail time would be too harsh for an executive who had already suffered social censure for his mistakes.Tokyo prosecutors had asked for a five-year jail term for Mr. Kikukawa and a fine of 1 billion yen for Olympus, according to Kyodo News.In the court decision on Wednesday, Judge Hiroaki Saito said the former executives had simply taken over a scheme started in the 1990s by their predecessors. He also pointed out that there was no evidence Mr. Kikukawa and his colleagues had pocketed any money.The former executives who are thought to have made the decision to hide the losses were not charged because the statute of limitations had expired.A bid by Mr. Woodford to win back his job at Olympus was unsuccessful, but he won a multimillion-dollar settlement for unfair dismissal last year. Also last year, Olympus was fined 192 million yen by Japan's financial regulator for falsifying financial statements.The company is known by consumers for its cameras, but its main business is medical endoscopes, in which it is a world leader. Olympus has since regained its stride, trimming its work force and striking a capital alliance with Sony, which was looking to expand into the lucrative market for medical equipment. Those moves have helped Olympus rebound from heavy losses.Shares in the company also recovered, almost doubling this year thanks in part to the pro-growth policies of Prime Minister Shinzo Abe.
HIMEJI, Japan — Campaigning for the July 21 parliamentary election began across Japan on Thursday, with opinion polls forecasting major gains for Prime Minister Shinzo Abe and his economic revival plan.At stake in the election are half of the seats in the upper house of Parliament, where his main opponents, the Democratic Party, now have control. Mr. Abe's conservative governing party, the Liberal Democrats, soundly defeated the Democrats in December in elections for the more powerful lower house of Parliament, and the polls so far suggest that they will repeat that feat in the upper house. If they succeed, Mr. Abe will be the first Japanese prime minister in years to break a rapid cycle of rise and fall for the country's leaders.Control of both houses of Parliament would give Mr. Abe more freedom to push forward a doctrine that his party now proudly calls Abenomics, a cocktail of monetary stimulus, government spending and promised economic changes meant to jolt Japan out of its long deflationary slump.Enthusiasm for Abenomics has already driven up prices on the Tokyo stock market by one-third this year, and Japan's aggressive easing of monetary policy has lifted the country's mainstay exports by pushing down the yen's value against the dollar and other currencies. Japan's economy is now the fastest-growing among the Group of 7 major industrialized nations.Here in Himeji, a sleepy city in western Japan known for its picturesque feudal castle, the Liberal Democratic candidate Yoshitada Kounoike spoke of the progress the government has made so far and urged voters to give the governing party an even stronger hold on power, to make sure the recovery takes root."It's clear our economic policies are starting to work — please trust that we can carry through," Mr. Kounoike told about 200 people gathered on a busy shopping street. "You've seen that with the Liberal Democratic Party, today has been better than yesterday and tomorrow will be better than today," he called out. "But there are still those in Parliament who insist on getting in the way."For the Liberal Democrats and their junior coalition partners to gain control of the upper house, they must win 63 of the 121 contested seats in this month's election. For the governing party to win an outright majority of its own, it must win 72 seats.By focusing on the economy, the Liberal Democrats have pushed more divisive issues, like the future of Japan's nuclear program out of the spotlight. Though Mr. Abe is known as a hawk with revisionist views of Japan's wartime history and as a proponent of changing Japan's pacifist Constitution, he has so far kept his noneconomic agenda secondary to his promises of broad economic recovery."I make this promise to you: Japan's economy can grow," Mr. Abe told his first election rally in the city of Fukushima. "Let's strive to be No. 1 again. Let's bring Japan back to the world's center stage."
TOKYO — Japan moved a step closer to restarting nuclear reactors Monday as four utility companies applied for safety inspections of 10 idled plants, the clearest sign of a return to atomic energy nearly two and a half years after the Fukushima disaster.With all but two of the country's 50 reactors offline since a tsunami swept through the Fukushima Dai-ichi plant in March 2011, Japan has been almost without nuclear energy that once supplied about a third of its power.Four Japanese nuclear plant operators — supplying the regions of Hokkaido, Kansai, Shikoku and Kyushu — Monday filed applications for inspections by the Nuclear Regulation Authority for 10 reactors at five plants under new safety requirements that have just come into effect. Applications for two more reactors are expected later in the week.Only reactors that pass the stricter rules will be allowed to restart, possibly early next year. Inspections would take about six months for each reactor, the watchdog said, as its staff can handle just a few reactors at a time. Obtaining consent from local governments and communities would require at least several weeksWatchdog officials refused to say which reactor they will inspect first. Critics say the rules have loopholes, including grace periods for some safety equipmentHit by soaring gas and oil costs to run conventional power plants to make up the energy shortfall, Japanese utility companies have lobbied hard to get their reactors back online.Nearly all the utilities that own nuclear power plants reported huge losses last fiscal year due to higher costs for fuel imports. Hokkaido Electric Power Co. said it has been hit with additional daily fuel costs of 600 million yen ($6 million) to make up for three idled reactors. Nuclear operators have requested rate hikes or plan to do so.Prime Minister Shinzo Abe has pushed for restarts since taking office in December, freezing the previous government's nuclear phase-out plan. Resumption of nuclear power plants is part of his ruling party's campaign platform in parliamentary elections in two weeks.New rules for the first time require plants to guard against radiation leaks in the case of severe accidents, install emergency command centers and enact anti-terrorist measures. Operators are required to upgrade protection for tsunamis and earthquakes, as well as tornadoes and aviation accidents.Safety was previously left up to the operators, relying on their self-interest in protecting their investments as an incentive for implementing adequate measures. Tokyo Electric Power Co. came under fire for underestimating the risk of a tsunami and building a seawall that was less than half the height of the wave that hit its Fukushima Dai-ichi plant and caused multiple meltdowns and massive radiation leaks. About 160,000 evacuees still cannot return home.Ikuo Morinaka, senior official at Kansai Electric Power Co., which is applying to restart four reactors in Fukui prefecture that supply power to large parts of western Japan, said the company has taken emergency measures and additional steps since the Fukushima disaster."We are ready," Morinaka said after handing a thick file of documents to a watchdog official at a media-packed ceremonial event.Dozens of activists opposing nuclear power staged rallies outside a building that houses the watchdog's office, holding banners and chanting anti-nuclear slogans.Critics say the new safety requirements have loopholes that make things easier for operators, including a five-year grace period for some of the mandated steps given to reactors known as PWRs. They come with larger containment chambers considered less likely to suffer from pressure buildup than ones like those ravaged at Fukushima. This means half of the 48 reactors that use a pressurized water system could operate without the features for up to five years.All 10 reactors set for inspections are PWRs, and none of them have completed filtered vents and full-fledged emergency command centers yet, according to the summary of their application documents released Monday.The approvals are aimed at resuming reactor operations even though nearby communities lag in enacting needed emergency and evacuation procedures, and the restarts will cause more nuclear waste, plutonium stockpiles and other safety and environmental risks, said a group of experts headed by Hosei University sociologist Harutoshi Funabashi.The critics say running nuclear plants will eventually become a financial burden, as safety upgrades under the new requirements add up and the cost of decommissioning aging reactors and waste cleanup. Even initial safety upgrades are estimated to exceed a combined total of 1 trillion yen ($10 billion).The operators said it's a necessary investment."Despite the spending, we need to get nuclear plants running in order to provide stable power supply," said Toru Yoshisako, vice president of Kyushu Electric Power Co., which operates six reactors in southern Japan.
NAHA, Japan — In a windowless room in a corner of a bustling market where stalls displayed severed pigs' heads and bolts of kimono silk, Okinawans gathered to learn about a political idea that until recently few had dared to take seriously: declaring their island chain's political independence from Japan.About two dozen people of all ages listened as speakers challenged the official view of Okinawa as inherently part of homogeneous Japan, arguing instead that Okinawans are a different ethnic group whose once-independent tropical islands were forcibly seized by Japan in 1879. Then, to lighten the mood, the organizers showed "Sayonara, Japan!", a comedy about a fictional Okinawan island that becomes its own little republic."Until now, you were mocked if you spoke of independence," said one speaker, Kobun Higa, 71, a retired journalist whose book on the history of the tiny independence movement has become a hot seller online. "But independence may be the only real way to free ourselves from the American bases."Mr. Higa and other advocates admit that few islanders would actually seek independence for Okinawa, the southernmost Japanese island chain, which is home to 1.4 million residents and more than half of the 50,000 American troops and sailors based in Japan. But discontent with the heavy American presence and a growing perception that the central government is ignoring Okinawans' pleas to reduce it have made an increasing number of islanders willing to at least flirt publicly with the idea of breaking apart in a way that local politicians and scholars say they have not seen in decades.In May, a newly formed group led by Okinawan university professors held a symposium on independence that drew 250 people. A tiny political party that advocates separation from Japan through peaceful means has been revived after decades of dormancy, though its candidates have fared poorly in recent elections. And on his blog, a member of Parliament from Okinawa recently went so far as to post an entry titled "Okinawa, It's Finally Time for Independence From Yamato," using the Okinawan word for the rest of Japan."Before, independence was just something we philosophized about over drinks," said Masahide Ota, a former governor of Okinawa, who is not a member of the movement."Now, it is being taken much more seriously."The independence movement remains nascent, with a few hundred active adherents at most. But Mr. Ota and others say it still has the potential to complicate Japan's unfolding contest with China for influence in the region.That struggle expanded recently to include what appears to be a semiofficial campaign in China to question Japanese rule of Okinawa. Some analysts see the campaign as a ploy to strengthen China's hand in a dispute over a smaller group of islands that has captured international headlines in recent months. Some Chinese scholars have called for exploiting the independence movement to say there are splits even in Japan over the legitimate ownership of islands annexed during Japan's imperial expansion in the late 19th century, as Okinawa and the smaller island group were.Okinawa has long looked and felt different from the rest of Japan, with the islands' tropical climate, vibrant musical culture and lower average incomes setting it apart. Strategically situated in the center of East Asia, the islands, once known as the Kingdom of the Ryukyus, have had a tortured history with Japan since the takeover, including the forced suicides of Okinawan civilians by Japanese troops during World War II and the imposition of American bases after the war.For years, Okinawans directed much of their ire over the bases at the United States. But that changed four years ago when the Japanese prime minister at the time, Yukio Hatoyama, reneged on campaign pledges to move the bustling Marine air base at Futenma off Okinawa, rather than to a less populated site on the island as previous governments had approved. After that, many Okinawans shifted much of their anger toward the rest of Japan, which wants the United States military presence to offset China's growing power, but is unwilling to shoulder more of the burden of bases for fear of crime, noise and accidents.
TOKYO — Japan may restart several reactors shut down by the Fukushima nuclear crisis in about a year, a senior regulator said in an interview on Tuesday, a day after new safety rules went into effect designed to avoid a repeat of the disaster.At the Fukushima Daiichi nuclear plant north of Tokyo, the site of the world's worst atomic disaster since Chernobyl in 1986, the situation took a turn for the worse as radiation levels in groundwater soared, suggesting highly toxic materials from the plant are now close to the Pacific Ocean.But Japan is forging ahead with attempts to restart idled reactors in the face of a sceptical public, after Fukushima highlighted weak oversight of the industry.That is meant to change with the new rules.Getting units restarted is a key government goal to reduce the import bill for fossil fuel to run conventional stations. Only two of Japan's 50 reactors are connected to the grid and operators applied to restart 10 on Monday."Some units are projected (to restart) one year from now, though I don't know how many," Kenzo Oshima, a commissioner of Japan's Nuclear Regulation Authority, told Reuters. "It is hard to imagine that all the applications would be rejected, though we don't know what the outcome will be at the moment."He did not identify the reactors that are likely to restart.Tokyo Electric Power Co, the operator of the Fukushima station, hit by the March 2011 earthquake and tsunami, said that an observation well between the damaged reactor No. 2 and the sea showed levels of radioactive caesium-134 were 90 times higher on Monday than they had been the previous Friday.Tokyo Electric, also known as Tepco, said it detected caesium-134 at 9,000 becquerels per litre, 150 times above Japan's safety standard. A becquerel is a measure of the release of radioactive energy.The reading for caesium-137, with a half life of 30 years, was some 85 times higher than it had been three days earlier.The latest findings, 25 metres (yards) from the sea, come a month after Tepco detected radioactive caesium in groundwater flowing into its wrecked plant far from the sea on elevated ground. The level of caesium found in June was much lower than the amount announced on Tuesday.The spike, combined with recent discoveries of high levels of radioactive elements like tritium and strontium, suggest that contaminated water is spreading toward the sea side of the plant from the reactors sitting on higher ground."We don't know what is the reason behind the spike," Tepco spokeswoman Mayumi Yoshida told Reuters. "We're still looking to determine the causes behind it."The operator has been flushing water over the three reactors to keep them cool for more than two years, but contaminated water has been building up at the rate of an an Olympic-size swimming pool per week.In April, Tepco warned it may run out of space to store the water and asked for approval to channel what it has described groundwater with low levels of radiation around the plant and to the sea through a "bypass". Local fishermen oppose the proposal.Tepco also announced that the plant's manager at the height of the crisis, when three reactors underwent meltdowns, died on Tuesday of oesophageal cancer - unrelated to his duties.Masao Yoshida was widely credited with preventing the situation from spiralling out of control when he ignored an order from Tepco executives to stop pouring seawater over the reactors to keep them from overheating further.He was one of a skeleton group of staff, known as the Fukushima 50, who remained at the plant at the height of the crisis, but he rarely spoke publicly about his experiences.
TOKYO — Japanese nuclear operators applied Monday to restart reactors under rules drawn up after the Fukushima disaster, but early approval is unlikely as a more independent regulator strives to show a skeptical public it is serious about safety.The governing Liberal Democratic Party of Japan and the utilities are eager to get reactors running again, with the reining in of soaring fuel costs a key part of Prime Minister Shinzo Abe's economic plan.But the Liberal Democrats must tread carefully to avoid compromising the independence of the new regulator, which is struggling to build credibility with a public whose faith in nuclear power was shaken after meltdowns at Tokyo Electric Power's Fukushima Daiichi plant.The Nuclear Regulation Authority has said it will take at least six months to review nuclear plants, after which the consent of communities that are host to reactors is needed.All but two of Japan's 50 reactors have been closed in the wake of the disaster in March 2011, which forced 160,000 people from their homes, many of whom are unlikely to be able to return for decades.Nuclear power accounted for about a third of Japan's electricity supply before the Fukushima catastrophe, the worst nuclear crisis since the Chernobyl accident in Ukraine in 1986.The disaster, caused by an earthquake and tsunami that knocked out power and cooling functions at the Fukushima plant, highlighted lax oversight of the powerful energy companies.Polls show that a majority of Japanese want to end reliance on atomic power and are opposed to restarting the plants. But the Liberal Democrats argue that nuclear energy will cut fuel costs that have pushed the country into a record trade deficit and will help return unprofitable utilities to profit.Hokkaido Electric Power, Kansai Electric Power, Shikoku Electric Power and Kyushu Electric Power applied to get 10 reactors restarted, the regulator said.Shunichi Tanaka, chairman of the Nuclear Regulation Authority, said Thursday that elevating safety culture to international standards would "take a long time."The regulator has said that its review of Japan's nuclear fleet may take more than three years.The difficulty the energy companies face in getting approvals was highlighted as Tokyo Electric held back from applying to get units started at its Kashiwazaki-Kariwa facility after the local authorities rebuffed the company's plans.The equipment improvements the reactors need to comply with the new rules could cost the industry as much as $12 billion, according to one estimate.About 80 Nuclear Regulation Authority staff members have been divided into three groups for the safety checks, with another group overseeing earthquake resistance.Japan is set to be without nuclear power again in September, for the first time since June 2012, as its only active reactors, Kansai Electric's Ohi No. 3 and No. 4 units, are scheduled to enter planned maintenance shutdowns.
The essence of a team sport is that it allows — demands even — that a player grow and adapt with the passing of time.On Monday morning, Andy Murray said that nothing in his life could ever be more special than winning Wimbledon for the first time. At 26, he has probably peaked, mentally, physically and materially.That same Monday morning, David Villa was sold by Barcelona to Atlético Madrid for little more than a tenth of the €40 million that Barça had paid for him three years ago. At 31, Villa has every incentive in his life to change his role, to become a different type of forward, to explore new ground, so to speak.That is where the team player, if he is smart, can challenge himself in a way that gets better with age. "The body slows down, but the brain speeds up," was the way that Anthony Dowell, the dancer who became artistic director of the Royal Ballet in London, once put it.For Murray, just as it was for Maria Sharapova when she won Wimbledon at only 17, the pinnacle demands the intensity of nearly gladiatorial proportions. But for Villa, the role conversion might yield three years, or more, of new rewards.On the face of, Villa is as singular as it gets in soccer.He has won the World Cup, won the Golden Boot as top scorer in a European Championship, and won every medal at the club and national team level that a career can offer. His 282 goals in 575 games played for Sporting Gijón, Zaragoza, Valencia and Barcelona, are surpassed by his record of 56 goals in 91 matches for his country thus far.Villa, alone among Spaniards, has topped 50 goals for his national side. Yet as Spain regroups after its heavy defeat to Brazil in the Confederations Cup last month, it is perfectly clear that the coach, Vicente Del Bosque, will be re-examining the so-called "false No. 9" formation that made his team so successful without an apparent out-and-out striker.Del Bosque now has less than a year before Spain must defend its World Cup, again in Brazil. When the coach goes back to his drawing board, he will obviously take form into account — and no doubt if Fernando Torres and David Villa, genuine pals as well as compatible forwards, have recaptured anything like their best work, then it will surely be Torres at No. 9 and Villa floating around him, often from the left, at No. 7.And Del Bosque believes in Villa. He once said, before the 2010 World Cup, that he would rather have David Villa than Kaká or Cristiano Ronaldo, the two outstanding players at Del Bosque's former club, Real Madrid.The coach spoke of Villa's courage, his decision making, his mobility and his rare combination of choosing the moment when to take the shot or when to be selfless and play in others.So why the move from Barcelona to Madrid? A combination of factors. Villa needed time to adapt his play, to get on the same wavelength as those unique passers and movers Lionel Messi, Andrés Iniesta and Xavi Hernández at Barça. His record there — 48 goals in 116 games — isn't bad, but it was interrupted by the second lengthy injury of his career.In childhood, the boy from the mining village of Langreo in the north of Spain had shattered his femur. While others doubted he would recover from that, Villa's father encouraged the youngster to work on developing the other foot to master the ball, just in case.The result is a two-footed striker. Then, playing for Barcelona at the Club World Cup in Yokohama, Japan, in December 2011, his tibia snapped. Once more it was a complicated fracture that cost Villa the rest of the season, along with Euro 2012.And as happens in sports, the team cannot wait for the individual. Pedro grew into Barça's attack during Villa's absence, and now there is the arrival of a superstar, Neymar, to link up (Barcelona hopes) with Messi.Hence the cut-rate sale. Villa made his choice this week between moving to a fresh challenge with the London team Tottenham Hotspur, or moving within a league he knows, to Madrid.He joins a team that has a spectacular affinity with fine strikers, though not a budget to hold them for very long. Diego Forlán, Sergio Agüero, and more recently Radamel Falcao have had phenomenal seasons in Atletico's red and white stripes, then moved on, which both profited the players and allowed the Madrid club to pay off some of its debts.Villa arrives there as an opportune time. Atlético holds the King's Cup and, as the third-place team in La Liga last season, plays in the Champions League. Villa has big shoes to fill in place of Falcao, who has taken the option of moving to the tax haven of Monaco.I can see Villa taking this chance all the way to the World Cup next summer. He is experienced, and Atlético has an experienced lineup to complement him. The team looks for a man to try to replace Falcao's instinctive striking quality, but whereas the Colombian Falcao often appeared almost out of the shadows to steal goals, Villa has always worked indefatigably for what came his way.This, though, is Villa's time to challenge himself. He might be 31 going on 26 because the year that his broken limb in Yokohama cost him — and the place in Barcelona's team — might well have meant less wear and tear and less energy expended during his recuperation.Everything he has ever achieved has been fired by desire. In his youth, he idolized Luís Enrique and Quini, who came from the same region, Asturias, as he did.Over time, his reputation outgrew theirs. The Spanish still call Villa by his Asturian nickname, El Guaje. Today, as a senior player still looking to enhance a record that no Spaniard could match, the last thing you would call him is the Kid.
SAPPORO, Japan — The showdown in June was brief and had little influence on the game, but it spoke volumes about one of the biggest stars to emerge in Japanese baseball in years.Shohei Otani of the Hokkaido Nippon Ham Fighters pinch-hit in the fourth inning against the Hanshin Tigers. The crowd of 22,000 fans at the Sapporo Dome buzzed — Otani is a flame-throwing pitcher who also hits well enough to play right field when not on the mound.The Fighters led, 1-0, and had runners on second and third base. With first base open, Randy Messenger, the Tigers' pitcher, worked carefully, tossing three balls before throwing a strike, with Otani taking. After a checked-swing strike, Otani walked, loading the bases.The Fighters failed to score, but the at-bat was a reminder that the fresh-faced Otani, who turned 19 on July 5, has quickly earned the respect of his rivals and the attention of fans. The most sought amateur player in Japan last year, he made waves when he declared that he wanted to become the first Japanese player to jump directly from high school to the major leagues. The Dodgers, the Red Sox and other teams scouted him.Otani's intention to leave scared away every team in Japan except the Fighters, who drafted him in the first round and persuaded him to start his career in Japan. They had a record to run on: nine years ago, the Fighters drafted Yu Darvish out of high school. He became an ace and helped the Fighters win several pennants before he signed a lucrative deal with the Texas Rangers.To the relief of Nippon Professional Baseball, which has struggled to attract young fans, Otani stayed in Japan. He was rewarded with a signing bonus of 100 million yen, or $1 million; the maximum rookie salary, 15 million yen ($150,000); and, for good measure, Darvish's old number, 11.As a sweetener, he was allowed to pitch and play another position, a rare concession in a sport driven increasingly by specialization. The decision ratcheted up the intense attention on Otani, who has quickly learned the careful art of the bland interview.But his performance has shown that he is no novelty. In fewer than 100 plate appearances, Otani, who hits left-handed and throws right-handed, has 13 doubles, a home run and a batting average solidly above .300. In five starts, he is 2-0 with a 4.21 earned run average. He was chosen to play in the All-Star Series as an outfielder. He also became the first Nippon Professional Baseball rookie since 1951 drafted out of high school to win a game as a pitcher and play another position in his first year.Otani's statistics are a far cry from those of Babe Ruth, the most famous player to pitch and play another position. In 1918, Ruth hit .300 with 11 home runs and had a 13-7 pitching record with a 2.22 E.R.A. Since 1900, only 13 major league players have pitched in at least 10 games and played in at least 10 others as a position player in the same season, according to the Elias Sports Bureau. No one has done it since 1947.But Otani's talents have triggered a parlor game of sorts: should he pitch, or should he hit?"It was a hard decision whether he'll be a pitcher or a hitter because he has a great bat and a great arm," said Toshimasa Shimada, an executive with the Fighters. "He was already throwing above 150 kilometers per hour in the minors," or about 93 miles per hour."You don't see many arms like that," Shimada said. "But you also don't see many players out of high school hitting .330 or .340."Shimada said the team would let Otani, who is 6-foot-4, decide which position he ultimately wanted to play. For now, the Fighters are focused on keeping him healthy. Otani, who lives in the team dormitory with the other rookies, sprained an ankle early in the season and missed a few weeks. He is essentially the sixth man in a six-man rotation and is rested on days before and after he pitches. The team has set a limit for him of 110 pitches per game."We're being very careful how he works," Shimada said.
There are lots of reasons to go to the movies. You might want to watch giant robots beat each other up or look at beautiful naked people or laugh. Or you might have a less remarked upon but perfectly legitimate reason: to feel bad.A well-made bummer can be a beautiful thing, and while many countries have distinguished histories in the genre, none currently outdo Japan when it comes to malaise and depression. The annual Japan Cuts festival, which runs through July 21 at Japan Society, includes a healthy selection of recent downers. Together they demonstrate that Japanese filmmakers can turn just about subject into an occasion for gloom.Japan produces other types of films, of course, and these are generously represented in the festival. The box office hit "Thermae Romae" is a comic romp about a designer of ancient Roman baths who finds a time portal to a contemporary Japanese bathhouse. "Rurouni Kenshin" is a live-action adaptation of a hugely popular manga series about Meiji-era swordplay.But there's no denying that a strain of melancholy runs through much of "Japan Cuts," sometimes explicitly tied to the country's ruinous modern history of war, economic decline and natural disaster. Perhaps the grimmest of the films available for preview is "A Woman and War," directed by Junichi Inoue, who equates the death spasms of imperial Japan in World War II with sexual violence in much the same way as the longtime provocateur Koji Wakamatsu. A private returns from the front lines in China minus his right arm and, as we gradually discover, most of his humanity; living nearby is a prostitute who has lost the ability to enjoy sex. Eventually their paths cross, after much discussion of Japan's future, a vivid bombing raid and a number of rapes and murders presented in an eerily matter-of-fact style.Most of the films under consideration here don't address Japan's travails so straightforwardly, but they share a style that cuts across genres and subjects: quiet and deliberate, with scenes playing out at length. You could call it contemplative and formal, or slow and static; you could also speculate about whether it's an aesthetic or a budgetary choice.The story of Miwa Nishikawa's "Dreams for Sale" is predicated on Japan's long economic downturn: when the restaurant of the chef Kanya (Sadao Abe) and his wife, Satoko (Takako Matsu), burns down, they can't afford to rebuild. But when Kanya — who is petulant, short and plain but has a genius for seduction — beds a former customer, Satoko has a brainstorm. With her help, he beguiles a series of lonely women, promising marriage while borrowing substantial sums of money."Dreams for Sale" mixes the slapstick of Kanya's serial romances with a doleful meditation on financial desperation and, less directly, on the crushing power of Japanese conformity: the women are willing to believe his lies because the pressure to marry is so intense. The last shot, in which a character takes a long look straight into the camera, hits a typical note: resignation mixed with defiance.Conformity is the central theme of "The Kirishima Thing," by Daihachi Yoshida, winner of best film and director at this year's Japan Academy Awards. A high school mystery that feels like a John Hughes or Cameron Crowe movie on downers, it's about the consequences of an act of renunciation: Kirishima, the big man on campus, quits the prestigious volleyball club and then fails to show up for school at all. He's an adolescent Godot, literally absent from classes and from the film, and the other students anxiously wait for him to reappear and explain himself.Mr. Yoshida plays tricks with time and narrative, redoing scenes from the perspectives of students on different rungs of the school's social ladder: band members, athletes and, at the bottom, film geeks. While the popular crowd obsesses about Kirishima, the film club goes about shooting its unauthorized zombie movie, whose dialogue provides the future auteurs' summary of high school life: "We fight back because we have to."Shuichi Okita's "Story of Yonosuke" is a life-affirming yarn that has drawn comparisons to "Forrest Gump" — its hero is a good-looking country bumpkin who goes to Tokyo for college in the go-go 1980s — but is much more restrained in its sentimentality. Still, it's the closest thing in the festival to an outright tearjerker.Yonosuke Yokomichi (Kengo Kora) has a time-honored combination of buffoonish awkwardness and healing life force, demonstrated in his clumsy but surprisingly successful encounters with women. Occasionally the movie jumps ahead 16 years for scenes in which his college friends realize how he changed their lives. Mr. Kora is admirably tough-minded in his portrayal of Yonosuke, emphasizing eccentricity and obnoxiousness over likability.Satoshi Miki, whose "Adrift in Tokyo" (2007) is a classic of Japanese anomie, adds to the canon with the black comedy "It's Me, It's Me." Like "Dreams for Sale," it's the story of a scam, but it quickly moves beyond that into a realm of creepy fantasy and poisoned allegory. Kazuya Kamenashi plays Hitoshi, frustrated and underemployed, who impulsively steals a cellphone and embarks on a popular swindle, persuading the owner's mother to wire money to a bank account. ("This is like one of those phone scams!" she says, a little turned on.)Hitoshi's criminal enterprise takes a strange turn when he discovers that a new Hitoshi, a dead ringer for him, has taken his place with his own mother: the identity thief's identity has been stolen, and soon more Hitoshis start to turn up. This isn't so bad when there are just three or four; the prototypically withdrawn young Japanese man enjoys a new sort of friendship because, as one of them says, "it's easier to have a relationship with yourself."The doppelgängers grow into a zombielike mob, however, and the telephone greeting "It's me," originally a deception, becomes a desperate plea for recognition. Mr. Miki brings the tale to a bloody and satisfyingly tricky conclusion, without losing the proper note of resignation. As the final showdown among the Hitoshis begins, the original sighs and delivers a 21st-century benediction: "This is so lame."
TOKYO — Prime Minister Shinzo Abe's ruling bloc remains on track for a big win in Sunday's upper house election, final surveys before the vote showed on Monday, a victory that would likely help end six years of parliamentary deadlock.The surveys showed support for Abe's conservative Liberal Democratic Party (LDP) far outstrips other parties, buoyed by hopes that his hyper-easy monetary policy, public spending and structural reform will bolster growth and jolt Japan out of years of stagnation.Voter preference polls taken on Saturday and Sunday and published by the Asahi and Mainichi dailies showed that 37 to 43 percent of voters wanted to vote for the LDP. Such support meant that, along with coalition partner the New Komeito, the LDP would likely win a majority in the upper house.It would also spell an end to the "twisted parliament" in which the opposition controls the upper house, hampering policy implementation, even if Abe's commitment to growth-generating and potentially painful reforms such as deregulation remains in doubt.Monday's surveys showed 8 percent of respondents wanted to vote for the New Komeito, ahead of the main opposition Democratic Party of Japan (DPJ) with 7 percent. Around a third of those surveyed did not support any party, and voter turn-out was expected to be low.Japan has suffered parliamentary gridlock ever since Abe led the LDP to a massive defeat in a 2007 upper house vote. He quit abruptly two months later due to the deadlock, plummeting support and ill health.The DPJ faced a similar headache after sweeping to power in 2009, only to lose a 2010 upper house election.The hawkish Abe, 58, returned to power in December for a rare second term after the LDP-led bloc handsomely won a December election for parliament's powerful lower house. The coalition, however, has since lacked a majority in the upper chamber, which can block legislation.
Doubles from about 29,000 yen, or $300 at 97 yen to the dollar.The Tokyo Station Hotel is a thoroughly modern update of the original Western-style hotel in Tokyo's landmark central railroad station, with 150 luxurious rooms. Reopened in October 2012 after a six-year renovation, the hotel dates back to 1915, a year after the station opened. The massive building they share is a rare relic of a brief architectural era, nearly obliterated by a 1923 earthquake and World War II firebombing, when Tokyo buildings took on a late Victorian and Edwardian look. In a city of skyscrapers and postwar concrete, it stands out with its domes, its red brick facade, and a long three-story profile that translates into almost humorously lengthy corridors in the hotel. (Fortunately, the trek to my room was pleasant: softly lighted and quiet, with plush carpet underfoot.)The hotel is in Marunouchi, the historical center of Tokyo, close to the Imperial Palace. Express trains from Narita Airport, as well as subways and trains from all over the city, arrive at the attached rail station.My king superior room, for 44,100 yen, was decorated with dark woods, heavy silk draperies, carpeting in a muted pattern suggestive of fleurs-de-lis, and a glass chandelier. Sturdy and attractive furniture was scattered about: a comfortable bed flanked by night stands with focused reading lights, an upholstered chair and glass cocktail table, a dresser. Channels in several languages were available on the large flat-screen television, and the latest issue of Time magazine's international edition was on the desk. Serenity reigned. Although I was in one of the world's busiest railroad stations, I never heard a train.Studio-apartment-size — not the size of the studio's bathroom, but of the whole apartment. Wooden blinds covered a wide floor-to-ceiling window, glass doors enclosed a bathing alcove with a gleaming white soaking tub and a spacious rain shower, and, in its own private sanctum, the toilet offered various rinsing and warming functions with a wall panel of controls. The white terry robes were thick and fluffy but not an improvement over the much more comfortable cotton yukata kimonos traditionally provided in Japanese hotels.I didn't have time to try the spa and fitness rooms, and didn't need the business center, but would not have missed the guests-only breakfast (3,960 yen) in an expansive, lofty room called the Atrium. This was a white-tablecloth buffet with Western-style and Japanese cuisine stations serving everything from shrimp and smoked salmon to omelets, French pastries, Japanese porridge, rice and seaweed.A "sandwich set" on three open-faced half slices of bread (2,200 yen) was ordered at 6:58 p.m., promised at 7:30, and arrived at 7:23, rolled in under a linen tablecloth. The food was tasty and satisfying, the presentation elegant. A request for milk, often a challenging order in Japan, elicited just one question: "Hot or cold?"In a city with many Western-style luxury hotels, this one offers a unique character and some reasonably affordable options, as well as very attractive rooms and excellent service.
TOKYO — Prime Minister Shinzo Abe of Japan is likely to win a mandate Sunday for his three-part recipe to end stagnation in the economy, but anyone expecting him to use it to push a big-bang overhaul agenda might need a reality check.Mr. Abe's bloc, led by his Liberal Democratic Party, is expected to win a hefty majority in elections for the upper house, ending a "twisted Parliament" in which the opposition controls the upper chamber. Surveys by the news media published Monday showed that Mr. Abe's party maintained a substantial lead over rivals.The stalemate in Parliament has hampered policies for most of the past six years since Mr. Abe, then in his first term as prime minister, and the Liberal Democratic Party suffered a humiliating defeat in the upper house. He resigned two months later and was followed by a string of short-term leaders.Mr. Abe, who returned to office in December for a rare second chance, will have few excuses for shying away from overhauls, including deregulation, that many see as vital to generating growth, but his commitment to doing so remains in doubt."What's required is the kind of thoroughgoing reform that Mr. Abe doesn't seem to have the vision or stomach for," said Jun Okumura, a senior adviser for the Eurasia Group, a political risk research and consulting firm, and former official at the Japanese Ministry of Economy, Trade and Industry."Just because he wins an election doesn't mean vested interests will be any more amenable to changes that would affect them negatively," he added. "A leader can do a lot with the ability to appoint and dismiss cabinet members, and ultimately, the right to call a general election.Hopes for Mr. Abe's prescription of low interest rates, big spending and steps to promote growth — nicknamed Abenomics — pushed up Tokyo share prices and weakened the yen even before his bloc won the December election for the powerful lower house.Business executives and economists welcomed his decision in March to join talks on the U.S.-led Trans-Pacific Partnership, or T.P.P., trade pact, despite fierce opposition from the farm lobby, a traditional backer of the Liberal Democrats.Advocates say joining the pact would open Japan's economy to competition and increase momentum for deregulation to ignite growth."T.P.P. is not about agriculture reform; it's about whether Japan sits at the table when global rules are made and doing whatever it takes to be a first-rate power," said Jesper Koll, head of equities research at J.P. Morgan in Tokyo.Mr. Abe has also backed changes in the energy sector that would break up regional utility monopolies, also powerful supporters of his party, although a political scuffle just before a Parliament session ended in June prevented an overhaul bill from passing.Optimists argue that the desire of Mr. Abe and like-minded nationalists for a strong economy to ensure Japan's place on the global stage will keep up pressure for overhauls — a 21st-century version of the "Enrich the Country, Strengthen the Army" slogan of the late 19th-century reformers who modernized Japan."I think he sees a genuine challenge to the sovereignty and power of the country," said Robert Feldman, chief economist at Morgan Stanley MUFG in Tokyo.But reaction to Mr. Abe's so-called third arrow of structural overhauls, unveiled in June, has been tepid, prompting the prime minister and his aides to promise that more is in store after the upper house election.Among the areas where critics want bolder steps are agrarian land policy, labor market measures to make it easier for companies to get out of money-losing businesses and shift to growth sectors, cuts in the corporate tax rate and an easing of barriers to immigration to cope with Japan's aging and shrinking population.A split among Mr. Abe's growth strategists between those who see a big role for government in picking and backing new growth sectors, and those who want government to get out of the way to allow innovation, also clouds the outlook for overhauls.Too decisive a victory on Sunday could make it harder for Mr. Abe to push through the sort of changes that would harm traditional Liberal Democratic supporters.Such a win would raise the number of members of Parliament with ties to vested interests and increase complacency in the party.Some media forecasts give Mr. Abe's party a shot at winning an upper house majority on its own for the first time since 1989. With no national election required again until 2016, members keeping quiet now are likely to become more vocal after Sunday."Are we dealing with Japanese politics?" said Mr. Koll of J.P. Morgan. "The answer is yes. Will there be compromise? You bet. The risk of compromise moving to the forefront gets bigger the bigger they win."Mr. Abe will also face a tough decision in the autumn on whether to give the go-ahead for a plan to raise the sales tax to 8 percent from 5 percent next year, the first stage in a scheduled doubling by October 2015 to help limit the huge public debt.Some party members fear the tax increase would derail a recovery, but postponing it could cause havoc in financial markets, where the delay would be taken as a signal of reneging on fiscal overhaul.The International Monetary Fund, while giving a cautious approval to Abenomics, has warned of risks if Japan does not both cut its debt — already twice the size of its $5 trillion economy — and enact structural overhauls.
TOKYO — Japan's prime minister appealed to nationalism during a campaign stop Wednesday near disputed islands in the East China Sea, saying China's increased activity in the area challenged Japan's security in territory that Tokyo would never compromise over.Prime Minister Shinzo Abe made the remarks in Ishigaki, an island about 150 kilometers (95 miles) southeast of the Japanese-controlled islands called Senkaku, which China also claims and calls Diaoyu. Abe is known for his hawkish security policy and nationalistic remarks, comments that have hurt Japan's relations with Asian neighbors."Today, we face a continuing provocation to our country's territorial land, sea and airspace," Abe said in an address to about 50 coast guard officers during his visit to Ishigaki, where he campaigned ahead of Sunday's parliamentary elections.Abe said incursions by Chinese ships into the area around the disputed islands made "our country's territorial security environment an extremely challenging one." He urged the coast guard to boost their watchfulness.Abe also took to the streets to make his campaign appeal to Ishigaki voters."Senkaku is undoubtedly Japan's inherent territory. Clearly, there is no territorial problem here. We will not make any compromise, not even a step, on this matter," he said.Abe made a similar address Wednesday to soldiers stationed on Miyako island. Tougher territorial defense has been part of the campaign platform for Abe's ruling Liberal Democratic Party.Japan nationalized the Senkaku in September to strengthen its territorial claims, leading to a diplomatic row between Tokyo and Beijing. Since then, official Chinese vessels have entered Japanese-claimed waters around the islands on 52 days, according to Japan's coast guard.With the economy showing signs of improving under Abe's policies, his party is expected to win a comfortable majority in the upper house, allowing the governing coalition to regain control of both houses.
TOKYO — Prime Minister Shinzo Abe's ruling coalition is expected to secure a big victory in Sunday's upper house election, surveys showed on Wednesday, resolving six years of parliamentary stalemate and further weakening the opposition.Support for Abe's Liberal Democratic Party has consistently far outstripped that for other parties in the run up to the election, buoyed by hopes that his push for hyper-easy monetary policy, public spending and structural reforms would reinvigorate Japan's economy.Half of the upper house's 242 seats come up for election every three years.Voter preference polls taken between Sunday and Tuesday published by the Kyodo News agency, the Nikkei and Yomiuri dailies showed the LDP and its coalition partner, the New Komeito, were likely to win more than 70 of the 121 seats up for grabs.That would secure a majority in the upper house for Abe's bloc. It would also end the "twisted parliament", in which the opposition controls the upper house, giving it the ability to hamper policy implementation.However, even with control of both houses of parliament, there are doubts about the extent of Abe's commitment to potentially painful reforms that critics say are needed to revive the economy's growth over the longer term.The surveys showed the main opposition Democratic Party of Japan could suffer its worst electoral defeat in its 15-year history, dealing another blow to the party that was kicked out of power in December's lower house elections.The DPJ held 44 seats up for grabs this time but was likely to come away with fewer than half that number, the Nikkei poll said. Other opposition parties like free market proponents Your Party could gain some seven seats, while the conservative Japan Restoration Party could get around six, Kyodo's poll shows.Still, the Nikkei poll found about a fifth of voters are undecided. Voter turn-out is expected to be low.Japan has suffered parliamentary gridlock ever since Abe led the LDP to a massive defeat in a 2007 upper house vote. He quit abruptly two months later.The DPJ faced a similar headache after sweeping to power in 2009, only to lose a 2010 upper house election.The hawkish Abe, 58, returned to power for a rare second term after the December lower house election.
TOKYO — All Nippon Airways and Japan Airlines, the world's biggest operators of Boeing's 787 Dreamliner, said on Tuesday that they had completed emergency checks on their fleet and found no threats to safety after a fire occurred inside a parked 787 jet at Heathrow Airport last week.British safety investigators are examining whether a malfunction in an emergency locater transmitter, or any other equipment in the rear of the parked Ethiopian Airlines plane, set off or fueled the fire on Friday.The fire, which caused no injuries, nevertheless came as an unwelcome reminder of the overheating lithium-ion batteries that prompted a worldwide grounding of 787 jets early this year.The transmitter, which would send out the plane's location after a crash, is powered by a smaller, lithium-manganese battery. Britain's Air Accidents Investigation Branch has essentially ruled out that the larger lithium-ion batteries played a role in the fire, but it confirmed on Tuesday that the transmitter "is one of several components being looked at in detail." The agency added that it would be premature to speculate on the causes of the fire at this stage.Industry officials said there were not many other components near the transmitter, which is in the ceiling in front of the plane's tail. They said investigators were also checking electrical wiring and distribution boxes as well as parts of the oxygen and air-conditioning systems for any clues to how the fire started or spread.Investigators also have not said whether Ethiopian crews performed any maintenance on these systems during the eight hours that the jet was parked at Heathrow, near London.All Nippon, which operates 20 Dreamliners, said it had completed checks on the rear sections of the jets, removing ceiling panels in that area and making sure that all the wiring was properly connected.It also looked for any signs of charring and other abnormalities on the transmitter, and found nothing amiss.The airline carried out the checks on Sunday and Monday, said Megumi Tezuka, an All Nippon spokeswoman based in Tokyo. All Nippon decided to carry out the inspections even though it had not received any specific instructions or guidance to do so from Boeing or Japanese regulators, she said."We found nothing that would prompt us to ground the planes or take any other action for now," she said. The airline was awaiting further information from British investigators and Boeing on the cause of the fire.Japan Airlines, which operates eight Dreamliners, said it had also completed checks on the planes over a long holiday weekend in Japan and continued to fly them."We remain in close contact with Boeing and are waiting to receive further information," said a Japan Airlines spokesman, Hisanori Iizuka.The two Japanese airlines together own more than 40 percent of the Dreamliners delivered so far.In January, when a fire broke out on a parked Japan Airlines jet, and smoke forced an All Nippon flight to make an emergency landing, both episodes were set off by the plane's lithium-ion batteries. Those batteries, used more extensively in the 787 than in any other commercial plane, supply power when the jet is on the ground and provide backup power for the flight systems when it is in the air.The episodes prompted regulators around the world to ground the innovative planes, which use lightweight carbon composites to cut fuel costs, until Boeing made the batteries more fireproof. Flights resumed in late April.The lithium-manganese battery in the transmitter weighs 6.6 pounds, compared with 63 pounds for each of the batteries that overheated in January. Any indication that the transmitter is to blame would be a relief to Boeing, because it is used in many jets and is not a new feature of the 787.
BEIJING/TOKYO — Two of China's top newspapers accused Japanese Prime Minister Shinzo Abe on Thursday of dangerous politics that could threaten regional security, as Tokyo warned Beijing not to expand gas exploration in disputed waters of the East China Sea.The People's Liberation Army Daily said Abe was trying to play the "China threat" angle, to win votes in July 21 elections, with a visit on Wednesday to Japan's southern island of Ishigaki, near islets claimed by both China and Japan.Territorial claims by Japan and China over the uninhabited islets and resource-rich waters in the East China Sea, as well as China's claims over the South China Sea, rank as some of Asia's biggest security risks.During the visit to Ishigaki island, Abe repeated Tokyo's stand that the nearby disputed Senkaku islands, called the Diaoyu by China, are inherent Japanese territory, adding that he has no intention of conceding even one step."This kind of 'drinking poison to slake ones thirst' not only threatens regional stability, it gives encouragement to Japan's 'turn to the right'," said the daily.Abe wants to revise Japan's constitution, drafted by the United States after World War Two, to formalise the country's right to have a military. Critics say his plan could return Japan to a socially conservative, authoritarian past.The People's Liberation Army Daily said Abe could not have chosen a worse time to visit Ishigaki, which lies some 160 km (100 miles) from the uninhabited islets the two nations contest."You cannot criticise a national leader for visiting his country's own territory but in a situation where the dispute over the Diaoyu Islands is continuing and the situation is complex and sensitive, Abe's actions are doubtless extremely dangerous and irresponsible," the paper, the official publication of China's military, said in a commentary.The ruling Communist Party's official People's Daily warned that China would never allow itself to be trampled on again, a reference to China's bitter memories of Japan's invasion of the country ahead of and during World War Two.In a commentary published under the pen name "Zhong Sheng", or "voice of China", the newspaper said that Abe was looking for excuses to re-arm Japan and that the dispute with China was a convenient way of pushing this."The aim is to create tension and provoke incidents, to push Japan's military development," it said.Patrol ships from both nations routinely shadow each other near the islands, raising concerns about an unintended clash.On Thursday, three Chinese surveillance vessels sailed into what Japan considers its territorial waters near the isles on what Beijing said was a routine patrol.The Japan Coast Guard said the ships later left its territorial water but remain in the contiguous area.The territorial dispute between China and Japan was further complicated on Wednesday with news that Chinese state-run oil companies plan to develop seven new gas fields in the East China Sea, possibly siphoning gas from the seabed beneath waters claimed by Japan.Beijing had slowed exploration in the energy-rich East China Sea but is now rapidly expanding its hunt for gas, a cheaper and cleaner energy to coal and oil imports.Japanese Chief Cabinet Secretary Yoshihide Suga said his government had asked China about the plans, first reported by Reuters."If the Chinese side is to proceed unilaterally with development in the area over which there are conflicting claims, Japan would never accept it," Suga told a regular news conference on Thursday.
TOKYO — Steam or vapors appeared to be coming from a damaged reactor building at Japan's tsunami-crippled nuclear plant Thursday, but the plant operator said radiation levels were steady.The video images showed a small amount of vapor or steam, but the origin wasn't clear. It was detected in the morning and was continuing in the afternoon.The reactor's spent fuel pool was stable and measurements of the temperatures and pressure have not changed significantly, Tokyo Electric Power Co. said.Workers were continuing to inject water into the No. 3 reactor to cool it, the utility said.The No. 3 reactor was one of three at the Fukushima Dai-ichi plant where the nuclear cores overheated and melted after the 2011 earthquake and tsunami. Radiation spewed from the plant and still contaminates the air, water and soil nearby.TEPCO is relying on a makeshift system of hoses and pumps to keep the reactors from overheating, and the site still is littered with damaged vehicles, twisted metal and other debris left by the waves that swept through the plant and knocked out its power. The utility has estimated that shutting down the plant will take 40 years.The Fukushima accident was the world's worst nuclear disaster since Chernobyl in 1986. Thousands of people have been unable to return to their homes near the plant because radiation levels are still high.Most of Japan's nuclear reactors remain shut down for safety checks following the disaster.
(Reuters) - The National Hockey League (NHL) and International Ice Hockey Federation (IIHF) reached an agreement to free players for the 2014 Sochi Olympics on Friday after nearly four years of intense and sometimes bitter negotiations.After the 2010 Vancouver Games unhappy NHL owners signaled through Commissioner Gary Bettman that they were prepared to end their Olympic participation, triggering years of talks followed by months of grinding negotiations before finally producing the long-awaited deal."The National Hockey League features the most international player population in professional sports, and our outstanding athletes take tremendous pride in representing their homelands on the global stage," Bettman said in a statement."The decision to participate in the XXII Olympic Winter Games in Sochi was in many ways a difficult one but one that we know will be well received by our players and, most importantly, by the vast majority of our fans and sports fans everywhere."News of an agreement was welcomed by both players and hockey fans around the world, including Canadian Prime Minister Stephen Harper who tweeted, "I'm pleased to hear that @NHL players will be competing in #Sochi. Like all Canadians I can't wait to see how Team Canada takes shape!"Pittsburgh Penguins captain Sidney Crosby, who scored the overtime goal against the United States that gave Canada the gold medal in Vancouver, could not hide his delight about getting the chance to defend the country's Olympic title."I'm glad that we are going and obviously excited to kind of start the process," Crosby said on a conference call. "The biggest thing is just representing your country."Anybody who gets the chance to do that there is a lot of pride that comes with that and being Canadian and playing hockey that's a dream come true."As part of the agreement, the NHL will halt its 2013-14 regular season to allow about 120 players the chance to compete in the February 12-23 tournament.Few other details of the deal were immediately available, however, the list of NHL demands was long and well-known.NHL owners had loudly complained about what they perceived as second class treatment by the International Olympic Committee (IOC) and wanted some form of compensation for shutting down operations in the middle of the season and turning over their most important assets - the players.The key issues standing in the way of an agreement were believed to center on insurance, travel, access to players and hospitality for players' and owners' families.The NHL also wanted to be treated more like a rights holder or top sponsor such as McDonald's, allowing the league greater access to video and other Games-related media material so it can trade on the Olympic brand to help sell and promote its product.Negotiations were often contentious with Bettman arguing the league did not necessarily need the Olympics while IIHF chief Rene Fasel insisted they did, telling CBC in an interview earlier this year; "I think Gary has no other choice. He has to come to Sochi."Since the 1998 Nagano Winter Games, when NHL players made their Olympic debut, owners insisted they have seen diminishing returns on their investment, particularly when the event is held outside North America and games cannot be aired in prime time.But the NHL was under increasing pressure to get a deal done with many Russian players, including Washington Capitals captain Alexander Ovechkin, warning they would compete in Sochi no matter what the league decided.Russian President Vladimir Putin also urged the NHL to get a deal done while NBC, which paid $775 million for the U.S. broadcast rights to the Sochi Games, would have expressed its hopes at having NHL players in Russia after inking a 10-year $2 billion television deal with the league."Although there were many details to discuss with our partners NHL and NHLPA, there was never any doubt in my mind that we would not continue the tradition from Nagano, Salt Lake City, Turin and Vancouver," said Fasel, who is also a member of the powerful IOC executive committee, in a statement. "The modern Olympic era is about sportive competition on the highest possible level."This is what fans around the world expect from a 100-metre race or downhill skiing and this is also what they are entitled to expect from our sport."
NEW YORK — After weeks of tough negotiations, the NHL and its players reached a deal with the International Ice Hockey Federation on Friday to put the season on hold again so the game's biggest stars can compete next year in the Sochi Olympics.Putting a stop to another season one year after the damaging lockout created a shortened, 48-game campaign was hardly an optimal plan for the NHL. But an agreement was made to allow the top players to take part in the Olympics for the fifth straight time."Our outstanding athletes take tremendous pride in representing their homelands on the global stage," NHL Commissioner Gary Bettman said in a joint announcement with the players' association. "The decision to participate in the XXII Olympic Winter Games in Sochi was in many ways a difficult one, but one that we know will be well received by our players and, most importantly, by the vast majority of our fans and sports fans everywhere."NHL players first went to the Olympics for the 1998 Nagano Games. Now they will be available to the 12 national teams that will comprise the hockey tournament from Feb. 12-23. More than 120 NHL players are expected to compete in Sochi while the league takes a break for 2½ weeks from Feb. 9-26."You find out pretty quickly that an Olympic-year schedule is a little more condensed and a little more intense than a typical year," Pittsburgh Penguins captain Sidney Crosby said during a conference call. "You have to take advantage of your days off because it is condensed."Playing that condensed schedule then going right into basically a pretty intense playoff atmosphere, every game is like a Game 7. Then coming back from that, you basically go from being at that level of intensity to regular-season games."Crosby is a veteran of this type of schedule, having served as an alternate captain at the 2010 Vancouver Games when Canada captured the gold medal. Crosby scored the "Golden Goal" in overtime against the United States to win the championship."It's gone by really fast," he said. "With injuries and stuff like that, too, it wasn't like there were three full hockey seasons to kind of look back on."It's exciting. You start to kind of think about it with it being announced that we're going."Friday's announcement paved the way for the NHL to reveal the schedule for the upcoming regular season. That had been held up until a resolution was made on Olympic participation. The league said Friday the 2013-14 regular season will begin Oct. 1.Long gone are the days in which college and amateur players made up Olympic hockey teams like the 1980 United States "Miracle on Ice" squad that captured gold in Lake Placid, N.Y.Former NHL head coach Tom Renney, now an associate coach with the Detroit Red Wings, led Canada to the silver medal at the Olympics in Lillehammer, Norway, in 1994 — the last Games without NHL players. He is on board with professionals taking part."I am a big fan of Olympic hockey and still hold 1994 and Lillehammer very close to my heart," Renney told The Associated Press in an email. "I am all for the NHL participating in the Olympic Games."The Olympic experience gives many a break in a busy schedule, which is never a bad thing. Coaches and many players can regroup, recover, rest, etc. At the end of the day, it is good for all involved in hockey to have the NHL participate in the Olympics, and the positive ramifications outweigh the negative."But with increased logistic issues such as insurance, travel and disruption of the regular season, there is no guarantee NHL players will be back at the Olympics in 2018 and beyond."The players are very pleased that an agreement has been reached that will allow the world's best hockey players to compete at the Winter Games in February," said Don Fehr, the players' association executive director. "Having the opportunity to wear their nation's sweater in Sochi is something the players look forward to."Bettman, Fehr and IIHF President Rene Fasel met for more than five hours July 1 — the day after the NHL draft — at league headquarters in New York and made progress toward a deal that took nearly three more weeks to hammer out."I am very happy with the result of the constructive discussions which will ensure that once again we will see the world's top ice hockey players competing at the Olympic Games," IOC President Jacques Rogge said in a statement. "I would like to thank all parties involved for making this happen ahead of Sochi 2014."The biggest challenge the NHL faces every time the Olympics come is the need to stop the hockey season for several weeks so its players can go. That became a bigger factor this time because of last season's lockout that delayed the start of the campaign until late January."Although there were many details to discuss with our partners NHL and NHLPA, there was never any doubt in my mind that we would not continue the tradition from Nagano, Salt Lake City, Turin and Vancouver," Fasel said in a separate statement. "The modern Olympic era is about sportive competition on the highest possible level. This is what fans around the world expect from a 100-meter race or downhill skiing and this is also what they are entitled to expect from our sport."It is the obligation of the IIHF toward our fans that the biggest sports show on Earth has the best players, and toward our member associations that they are able to select the best players that their educational systems have developed. I would like to thank NHL Commissioner Gary Bettman and NHLPA Executive Director Don Fehr for their cooperation."As part of the deal, seven NHL referees and six NHL linesmen will join the IIHF on-ice officials' crews that will work the men's tournament. It will be played according to the IIHF rulebook on the bigger international-sized rinks."Most countries have a national program that includes best on best at various competitions, from Under 16, 17, 18, and 20," Renney said. "It makes sense then that this high performance philosophy is maintained with the world's best adult players competing against each other in the Olympics."Crosby, who was left off Canada's Olympic team during his rookie NHL season in 2006, never really doubted that NHL players would be back for the Sochi Games."I think everyone thought it was just a matter of time, working out logistics," he said. "With it being a little further in Russia, I'm sure there was a little bit more work to do. I'm glad that we're going, and obviously excited to kind of start the process."Soon enough he will shooting for a golden repeat."When you play for Canada, that's the expectation," Crosby said. "You realize pretty quickly that people come together that time of year especially. When it's hockey even more so."You want to go there and find a way to win gold."
TOKYO — Japanese were voting Sunday in a parliamentary election expected to give Prime Minister Shinzo Abe's ruling coalition a strong mandate, though initial reports showed turnout to be lackluster.A victory would give Abe's Liberal Democratic Party and partner New Komeito control of both chambers of parliament — an elusive goal for the government in recent years. It also may provide the wherewithal for difficult economic reforms and progress on Abe's a conservative political agenda that could further complicate already testy relations with China and South Korea.Abe says his top priority is to sustain the economic recovery helped along by aggressive monetary and fiscal stimulus since he took office in late December. In the long run, that will require sweeping changes to boost competitiveness and help cope with Japan's rapidly graying population and bulging national debt."I want them to carry on doing their best as the economy seems to be picking up," said Naohisa Hayashi, a 35-year-old man who runs his own business.Despite the potentially huge stakes for the election, early turnout was fitful, local media reported, with the rate of voters casting ballots down several percentage points in most areas.The Liberal Democrats' "Abenomics" economic program has borne some fruit, lifting the stock market, boosting business confidence and helping exporters by weakening the yen.But Abe faces a decision this fall on whether to follow through on raising the sales tax next April from 5 percent to 8 percent — a move many worry will derail the recovery."We are now doubtlessly on the verge of economic recovery where the money flow becomes cyclical inside society. This is the only way to go. That is why we cannot lose this election," Abe said during a rally Saturday.A convincing victory in Sunday's vote, where half the 242 seats in the less powerful upper house of parliament are up for grabs, may also embolden Abe and his backers in the LDP to pursue a nationalistic agenda he was unable to pursue when his first time in office, in 2006-2007, was cut short after he resigned for health reasons.After more than two decades of economic doldrums, the Japanese public has grown weary of political bickering and ineffectual leadership. Bereft of an effective, united political opposition, they have opted for the perceived safety of the Liberal Democrats, who have ruled Japan for most of the past seven decades.Retiree Isao Arai, 79, said he was fed up with the political confusion and paralysis that has dominated in recent years."With the recent political situation, party policies were complicated and hard to understand," he said.The Liberal Democrats' "Recover Japan" platform calls a strong economy, strategic diplomacy and unshakable national security under the Japan-U.S. alliance, which allows for 50,000 American troops to be stationed in Japan.They also favor revising the country's pacifist constitution, drafted by the United States after World War II, to give Japan's military a larger role — a message that alarms Beijing but resonates with some voters troubled by territorial disputes with China and South Korea and widespread distrust of an increasingly assertive Beijing.Abe has upset both neighbors by saying he hoped to revise a 1995 apology by Japan for its wartime aggression and questioning the extent to which Korean, Chinese and other Asian women were forced to provide sex for Japanese soldiers before and during World War II.Revising the constitution would require two-thirds approval by both houses of parliament and a national referendum. Polls show the public are less interested in such matters than in reviving the economy and rebuilding areas of northeastern Japan devastated by the March 2011 tsunami.Very little progress has been made on reconstruction two-and-a-half years after that disaster, or on cleaning up from the ensuing nuclear disaster at the crippled Fukushima Dai-Ichi plant that has most of Japan's nuclear reactors still closed for safety checks.Despite considerable public opposition to nuclear power in the wake of the 2011 Fukushima disaster, many voters appear to be willing to support the pro-nuclear LDP because they are attaching a higher priority to economic and security issues.Associated Press writers Malcolm Foster and Emily Wang contributed to this report.
TOKYO — Japanese Prime Minister Shinzo Abe's ruling coalition won a solid majority in the upper house of parliament in elections, gaining control of both chambers and a mandate to press ahead with difficult economic reforms.The win is an endorsement of the Liberal Democratic Party's "Abenomics" program, which has helped spark a tentative economic recovery in Japan. It's also a vindication for Abe, who lost upper house elections in 2007 during his previous stint as prime minister."We've won the public's support for decisive and stable politics so that we can pursue our economic policies, and we will make sure to live up to the expectations," Abe told public broadcaster NHK late Sunday after he was projected to win based on exit polls and early results. Official results were expected sometime Monday.The victory also offers the hawkish Abe more leeway to advance his conservative policy goals, including revising the country's pacifist constitution and bolstering Japan's military, which could further strain ties with key neighbors China and South Korea, who are embroiled in territorial disputes with Japan.Controlling both houses of parliament has been an elusive goal in recent years. A divided parliament has had difficulty passing legislation, and voters fed up with the gridlock and high leadership turnover appeared willing to opt for the perceived safety of the LDP, which has ruled Japan for most of the post-World War II era.Abe said voters supported the LDP to push his party's economic policies and said it would be the government's top priority."Now that we got rid of the twisted parliament, the LDP is going to face a test of whether we can push forward the economic policies so that the people can really feel the effect on their lives," Abe told NHK.Japan's stagnant economy is showing signs of perking up, helped by the aggressive monetary and fiscal stimuli that Abe has implemented since he took office in late December. Stocks have surged, business confidence is improving and the weaker yen has eased pressure on vital exporters."I want them to carry on doing their best as the economy seems to be picking up," Naohisa Hayashi, a 35-year-old man who runs his own business, said after casting his ballot in Tokyo.But long-term growth will depend on sweeping changes to boost competitiveness and help cope with Japan's rapidly graying population and soaring national debt. Such reforms, long overdue, are bound to prove difficult even with control of both chambers of parliament.Abe also faces a decision this fall on whether to follow through on raising the sales tax next April from 5 percent to 8 percent, a move needed to shore up Japan's public finances, but one that many worry will derail the recovery.Based on preliminary results collated by local media, the LDP and its coalition partner, New Komeito, won a combined 76 seats, giving them a total of 133 seats in the upper house, more than the 122 needed for a majority.The LDP won 65 seats, which together with the 50 it held before the elections gives it 115, short of an outright majority.The main opposition Democratic Party of Japan, which fell from power in December elections, lost nearly 27 seats.Voter turnout was low, suggesting a lack of public enthusiasm. According to Kyodo News agency, 52 percent of eligible voters cast ballots, the third-lowest turnout since the end of World War II.The Liberal Democrats' "Recover Japan" platform calls a strong economy, strategic diplomacy and unshakable national security under the Japan-U.S. alliance, which allows for 50,000 American troops to be stationed in Japan.The party also favors revising the country's pacifist constitution, drafted by the United States after World War II, to give Japan's military a larger role — a message that alarms the Chinese government but resonates with some Japanese voters troubled by territorial disputes with China and South Korea and widespread distrust of an increasingly assertive Beijing.Abe has upset both neighbors by saying he hopes to revise a 1995 apology by Japan for its wartime aggression and questioning the extent to which Korean, Chinese and other Asian women were forced to provide sex for Japanese soldiers before and during World War II.Revising the constitution would require two-thirds approval by both houses of parliament and a national referendum. Polls show the public is less interested in such matters than in reviving the economy and rebuilding areas of northeastern Japan devastated by the March 2011 earthquake and tsunami.In his interview with NHK on Sunday night, Abe said he would not rush the debate on constitutional revision and seeks to "expand and deepen" discussion to gain public support over time. He said there was still some homework to do, including finalizing details of a national referendum.Abe also hinted at possibly cooperating with the new Restoration Party, co-led by outspoken Osaka Mayor Toru Hashimoto, in trying to reach the two-thirds majority. Hashimoto stirred up controversy in May when he said that Japan's wartime system of using Asian women in battlefront brothels was necessary at the time.Chief Cabinet Secretary Yoshihide Suga said the LDP would try to make progress on constitutional revision because it's the party's long-cherished goal."We have sought to revise the constitution in order to have one of our own. We have finally come to a point where a revision is a realistic option. We would definitely want to deepen a discussion," Suga told broadcaster NTV.Associated Press writers Elaine Kurtenbach, Mari Yamaguchi and Kaori Hitomi contributed to this report.
TOKYO — Japanese Prime Minister Shinzo Abe's ruling coalition scored a decisive victory in an election on Sunday - so big that there are suspicions he will lose interest in difficult economic reforms and pursue his nationalist agenda instead.The victory in the vote for parliament's upper house gives Abe a stronger mandate for his prescription for reviving the stagnant economy. Coincidentally, it could also give lawmakers in his own party, some of whom have little appetite for painful but vital reforms, more clout to resist change.Public broadcaster NHK said early on Monday Abe's Liberal Democratic Party (LDP) and its coalition partner, the New Komeito party, had won 76 of the 121 seats up for grabs in the 242-seat upper house.With the coalition's uncontested 59 seats, that ensures it a comfortable majority, tightening Abe's grip on power and raising the chances of a long-term Japanese leader for the first time since the reformist Junichiro Koizumi's rare five-year term ended in 2006.It also ends a parliamentary deadlock that began in 2007 when Abe, then in his first term as premier, led the LDP to a humiliating upper house defeat that later forced him to resign. The LDP fell short of a majority on its own on Sunday.Abe, who returned to power after his coalition's big win in a December lower house poll, repeated on Sunday that he would focus on fixing the world's third-biggest economy with his "Abenomics" mix of hyper-easy monetary policy, fiscal spending and a growth strategy including reforms such as deregulation."We've argued that our economic policies aren't mistaken, and the public gave us their support. People now want to feel the benefits. The economy indeed is improving," a weary but confident-sounding Abe said at LDP headquarters late on Sunday after his ruling coalition's victory was assured."We'd like to do our best to generate a positive cycle - in which job conditions improve and wages rise, boosting personal consumption and prompting companies to invest more - as soon as possible," he said.But some, including Japanese businesses with a big stake in the matter, worry the hawkish leader will shift to focus on the conservative agenda that has long been central to his ideology.That agenda includes revising the post-war pacifist constitution, strengthening Japan's defense posture and recasting Tokyo's wartime history with a less apologetic tone.Despite the hefty win, the strength of Abe's mandate was diluted by low voter turnout. Media reported turnout was 52.61 percent, more than 5 percentage points below the turnout in the last upper house poll in 2010. That could keep up pressure to stay focused on the economy.For now, many experts suggest, Abe is unlikely to turn his back on economic matters as he tries to beef up his so-far disappointing economic reform plans. He also confronts a decision on whether to go ahead with raising the 5 percent sales tax to 8 percent next April, part of a planned doubling by October 2015 aimed at reining in Japan's massive public debt."My understanding is that Abe-san has three faces: Abe as right-wing, Abe as a pragmatist, Abe as the economic reformer," said Shinichi Kitaoka, president of the International University of Japan. "He has been showing the third face so far and will try to do the same after the election."Still, Abe is moving toward security policy changes that mark a big shift in a country that has prided itself on pacifist ideals even as it built up a military bigger than Britain's.Among those changes are an expected reinterpretation of the constitution to end a self-imposed ban on exercising the right of collective self-defense, or aiding an ally under attack, such as if an unpredictable North Korea launched a missile attack on security ally the United States.Another is a review of defense policies that include a consideration of acquiring the capability to attack enemy bases when an attack is imminent and no other options exist, and creation of a Marines division to protect remote islands such as those at the core of a heated territorial row with China.One clue to how Abe intends to proceed on the touchy topic of wartime history will be whether he visits the Yasukuni Shrine for war dead, where Japanese leaders convicted as war criminals by an Allied tribunal are also honored, on the emotive August 15 anniversary of Japan's defeat in World War Two.A pilgrimage to the shrine would outrage China, where bitter memories of Japan's past militarism run deep, and upset Washington, which fears a further fraying of Tokyo's already fraught relations with its neighbors."The first Abe really wishes to go (to Yasukuni on August 15) but I guess he will refrain from that," Kitaoka said.But he added: "Mr. Abe is somewhat unpredictable."Abe moved quickly to improve ties with China and South Korea at the start of his first 2006-2007 term but it is unclear whether he will repeat that success in his second. He has taken a tough stance toward Beijing in particular this time.Ties with China and Japan have been seriously strained by territorial rows and feuds over wartime history. Concerns are simmering about the risk of an unintended clash near disputed isles in the East China Sea where Japanese and Chinese vessels have been playing a cat-and-mouse game for months."In that environment, something could go wrong," said Michael Green, Japan Chair at the Washington-based Center for Strategic and International Studies. "That's the Black Swan."Abe is also unlikely to abandon his long-term goal of revising the 1947 constitution, drafted by U.S. occupation forces after Japan's defeat and never altered since.Conservatives see the constitution as not only restricting Japan's right to defend itself but as responsible for eroding traditional mores such as duty to the state.Abe said on Sunday more debate was needed to win public understanding on constitutional reform. "I would like to deepen proper debate in a calm and stable situation," he said.The LDP and smaller parties that also favor revising the constitution failed to obtain a two-thirds majority in the upper house. They have this in the lower chamber, but two-thirds approval of both houses is required before a revision can be taken to a public referendum - a requirement Abe has said should be eased.Coalition partner New Komeito is cautious about changing the charter's signature war-renouncing Article 9 which, if taken literally, bans maintenance of armed forces.Sunday's election also left many wondering about the future of a competitive two-party democracy in Japan. The opposition Democratic Party of Japan, which surged to power in 2009 only to be ousted last year, suffered its worst drubbing since its founding in 1998.
My journey to the Shakotan Peninsula, a scenic corner of Hokkaido known for its sea urchin, salmon, herring and other fish, actually began in New York more than 30 years ago when my father took me for sushi at a Japanese restaurant near his office in Lower Manhattan.Our occasional visits were an exotic treat for a suburban kid raised on steak and pasta. When I was in my teens, my father decided to expand my horizons and ordered uni, or sea urchin. To his surprise, I loved its sublime taste and gelatinous texture.Uni became my litmus test for sushi fans. In college, I dared friends to try it. After graduation, I moved to Japan and sought it out. When I worked in the Tokyo bureau of The New York Times a decade ago, I often walked across the street to Tsukiji Fish Market, the world's largest wholesale fish market, to dine on sushi — and, especially, uni.On our annual visits to Japan since then, my wife and I stay near the market so we can take in the fabulous seafood. A few years ago when we visited the seaside town of Shimoda, we met a woman on the beach with a bucket of uni. She generously cut two open so we could taste the sweet roe inside.As good as it was, I knew that the freshest uni was in Hokkaido, the northernmost of Japan's four main islands. So in June, we took a 90-minute flight from Tokyo to Sapporo to visit the source.Our timing was good. While the rest of Japan was sweltering and wet, Hokkaido was bathed by soft breezes and sunshine. Everything was in bloom, including the ubiquitous lavender whose fragrance reminds visitors how far they are from gritty Tokyo.Mid-June was also the start of uni fishing season on the Shakotan Peninsula, two hours west of Sapporo, Hokkaido's capital and largest city. No trains run as far as the town of Shakotan, so we rented a car and drove past Sapporo's sprawl until we hit a coastal road that bordered Ishikari Bay. Tokyo's bustle and concrete seemed a world away.With just 5.5 million people spread across an area a bit smaller than Maine, Hokkaido is roomy by Japanese standards. With lush forests and dramatic coastlines, the island is still considered a frontier by the Japanese, who settled there in earnest less than 150 years ago.Like Maine, Hokkaido is a seafood lovers' paradise. As we drove northwest, it seemed we had entered an uni festival. First in Otaru, then in the smaller port towns of Yoichi, Furubira and then Shakotan, banners flapping in front of restaurants and shops celebrated the arrival of sea urchin.We stopped for lunch in Shakotan, a town known for its stunning capes, reefs and blue waters that are part of a marine sanctuary. We chose Fuku Zushi, a modest sushi bar that, based on the pictures on the walls, had been featured on television shows.At the counter, I ordered sanshoku chirashi (2,100 yen, or $21.50 at 98 yen to the dollar), a lacquer bowl filled with uni, ikura, or salmon eggs, and hotate, or scallops, on a bed of rice with wasabi, mint leaf, sliced cucumber, ginger and pickles. The ikura popped in my mouth, the hotate was buttery soft and the uni was creamy and sweet without a seafood aftertaste, the kind of freshness I was hoping we would encounter when we left Tokyo.There are more than 100 varieties of sea urchin in Japan, but only six are edible. The chef, Kiichi Sasaki, explained that two types are caught nearby: Murasaki uni, which has a mustard yellow color and a sweet taste, as well as longer tentacles on the outside, and bafun uni, which has an orange hue and a richer taste.Whatever the type, uni is not for everyone. Compared with the meaty red and silver cuts of fish on most sushi plates, uni can taste like briny Jell-O. People who are turned off by the idea of eating roe are unlikely to go for uni, either. But for connoisseurs, Shakotan is the place to be between mid-June and mid-August, when the uni is at its freshest. Mr. Sasaki said some customers visit several times a season.
TOKYO — Dozens of Japanese train passengers pushed a 32-ton train carriage away from the platform to free a woman who had fallen into the 20-centimeter (eight-inch) gap between the train and platform during the busy morning rush hour Monday.The act of heroism was captured by a newspaper photographer, whose photo of the rescue ran in the Yomiuri daily's evening edition.A public announcement that a passenger was trapped prompted about 40 people to join train officials to push the carriage, whose suspension system allows it to lean to either side, according to the Yomiuri newspaper, Japan's largest daily.The unnamed woman in her 30s was then pulled out uninjured to applause from onlookers at JR Minami-Urawa station, just north of Tokyo.After just an eight-minute delay, the train went on its way.
TOKYO — Prime Minister Shinzo Abe is unlikely to visit Tokyo's Yasukuni Shrine, seen in much of Asia as a symbol of Japan's past militarism, on the emotive August 15 anniversary of Japan's defeat in World War Two to avoid upsetting China and South Korea, Japanese media reported on Thursday.Abe, who cemented his grip on power in an upper house election on Sunday, has taken a tough stance with China in a territorial row over tiny islands. But he has also said that his door is open to dialogue with Beijing and has sought to mend ties with Seoul."The prime minister will make a wise decision (about the shrine visit). It would be a different story if (his government) had a short future ahead, but he has three years," one source close to Abe was quoted as saying by the Mainichi Shimbun newspaper."The time will come for him to fulfill his will."Another government source was quoted as telling the daily: "August is not the time for a visit."Whether Abe will visit the Yasukuni Shrine for war dead, where Japanese leaders convicted as war criminals by an Allied tribunal are among those honored, is seen as a key to gauge how he intends to proceed on the touchy topic of wartime history.A pilgrimage to the shrine would outrage China and South Korea, where bitter memories of Japan's past militarism run deep, and upset Washington, which fears a further fraying of Tokyo's already fraught relations with its neighbors.Beijing is already on edge about the hawkish Abe's plans to bolster the military and loosen the constraints of the country's pacifist constitution. Tokyo is likely to start considering acquiring the ability to launch pre-emptive military strikes in a planned update of its defense policy, though in a sign of the sensitivity, it may tone down the phrasing.Abe, who wants to recast Japan's wartime history with a less apologetic tone, steered clear of a visit to the shrine during his first 2006-2007 term but later said he deeply regretted it.While Abe moved quickly to improve ties with China and South Korea at the start of his first term, it is unclear whether he will repeat that success in his second.Abe visited the shrine during its autumn festival in October last year, shortly before taking office again as premier in December after his ruling party's win in a general election.Tensions flared between Japan and its Asian neighbors earlier this year when Abe made an offering to the shrine, and Deputy Prime Minister Taro Aso and two other ministers visited Yasukuni during its spring festival.Analysts have said Abe might pay homage at the shrine during this year's autumn festival, even if he avoids a summer visit in the summer.
TOKYO — Japan scrambled fighter jets on Wednesday after a Chinese military aircraft flew for the first time through international airspace near its southern islands out over the Pacific, in a move seen by Japan as underlining China's maritime expansion.Ties between China and Japan have been strained by a territorial dispute over uninhabited East China Sea islets and hawkish Japanese Prime Minister Shinzo Abe won a decisive victory in upper house elections on Sunday.Japan's Defense Ministry said a Chinese Y-8 airborne early warning plane flew through airspace between Okinawa prefecture's main island and the smaller Miyako island in southern Japan out over the Pacific at around noon and later took the same route back over the East China Sea."I believe this indicates China's move toward further maritime expansion," Japanese Defense Minister Itsunori Onodera told reporters, in comments carried on public broadcaster NHK.Chinese government spokesmen were not immediately available for comment.The waters around the disputed islands, called the Senkaku in Japan and Diaoyu in China, and which are to the west of Okinawa's main island, are rich fishing grounds and the sea floor around them could hold big oil and gas reserves.Tension between China and Japan escalated last September when Japan bought three of the disputed islands from a private Japanese owner.Since then, patrol ships and aircraft from both countries have been shadowing each other in the sea and skies around the islets.That has raised fears of an unintended collision leading to a broader clash.Abe has pledged to take a firm stance in the territorial dispute, but said in his news conference following the upper house election win that Japan's door was open to dialogue.
KOYA, Japan — Ryusho Soeda, 66, has taken on a job for which his career as a Buddhist priest never prepared him: forensic accounting.Mr. Soeda's temple is the 1,200-year-old Koyasan temple, deep in the mountains of western Japan and long prized as a haven for quiet contemplation. But in recent months, monks at the site have been debating a very worldly question: How did a complex bet on the yen go so horribly wrong?Mr. Soeda, who was picked to head Koyasan in June after his predecessor had been forced out, has promised a full accounting of the temple's losses, which at one point last year threatened to wipe out half of its endowment."My duty is to find out exactly what has happened and to publish it," Mr. Soeda said. "Just like Greece published its window-dressing only after they had a new government, the truth will not come to the light unless you change the power."The financial crisis at Koyasan is an example of the losses that cash-rich Japanese religious groups, schools, small companies and individuals are facing — and in some cases fighting in court — because of financial derivatives tied to the yen.Fujita Health University, in Toyoake, which runs one of Japan's biggest hospitals, lost nearly ¥24 billion, or $240 million, on currency derivatives. Nanzan University in Nagoya said this year that it had lost more than ¥23 billion. Both schools took their losses from derivatives that were sold to them in the unsupervised, over-the-counter market. In many other cases, the losses have been driven by a product called a power reverse dual-currency bond, or P.R.D.C., a derivative marketed aggressively to nonprofit investors in Japan.The losses highlight a problem Prime Minister Shinzo Abe has vowed to address: Japan's long-running economic slump has left its enormous savings stranded in dead-end investments and left investors desperate for yield.Mr. Abe has pledged to revive the Japanese economy, the world's third-largest, and to foster growth that outstrips renewed inflation of 2 percent. But doing so will also mean changing the mind-set of Japanese investors and driving home the message that risk follows return.P.R.D.C. bonds offered a higher return at a time when the yield on 10-year Japanese government bonds was less than 1 percent. Their popularity peaked in 2006 and 2007, just before the onset of the global financial crisis.Yoshio Yoshimoto, a professor of economics at Kansai University in Osaka, said many universities jumped without reading the fine print."One might wonder whether these schools should teach economics to students in the first place," he said.Nonprofits in Japan are not required to mark losses on assets for the price they would sell in the market at the time. Partly as a result, total losses from derivative bets gone bad are hard to estimate. But in one indication of the extent of the problem, there are about 300 lawsuits in progress over such losses, according to Akiyoshi Motosugi, a lawyer in Tokyo. Most claim that the risks of the derivatives were not fully explained by the banks that sold them.One of those is by Komazawa University, a Buddhist-affiliated school in Tokyo. In 2008, the university lost about ¥16 billion, at current exchange rates, on currency derivatives purchased from Deutsche Bank, BNP Paribas and UBS.Deutsche and BNP Paribas declined to comment. UBS said it was contesting the claim."We have challenged these allegations and are defending ourselves accordingly," the bank said.P.R.D.C. bonds were often structured to carry a high coupon, or payout, for the first year. After that the payout was determined by the rate of the yen. A knockout clause was typically set so that the bonds would be redeemed if the yen weakened past a certain threshold against the U.S. dollar or Australian dollar.That meant investors accepted the risk of no interest payments if the yen were to strengthen — as it did from late 2007 to late 2012.
(Reuters) - Manchester United have not given up their pursuit of Barcelona's Cesc Fabregas and talks to bring the Spain midfielder to Old Trafford are "ongoing", coach David Moyes said on Thursday.Moyes confirmed this week that the club had made a second bid for the 26-year-old though Fabregas's Barca team mate Gerard Pique told British newspaper The Sun that United were wasting their time chasing the playmaker.Negotiations to sign the Spaniard "are ongoing", Moyes, who replaced the long-serving Alex Ferguson at the end of last season, told reporters in Osaka ahead of the club's friendly with J-League club Cerezo Osaka on Friday.Moyes also said the recovery of Wayne Rooney, who left the Asia-Pacific tour early with a hamstring injury, fuelling intense speculation that he was on his way out, was on track."Wayne's running, probably at the level where we thought he would be just now, and he'll pick up his work again," Moyes said.The English champions have lost two matches and won one so far on their tour with the latest defeat coming on Tuesday when a youthful side lost 2-3 to Japan's Yokohama F. Marinos.Former Everton manager Moyes said he would try to rotate his players to spare them from the intense heat and humidity."It's not as important as winning the first game of the Premier League season but you want to win as often as you can and we'll try and do so," he added."We're not used to training or playing in these conditions but I hope it will benefit us when we go back to England from playing in such warm conditions."We're meaning to use all our players tomorrow night to make sure everybody doesn't have to lose so much weight and fluid. I'm sure it will be a very hot evening."
ZAATARI, Jordan — Japan's foreign minister says Tokyo will increase its aid to Syrian refugees living in a desert camp in Jordan and help provide better sanitation there.Fumio Kishida's pledge followed his visit Friday to Zaatari camp, home to 120,000 Syrians and just across the border from Syria.Kishida was shown the camp's limited and basic washing facilities, which lack shower areas and which have been blamed for poor sanitation in Zaatari.Parched Jordan says it can do little and that the refugees are exhausting the country's meager water resources.Kishida says that "considering the hot desert climate here, we feel the importance, indeed the urgency, to help out in this area."He says Japan contributed $95 million to Syrian refugees who fled to other countries since the conflict erupted in 2011.
TOKYO — Japanese consumer prices rose in June at their highest annual pace in nearly five years in an early sign of an end to persistent deflation, boding well for the central bank's bold stimulus plan to achieve its 2 percent inflation target in two years.The 0.4 percent rise in core consumer prices, which is slightly higher than a median market forecast for a 0.3 percent increase, was largely because of a rise in electricity bills and a weak yen that inflated the cost of gasoline imports.But it is an encouraging sign for the Bank of Japan, eager to end 15 years of grinding deflation, because it suggests that more companies are optimistic enough about the economy to believe they can raise prices or at least not cut them.The data is also a boost to Prime Minister Shinzo Abe's sweeping pro-growth policies that aim to pull the world's third largest economy out of stagnation.Mr. Abe's government, which is driving an aggressive policy mix of monetary and fiscal stimulus to foster sustainable long-term growth, has already seen positive signs as first-quarter data showed Japan was the fastest-growing major economy in the world.The increase in the core consumer price index, which excludes fresh food but includes energy costs, was the highest annual pace since a 1 percent rise in November 2008. It is the first time in 14 months that consumer prices have risen. (In May, prices neither rose nor fell.)Tokyo core C.P.I., a leading indicator of nationwide prices, rose 0.3 percent in July after a 0.2 percent increase in June, matching the median forecast, suggesting prices will continue to rise in the coming months.The Bank of Japan unleashed an intense burst of monetary stimulus on April 4, promising to double the supply of money through aggressive asset purchases to meet its 2 percent inflation target in roughly two years.Many analysts expect prices to gradually rise, reflecting improvements in the economy, but they view the two-year time frame for achieving the inflation goal as too ambitious.
TOKYO — Mika Tanabe, a new investor in the Japanese stock market, has been on a stomach-turning roller-coaster ride. Since March, her shares in Softmax, an electronic medical records company, have slumped 30 percent, surged 120 percent, lost half their value, then climbed 20 percent again.She watched in bewilderment as Softmax shares plummeted as much as 25 percent in just one day. Her friends had warned her, Ms. Tanabe said, that playing with stocks was playing with fire."They said investing is so risky, so dangerous. It's what many people think," said Ms. Tanabe, who is 26. She listens to them and then rationalizes it. "I tell myself that stocks are going to rise in the long run."The wild ride in Japanese equities this year has been driven by the hopes and fears accompanying the bold economic policies of Prime Minister Shinzo Abe. The country's economy, after decades of doldrums, appears to be re-energized. Mr. Abe's success in the Japanese parliamentary elections last Sunday affirmed the policies, even if the statistics are not always encouraging. It has reinvigorated an interest in investing, some brokers here said, that brings flashbacks of Japan's spectacular bubble era of the late 1980s.After a giddy 80 percent ascent over six months, the Nikkei 225 stock index turned sharply southward in mid-May and all the horrors of Japan's historic bubble burst seemed to return. In a matter of days, stock market commentators went from hailing the "rally of the century" to cautioning that stock markets were a dangerous money-sink in which no casual investor could hope to thrive."Market terror! Amateur investors, get out now!" screamed a headline on the cover of the popular weekly magazine Shukan Gendai after a particularly bad run last month.The volatility continued on Friday as the Nikkei stock index fell almost 3 percent after news that Japanese consumer prices rose in June to their highest annual pace in nearly five years.The question market watchers are asking remains: Can Japan's retail investors get over a deeply entrenched suspicion of the stock market made worse by recent volatility?"Japanese still think of the stock market as a place where people, blinded by greed, manipulate prices based on some sort of voodoo magic," said Ryoji Musha, president of Musha Research, a private financial research firm based in Tokyo, and former chief investment adviser at Deutsche Securities in Japan.The continued wariness casts a cloud on the long-term strength of Japanese stocks, even as individual investors are crucial to sustaining a recovery, experts say. Fear of stock markets also limits the broader effect of the wealth generated so far by Mr. Abe's economic policies, because too few ordinary Japanese stand to benefit directly from stock market gains. And it undermines efforts by Mr. Abe to shift the trillions of yen sitting in low-yielding savings accounts in Japan toward more productive investments."Any long-term market recovery hinges on the support of individual investors," said Masayuki Doshida, senior market analyst at Rakuten Securities, an online retail brokerage firm. He said that some individual investors had bought stocks on margin, or borrowed money from brokers to pay for their stock purchase. But once those stocks fell past a certain value, many investors were forced to sell their shares, worsening the market fall."But I'm optimistic. I'm waiting for investors to regain their nerve and jump back in," Mr. Doshida said.The Japanese remain some of the most cautious investors in the industrialized world. Stocks and mutual funds together made up just 11 percent of financial assets held by individuals in Japan at the end of last year. That is less than half the levels seen in 1990 near the bubble's peak, and far below the current 45 percent in the United States and 22 percent in the euro zone, according to figures from the Bank of Japan.
Two airlines said on Friday that they had found pinched wires in emergency locator transmitters on Boeing 787 Dreamliners, the same type of damage that has been identified as the probable cause of a fire on another 787 in London this month.United Airlines said it found the pinched wire, which connects the battery to the transmitter, on one of its six 787s. Christen David, a spokeswoman for United, said that the airline had found the problem in an inspection ordered by the Federal Aviation Administration.Japan's All Nippon Airways said it had found a pinched wire in the same type of built-in beacon on one of its 787s. It said it also found a dented wire in a portable transmitter.The airlines said they had removed damaged devices on the 787s and sent them to the manufacturer, Honeywell Aerospace, for evaluation.The latest problems suggest that there is a more systemic problem with the devices, which are intended to broadcast signals about a plane's location after a crash. British investigators say they believe that the fire aboard an Ethiopian Airlines Dreamliner parked at Heathrow Airport on July 12 may have started in the beacon. On the 787, the transmitter is in the top rear of the airplane with no direct fire-suppression system.A photograph of the charred device on that plane indicated that a cap over the battery had been closed on the wire. That apparently pinched the wire, which could have led to an eventual short that set off the fire.United, All Nippon and the 11 other airlines that fly the fuel-efficient new planes said shortly after the Ethiopian fire that they had inspected the devices and found no problems. Over the last week, Boeing, the F.A.A. and regulators in Europe and Japan have told them to either remove or inspect the beacons, looking specifically for a pinched wire.United initially performed a visual check on its 787s that failed to detect the pinched wire in the six-pound device but found it on the second look.Regulators said on Friday that they were still trying to figure out whether the wires became pinched during the manufacturing at Honeywell, the installation into the planes at Boeing or during maintenance checks at the airlines. Honeywell declined to comment.All Nippon Airways has taken the built-in locator beacons out of its eight domestically operated Dreamliners with the permission of local regulators and has inspected and put back those on its 12 787s that fly international routes because some countries require them.The beacons are designed to guide rescuers to downed aircraft, although in most cases close radar tracking and eyewitness reports allow air traffic controllers to pinpoint crash sites.Japan's Transport Ministry informed All Nippon and Japan Airlines this week that they were permitted to remove the beacons, said Ryosei Nomura, a spokesman for the airline in Tokyo.British investigators also have recommended that the F.A.A. review whether the order to inspect or remove the beacons should extend to other types of commercial, business and private jets that carry the Honeywell model.While the transmitter is a standard item on most planes, Boeing has also had problems with the novel electrical systems on the 787, which entered service in late 2011.Qatar Airways said on Friday that it had taken one of its Dreamliners out of service after what it described as a minor technical issue, as pressure mounted on the plane maker over possible new electrical problems with the advanced jet.The airline and Boeing declined to give further details.Boeing also said on Friday that it was shifting five commercial-aircraft executives, including Mike Sinnett, the chief of engineer on the 787, to new jobs. Mr. Sinnett will become the vice president for product development in charge of future plane concepts. Bob Whittington, the chief engineer on the 777 program, will take over for Mr. Sinnett on the 787.Separately on Friday, federal regulators proposed a $2.75 million civil penalty against Boeing for installing nonconforming fasteners on its 777 jetliner and failing to correct its quality control system for two years.The FA.A said that Boeing found it had been installing fasteners that were insufficiently tapered in September 2008. The plane maker stopped using those fasteners after it discovered the problem but, according to the F.A.A., failed to correct some of its manufacturing issues related to these fasteners until November 2010.Boeing said that it was "working closely with the F.A.A. to address any remaining concerns."
BEIJING — China launched its revamped coast guard last week and immediately sent four ships, emblazoned with the new red, white and blue logo, to patrol waters off disputed islands in the nearby East China Sea.The message was clear: China planned to use the new unified paramilitary vessels to keep pressure on Japan over the sovereignty of the tiny islands, an issue that has riled relations between the two countries.At the same time as the newly designated coast guard vessels appeared in the waters on Wednesday, China sent a turboprop early-warning aircraft through international airspace between the islands of Okinawa and Miyako, an area where Japan said Chinese planes had not flown before. The Japanese called the flight by the Y-8 aircraft the latest in a series of provocations aimed at forcing concessions from Japan, which administers the disputed islands, known as Diaoyu in China and Senkaku in Japan.The merger of four Chinese maritime units into one superagency was announced in March. The actual creation of the new force has been nervously awaited in the Asia Pacific region as another sign of China's fast-growing maritime capability and its determination to enforce claims in the South China Sea, as well as the East China Sea.The large number of Chinese and Japanese maritime vessels in dangerous proximity in the East China Sea at a time of high tensions over the islands has raised alarm in Washington about clashes that could lead to larger conflict.In such an escalation, the United States might be pulled into the fight because the mutual defense pact with Japan obliges Washington to defend all territories administered by Japan.A senior Chinese Navy official, Zhang Junshe, vice president of the Naval Research Institute, hailed the unification of China's maritime law enforcement agencies under a new National Oceanic Administration as the creation of an "iron fist" that would replace ineffective operations scattered among a number of agencies.In Washington, the growing power of China's maritime forces is being closely watched. The American allies in the region — Japan, South Korea and the Philippines — all have serious squabbles with China over maritime territorial and boundary issues, and fishing rights. The Philippines recently filed an arbitration case against China before the international tribunal that governs the United Nations Convention on the Law of the Sea. The Philippines argues that China's claims to the South China Sea are illegal.At a conference on maritime safety in Beijing last week, four retired American admirals, three retired American defense attachés and a group of American maritime experts met with Chinese officials to discuss the ramifications of the strengthened Chinese Coast Guard.The new coast guard is a "positive development," said Susan L. Shirk, a former deputy assistant secretary of state, who organized the conference for the University of California Institute on Global Conflict and Cooperation. Vessels belonging to the fisheries law enforcement agency have been particularly aggressive in the South China Sea over the past few years, and this kind of behavior may be modified under the new structure, she said."It's good for China's neighbors and the United States because we know who is responsible and who we can hold responsible," Ms. Shirk said. "As they develop a sense of professionalism in accordance with international law, it should make for lower risk of accidents."A Chinese naval expert, Li Jie, said the Chinese coast guard ships would most likely be outfitted with "light weaponry," like "high-pressure water cannons and guns." Japan's Coast Guard ships, which patrol the waters off the disputed islands, are armed with weapons including large deck guns, similar to those on board United States Coast Guard vessels."We should be realistic," Ms. Shirk said. "The Chinese Coast Guard will model themselves on the United States, and the Japanese and the South Korean Coast Guards, all of which are more capable with equipment than the Chinese Coast Guard at the moment."A rapid five-year program to build 30 new cutters for China's Coast Guard, announced in 2010, is well under way, said Lyle J. Goldstein, associate professor at the China Maritime Studies Institute of the United States Naval War College in Rhode Island, who attended the Beijing conference. "Our Coast Guard would love to have a building program that approximates that."In some respects, the reinforced coast guard, even as it plays an important role in territorial disputes, should not be a concern, he said."Of the 10 biggest ports in the world, more than half are in China," Mr. Goldstein said. "They have some of the busiest sea lanes in the world. Even putting the disputes aside, there are still legitimate safety, environmental and management reasons for these enhanced capabilities."
SHANGHAI — China has ruled out the possibility of a proposed summit meeting with Japan, the official China Daily reported on Tuesday, after Tokyo proposed the meeting in a bid to defuse a territorial row.The report, quoting a statement by an unidentified Chinese official made on Monday, comes during a visit by Japanese Vice Foreign Minister Akitaka Saiki.Saiki's visit is the latest in a series of efforts by Japanese Prime Minister Shinzo Abe to improve relations soured by the bitter row over uninhabited islands claimed by both countries.The hawkish Abe, who cemented his grip on power in an election last week, has been signaling a desire for dialogue with China - even though Japan has raised its assessment of the risk of China's military buildup and maritime assertiveness.The unidentified Chinese official urged the Japanese government to take concrete measures to improve strained ties rather than "empty slogans", the China Daily report said.It also said statements by Abe adviser Isao Iijima that a summit between Abe and President Xi Jinping could occur in the "not-too-distant future", based on conversations with Chinese officials in Beijing in mid-July, were misleading.A Japanese foreign ministry source in Tokyo said he had not seen the China Daily report and could not comment on it directly, but said it was still possible a summit could be held "at an appropriate time"."It is true no concrete date is set for a leaders' summit or foreign ministers' summit," the Japanese source said. "But this does not mean there will never be one in the future."China's foreign ministry also said in a statement on its website on Monday that Iijima had not met any Chinese government officials recently, contrary to reports on Sunday.The China Daily quoted the unidentified Chinese official as saying: "What Iijima told reporters on Sunday is not true and is fabricated, based on the needs of Japan's domestic politics."Friction between China and Japan over the disputed islands has intensified in recent years. The election of Abe, perceived as reorienting Japan towards a confrontational posture in regard to Beijing, was not welcomed by the Chinese government.Abe is also perceived in China as being insufficiently or insincerely apologetic for Japan's past militarism.Foreign critics have also accused the Chinese Communist Party of manipulating domestic opinion through anti-Japanese propaganda and film to buttress its own legitimacy.The China Daily is an English language publication put out by the Chinese government for foreign consumption.
SHANGHAI — China has ruled out the possibility of a proposed summit meeting with Japan, the official China Daily reported on Tuesday, after Tokyo proposed the meeting in a bid to defuse a territorial row.The report, quoting a statement by an unidentified Chinese official made on Monday, comes during a visit by Japanese Vice Foreign Minister Akitaka Saiki.Saiki's visit is the latest in a series of efforts by Japanese Prime Minister Shinzo Abe to improve relations soured by the bitter row over uninhabited islands claimed by both countries.
TOKYO — More than a year after Japan's Supreme Court ordered camera and medical-equipment maker Olympus to stop punishing a whistleblower and reinstate him to his regular job, Masaharu Hamada is still fighting his courtroom battle.On Monday, he got company.Another Olympus employee, Yoshihisa Ishikawa, filed a labor lawsuit against Tokyo-based Olympus Corp., demanding 8.8 million yen ($88,000) in damages for psychological stress and harassment — for sending him to work under Hamada.Ishikawa says the lawsuit is not a critique of Hamada. His lawsuit says his reassignment followed repeated pressure to resign, and the company never gave a reason. Olympus had no immediate comment on Ishikawa's lawsuit, saying it had yet to see it.Koichi Kozen, the lawyer for both men, says the two cases show the extreme measures that Japanese corporations use when dealing with employees who step outside of highly conformist corporate culture. Some companies have special rooms for unwanted employees to embarrass them into quitting, he said.Olympus contests Hamada's assertion that it has failed to reinstate him and says it is following the Supreme Court's ruling. Hamada is considered a whistleblower under Japanese law because he was subjected to bizarre and humiliating treatment after questioning possible professional misconduct.The company has suffered a serious image problem since 2011 because of a whistleblower with an even higher profile, former chief executive and Briton Michael Woodford. He was fired after uncovering dubious accounting at Olympus that covered up massive losses.Woodford won a 10 million pound (1.2 billion yen, $15.4 million) settlement from Olympus in a British court last year. He had sued alleging unlawful dismissal and discrimination.Earlier this year, a former Olympus president and two other executives were convicted in a Tokyo court for their role in the cover-up of investment losses, which surfaced after Woodford came forward. They avoided imprisonment. Olympus was fined 700 million yen ($7 million).Hamada's legal battle began in 2008, when he sued after being ostracized for relaying a supplier's complaint.He won in the Supreme Court in June last year — Japan's first such whistleblower case. He received 2 million yen ($20,000) in damages.But more than a year after the ruling, Hamada, a salesman with experience in the U.S., says he has not been awarded his due — placement back in his regular job.He was recently transferred to a position in quality training, an area in which he has no experience.Hamada has been back in Tokyo District Court, with a civil lawsuit, demanding Olympus abide by Supreme Court's ruling and place him in a job more appropriate for his background, preferably overseeing corporate compliance. He is seeking 10 million yen ($100,000) in damages."Why should Olympus get away with this?" Hamada said. "I am going to have to win a 100 times."He is delighted to have another Olympus challenger in Ishikawa.Ishikawa's assignment to work under Hamada happened a few days after Hamada filed a complaint that he did not have any workers under him although his title was "team leader."Ishikawa, 50, an award-winning engineer with several patents to his name, is not sure why he was targeted, but suspects it may be because he was outspoken and questioned the decisions of his boss.The corporate culture at Olympus favors subservience and conformity, according to Ishikawa, who says he lost 3 kilograms (7 pounds) in a week from stress. It hurts when you're a hard-working employee to be told you're no longer needed, he said."I want to represent all the workers who are suffering like this," he said. "I never asked for lots of money. I never asked for success. All I wanted to do was make good products."
TOKYO — Japan's factory output fell the most in more than two years in June, although the labor market improved, a sign that Prime Minister Shinzo Abe's pro-growth policies are bearing fruit but still have far to go to establish a durable recovery.The decrease in industrial production, the first in five months, largely reflected efforts by manufacturers to avoid a buildup of inventory, and they forecast a brisk pickup in July.The levels of unemployment and job availability, the best since 2008, augur well for the private spending Mr. Abe has sought to prompt through aggressive monetary and fiscal stimulus programs since he took office in December.Analysts said the data served as a six-month scorecard for Mr. Abe, who is seeking to strike a balance between reviving growth and fiscal consolidation, while facing a tough decision on whether to go ahead with a planned increase in the sales tax next year.The 3.3 percent decline in industrial output from the previous month was the largest since March 2011, when an earthquake and tsunami ripped through Japan's northeastern coastal areas, data released Tuesday by the Ministry of Economy, Trade and Industry showed.The drop exceeded forecasts of a 1.8 percent decline in a Reuters poll because of lower production of cars in response to lower demand in Japan and abroad. Production of semiconductors also decreased, reflecting weakening demand for smartphones in Asia.Output had risen 1.9 percent in May, and the ministry stuck to its assessment that the trend was showing a moderate increase. Manufacturers expect output to have risen 6.5 percent in July and to fall 0.9 percent in August."I think there is no change in the trend that production is expected to stay on a steady recovery as June trade data was good, benefits from the yen's weakness are appearing, and domestic demand is solid," said Yoshiki Shinke, chief economist at Dai-Ichi Life Research Institute.Labor market data showed that the ratio of jobs to applicants rose to 0.92 in June from 0.9 in May, meaning jobs were available for more than 9 out of 10 job seekers. That was the strongest demand for workers in five years.The unemployment rate fell to 3.9 percent in June, its lowest level since October 2008.However, wage earners' household spending unexpectedly fell 0.4 percent in June from the same month a year earlier, compared with a median estimate for a 1 percent increase, suggesting that rapid gains in private consumption might be moderating slightly."We see positive numbers emerging, including a drop in the jobless rate, which is one example," Finance Minister Taro Aso told reporters. "Certainly the mood is looking up."There are signs Mr. Abe is rethinking the sales tax increase out of concern it could derail a nascent economic recovery.Mr. Aso said the final decision would be made after a summit meeting of the world's 20 major economies in early September.
TOKYO — Toyota Motor, the world's largest automaker by sales, lifted its annual profit forecast on Friday after almost doubling its net income in the quarter that ended in June to 562.1 billion yen ($5.64 billion) from a year earlier, thanks to favorable exchange rates.Profit in the Japanese automaker's financial first quarter beat analysts' expectations by a wide margin, and underscored the boost that Toyota and other automakers have received from the economic policies of Prime Minister Shinzo Abe of Japan. Those policies have galvanized Japan's export industry by weakening the yen by about 15 percent since last year, increasing the value of products sold overseas.Technically, Toyota sold almost 37,000 fewer vehicles in the latest quarter, compared with the same quarter last year, with sales falling in Europe, Asia and Japan. Sales in Japan have slowed since government incentives for fuel-efficient cars expired last year. Toyota is also struggling in China, the world's biggest auto market, because consumer enmity over a territorial spat between Beijing and Tokyo has weighed on sales of Japanese brands. Auto sales continue to slump across the board in Europe.But it was the weaker yen, together with a strong showing in its biggest overseas market, the United States, that lifted Toyota's bottom line. Economists predict the yen to weaken further, while the latest United States sales figures, for July, showed Toyota surging ahead of Ford for the first time in three years, with a 17 percent jump from the same month last year.Toyota now expects net income for its full financial year that ends next March to reach 1.48 trillion yen, up slightly from a previous forecast of 1.37 trillion yen and an increase of 54 percent from its net profit last year.In the latest quarter, net profit rose 93.6 percent from a year earlier to 562.1 billion yen, while operating profit rose 87.9 percent to 663.3 billion yen. Toyota attributed more than four-fifths of its operating profit increase to the weaker yen. Net revenue for the quarter rose 13.7 percent to 6.255 trillion yen compared to last year.Helped by its strong numbers, Toyota is set to become the first automaker in the world to build more than 10 million vehicles in a single year. It said on Friday that it would build 10.12 million vehicles this calendar year, up 180,000 units from a previous production plan. Those numbers include models made by Daihatsu Motor and Hino Motors, which are part of the Toyota group.
TOKYO — A strong earthquake shook northeastern Japan on Sunday in the same region devastated by a giant tsunami and temblor 2-1/2 years ago, but there were no immediate reports of damage or injuries.The quake with a preliminary magnitude of 6.0 struck shortly after midday, and was centered off the coast of Miyagi Prefecture, and 50 kilometers (30 miles) below the seabed.The quake shook a wide region, including Fukushima and Iwate prefectures, and there was no risk of a tsunami, the Japan Meteorological Agency said.Tokyo Electric Power Co., the utility that runs Fukushima Dai-ichi, said no problems were reported there or at another one of its nuclear plants in Fukushima, and that there were no power outages and radiation monitors did not show any change.Fukushima Dai-ichi plant went into multiple meltdowns after the March 2011 tsunami, and tons of water are being used daily to keep its reactors under control. Decommissioning is expected to take decades.Tohoku Electric Power Co. also said no problems were detected at its Onagawa nuclear plant in Miyagi Prefecture.Some roads were blocked off and some trains stopped running temporarily for safety checks, broadcaster NHK TV said.
TOKYO — Japan asked the U.S. military not to fly its Japan-based HH-60 helicopters until it determines why one crashed at a U.S. base on the southern island of Okinawa, as the U.S. Air Force said Tuesday that it stopped searching for a missing crew member after finding remains.Three of the helicopter's four crew members ejected from the aircraft and were in stable condition, the U.S. Air Force said in a statement. It said the human remains found near the crash site were not yet identified. Japan's defense minister had said Monday that information then available indicated all had survived.Japan formally complained to the U.S. over the crash, which occurred at a time of intense local opposition to the U.S. Marine Corps' additional deployment of 12 MV-22 Osprey transport aircraft on Okinawa, where anti-U.S. military sentiment is a longstanding issue.Dozens of opponents of the U.S. presence gathered Tuesday outside the Futenma base on Okinawa, chanting and raising fists and banners protesting the crash and demanding an end to the Osprey deployments."We have asked the U.S. not to fly the same aircraft until they find out the cause of the accident and take preventive steps," Defense Minister Itsunori Onodera told reporters Tuesday.Chief Cabinet Secretary Yoshihide Suga said Japan had also asked Washington to postpone a planned additional deployment of a dozen Ospreys to Okinawa until the latest problem is resolved.About half of the 50,000 U.S. troops in Japan are based on the island under a Japan-U.S. security pact, and many residents have complained about base-related crime, noise and accidents.The HH-60 rescue helicopter, which belongs to Okinawa's Kadena Air Base, was on an unspecified training mission when it crashed at Camp Hansen. Flying activities were suspended Tuesday at Kadena, for the sake of recovery operations, the Air Force statement said, with fixed-wing aircraft due to resume flights on Wednesday.Local media said the crash revived memories of an accident in 2004, when a CH-53 helicopter from Marine Corps Air Station Futenma crashed into a university building, triggering a huge anti-base uproar although there were no civilian injuries and the crew survived."We knew it was going to happen sooner or later," said Kadena Mayor Hiroshi Toyama, referring to Monday's crash.
TOKYO — Highly radioactive water seeping into the ocean from Japan's crippled Fukushima nuclear plant is creating an "emergency" that the operator is struggling to contain, an official from the country's nuclear watchdog said on Monday.This contaminated groundwater has breached an underground barrier, is rising toward the surface and is exceeding legal limits of radioactive discharge, Shinji Kinjo, head of a Nuclear Regulatory Authority (NRA) task force, told Reuters.Countermeasures planned by Tokyo Electric Power Co are only a temporary solution, he said.Tepco's "sense of crisis is weak," Kinjo said. "This is why you can't just leave it up to Tepco alone" to grapple with the ongoing disaster."Right now, we have an emergency," he said.Tepco has been widely castigated for its failure to prepare for the massive 2011 tsunami and earthquake that devastated its Fukushima plant and lambasted for its inept response to the reactor meltdowns. It has also been accused of covering up shortcomings.It was not immediately clear how much of a threat the contaminated groundwater could pose. In the early weeks of the disaster, the Japanese government allowed Tepco to dump tens of thousands of metric tons of contaminated water into the Pacific in an emergency move.The toxic water release was however heavily criticized by neighboring countries as well as local fishermen and the utility has since promised it would not dump irradiated water without the consent of local townships."Until we know the exact density and volume of the water that's flowing out, I honestly can't speculate on the impact on the sea," said Mitsuo Uematsu from the Center for International Collaboration, Atmosphere and Ocean Research Institute at the University of Tokyo."We also should check what the levels are like in the sea water. If it's only inside the port and it's not flowing out into the sea, it may not spread as widely as some fear."NO OTHER OUTLET FOR WATERTepco said it is taking various measures to prevent contaminated water from leaking into the bay near the plant. In an e-mailed statement to Reuters, a company spokesman said Tepco deeply apologized to residents in Fukushima prefecture, the surrounding region and the larger public for causing inconveniences, worries and trouble.The utility pumps out some 400 metric tons a day of groundwater flowing from the hills above the Fukushima Daiichi nuclear plant into the basements of the destroyed buildings, which mixes with highly irradiated water that is used to cool the reactors in a stable state below 100 degrees Celsius.Tepco is trying to prevent groundwater from reaching the plant by building a "bypass" but recent spikes of radioactive elements in sea water has prompted the utility to reverse months of denials and finally admit that tainted water is reaching the sea.In a bid to prevent more leaks into the bay of the Pacific Ocean, plant workers created the underground barrier by injecting chemicals to harden the ground along the shoreline of the No. 1 reactor building. But that barrier is only effective in solidifying the ground at least 1.8 meters below the surface.By breaching the barrier, the water can seep through the shallow areas of earth into the nearby sea. More seriously, it is rising toward the surface - a break of which would accelerate the outflow."If you build a wall, of course the water is going to accumulate there. And there is no other way for the water to go but up or sideways and eventually lead to the ocean," said Masashi Goto, a retired Toshiba Corp nuclear engineer who worked on several Tepco plants. "So now, the question is how long do we have?"Contaminated water could rise to the ground's surface within three weeks, the Asahi Shimbun said on Saturday. Kinjo said the three-week timeline was not based on NRA's calculations but acknowledged that if the water reaches the surface, "it would flow extremely fast."A Tepco official said on Monday the company plans to start pumping out a further 100 metric tons of groundwater a day around the end of the week.The regulatory task force overseeing accident measures of the Fukushima Daiichi nuclear power station, which met Friday, "concluded that new measures are needed to stop the water from flowing into the sea that way," Kinjo said.Tepco said on Friday that a cumulative 20 trillion to 40 trillion becquerels of radioactive tritium had probably leaked into the sea since the disaster. The company said this was within legal limits.Tritium is far less harmful than cesium and strontium, which have also been released from the plant. Tepco is scheduled to test strontium levels next.The admission on the long-term tritium leaks, as well as renewed criticism from the regulator, show the precarious state of the $11 billion cleanup and Tepco's challenge to fix a fundamental problem: How to prevent water, tainted with radioactive elements like cesium, from flowing into the ocean.
TOKYO — Japan's government must support the operator of the crippled Fukushima nuclear plant in its efforts to contain buildups and leaks of radioactive water at the facility, the top government spokesman said on Wednesday.Prime Minister Shinzo Abe will order the government later in the day to strengthen its response on water containment, said Chief Cabinet Secretary Yoshihide Suga, indicating the government will get directly involved in combating the worsening problem."It is necessary for the country to step forward and offer support" to Tokyo Electric Power Co Ltd as it fights to stop contaminated groundwater from leaking into the ocean, Suga told a regular news conference.Abe, at a meeting of a government task force on the nuclear disaster, will instruct Trade and Industry Minister Toshimitsu Motegi to "take prompt measures" on the problem, Suga said.Motegi's ministry is considering requesting budget funds to address the water problem, he added. A government official told Reuters on Wednesday that the ministry had requested an allocation to help address the water problem.
YOKOHAMA, Japan — Japan on Tuesday unveiled its biggest warship since World War II, a huge flat-top destroyer that has raised eyebrows in China and elsewhere because it bears a strong resemblance to a conventional aircraft carrier.The ship, which has a flight deck that is nearly 250 meters (820 feet) long, is designed to carry up to 14 helicopters. Japanese officials say it will be used in national defense — particularly in anti-submarine warfare and border-area surveillance missions — and to bolster the nation's ability to transport personnel and supplies in response to large-scale natural disasters, like the devastating earthquake and tsunami in 2011.Though the ship — dubbed "Izumo" — has been in the works since 2009, its unveiling comes as Japan and China are locked in a dispute over several small islands located between southern Japan and Taiwan. For months, ships from both countries have been conducting patrols around the isles, called the Senkaku in Japan and the Diaoyutai in China.The tensions over the islands, along with China's heavy spending on defense and military modernization, have heightened calls in Japan for beefed-up naval and air forces. China recently began operating an aircraft carrier that it refurbished after purchasing from Russia, and is reportedly moving forward with the construction of another that is domestically built.Japan, China and Taiwan all claim the islands.Though technically a destroyer, some experts believe the new Japanese ship could potentially be used in the future to launch fighter jets or other aircraft that have the ability to take off vertically. That would be a departure for Japan, which has one of the best equipped and best trained naval forces in the Pacific but which has not sought to build aircraft carriers of its own because of constitutional restrictions that limit its military forces to a defensive role.Japan says it has no plans to use the ship in that manner.The Izumo does not have catapults for launching fighters, nor does it have a "ski-jump" ramp on its flight deck for fixed-wing aircraft launches.
TOKYO — Prime Minister Shinzo Abe's efforts to improve strained ties with China by staying away from a Tokyo shrine to war dead could be thwarted if cabinet members and a ruling party executive pay their respects there next week.Often fragile Sino-Japanese relations have been badly frayed for nearly a year by a row over uninhabited islands in the East China Sea claimed by both countries, disputes over Japan's wartime history, and regional rivalries.Abe, who returned to power in December after his Liberal Democratic Party-led coalition's big election win, will probably skip a pilgrimage to Yasukuni Shrine, seen as a symbol of Japan's past militarism, on the August 15 anniversary of Japan's defeat in World War Two in the hope of opening the door to a summit with Chinese President Xi Jinping.But Tomomi Inada, minister for administrative reform, plans to visit the shrine, where Japanese leaders convicted as war criminals by an Allied tribunal are also honored, on August 15 as does LDP policy chief Sanae Takaichi, the Asahi newspaper said.China's Foreign Ministry said visits by Japanese political leaders were unacceptable, whatever form they took."The issue of the Yasukuni Shrine relates to whether or not those in power in Japan can honestly and sincerely face up to Japan's past, whether or not they can correctly recognize and deal with the history of invasion of the Japanese militarists, and whether or not they can respect the feelings of the people of the victim nations," the ministry said in a statement."It does not matter in what form or using what identity Japanese political leaders visit the Yasukuni Shrine, it is an intrinsic attempt to deny that period of history of invasion of the Japanese militarists, and China cannot accept it," it said.Japanese diplomatic experts said that China in the past had been angered mainly by top leaders' visits to the shrine - specifically the prime minister, foreign minister and chief cabinet secretary. But in the current tense climate, pilgrimages by lesser political lights would also have a negative effect."Abe's message will evaporate," if Inada and Takaichi go to Yasukuni, said a Japanese political source with ties to China. "But he is popular enough that he can halt them if he wants."Conservatives say it is natural to pay respects at Yasukuni to those who died for their country.Japan hopes that if Abe - who avoided the shrine during his first 2006-2007 term but has said since he regretted doing so - stays away on August 15, it would help smooth the path to a leaders' summit.China, however, officially denies that any talks on a possible summit are taking place and shown no public signs of even wanting one. The country's Foreign Ministry has accused Abe of simply "chanting empty slogans" in his push for talks with Xi.Tension flared in April between Japan and neighbors China and South Korea after Finance Minister Taro Aso, who doubles as deputy prime minister, and two other ministers visited Yasukuni, followed by a group of at least 168 lawmakers.
SUBIC, Philippines — The Philippines on Tuesday celebrated the arrival of a decommissioned U.S. Coast Guard cutter that will become its meager navy's second largest ship as it attempts to counter rival Chinese territorial claims in potentially oil-rich offshore seas.President Benigno Aquino III saluted as the 3,250-ton white cutter, renamed Philippine navy frigate BRP Ramon Alcaraz, docked at a wharf in Subic Bay freeport northwest of Manila. A part of the former U.S. naval base will soon be turned into a Philippine military hub after the government approved a plan to shift its assets closer to the disputed islands in the South China Sea.The ships are no match for the vastly superior Chinese navy, but both Philippine and U.S. officials have agreed to boost the country's military to make it more credible and shake its image of being one of the region's weakest. Washington is a defense treaty ally of the Philippines and is obligated to help fend off an external attack.The Alcaraz is the Philippine navy's second largest vessel after another decommissioned Coast Guard cutter that was donated by Washington in 2011.That ship, the 3,390-ton frigate BRP Gregorio del Pilar, has patrolled disputed waters and became entangled last year in a standoff with Chinese vessels at Scarborough Shoal, a sprawling fishing ground more than 260 kilometers (160 miles) west of Subic that came under Beijing's control after Philippine vessels withdrew.Philippine navy chief Vice Adm. Jose Luis Alano said the Alcaraz will also soon be deployed to patrol disputed waters. He said the Philippines is considering adding a third former U.S. Coast Guard cutter to its fleet.A military brass band played nationalist songs and a few hundred students waved small Philippine flags in Tuesday's ceremony. Loud 21-cannon fire thundered in the background."It will further intensify our patrolling of the Philippines' exclusive economic zone and our capability to quell any threat and bad elements, respond to search and rescue operations and take care of our marine resources," Aquino told a crowd that included U.S. Ambassador Harry Thomas.Also Tuesday, Japan unveiled its largest warship at a naval base in Yokohama. Japan has been locked in a separate and potentially volatile territorial dispute with China over small islands controlled by Tokyo in the East China Sea.The developments point at an arms race by China's neighbors that have been alarmed by Beijing's assertiveness in claiming vast waters and backing those claims by deploying new maritime forces and refurbished vessels. Its claims in the South China Sea overlap with the 220-mile exclusive economic zones of the Philippines, Vietnam and other claimants.In the Philippine-claimed Spratly Islands, a confidential military report said 74 foreign vessels were spotted in a six-day surveillance period early last month, including 61 from China and 10 from Vietnam.The report, obtained by The Associated Press, said Beijing's surveillance patrols are now more organized in the disputed waters off the western Philippines, with the same Chinese vessels being rotated to guard both Scarborough Shoal and the Second Thomas Shoal farther south. Mischief Reef, a vast area occupied by China in 1995, now serves as a "central base" and "crucial outpost for replenishing China's naval and maritime assets in the disputed area," it said.China has also deployed its own coast guard cutters in disputed waters to complement maritime surveillance and fishery enforcement ships. The action "demonstrates China's resolve to consolidate its self-acclaimed indisputable sovereignty in the South China Sea," the report said.The Philippines antagonized China when it filed an arbitration case with a U.N. tribunal handling maritime disputes. China has preferred to settle the disputes bilaterally, but the Philippines and Vietnam, which is also engulfed in a rift with China over the Paracel Islands, want to involve the 10-member Association of Southeast Asian Nations.Last week, China's president adopted a more reconciliatory tone, saying Beijing will continue to guard its sovereignty claims but also wants to open some disputed areas to joint economic development. The Philippines says it is open to the idea but it must conform with Philippine laws — a potential deal-breaker.Associated Press writer Jim Gomez contributed to this report.
TOKYO — The government said it will step in and take "firm measures" to combat leaks of radioactive water at Japan's crippled nuclear power plant, including possibly funding a costly containment project.The announcement Wednesday came a day after the operator of the wrecked Fukushima Dai-ichi plant said some of the water was seeping over or around an underground barrier it created by injecting chemicals into the soil that solidified into a wall."There is heightened concern among the public, particularly about the contaminated water problem," Prime Minister Shinzo Abe said during a government nuclear disaster response meeting at his office. "This is an urgent matter that needs to be addressed. The government will step in to take firm measures."The latest problem involves water that accumulated over the last month since the operator, Tokyo Electric Power Co., began creating the chemical barrier to stop underground leaks after detecting radiation spikes in water samples in May.Government officials said Wednesday that an estimated 300 tons of radioactive water has been leaking into the sea each day since early in the crisis, which was caused by the March, 11, 2011, earthquake and tsunami.Since a major leak occurred from a maintenance pit a month after three reactors at the plant melted following the disasters, TEPCO had denied any further leaks of radioactive water into the sea, despite repeated warnings by experts, until finally acknowledging them last month.The underground barrier on the coastal embankment has slowed the leaks somewhat, but has caused underground water to swell. To prevent an overflow above the surface, which is feared to happen within weeks, TEPCO will start pumping out about 100 tons of underground water from coastal observation wells this week. Later this month, TEPCO will remove old contaminated water from trenches near the coast — a time bomb that it had left untouched despite repeated prodding from the government.Shinji Kinjo, an official at the Nuclear Regulation Authority, said faster-than-expected swelling of the underground water following the installation of the chemical barriers accelerated the emergency caused by TEPCO's delays.Alarmed by the leaks, a fisheries cooperative in nearby Iwaki city decided to indefinitely postpone a test catch planned for September.Government officials said Wednesday they were considering funding a separate, multibillion-dollar project to surround the reactor buildings with a wall of frozen ground to block underground water from entering the contaminated buildings. The project, announced in May, is scheduled for completion in July 2015.Similar methods have been used to build tunnels, but building a wall that surrounds four reactor buildings and their related facilities is "unprecedented anywhere in the world," said Chief Cabinet Secretary Yoshihide Suga. "We believe it is necessary that the country steps forward to support its construction," he said.Tatsuya Shinkawa, an official at the Agency for Natural Resources and Energy, said government officials were discussing funding details for the frozen ground wall project, which reportedly could cost 30 billion to 40 billion yen ($300 million to $400 million).That would be in addition to an 8.7 billion yen budget this year for decommissioning projects including development of robots to locate and remove debris from the melted reactors.The plant is also constructing an offshore wall of steel panels along the coast to keep contaminants from spreading further into the sea. TEPCO says radioactive elements have mostly remained near the embankment inside the bay, but experts have reported offshore "hot spots" of sediments contaminated with high levels of cesium.
TOKYO — A Japanese government official said an estimated 300 tonnes of contaminated water is leaking into the ocean each day from the crippled Fukushima nuclear plant, after Prime Minister Shinzo Abe pledged on Wednesday to step up government efforts to stem radioactive water leakage.Abe ordered the Minister of Economy, Trade and Industry to urgently deal with the water situation and ensure the plant's operator, Tokyo Electric Power Co, takes appropriate action to deal with the cleanup, which is expected to take more than 40 years and cost $11 billion (7 billion pounds).The ministry official also said the utility would begin pumping out groundwater to reduce leakage and had aimed to be removing 300 tonnes per day by December, but would end up 60 tonnes short of that goal. Removing 300 tonnes of groundwater, however, would not necessarily halt leakage into the sea, he said.
TOKYO — Japanese Prime Minister Shinzo Abe told the industry ministry on Wednesday to take appropriate measures to tackle the "urgent issue" of radioactive water building up at the crippled Fukushima nuclear plant.The Ministry of Economy, Trade and Industry needed to be more proactive role in dealing with the problems at Tokyo Electric Power Co's Fukushima Daiichi plant, Abe told reporters after attending a meeting of the government's task force on the nuclear disaster.He stopped short of committing government funds to deal with the mounting levels of radioactive water.Tokyo Electric has been widely castigated for its failure to protect the Fukushima plant, 220 km (130 miles) northeast of Tokyo, from the massive 2011 earthquake and tsunami that led to the worst nuclear disaster in the world since Chernobyl and its inept response to the reactor meltdowns.
TOKYO — Japan's Meteorological Agency said Thursday it is investigating after it issued an alert for a major earthquake that turned out to be only a mild shake.Loud alarms rang from cellphones and TVs just before 5 p.m. on Thursday warning of a magnitude-7.8 quake, which could cause severe damage. It said residents throughout Japan should be prepared.A few minutes later the Meteorological Agency reported a magnitude-2.3 quake centered in Wakayama prefecture in western Japan. Under the Japanese system for measuring quakes, it barely registered.Public broadcaster NHK said the agency blamed electronic noise for triggering the apparently false alarm.The alert caused a brief halt of high-speed train services.Japan beefed up its warning systems following a magnitude-9 earthquake and tsunami in March 2011 that killed more than 18,000 people. That disaster raised concern over Japan's level of readiness for such catastrophes.
TOKYO — An earthquake with preliminary magnitude of 2.3 was recorded in western Japan on Thursday, the Japan Meteorological Agency said, after it had issued a warning of a major tremor.At least one TV broadcaster reported that a strong earthquake had occurred, but people in the area contacted by Reuters via phone felt no tremor.
TOKYO — Four Chinese ships spent more than 24 hours in what Japan sees as its territorial waters, prompting a Japanese protest to China on Thursday at a time when Tokyo has been signalling its desire for a summit.Relations between the world's second- and third-largest economies have been strained for months, largely because of a dispute over a group of islands in the East China Sea.But Japanese Prime Minister Shinzo Abe is keen to improve relations and has called for dialogue with China, although he has rejected any conditions on talks.Chinese ships have previously been in waters near the uninhabited East China Sea islands that are controlled by Japan but claimed by both countries, but they have usually left after several hours."This is extremely regrettable and totally unacceptable," Japan's chief cabinet secretary, Yoshihide Suga, told a news conference.He said Japan had summoned an envoy from the Chinese embassy early on Thursday to protest "strongly" and demand the ships immediately leave.The ships withdrew at around noon, Japan's coastguard said.It was the longest stay by Chinese ships in waters near the islands since the dispute flared anew last September, after Japan bought several of the islands from a private owner, angering China.China's Foreign Ministry said the Chinese vessels had taken action against a Japanese boat that had entered Chinese territorial waters. It said it had lodged a complaint with Tokyo.China's State Oceanic Administration said in a statement posted on its website on Wednesday that four coastguard ships were conducting a patrol around the islands.The ships had spotted Japanese ships "infringing China's sovereignty" and told them to leave, the Chinese agency said.For months, aircraft and ships from both countries have played a cat-and-mouse game near the islands, known as the Senkaku in Japan and the Diaoyu in China, ratcheting up tension.According to an annual poll sponsored by the official China Daily and the Japanese think-tank Genron NPO, 92.8 percent of Chinese surveyed had a negative attitude towards Japan, 28 percentage points higher than in 2012 and the worst since 2005.The survey, released this week, also showed that 90.1 percent of Japanese had negative feelings toward China, up from 84.3 percent last year. Both groups gave the island issue as the reason.
TOKYO — Japanese prosecutors are unlikely to indict former prime minister Naoto Kan, utility executives or regulators over their handling of the 2011 Fukushima nuclear crisis, rejecting complaints filed over the world's worst atomic disaster since Chernobyl, the Asahi newspaper reported.The reported decision comes as Fukushima plant operator Tokyo Electric Power Co.(Tepco) struggles to contain highly radioactive water that is pouring out from the tsunami-wrecked plant, prompting the government to step in to try to help with the clean-up.Prosecutors had questioned Kan, who was prime minister when a massive earthquake and tsunami hit northeast Japan on March 11, 2011, as well as probing possible professional negligence of others including then-Tepco president Masataka Shimizu, the newspaper said on Friday.The massive quake and tsunami caused reactor meltdowns at the plant, spewing radiation and forcing 160,000 people to flee their homes, many never to return.The complaints were filed by citizens affected by the disaster, the paper said.Prosecutors judged, however, that it was difficult to prove that the accused could have predicted such a big earthquake and tsunami as well as to establish a causal relationship between the nuclear disaster and deaths and injuries among evacuees. A formal decision by the prosecutors is likely as early as this month, the Asahi said.
TOKYO — The Bank of Japan on Thursday left its vast monetary easing program unchanged as it issued an upbeat assessment of Tokyo's efforts to counter growth-sapping deflation.In a widely expected move, the central bank said its board voted unanimously to stand pat after a two-day policy meeting, as investors keep a close eye on the Federal Reserve of the United States amid growing speculation that it will soon start tapering its large stimulus program.The Bank of Japan, which unveiled its own gigantic bond-buying program in April, said the outlook for the country — the world's third-biggest economy — was looking brighter, while early signs of rising prices were good news for its efforts to hit a 2 percent inflation target within two years.Many analysts have expressed doubts on the Bank of Japan's ambitious timeline, given that the country has been struggling with deflation for more than 15 years. The inflation target is a crucial part of Prime Minister Shinzo Abe's plan, known as Abenomics."Japan's economy is starting to recover moderately," the Bank of Japan said on Thursday, pointing to better times ahead for important export markets. "Overseas economies as a whole are gradually heading toward a pickup, although a lackluster performance is partly seen."
TOKYO — Japan lodged a protest with China's top diplomat in Japan on Thursday after three Chinese paramilitary ships stayed in waters around disputed islands for longer than at any time since a fight over the area heated up last year, the Japanese Foreign Ministry said.The three vessels, identified as belonging to China's newly created Coast Guard, entered the waters off the islands in the East China Sea on Wednesday and remained for more than 28 hours, Japan's Coast Guard said. A fourth Chinese ship arrived after the first three; all the vessels left around noon on Thursday. The islands are known as the Senkaku in Japan and the Diaoyu in China.While such incursions into Japanese-administered waters have recently been taking place almost daily, the Chinese ships usually stay only a few hours. They are tailed by Japanese Coast Guard ships in a high-seas game of cat and mouse.The length of the most recent incursion brought expressions of concern in Tokyo, where the Foreign Ministry said Junichi Ihara, head of the Asian and Oceanian Affairs Bureau, summoned the acting Chinese ambassador to Japan, Han Zhiqiang, to lodge a formal protest."We have expressed our anger to the Chinese side," Foreign Minister Fumio Kishida said. "Attempts to change the status quo with implied threats of force are not permitted by the international community."The small, uninhabited islands at the center of the dispute are administered by Japan but also claimed by China and Taiwan. Since September, Chinese ships have made regular visits into the waters as part of what analysts call a long-term strategy of wearing down Japan's will to keep enforcing its claims.The territorial dispute, which has lasted decades, flared up last year after the Japanese government bought three of the five islands from their private owner. The move prompted outrage from Beijing, which saw it as an effort by Japan to solidify its claims. The Japanese government said it was acting to pre-empt the purchase of the islands by the nationalist former mayor of Tokyo, who wanted to build a lighthouse and take other more provocative steps to assert Japanese control.
KESENNUMA, Japan — A stranded fishing boat that became a symbol of the devastation of Japan's 2011 tsunami has long divided a northeastern coastal city — between those who wanted to keep it as a monument of survival and those who wanted a painful reminder gone.Last week, the city announced it will be torn down after a heated debate and citywide vote. The soul-searching over the ship highlights how the aftermath of the tsunami disaster continues to torment Japan two years later.The 330 metric ton (360 ton) Kyotokumaru was swept by the towering tsunami from the city's dock for about 750 meters (800 yards) into a residential district.It has become a landmark for Kesennuma, a port city of 70,000 people, and a testament to the destructive power of the tsunami set off by the magnitude-9.0 earthquake on March 11, 2011, which killed nearly 19,000 people.The nearby smashed buildings and debris were cleared, but the 60-meter (200-foot) tuna-fishing boat has stood, majestic but oddly jarring, on dry ground for more than two years.Opinion on the ship had been so divided it had been put to a vote by the city residents last month. Of the 14,083 responses, 68 percent, or 9,622 people, voted to have the ship destroyed. Only 16 percent voted to keep it.Yoshimi Abe, a 72 year-old housewife and Kesennuma resident, was among those who wanted to get rid of the ship.It's just a constant reminder of the terrible disaster," she said. "When I walk by it every morning, my heart aches."The house that Abe grew up in was destroyed by the tsunami, and she now lives in temporary housing.In contrast, Shigeru Saito, 80, voted to keep the boat, which he saw as a plus for drawing business."My son owns a store in the temporary market near Kyotokumaru. Many of his customers are out-of-town visitors who drop by to see the ship," he said.For now, Kyotokumaru still towers over the flattened neighborhood, its blue and red paint rusting, propped up with iron beams and fenced off with yellow tape. It's surrounded by bouquets of flowers left by people. They pray and take photos. Some just stand and stare.Much of the tsunami-hit region's rebuilding remains untouched. Fears grow about people, especially young people, leaving. Some areas will be ghost-towns for decades because of the radiation from the Fukushima Dai-ichi nuclear power plant that went into multiple meltdowns.The Fukushima fishing company, which owns the Kyotokumaru, has signed a contract with a nonprofit organization that recycles ships. The dismantling is likely to start in the next few weeks.Kesennuma Mayor Shigeru Sugawara was disappointed the landmark would soon be gone."I wanted to leave a visible symbol of what happened here for generations to come," said Sugawara. "The decision has been made, and there's nothing much more we can do."
IWAKI, Japan — Ten workers at Japan's crippled nuclear plant were exposed Monday to small amounts of radiation while conducting cleanup activities, the plant's operator said.Tokyo Electric Power Co. said it is still investigating how the workers were contaminated at the Fukushima Dai-ichi nuclear power plant, but that it may have been from radioactive dust.It said small amounts of radiation were found on the workers' faces and hair.A powerful earthquake and tsunami destroyed power and cooling systems at the plant in March 2011, causing the release of large amounts of radiation. Makeshift equipment is being used to cool the reactors, and the plant has been plagued by blackouts and leaks of contaminated water.
TOKYO — Japan's economic growth slowed in the quarter that ended in June to an annualized rate of 2.6 percent, government data showed Monday, clouding the outlook for the economic policies of Prime Minister Shinzo Abe and raising concerns that he may put off moves to tackle the country's enormous public debt.This was the third consecutive quarter of growth for Japan's gross domestic product of about $5 trillion, the third-largest in the world, after those of the United States and China.Still, the expansion fell short of analysts' expectations for Japan, whose economy grew at a robust pace of 3.8 percent in the previous quarter, helped by the Abe government's monetary and fiscal stimulus drive.Economists polled by Reuters had expected Japan's economy to grow at a similarly healthy clip in the April-to-June quarter. But weak capital expenditure, reflecting continued caution among Japanese corporations about the country's long-term prospects, slowed growth, according to figures released by the Cabinet Office.Compared with the previous quarter, the Japanese economy grew 0.6 percent.Private consumption rose a better-than-expected 0.8 percent over the previous quarter, as a brightening mood in Japan pushed up spending on food, travel and luxury products. But capital expenditure fell 0.1 percent, below a market forecast for a 0.7 percent increase."Corporations' cautious attitudes was the main factor limiting growth," Harumi Taguchi, principal economist at the research firm IHS, said in a note. Companies, he added, "remained hesitant to increase capital expenditure and continued to cut inventory in light of the slow recovery of exports and uncertainty regarding the sustainability of the economic recovery."Though export growth slowed in the quarter, shipments were expected to pick up as recovery gathered steam overseas, Mr. Taguchi said, especially in the United States and Europe.Less robust growth in China, Japan's largest trading partner, is a concern. A spat over islands in the East China Sea that are claimed by both countries, has also hurt trade between the two countries.Signs of slowing growth could strengthen the hand of critics of Mr. Abe's economic drive, known as Abenomics, which has relied heavily on monetary stimulus and government spending to revive growth in Japan's long-deflationary economy.Mr. Abe has promised to follow up with market deregulation and the easing of trade barriers to raise the long-term growth potential.Weaker growth could also derail Japan's plans to raise taxes and pare back soaring government debt, which reached ¥1 quadrillion, or $10.3 trillion, in the latest quarter, more than twice the size of its economy.To start easing that debt burden, the government plans to raise the sales tax to 8 percent next April, from the current level of 5 percent, and to 10 percent in October 2015.According to government calculations, raising the sales tax could double tax receipts to more than 5 percent of gross domestic product, compared with the current 2 percent to 3 percent.Whether Japan goes ahead with raising the tax will depend on how sustainable the government deems economic growth to be. Under the current plan, the increase will be implemented if it is likely that the economy can sustain at least 2 percent real G.D.P. growth for the next decade.Mr. Abe said Monday that he remained confident on Japan's economic prospects and that he would stay on course with economic overhauls. He has been noncommittal about the consumption tax, however."The economy has been steadily rising," he said at a news conference. "I'll continue to focus on the economy, implementing further growth strategies in the autumn."Some economists warn that raising taxes too soon could derail Japan's nascent recovery."A tightening in fiscal policy would almost certainly snuff out the current cyclical rebound," Duncan Wooldridge and Silvia Liu, economists at UBS, said in a note to clients before the G.D.P. numbers."The desire for fiscal consolidation in the long run must not sacrifice the war on deflation in the short run," the note continued. "To hike or not to hike the consumption tax is the only policy which matters over the next four quarters."
TOKYO — Brandishing a new Sony Xperia as she left a mobile phone shop in a trendy part of Tokyo, Nisako Hanawa, a 17-year-old student, explained that she had chosen that brand "because of its cool design and its good reputation."Asked about another leading smartphone maker, Samsung Electronics of South Korea, she and a friend exchanged quizzical looks. "Samsung?" Miss Hanawa asked. "I haven't heard of it."Samsung Electronics may be the largest consumer electronics company in the world, selling one out of every three smartphones and one in five televisions. LG, the other giant electronics maker in Korea, has a significant share of TV and washing machine markets in Europe and the United States. But here in trend-obsessed Japan, consumers have not caught on that elsewhere in the world some Korean products are knocking Japanese rivals off the shelves.Many Japanese explain away the absence of Korean brands by claiming the quality is inferior. "South Korean products are still affected by a 'cheap and nasty' image, which remains prevalent among Japanese above a certain age," wrote Hidehiko Mukoyama, an economist at the Japan Research Institute, in a research paper about Japan-South Korea trade relations.The evidence says otherwise. Korean-made TVs, phones, washers and cars rate higher than many Japanese brands in independent tests by Consumer Reports, CNet and others. LG TVs have been getting favorable reviews in Japan. A local magazine, HiVi, recently rated a 32-inch, high-definition, 3-D-capable LG set-top ahead of televisions in its category from Mitsubishi and Sharp.The unfamiliarity is not because tariffs make Korean products costlier. Japan eliminated the import duty on many Korean electronics products, including TVs and smartphones.But this last holdout is finally being cracked open. In 2008, LG stopped selling its televisions in Japan, but it reintroduced them two years later. Now many of the biggest electronics retailers in Japan, including the No. 1 player, Yamada Denki, and the second-biggest chain, Biccamera, sell LG TVs.At a suburban Tokyo branch of Nojima, a major Japanese retail chain, LG televisions are displayed prominently alongside sets from domestic brands like Sony, Sharp, Panasonic and Toshiba.Kohei Tomizawa, a sales clerk, said LG TVs were selling briskly, though not as well as those from Sony. LG sets "tend to be more popular with younger people, and younger people don't buy as many televisions as older customers, who tend to prefer well-known Japanese brands, like Sony," Mr. Tomizawa said.The quality myth may be less believable to a younger generation of consumers. With South Korean food and television shows popular in Japan, LG has latched on to the popularity of K-pop music across Asia and beyond. It has run ads for its smartphones in Japan that feature Kara, a Korean group that is popular in Japan."I think things have improved compared to the old days, thanks to the influence of Korean popular culture," said Byoung-Uk Lee, assistant director of the Korea Trade-Investment Promotion Agency in Japan.LG said it sold about $675 million worth of TVs, smartphones, washing machines, vacuum cleaners and other goods in Japan last year, up about 45 percent from 2010.Samsung also pulled out of Japan in 2007, after failing to make much of a dent here. (The biggest Korean carmaker, Hyundai Motor, also beat a retreat from Japan shortly thereafter.)But Samsung has come back for a second shot in Japan, starting with its smartphones. NTT Docomo, the largest mobile phone carrier in Japan, has turned to Samsung to try to fend off rising competition from two rival network operators, SoftBank and KDDI.Those two companies have been poaching customers from Docomo, which does not offer the popular iPhone. "Docomo needs Samsung, and that is giving it an opening," said Michito Kimura, an analyst at IDC, a research firm.Starting in May, Docomo plastered Japanese cities with advertising posters featuring the flagship Samsung Galaxy S4 smartphone alongside a Sony Xperia A. The campaign, for what Docomo bills as its "summer collection," is the first time that any Japanese carrier has given such prominence to a Samsung phone.So far, the results of Docomo's embrace of Samsung have been mixed. Analysts say Samsung smartphones have been a tougher sell in Japan than in other countries where consumers are familiar with the brand through the televisions and other goods.Docomo said that under its summer promotion, it had sold 400,000 Galaxy S4 phones through mid-July, but that was less than half the total of Sony Xperia A handsets.Apple dominates the Japanese smartphone business, holding a 40 percent market share in the first quarter, according to IDC. Sharp, with 15 percent, and Sony, with 13 percent, follow. Samsung has not cracked the top five vendor ranks.Japanese and Korean news media have reported that Samsung is considering re-entering the Japanese television market. Samsung declined to comment.To succeed in Japan, Samsung will have a lot of work to do changing a mind-set. But some analysts, like Sea-Jin Chang, the author of "Sony vs. Samsung: The Inside Story of the Electronics Giants' Battle for Global Supremacy," are convinced that South Korean companies have a brighter future in Japan."Japanese customers favor domestic producers," said Mr. Chang, executive director of the Center for Governance, Institutions and Organization at National University of Singapore. "No Korean or Western firms were good enough for them, except Apple. But you will find more Korean firms accepted in the Japanese mainstream in the future."
TOKYO — Jen Lin-Liu, a U.S.-born resident of China, was taking a pasta-making course in Rome when she began wondering whether the tale of Marco Polo bringing noodles to Italy from China was actually true.Her curiosity led her along the Silk Road, the ancient trade route linking Asia and Europe, eating the different kinds of pasta she found and speaking candidly with women as they cooked together in kitchens along the way.Lin-Liu, who runs a Beijing cooking school and now lives in the Chinese city of Chengdu, spoke with Reuters about noodles, dumplings and her just-published book "On the Noodle Road".Q: This got started in Italy?A: At the pasta class I was really struck by how similar the method of making fettuccine was to Chinese noodles. Not only that but there are so many shapes of noodles that I've seen across China that reminded me of Italian shapes ... A lot of the similarities were specifically things I'd seen with northern Chinese food and Italian food.In northern China they use fennel, they use a lot of eggplant, a lot of noodles. So it got my curiosity going: was there a connection between the noodles of China and pasta in Italy and was that myth about Marco Polo true? And if not, is there something else in its place that could explain all these coincidences?Q: What was one of the most surprising things you found?A: I found the similarities between the dumplings of the Silk Road to be the most striking element of the food - Chinese dumplings that evolved into a steamed dumpling in the Uighur community called manta, which are stuffed with either pumpkin or mutton and served with a clotted cream. Those dumplings cross over into Central Asia as pretty much the same thing.Then as you cross the Silk Road into Turkey that same dumpling is called manti. It gets substantially smaller, basically the size of the pinkie nail, and is filled with a little dot of beef and onion and cooked very quickly, served with a yoghurt sauce with a drizzle of mint oil and paprika and crushed walnuts. Delicious. Then that same dish you see in Italy, with tortellini, where they become a little bit bigger.What connected the tortellini with the Turkish manti is that I heard the same story told about those two dishes - that daughters-in-law, when they married into a family, were judged by how well they made them. The more they could fit on a spoon, the better daughter-in-law they were.Q: What impact has this trip had on your cooking and thinking about food?A: I have a much greater appreciation for certain ingredients such as Chinese chives. It was an interesting ingredient that I saw quite far along the Silk Road, all the way to Turkey. I had never really liked Chinese chives before but it was used in Uighur cooking. I saw it in Central Asia and then in Turkey. Mung beans were another one. In Central Asia they're a savory ingredient they make a kind of split pea soup with and they make a salad with it in Turkey that's similar to tabbouleh.It's interesting to see the different applications of ingredients, things that in China I would pretty much just associate with dumplings. To see them incorporated in different ways opens your way of thinking to why can't I serve this sweet or savory? Why does it have to be this one way?Q: In China, you've lived in Beijing, Shanghai and Chengdu - can you name a food from each city that symbolizes it to you?A: Beijing, definitely dumplings. The best dumplings are the regular dumplings filled with things like pork and fennel or lamb and pumpkin. In Shanghai, they have the Shanghai soup dumplings with very thin wrappers filled with some ground pork and soup. Those are delicious. In Chengdu, if we were going to continue with the theme, they have a dish of spicy wontons - little dumplings, wontons, covered in a really spicy, sweet sesame oil, little sesame seeds sprinkled over it. They're delicious, partly because of all the wonderful sauce you get.A: Yes, they can assimilate into so many different cultures, that's what's so different. They have inserted themselves into the flavors and cultures of every place they went.1. Place the water and salt in a large bowl, add 1 cup flour. Mix thoroughly then add the rest of the flour, 1/4 cup at a time, until all the flour has been incorporated. Transfer the dough to a clean, lightly floured surface and knead for 3 to 5 minutes until soft and pliable but still a little springy. Cover with a damp cloth or wrap in plastic and let sit for at least 30 minutes.2. In a medium bowl, combine the beef or lamb with the onion, salt, cumin and black pepper. Mix thoroughly.3. Working with 1/4 of the dough each time, roll each portion into a single very thin sheet - it should be almost translucent. Smear a very thin layer of shortening or margarine over the sheet of dough and fold it in half. Repeat, folding again. Place the dough in the centre of your working surface and roll it out into a thin square. Sprinkle flour over the dough and cut into 3-inch by 3-inch squares.4. Place a dough square in the center of your palm and add about 2 tablespoons of filling. Bring one pair of diagonally opposed corners together and press to seal, then bring the other pair together and press again. Seal the dumpling completely along the edges to make a pyramid shape with a square base. Brush each dumpling with a thin layer of beaten egg yolk.5. In oven heated to 350 degrees F (180 C), bake the dumplings for 10 minutes. Then turn up the heat to 425 F (220 C) and bake for another 10 minutes. Remove from the oven and serve immediately.
TOKYO — Japanese Prime Minister Shinzo Abe sent a ritual offering to the controversial Yasukuni Shrine for war dead on Thursday, but did not visit in person in an effort to avoid inflaming tensions with Asian neighbors.Koichi Hagiuda, an executive of the ruling Liberal Democratic Party, told reporters that Abe had sent the offering in his capacity as ruling party leader to pay his respects to the war dead and wanted to apologize for not going in person.Visits by Japanese leaders to the shrine in central Tokyo have outraged China and South Korea, which suffered under Japanese occupation and colonization in the 20th century, because wartime leaders convicted as war criminals by an Allied tribunal are honored there along with the nation's war dead.
TOKYO — Japanese Prime Minister Shinzo Abe sent a ritual offering to a controversial shrine for war dead on Thursday - the anniversary of Japan's defeat in World War Two - but did not visit in person in a effort to avoid inflaming tensions with Asian neighbors.However, at least two cabinet ministers publicly paid their respects at Yasukuni Shrine, seen as a symbol of Japan's past militarism, which is likely to anger South Korea and China and risks undermining tentative diplomatic overtures to Beijing."I asked my special aide ... to make the offering on my behalf with a feeling of gratitude and respect for those who fought and gave their precious lives for their country," Abe told reporters at the prime minister's office."As for when I might go to Yasukuni Shrine, or whether I will go or not, I will not say as this should not become a political or diplomatic issue," he said after his Liberal Democratic Party (LDP) aide conveyed the offering in the name of "Shinzo Abe, LDP leader."Chinese state media reported the country's military would conduct live fire drills for four days from Thursday in the East China Sea, though not close to Japan. Some Japanese media speculated this was timed to coincide with the Yasukuni visits.Visits to the shrine by top politicians have outraged Beijing and Seoul in the past because the shrine honors 14 Japanese wartime leaders convicted as war criminals by an Allied tribunal, along with war dead."Can you imagine what the world would think of Germany if they paid homage to Nazi boss Hitler?" retired Chinese Major General Luo Yuan, one of China's most outspoken military figures, wrote in the influential tabloid the Global Times.Japanese conservatives say it is only natural to honor the war dead and deny that doing so at Yasukuni glorifies the war.That leaves Abe treading a fine line between trying to mend ties with neighbors and appealing to his conservative backers."Paying homage to the war dead is a purely domestic matter and it's not for other countries to criticize us or intervene in these matters, Keiji Furuya, a minister whose portfolios include the national public safety commission, said after paying his respects at the shrine in central Tokyo.Internal affairs minister Yoshitaka Shindo also visited the shrine as did a group of 89 lawmakers, including LDP policy chief Sanae Takaichi and aides to another 101 MPs.Bitter memories of Japan's past militarism run deep in China and South Korea. Despite close economic ties and recent calls by Abe for a summit with Chinese President Xi Jinping, Japan's relations with its neighbors remain fraught because of territorial feuds and disputes over wartime history."Japanese leaders should show their courageous leadership to heal wounds of the past so that both countries can develop as a true cooperative partner," South Korean President Park Geun-hye said in a speech in Seoul marking the anniversary of the end of Japan's 1910-1945 colonial rule of the peninsula.Speaking later at a memorial service in Tokyo, Abe said: "We will carve out the nation's future that is full of hope, while facing history with humility and deeply engraving lessons to be learnt in our minds."Crowds of Japanese, including pensioners and schoolchildren, streamed through the shrine complex after it opened around dawn."My father died during the war, so I come here every year to pray for him and for the people who sacrificed their lives for the country," said Mariko Matsuda, 70. "It's a great shame that Prime Minister Abe won't visit the shrine today."Tokyo hoped that if Abe stayed away, it could send a signal to China of his desire to ease tensions and help pave the way for a summit.Beijing has made clear, though, that it will look askance at visits by Japanese political leaders in whatever form.A dispute over rival claims to uninhabited islands in the East China Sea intensified last September after the previous Japanese government bought the isles from a Japanese citizen.Feuding over the islands and wartime history, combined with regional rivalry and mutual mistrust, suggest that a summit is unlikely any time soon, officials involved in behind-the-scenes talks between Beijing and Tokyo told Reuters.Visits to Yasukuni by Prime Minister Junichiro Koizumi during his 2001-2006 term sent Sino-Japanese ties into a chill.The deeply conservative Abe thawed relations by staying away from the shrine during his short first term as prime minister, but later said he regretted not paying his respects as premier and made a visit after becoming LDP leader last September.Abe's agenda of bolstering the military and easing the limits of the pacifist post-war constitution on Japan's armed forces as a prelude to revising the U.S.-drafted charter have raised concerns in China, while Japan is worried about Beijing's military build-up and its maritime ambitions.
TOKYO — Japanese internal affairs minister Yoshitaka Shindo visited a shrine to war dead seen as a symbol of Japan's past militarism on Thursday, a move likely to anger China and further strain icy ties between Asia's two largest economies.China and South Korea, which suffered under Japan's occupation and colonization in the 20th century, are expected to be upset by the visit on the anniversary of Tokyo's World War Two defeat because the shrine also honors Japanese leaders convicted as war criminals by an Allied tribunal.Prime Minister Shinzo Abe, who says it is only natural to pay respects to those who died for their country, is expected to make an offering to the shrine but skip a personal visit on Thursday. China said last week that visits by Japanese political leaders were unacceptable in any form.
TOKYO — Japan's prime minister sent an offering to a shrine for war dead on Thursday, the anniversary of Japan's World War Two defeat, while cabinet members visited it in person, drawing harsh complaints from China and South Korea, and putting at risk tentative steps to improve ties.Prime Minister Shinzo Abe was treading a fine line between trying not to inflame tension with China and South Korea and upholding a conservative ideology shared by his supporters.But at least three cabinet ministers and dozens of lawmakers paid their respects at Yasukuni Shrine, seen as a symbol of Japan's past militarism."I asked my special aide ... to make the offering on my behalf with a feeling of gratitude and respect for those who fought and gave their precious lives for their country," Abe told reporters at the prime minister's office."As for when I might go to Yasukuni Shrine, or whether I will go or not, I will not say as this should not become a political or diplomatic issue," he said after his Liberal Democratic Party (LDP) aide conveyed the offering in the name of "Shinzo Abe, LDP leader."Visits to the shrine by top politicians outrage China and South Korea because the shrine honors 14 Japanese wartime leaders convicted as war criminals by an Allied tribunal, along with war dead."It does not matter in what form or using what identity Japanese political leaders visit the Yasukuni Shrine, it is an intrinsic attempt to deny and beautify that history of invasion by the Japanese militarists," China's Foreign Ministry said in a statement."We urge Japan to ... take concrete steps to win the trust of the international community, otherwise Japan's relations with its Asian neighbors have no future."Can you imagine what the world would think of Germany if they paid homage to Nazi boss Hitler?" retired Chinese Major General Luo Yuan, one of China's most outspoken military figures, wrote in the influential tabloid the Global Times.China and Korea suffered under Japanese rule, with parts of China occupied from the 1930s and Korea colonized from 1910 to 1945. Japanese leaders have apologized in the past but many in China and South Korea doubt the sincerity of the apologies, partly because of contradictory remarks by politicians.South Korea's Foreign Ministry called the visits "deplorable", saying they showed the ministers were "still keeping their eyes shut to history" and urging Japan to offer a sincere apology.Japanese conservatives say it is only natural to honor the war dead and deny that doing so at Yasukuni glorifies the war."Paying homage to the war dead is a purely domestic matter and it's not for other countries to criticize us or intervene in these matters, Keiji Furuya, a minister whose portfolios include the national public safety commission, said after paying his respects at the shrine in central Tokyo.Internal affairs minister Yoshitaka Shindo and administrative reform minister Tomomi Inada also visited the shrine as did a group of 89 lawmakers, including LDP policy chief Sanae Takaichi and aides to another 101 MPs.Chinese state media reported that it military would conduct live fire drills for four days from Thursday in the East China Sea, though not close to Japan. Some Japanese media speculated this was timed to coincide with the Yasukuni visits.Despite close economic ties and recent calls by Abe for a summit with Chinese President Xi Jinping, Japan's relations with its neighbors remain fraught."Japanese leaders should show their courageous leadership to heal wounds of the past so that both countries can develop as a true cooperative partner," South Korean President Park Geun-hye said in a speech in Seoul marking the anniversary of the end of Japan's 1910-1945 colonial rule of the peninsula.Speaking later at a memorial service in Tokyo, Abe said: "We will carve out the nation's future that is full of hope, while facing history with humility and deeply engraving lessons to be learnt in our minds."But Abe did not mention Japan's "wartime aggression" in Asia, a reference that has been included in speeches by his predecessors since 1994, according to Kyodo news agency.Crowds of Japanese, including pensioners and school children, streamed through the shrine complex after it opened around dawn."My father died during the war, so I come here every year to pray for him and for the people who sacrificed their lives for the country," said Mariko Matsuda, 70. "It's a great shame that Prime Minister Abe won't visit the shrine today."Four South Korean opposition lawmakers who tried to protest at the shrine were hustled away by police after a scuffle.Hundreds of members of the nationalist "Gambare Nippon" (Stand Firm! Japan) group, carrying Japanese flags with black mourning ribbons, later marched to the shrine, where they sang the national anthem and shouted "Long Live the Emperor".Tokyo had hoped that if Abe stayed away, it could send a signal to China of his desire to ease tension.A dispute over rival claims to uninhabited islands in the East China Sea intensified last September when the previous Japanese government bought the isles from a Japanese citizen.Feuding over the islands and wartime history, combined with regional rivalry and mutual mistrust, suggest that a summit is unlikely any time soon, officials involved in behind-the-scenes talks between Beijing and Tokyo told Reuters.Visits to Yasukuni by Prime Minister Junichiro Koizumi during his 2001-2006 term sent Sino-Japanese ties into a chill.The deeply conservative Abe improved relations by staying away from the shrine during a previous short term as prime minister, but later said he regretted not paying his respects as premier and made a visit after becoming LDP leader last September.Abe's agenda of bolstering the military and easing the limits of the pacifist post-war constitution on Japan's armed forces as a prelude to revising the U.S.-drafted charter have raised concern in China, while Japan is worried about China's military build-up and its maritime ambitions.
TOKYO — An explosion at a summer fireworks festival near Kyoto, Japan, injured 60 people, local police said Friday.The blast Thursday evening, just before the fireworks display was to start, may have been caused by a food stall vendor putting gasoline into an electricity generator without turning it off, said the deputy head of Kyoto's Fukuchiyama police station, who gave his surname as Okamoto. He said an investigation was underway.Eighteen of those hurt suffered major burns and other serious injuries, including a 13-year-old boy and a 10-year-old boy, he said.The annual festival in Fukuchiyama, Kyoto prefecture, was canceled after the explosion. Last year, it drew around 110,000 spectators.
TAGAJO, Japan — Shusaku Tani is employed at the Sony plant here, but he doesn't really work.For more than two years, he has come to a small room, taken a seat and then passed the time reading newspapers, browsing the Web and poring over engineering textbooks from his college days. He files a report on his activities at the end of each day.Sony, Mr. Tani's employer of 32 years, consigned him to this room because they can't get rid of him. Sony had eliminated his position at the Sony Sendai Technology Center, which in better times produced magnetic tapes for videos and cassettes. But Mr. Tani, 51, refused to take an early retirement offer from Sony in late 2010 — his prerogative under Japanese labor law.So there he sits in what is called the "chasing-out room." He spends his days there, with about 40 other holdouts."I won't leave," Mr. Tani said. "Companies aren't supposed to act this way. It's inhumane."The standoff between workers and management at the Sendai factory underscores an intensifying battle over hiring and firing practices in Japan, where lifetime employment has long been the norm and where large-scale layoffs remain a social taboo, at least at Japan's largest corporations.Sony wants to change that, and so does Prime Minister Shinzo Abe. As Japan's economic recovery slows, reducing the restraints on companies has become even more important to Mr. Abe's economic plans. He wants to loosen rigid rules on job terminations for full-time staff.Economists say bringing flexibility to the labor market in Japan would help struggling companies streamline bloated work forces to better compete in the global economy. Fewer restrictions on layoffs could make it easier for Sony to leave loss-ridden traditional businesses and concentrate resources on more innovative, promising ones."I have a single wish for Japan's electronics sector, and that's labor reform," said Atul Goyal, a technology analyst at Jefferies & Company.Sony said it was not doing anything wrong in placing employees in what it calls Career Design Rooms. Employees are given counseling to find new jobs in the Sony group, or at another company, it said. Sony also said that it offered workers early retirement packages that are generous by American standards: in 2010, it promised severance payments equivalent to as much as 54 months of pay. But the real point of the rooms is to make employees feel forgotten and worthless — and eventually so bored and shamed that they just quit, critics say.Labor practices in Japan contrast sharply with those in the United States, where companies are quick to lay off workers when demand slows or a product becomes obsolete. It is cruel to the worker, but it usually gives the overall economy agility. Some economists attribute the lack of a dynamic economy in Western Europe to labor laws similar to Japan's that restrict layoffs.New York had "rubber rooms" where it put teachers who would sit — with full pay — while the city tried to fire them. The practice was ended in 2010. The United Auto Workers and automakers had created, under union contracts, places where idled workers were essentially warehoused.Sony, a sprawling company with more than 146,000 employees, is under pressure. It has been outmaneuvered by more nimble competitors and its executives are trying to remake the company. Fixing Sony is especially critical after it snubbed the American activist investor Daniel S. Loeb's push to spin off part of Sony's entertainment business. Its shares have fallen almost 10 percent since Sony rejected his proposal earlier this month.Critics of labor changes say something more important is at stake. They warn that making it easier to cut jobs would destroy Japan's social fabric for the sake of corporate profits, causing mass unemployment and worsening income disparities. For a country that has long prided itself on stability and relatively equitable incomes, such a change would be unacceptable."That's not the kind of country Japan should aim to be," said Takaaki Matsuda, who leads the Sendai chapter of Sony's union.
MANILA, Philippines — Torrential rains brought the Philippine capital to a standstill Monday, submerging some areas in waist-deep floodwaters and making streets impassable to vehicles while thousands of people across coastal and mountainous northern regions fled to emergency shelters.The national disaster agency and local officials reported at least two dead and several missing. Schools, offices, the stock exchange, courts and embassies were closed as the weather bureau placed metropolitan Manila — a sprawling area of 12 million people — under red alert.The flooding following a night of heavy rains brought by the monsoon, which was enhanced by Tropical Storm Trami. It hovered over the North Philippine Sea and drenched the main northern island of Luzon with up to 30 millimeters (just over an inch) of rain per hour.TV footage showed residents trapped on rooftops as raging floodwaters swept through Binan town on Lake Laguna, near Manila.Flooding has become more frequent in Manila because of deforestation of mountains, clogged waterways and canals where large squatter communities live and poor urban planning.In the chilly northern mountain town of Sagada, army troops and police rescued 29 tourists, including 13 Japanese, who were stranded for several hours inside a cave after two days of heavy rains caused a stream at the entrance to swell, Office of Civil Defense official Andrew Alex Uy said. One Filipino tourist remained missing.Several dams in Luzon were forced to open flood gates because of rising waters and thousands of residents downstream were told to move.A landslide and floods shut down traffic on one of major highways leading out of Manila. In the outlying provinces of Cavite, Batangas and Ilocos Norte father north, local authorities said flash floods forced thousands to take refuge in schools and other sturdy buildings.Forecasters said the storm was expected to strengthen into a typhoon with winds of up to 120 kilometers (75 miles) per hour as it slowly moves away from the Philippines, passing just south of Japan's Okinawa by Wednesday.The Philippine archipelago is among the most battered by typhoons and storms in the world. About 20 tropical cyclones hit the country every year. .
TOKYO — Residents in a southern Japanese city were busy washing ash off the streets Monday after a nearby volcano spewed a record-high smoke plume into the sky.Ash wafted as high as 5 kilometers (3 miles) above the Sakurajima volcano in the southern city of Kagoshima on Sunday afternoon, forming its highest plume since the Japan Meteorological Agency started keeping records in 2006. Lava flowed about 1 kilometer (0.6 miles) from the fissure, and several huge volcanic rocks rolled down the mountainside.Though the eruption was more massive than usual, residents of the city of about 600,000 are used to hearing from their 1,117-meter (3,664-foot) neighbor. Kagoshima officials said in a statement that this was Sakurajima's 500th eruption this year alone.Residents wore masks and raincoats and used umbrellas to shield themselves from the falling ash. Drivers turned on their headlights in the dull evening gloom, and railway service in the city was halted temporarily so ash could be removed from the tracks.Officials said no injuries or damage was reported from the volcano, which is about 10 kilometers (6 miles) east of the city.By Monday morning, the air was clearer as masked residents sprinkled water and swept up the ash. The city was mobilizing garbage trucks and water sprinklers to clean up."The smoke was a bit dramatic, but we are kind of used to it," said a city official who requested anonymity because he was not allowed to speak to the media.JMA says there are no signs of a larger eruption but similar activity may continue. It was maintaining an earlier warning that people not venture near the volcano itself.Japan is on the "Ring of Fire," the seismic faults encircling the Pacific Ocean, and has frequent earthquakes and volcanic activity.
The words printed on the buses that drive through Kawaguchiko, a scenic town in the foothills of Japan's tallest and most sacred mountain, were as reassuring as they were disconcerting: "Preserve the Nature of Mt. Fuji."The message was a reminder that despite years of effort, the millions who visit the mountain and nearby towns each year and the plethora of businesses that serve them continue to have a profound impact on the environment, whether through mounting trash, poor air quality or suburban sprawl. Mount Fuji, or Fujisan as it's known to the Japanese, is the nation's most recognizable natural landmark, a conical volcano immortalized by artists like Katsushika Hokusai and Utagawa Hiroshige. These days, the mountain, less than two hours from Tokyo, is a playground for rich and poor. Climbing the mountain is on many hikers' bucket lists.But easy access to the mountain — drivers can park about halfway to the peak — has been a mixed blessing. Last year, nearly 320,000 people made the climb, yet 25 died trying. Illegally dumped garbage fills the forests. Traffic chokes surrounding roads and paths to the peak. Big events like the jazz festival at Kawaguchiko draw thousands of fans.Countermeasures have been taken. Low-waste toilets have been installed on the mountain, and tens of thousands of volunteers haul away tons of trash every year. Hybrid buses shuttle visitors to trailheads. This summer, climbers were asked to contribute a fee to help preserve the environment. But the measures will do only so much because the parade of visitors is likely to continue, especially now that Mount Fuji has been added to Unesco's World Heritage list as a cultural asset (the 13th in Japan) for inspiring artists, poets and religious pilgrims.Hearts swelled in Japan after the June 22 designation was announced. The question is whether it will draw so many more visitors that the qualities that made Mount Fuji a cultural asset in the first place will be diminished.Mount Fuji is bracing for a big jump. Other heritage sites in Japan including Hiraizumi in Iwate Prefecture, Shirakawa-go in Gifu Prefecture and Yakushima Island in southern Japan all saw an increase in visitors after they joined the list in recent years.Seiichi Kondo, Japan's Commissioner of the Agency for Cultural Affairs and a former ambassador to Unesco, said that more visitors are expected to visit Fuji, but that regulations may be strengthened to offset any degradation. "After all, the main objective of the inscription of particular sites on the list is to mobilize international efforts to protect them from various dangers, such as military conflicts, development and tourism," he wrote in an e-mail.Mr. Kondo said the number of tourists has risen 15 percent so far this year — indicative of the Japanese view that the mountain is "a special symbol of nature and their identity." According to other estimates, the number of visitors could double in the coming years. In the first 10 days of July alone, the number of hikers who passed the Yoshida Gate — a popular path to the peak — jumped 50 percent over the same period last year. Hikers were asked to bring portable toilet kits because the influx of visitors is overwhelming available infrastructure.Officials had tried on and off for 20 years to have Mount Fuji named a World Heritage site, and its inscription was front page news in June, when my wife and I visited Japan. Eager to see the celebration, we rode two hours by train to Kawaguchiko, a town 10 miles from the mountain.When we arrived at the small station, we knew instantly that many others had the same idea. After we boarded the Retro Bus that circles the town, our driver warned us that traffic would delay our trip. We crawled past gas stations, car dealers, fast-food joints and shops like Fujiyama Cookie.We got off at the Natural Living Center, where a guard was directing buses in and out of the parking lot. Nearby, vendors sold vegetables, fruit and crafts. The lakeshore gardens were pleasant though Mount Fuji's peak was obscured by thick clouds. As we walked among hundreds of photo-snapping tourists, our search for a view had little of the poetic resonance that Japan's Unesco bid suggested. So we rode the bus to the Kachi Kachi Yama Ropeway and took a cable car more than 3,000 feet to the peak, which on clear days is known for its views of Mount Fuji. There, the whistling wind mixed with the sound of revving motorcycles below. But at least we could imagine what the mountain looked like.
TOKYO — The operator of Japan's crippled Fukushima nuclear plant said on Tuesday it believes about 300 tons of highly contaminated water has leaked from a storage tank designed to hold overflows from the site.The leaked water contains 80 million becquerels of radiation per liter, a Tokyo Electric spokesman said by phone. The company will give further details at a media conference at 0330 GMT (11:30 p.m. Monday EDT).A becquerel is a measure of the release of radioactive energy.The Fukushima plant was crippled by an earthquake and tsunami in March 2011, the world's worst nuclear disaster in a quarter of a century.The government said this month it would step up its involvement in the plant's cleanup after announcing the station was leaking contaminated water into the ocean, following months of denials of a leakage by Tokyo Electric.
TOKYO — Japan will dramatically raise its warning about the severity of a toxic water leak at the Fukushima nuclear plant, its nuclear watchdog said on Wednesday, its most serious action since the plant was destroyed by an earthquake and tsunami in 2011.The deepening crisis at the Fukushima plant will be upgraded from a level 1 "anomaly" to a level three "serious incident" on an international scale for radiological releases, a spokesman for Japan's Nuclear Regulation Authority (NRA) said.That will mark the first time Japan has issued a warning on the International Nuclear Event Scale (INES) since three reactor meltdowns after the massive quake in March 2011.Water still leaking from the plant is so contaminated that a person standing close to it for an hour would receive five times the annual recommended limit for nuclear workers in a year.A maximum level 7 was declared at the battered plant after explosions led to a loss of power and cooling two years ago, confirming Fukushima as the worst nuclear accident since Chernobyl a quarter of a century earlier.Contaminated water with dangerously high levels of radiation is leaking from a storage tank at Fukushima, the plant's operator, Tokyo Electric Power Co said on Tuesday. The leak was classified as an "anomaly" earlier this week.The NRA's impending assessment upgrade came in a document posted on the agency's website on Wednesday, with formal adoption to follow a meeting that is being held by the authority's commissioners, the NRA spokesman said by telephone."Judging from the amount and the density of the radiation in the contaminated water that leaked ... a level 3 assessment is appropriate," the document said.The leak, which has not been plugged, is so contaminated that a person standing 50 cm (1.6 feet) away would, within an hour, receive a radiation dose five times the average annual global limit for nuclear workers.After 10 hours, a worker in that proximity to the leak would develop radiation sickness with symptoms including nausea and a drop in white blood cells.Each one-step INES increase represents a tenfold increase in severity, according to a factsheet on the website of the International Atomic Energy Agency. (www.iaea.org/)
GOTEMBA, Japan — Japan put its army on display Tuesday in an annual exercise at the foot of Mount Fuji intended to showcase the nation's ability to defend itself and to drum up support for plans to give Japanese troops a broader role at home and abroad.Designed more as a spectacle than a training opportunity, the exercises focus on a scenario in which Japan is attacked from the sea. As a narrator explained the attack to thousands of spectators in grandstands, a wide array of aircraft, artillery, tanks and helicopters fired on targets at the base of the scenic mountain, a powerful symbol of Japan itself.This year's exercises involve 2,400 troops, 30 aircraft and 80 tanks and armored vehicles, which is fairly typical. They will continue for several days. The exercises, held since 1961, are the biggest event put on by Japan's army, called the Ground Self-Defense Forces, each year.Defense Minister Itsunori Onodera, in a written statement, said the exercises show Japan's resolve to meet "deepening uncertainties'" in the region and to be able to defend its own territory.Though he did not go into specifics, Japan has been at a standoff with China for months over a group of small, uninhabited islands that both nations claim. The dispute over the islands, called the Senkaku in Japan and the Diaoyu in China, has soured relations between the two Asian giants and raised concerns in Tokyo that Japan must increase its military strength to meet China's growing power.Onodera noted the need for Japan to upgrade its surveillance capabilities — primarily to keep a watch over Chinese activity around the islands — and said Japan's military will increasingly be called upon to join in international peace-keeping operations, the fight against piracy and bilateral activities with Japan's allies.Japan has long relied on its main ally, the United States, to guarantee its defense. While Tokyo continues to look to Washington to play a big role in any contingency, both countries would also like to see Japan play a larger role in maintaining the Asian balance of power. Prime Minister Shinzo Abe, an outspoken conservative and China-policy hawk, has made strengthening the military one of his top policy goals. Abe specifically wants to ease constitutional restrictions on the military imposed after the war so that it can operate more freely.Under Japan's postwar constitution, the military is limited to a strictly defensive role and cannot fight with its allies unless its own nation is under attack.Abe's position has raised concerns among Japan's neighbors, who suffered at the hands of the Japanese military in World War II.Tokyo's growing rivalry with Beijing has also generated fears that an incident near the islands could lead to an armed clash, or that the two countries could undermine stability in the region with an escalating arms race.
TOKYO — Japan's nuclear watchdog said a leak of highly radioactive water at the crippled Fukushima nuclear power plant could be the beginning of a new disaster — a series of leaks of contaminated water from storage tanks.The plant operator has built hundreds of steel tanks to store massive amounts of radioactive water coming from three melted reactors, as well as underground water running into reactor and turbine basements.Tokyo Electric Power Co. says about 300 tons (300,000 liters, 80,000 gallons) of contaminated water leaked from one of the tanks, possibly through a seam. The leak is the fifth, and the worst, since last year involving tanks of the same design at the wrecked Fukushima Dai-ichi plant, raising concerns that contaminated water could begin leaking from storage tanks one after another."That's what we fear the most. We must remain alert. We should assume that what has happened once could happen again, and prepare for more," Nuclear Regulation Authority Chairman Shunichi Tanaka told a news conference. "We are in a situation where there is no time to waste."The watchdog also proposed at a weekly meeting Wednesday to raise the rating of the seriousness of the leak to level 3, a "serious incident," from level 1, "an anomaly," on an International Nuclear and Radiological event scale from 0 to 7.The watchdog urged TEPCO to step up monitoring for leaks and take precautionary measures.During the meeting, officials also revealed that plant workers apparently have overlooked several signs of leaks, suggesting that their twice-daily patrols were largely just a walk. They have not monitored water levels inside tanks, obviously missed a puddle forming at the bottom of the tank earlier, and kept open a valve on an anti-leakage barrier around the tanks.TEPCO said the leaked water is believed to have mostly seeped into the ground after escaping from the barrier around the tank. It initially said the leak did not pose an immediate threat to the sea because of its distance — about 500 meters (1,650 feet) — from the coastline.But TEPCO reversed that view late Wednesday and acknowledged a possible leak to the sea after detecting high radioactivity inside a gutter extending to the ocean.The company also said the tank may have been leaking slowly for weeks through a possible flaw in its bottom. That could create extensive soil contamination and a blow to plans to release untainted underground water into the sea as part of efforts to reduce the amount of radioactive water.The leaks have shaken confidence in the reliability of hundreds of tanks that are crucial for storing water that has been pumped into the broken reactors to keep melted radioactive fuel cool.The plant suffered multiple meltdowns following a massive earthquake and tsunami in March 2011 — a level 7 "major accident" and the worst since Chernobyl in 1986.About 350 of some 1,000 steel tanks built across the plant complex containing nearly 300,000 tons (300 million liters, 80 million gallons) of partially treated contaminated water are less-durable ones with rubber seams.TEPCO says the tanks that have leaked use rubber seams that were intended to last about five years. TEPCO spokesman Masayuki Ono said it plans to build additional tanks with welded seams that are more watertight, but will still have to rely on ones with rubber seams.Figuring out what to do with the radioactive water is among the most pressing issues affecting the cleanup process, which is expected to take decades."The growing contaminated water has been one of our biggest concerns since the March 11 accident," said Zengo Aizawa, TEPCO's executive vice president. "The contaminated water remains a problem that could lead to a crisis."The leaked water's radiation level, measured about 50 centimeters (2 feet) above the puddle, was about 100 millisieverts per hour — the maximum cumulative exposure allowed for plant workers over five years, Ono said.Contaminated water that TEPCO has been unable to contain continues to enter the Pacific Ocean at a rate of hundreds of tons per day. Much of that is ground water that has mixed with untreated radioactive water at the plant.
TOKYO — Contaminated water with dangerously high levels of radiation is leaking from a storage tank at Japan's crippled Fukushima nuclear plant, the most serious setback to the clean up of the worst nuclear accident since Chernobyl.The storage tank breach of about 300 tons of water is separate from contaminated water leaks reported in recent weeks, plant operator Tokyo Electric Power Co said on Tuesday.The latest leak, which is continuing, is so contaminated that a person standing 50 centimeters (1.6 feet) away would, within an hour, receive a radiation dose five times the average annual global limit for nuclear workers.After 10 hours, a worker in that proximity to the leak would develop radiation sickness with symptoms including nausea and a drop in white blood cells."That is a huge amount of radiation. The situation is getting worse," said Michiaki Furukawa, who is professor emeritus at Nagoya University and a nuclear chemist.The embattled utility Tokyo Electric has struggled to keep the Fukushima site under control since an earthquake and tsunami caused three reactor meltdowns in March 2011.Japan's Nuclear Regulation Authority has classified the latest leak as a level 1 incident, the second lowest on an international scale for radiological releases, a spokesman told Reuters on Tuesday.But it is the first time Japan has issued a so-called INES rating for Fukushima since the meltdowns. Following the quake and tsunami, Fukushima was assigned the highest rating of 7, when it was hit by explosions after a loss of power and cooling.A Tokyo Electric official said that workers who were monitoring storage tanks appeared to have failed to detect the leak of water which pooled up around the tank."We failed to discover the leak at an early stage and we need to review not only the tanks but also our monitoring system," he said.Continued contaminated water leaks from Fukushima has alarmed Japan's neighbors South Korea and China.Tokyo Electric, also known as Tepco, has been criticized for its failure to prepare for the disaster and been accused of covering up the extent of the problems at the plant.Massive amounts of radioactive fluids are accumulating at the Fukushima plant as Tepco floods reactor cores via a jerry-rigged system to keep melted uranium fuel rods cool and stable.The water in the improvised cooling system then flows into basements and trenches that have been leaking since the disaster.Highly contaminated excess water is pumped out and stored in steel tanks on elevated ground away from the reactors, which lie adjacent to the coast. About 400 tons of radioactive water per day has been pooling and kept in storage at Fukushima.In order to keep up with the pace of the contaminated water flow, Tepco has mostly relied on tanks that are bolted together with plastic sealing around the joints. Those tanks are less robust -- but quicker to assemble -- than the welded tanks that the utility has recently started installing.The latest leak came from the more fragile type of tank, which Tepco plans to keep using, although it is looking at ways to improve their strength, said Tepco official Masayuki Ono.Tepco said it did not believe that water from the latest leak had reached the ocean, about 500 meters (550 yards) away.A puddle that formed near the leaking tank is emitting a radiation dose of 100 millisieverts an hour about 50 centimeters above the water surface, Ono told reporters at a press briefingIn recent months the plant has been beset with power outages and other problems that have led outside experts to question whether Tepco is qualified to handle the cleanup, which is unprecedented due to the amount of radioactive material on the site and its coastal location.The government said this month it will step up its involvement in the plant's cleanup, following Tepco's admission, after months of denial, that leaked contaminated water had reached the ocean.Tepco has also struggled with worker safety. This month, 12 workers decommissioning the plant were found to have been contaminated by radiation. The utility has not yet identified what caused those incidents, which only came to its notice when alarms sounded as the workers prepared to leave the job site.A South Korean Foreign Ministry spokesman confirmed on Tuesday media reports that Seoul had asked Japanese officials to publicly explain what they were doing to stop contaminated water reaching the Pacific Ocean and valuable fishing grounds."Tepco and the government must come up with ways to stop the leaks as well as to monitor and analyze how much and what sort of radiation is entering the ocean, as well as the affect it is having on fish and sea plants," Furukawa said."They also need to make the information available to the public, all over the world, given this is the first case in history where contaminated water from a nuclear plant is flowing into the ocean at this magnitude," he said.
TOKYO — Japan's nuclear watchdog said on Wednesday it is concerned that more storage tanks at the wrecked Fukushima nuclear plant will spring leaks, following the discovery that highly contaminated water is leaking from one of the hastily built containers.The deepening crisis at the Fukushima plant will be upgraded from a level 1 "anomaly" to a level three "serious incident" on an international scale for radiological releases, a spokesman for Japan's Nuclear Regulation Authority said earlier on Wednesday.
JERUSALEM — Israel has distanced itself from a government official who made crude comments about the World War II nuclear bombings of Hiroshima and Nagasaki.Responding to a Japanese request for clarification, a top Israeli envoy told Japan that the comments were "unacceptable" and that the official had been suspended.Danny Seaman was a government public relations official and posted on Facebook that he was "sick" of "self-righteous" Japanese and international commemorations of Hiroshima and Nagasaki victims. He said those events were the results of "Japanese aggression."Israeli diplomatic officials said Thursday that the clarifications were made last week. The officials spoke on condition of anonymity because they were not authorized to discuss the private diplomatic discussions with the media.The Japanese Embassy did not return a call seeking comment.
TOKYO — Deep beneath Fukushima's crippled nuclear power station, a massive underground reservoir of contaminated water that began spilling from the plant's reactors after the 2011 earthquake and tsunami has been creeping slowly toward the Pacific.Now, 2 1/2 years later, experts fear it is about to reach the ocean and greatly worsen what is fast becoming a new crisis at Fukushima: the inability to contain vast quantities of radioactive water.The looming crisis is potentially far greater than the discovery earlier this week of a leak from a tank that stores contaminated water used to cool the reactor cores. That 300-ton (80,000-gallon) leak is the fifth and most serious from a tank since the March 2011 disaster, when three of the plant's reactors melted down after a huge earthquake and tsunami knocked out the plant's power and cooling functions.But experts believe the underground seepage from the reactor and turbine building area is much bigger and possibly more radioactive, confronting the plant's operator, Tokyo Electric Power Co., with an invisible, chronic problem and few viable solutions. Many also believe it is another example of how TEPCO has repeatedly failed to acknowledge problems that it could almost certainly have foreseen — and taken action to mitigate before they got out of control.It remains unclear what the impact of the contamination on the environment will be because the radioactivity will be diluted as it spreads farther into the sea. Most fishing in the area is already banned, but fishermen in nearby Iwaki City had been hoping to resume test catches next month following favorable sampling results. Those plans have been scrapped after news of the latest tank leak."Nobody knows when this is going to end," said Masakazu Yabuki, a veteran fisherman in Iwaki, just south of the plant, where scientists say contaminants are carried by the current. "We've suspected (leaks into the ocean) from the beginning. ... TEPCO is making it very difficult for us to trust them."To keep the melted nuclear fuel from overheating, TEPCO has rigged a makeshift system of pipes and hoses to funnel water into the broken reactors. The radioactive water is then treated and stored in the aboveground tanks that have now developed leaks. But far more leaks into the reactor basements during the cooling process — then through cracks into the surrounding earth and groundwater.About 1,000 tons of underground water from the mountains flows into the plant compound each day, of which 400 tons seep into the reactor and turbine basements and get contaminated. The remaining 600 avoids that area, but at least half of it is believed to eventually come in contact with contamination elsewhere before entering the sea, according to an estimate by Japan's Agency for Natural Resources and Energy.Scientists, pointing to stubbornly high radioactive cesium levels in bottom-dwelling fish since the disaster, had for some time suspected the plant was leaking radioactive water into the ocean. TEPCO repeatedly denied that until last month, when it acknowledged contaminated water has been leaking into the ocean from early in the crisis. Even so, the company insists the seepage is coming from part of a network of maintenance tunnels, called trenches, near the coast, rather than underground water coming out of the reactor and turbine area."So far, we don't have convincing data that confirm a leak from the turbine buildings. But we are open to consider any possible path of contamination," said TEPCO spokesman Yoshimi Hitosugi.The turbine buildings at the Fukushima Dai-ichi plant are about 150 meters (500 feet) from the ocean. According to a Japan Atomic Energy Agency document, the contaminated underground water is spreading toward the sea at a rate of about 4 meters (13 feet) a month.At that rate, "the water from that area is just about to reach the coast," if it hasn't already, said Atsunao Marui, an underground water expert at the National Institute of Advanced Industrial Science and Technology who is on a government committee studying the contaminated water problem. "We must contain the problem as quickly as possible."TEPCO, nationalized and burdened with the astronomical cleanup costs, has been criticized for repeatedly lagging in attempts to tackle leakage problems. As a precautionary step, it has created chemical blockades in the ground along the coast to stop any possible leaks, but experts question their effectiveness. After a nearly two-year delay, construction of an offshore steel wall designed to contain contaminated water has begun.The utility has also proposed building frozen walls — upside down comb-shaped sticks that refrigerate surrounding soil — into the ground around the reactor areas, but that still has to be tested and won't be ready until 2015 if proved successful.Prime Minister Shinzo Abe earlier this month announced that the government would intervene and provide funding for key projects to deal with the contaminated water problem."This is a race against the clock," said Toyoshi Fuketa, a commissioner on Japan's Nuclear Regulation Authority.Compounding TEPCO's problems is the new leak discovered this week. Most of the 300 tons is believed to have seeped into the ground, but some may have escaped into the sea through a rainwater gutter, said Zengo Aizawa, the company's executive vice president.That, too, may be a harbinger of more problems ahead.Some 1,000 steel tanks built across the plant complex contain nearly 300,000 tons (300 million liters, 80 million gallons) of partially treated contaminated water. About 350 of the tanks have rubber seams intended to last for only five years. TEPCO spokesman Masayuki Ono said the company plans to build additional tanks with welded seams that are more watertight, but will have to rely on rubber seams in the meantime.Shinji Kinjo, a regulatory official in charge of the Fukushima disaster, said the rubber-seam tanks were mostly built in a rush when the contaminated water problem started, and often lacked adequate quality tests and require close attention.Workers spotted two more questionable tanks during an inspection Thursday.After his inspection Friday, Fuketa, the regulatory commissioner, said that the plant's twice-daily leak-spotting patrols were "sloppy," and that there were hardly any protective measures taken in anticipation of a potential tank leak."It's like a haunted house, one thing happening after another," said Nuclear Regulation Authority Chairman Shunichi Tanaka, referring to the spate of problems at the plant. "But we must take any steps that would reduce risks to avoid a fatal accident."Leaks of highly contaminated water from the aboveground tanks aggravate the groundwater problem."Any contamination in the groundwater would eventually flow into the ocean. That is very difficult to stop even with barriers," said Ken Buesseler, a marine chemist at the Woods Hole Oceanographic Institution in Massachusetts. He found that radioactive cesium levels in most fish caught off the Fukushima coast hadn't declined in the year following the March 2011 disaster, suggesting that the contaminated water from the reactor-turbine areas is already leaking into the sea.But TEPCO hasn't provided the details he and other scientists need to further assess the situation.
HIRONO, Japan — The operator of Japan's wrecked Fukushima nuclear plant was careless in monitoring tanks storing dangerously radioactive water, the nuclear regulator said on Friday, the latest development in a crisis no one seems to know how to contain.Tokyo Electric Power Co. also failed to keep records of inspections of the tanks, Nuclear Regulation Authority (NRA) Commissioner Toyoshi Fuketa told reporters after a visit to the nearby Fukushima Daiichi plant.Fuketa visited the plant on Friday after NRA chairman Shunichi Tanaka said this week he was concerned more of the hastily built giant containers would fail."Fundamentally, for a facility holding that kind of radioactive water, they did not take action that foresaw the risks of possible leaks," Fuketa said."On top of that, and this is an impression I had before my visit, I can't help but say that the inspections were careless."Japan's nuclear crisis this week escalated to its worst level since a massive earthquake and tsunami crippled the plant more than two years ago, with Tokyo Electric saying a tank holding highly contaminated water leaked 300 tonnes of radioactive fluid.It was the fifth and most serious breach of the same type of tank, as the crisis goes from bad to worse, prompting neighbouring China to express shock at the continuing leaks.A tsunami crashed into the plant, north of Tokyo, on March 11, 2011, causing fuel-rod meltdowns at three reactors, radioactive contamination of air, sea and food and triggering the evacuation of 160,000 people.It was the world's worst nuclear accident since Chernobyl in 1986. There are 350 tanks in place at Fukushima holding radioactive water used to cool the fuel rods. The plant is fast running out of space.Tokyo Electric said on Thursday new spots of high radiation had been found near the storage tanks, raising fear of fresh leaks.Tokyo Electric, which has long had problems with documentation, did not keep proper records of its tank inspections and therefore missed problems, Fuketa said.
TOKYO — The operator of Japan's crippled nuclear plant said Saturday that deteriorated seams and a possible contortion of a reassembled storage tank might have caused a massive contaminated water leak that has triggered fears over the plant's radioactive water management.Tokyo Electric Power Co. said that after the foundation of the tank, which was storing radioactive water, partially collapsed two years ago, it was moved and reassembled. A 300-ton water leak from the tank was discovered Monday.The massive leak was the fifth and worst from a Fukushima Dai-ichi tank since the plant suffered triple meltdowns after the massive earthquake and tsunami in 2011. All five of the plant's tanks are collapsible and are seamed with rubber seals.TEPCO spokesman Noriyuki Imaizumi said the tank passed a water-tightness test and other safety requirements after being reassembled. The leak might have started when rubber seals degenerated, failing to cushion the tank's possible contortion, he said, adding that the company was further investigating the cause.Nuclear regulatory officials have raised concerns over a design flaw of the rubber seam tanks and urged a switch to more durable welded-seam tanks.TEPCO said that it believes the leaked water seeped mostly underground, but that some might have escaped into the Pacific.About one-third of the plant's 1,000 tanks storing contaminated water use the same design. The water had been used to cool the wrecked reactors.The latest leak was another example of how TEPCO has repeatedly failed to acknowledge problems it could have foreseen and acted on to mitigate before they got out of control. The tank problem also compounds TEPCO's ongoing battle with other radioactive water leaks from elsewhere in the plant that have already escaped into the ocean.
YOTSUKURA, Japan — Third-generation fisherman Fumio Suzuki sets out into the Pacific Ocean every seven weeks. Not to catch fish to sell, but to catch fish that can be tested for radiation.For the last 2 ½ years, fishermen from the port of Yotsukura near the stricken Fukushima Dai-Ichi nuclear plant have been mostly stuck on land with little to do. There is no commercial fishing along most of the Fukushima coast. In a nation highly sensitive to food safety, there is no market for the fish caught near the stricken plant because the meltdowns it suffered contaminated the ocean water and marine life with radiation.A sliver of hope emerged after recent sampling results showed a decline in radioactivity in some fish species. But a new crisis spawned by fresh leaks of radioactive water from the Fukushima plant last week may have dashed those prospects.Fishermen like 47-year-old Suzuki now wonder whether they ever will be able to resume fishing, a mainstay for many small rural communities like Yotsukura, 45 kilometers (30 miles) south of the Fukushima plant. His son has already moved on, looking for work in construction."The operators (of the plant) are reacting too late every time in whatever they do," said Suzuki, who works with his 79-year-old father Choji after inheriting the family business from him."We say, 'Don't spill contaminated water,' and they spilled contaminated water. They are always a step behind so that is why we can't trust them," Suzuki said, as his trawler, the Ebisu Maru, traveled before dawn to a point about 45 kilometers (30 miles) offshore from the Fukushima plant to bring back a test catch.With his father at the wheel, Suzuki dropped the heavy nets out the back of the boat, as the black of night faded to a sapphire sky, tinged orange at the horizon.As the sun rose over a glassy sea, father and son hauled in the heavily laden nets and then set to the hard work of sorting the fish: sardines, starfish, sole, sea bream, sand sharks, tossing them into yellow and blue plastic baskets as sea gulls screamed and swooped overhead.Five hours later, the Ebisu Maru docked at Yotsukura where waiting fishermen dumped the samples into coolers and rushed them to a nearby laboratory to be gutted and tested.Suzuki says his fisheries co-operative will decide sometime soon whether to persist in gathering samples.For now they will have to survive on compensation from the government and Tokyo Electric Power Co., the plant's operator.The cooperative also had plans to start larger-scale test catches next month that would potentially also be for consumption if radiation levels were deemed safe.But those plans were put on hold after more bad news last week: authorities discovered that a massive amount of partially treated, radioactive water was leaking from tanks at Fukushima, the fifth and so far the worst, breach.The water, stored in 1,000 tanks, is pumped into three damaged reactors to keep their melted fuel cool. Much of the water leaked into the ground but some may have escaped into the sea through a rain-water gutter.On Wednesday, the Nuclear Regulation Authority upgraded its rating of the leak to a "serious incident," or level 3, up from a level 1 on the international scale of the International Atomic Energy Agency.It remains unclear what the environmental impact from the latest contamination will be on sea life. Scientists have said contamination tends to be carried by a southward current and largely diluted as it spreads.Nobuyuki Hatta, director of the Fukushima Prefecture Fisheries Research Center, said the trend had been positive before the latest leaks, with fewer fish found exceeding radiation limits.The government's safety limit is 100 becquerels per kilogram, but local officials have set a stricter bar of 50 becquerels, said Hatta, who still expects test fishing to resume in September.It all depends on the type of fish, their habitat and what they eat. Out of 170 types of fish tested, 42 fish species are off limits due to concern they are too radioactive, another 15 species show little or no signs of contamination. Few, if any, show any detectable levels of cesium.Tests take over a month and are complicated. The time lag makes it difficult to say at any given point if sea life caught off the Fukushima coast is really safe to eat.Also, local labs lack the ability to test fish for other toxic elements such as strontium and tritium. Scientists say strontium should be particularly watched for, as it accumulates in bones. TEPCO's monitoring results of sea water show spikes in strontium levels in recent weeks.Suzuki has little faith in the future of his business."People in the fishing business have no choice but to give up," he said. "Many have mostly given up already."Associated Press writers Elaine Kurtenbach and Mari Yamaguchi in Tokyo contributed to this report.
TOKYO — Japan's nuclear regulator said on Wednesday it has officially raised the severity rating of the latest radioactive water leak at the crippled Fukushima nuclear plant to Level 3 on an international scale for radiological releases.The upgrade by Japan's Nuclear Regulation Authority (NRA) raises the rating of what was Japan's first warning on the International Nuclear and Radiological Event Scale (INES) since the three reactor meltdowns at the Fukushima plant in March 2011, which were triggered by a massive earthquake and tsunami. Those meltdowns were classified as Level 7, the highest INES rating.The plant's operator, Tokyo Electric Power Co, said last week that 300 tonnes of highly radioactive water leaked from a storage tank at the facility. The utility still does not know how long the water may have been leaking and said it was possible the contaminated water may have reached the Pacific Ocean.The NRA had said last week that it may upgrade the severity of the crisis from a Level 1 "anomaly" to a Level 3 "serious incident" on the INES scale, after consultations with the International Atomic Energy Agency.
TOKYO — Japan's first new rocket in 12 years failed to lift off on Tuesday, dealing a potential blow to hopes that Japan may be able to take a larger share of the growing, multi-billion dollar satellite launch industry.It was the second setback for the Epsilon rocket this month.An earlier launch was postponed because of a computer glitch. No word was immediately available on the cause of the problem on Tuesday or when the launch might be tried again.The countdown at Japan's Uchinoura launch center was broadcast live over the Internet, with commentary in English as well as Japanese. But nothing happened at the end of the countdown.JAXA, Japan's space agency, later said the launch was halted with 19 seconds to go. Japanese media said an "irregularity" had been detected.A three-stage rocket, the Epsilon - named for the fifth letter of the Greek alphabet - is 24.4 meters (80 feet) high, about half the size of Japan's workhorse H2A rocket. It weighs 91 metric tons (100.31 tons) and has been touted as a new, low-cost alternative.The rocket was scheduled to carry a telescope into space for observation of the solar system.Analysts said it was not immediately clear how much of an impact the failure would have on Japan's ambitions to cash in on the international satellite launch industry."This was the first flight and it was already postponed once and now will be postponed again," said Yukihiro Kumagai, an analyst at Jefferies & Co securities in Tokyo."Inevitably, this will raise some questions, but overall it is unlikely to have much influence," he added, noting that the Epsilon is not scheduled for another flight until 2015.The rocket's smaller size and a computer system that allows it to perform its own system checks means it can be assembled quickly, which is expected to cut both personnel and equipment costs.Launch control can be carried out using conventional desktop computers, greatly reducing costs and making the launches more mobile since they could take place at more sites.U.S. companies had a monopoly on the commercial launch business 30 years ago, but its hold has steadily declined, with most of the business going to the France-based Arianespace, a public-private European partnership that in 2012 reported revenue of 1.3 billion euros.The market has been shaken up by the recent entry of the California-based Space Exploration Technologies, known as SpaceX.Russia also markets a variety of rockets for space launches. Its workhorse Soyuz spaceships have been the only vehicles delivering crews to the ISS since the U.S. Space Shuttle fleet was retired from service in 2011.India and China also provide launch services to some extent.
TOKYO — Prime Minister Shinzo Abe should clarify whether he will visit a Tokyo shrine seen in much of Asia as a symbol of Japan's past militarism if he really wants to improve ties with China, a former moderate leader of Abe's party said on Wednesday.Chinese anger over Japanese politicians' visits to Yasukuni Shrine, where Japanese leaders convicted as war criminals by an Allied tribunal are honored, has strained ties already fraught over a dispute over tiny islands in the East China Sea.The conservative Abe wants to restore Japan's pride in its past and ease the U.S.-drafted, pacifist constitution's restraints on the military.The prime minister also says he is keen to improve ties with China. But China has brushed aside his calls for a summit as "grandstanding".Abe sent a ritual offering to Yasukuni on the August 15 anniversary of Japan's defeat in World War Two. But, as usual, he declined to say if he would make a pilgrimage in future."If he is not going to Yasukuni Shrine, he should say so," Yohei Kono, a former head of Abe's Liberal Democratic Party (LDP), told Reuters in an interview."Now he just says he won't say whether or not he will go, so even if Japan makes a proposal, China and South Korea cannot respond. On the one hand, he says the window is open (for dialogue), but leaves unclear whether he will visit the shrine or not, so they are afraid to step through the window."Relations between Japan and South Korea are also frayed by rows over wartime history and disputed isles.Twenty years ago this month Kono, then Japan's top government spokesman, put his name to a statement apologizing for the involvement of Japan's military in forcing "comfort women", as they are known in Japan, to work in wartime brothels. Most of the women were Asian, many Korean.The statement has been the target of criticism by Japanese ultra-conservatives, who argue there is no proof of direct involvement by the government or military in human trafficking.Abe has questioned the so-called Kono Statement in the past. But recently, under pressure from security ally Washington, he has dropped suggestions his government might alter those official remarks or tamper with a 1995 apology by then-Prime Minister Tomiichi Murayama.Kono said frequent remarks by Japanese politicians at odds with official apologies over the war eroded international trust in Japan."To be seen as a country which simply says what is expedient at the time, that alters mid-stream what should be maintained and forgets or ignores past promises is certainly a minus for Japan," said Kono, who also served as foreign minister.Kono also criticized Abe's push to revise or reinterpret Japan's U.S.-drafted pacifist constitution, seen by Japanese conservatives as a document forced on the country and out of tune with the current security environment including a rising China and unpredictable North Korea,"We must at all costs preserve the spirit of the constitution at the time it was drafted - that we will never go to war, that we will not use force to resolve international disputes," he said. "It is not possible to cope with such changes (in the security environment) with force."We should do so through diplomacy."Kono, who retired from parliament four years ago, is typical of the moderate conservatives who were once a significant force in the long-dominant LDP but who have lost ground as it tilted right. The party staged a comeback in December after three years out of power and cemented its grip in a July upper house poll that ended a deadlock in parliament.Kono said there were still moderate LDP lawmakers but they were wary of speaking out under Abe's leadership. "I'm at a loss," he said. "When I look at the results of that upper house election, what I am saying might seem like grumbling by one of a few people off in a corner."
TOKYO — A U.S. envoy was set to leave Japan on Friday to secure the release of an imprisoned and ailing American missionary in North Korea, a move that could signal the start of a gradual thaw in relations between Washington and Pyongyang.Robert King, special envoy for North Korean human rights issues, is scheduled to return from Pyongyang on Saturday after a one-day trip, an official at the U.S. Embassy in Tokyo said. The official was unable to specify exact times.The State Department has termed the trip a "humanitarian mission" and played down any connection between Bae's release and the North's sanctioned nuclear weapons program, although the planned release follows a pattern of previous periods of tension and thaws.King secured the release of another Korean-American missionary, Jung Young Su, in 2011 as part of a trip to assess North Korean pleas for food aid.Relations between Washington and Pyongyang have been in deep freeze since the collapse of a food deal in early 2012, when North Korea broke its promise to end its long-range rocket launches and prevented nuclear inspectors from examining its nuclear stockpiles and production.Bae, 45, was sentenced to 15 years hard labor for attempting to overthrow the North Korean state by spreading anti-government propaganda, according to North Korean media. His health has deteriorated since he was jailed and he has diabetes.North Korean state media said Bae started his plot to "topple" the country's government in 2006, a date that coincides with his own testimony about his arrival in China.It accused him of infiltrating 250 students into the country, spreading "false propaganda" and of bribing North Korean citizens in a bid to bring down the government.Bae lived in a Chinese town that borders North Korea and worked for a tour company while undertaking missionary work inside North Korea.North Korea says it practices religious freedom but religious expression is in effect tightly controlled in a state that acknowledges total loyalty to the Kim dynasty that has ruled for three generations. North Korea features at the bottom of most independent surveys of freedom.In online postings of one of his speeches on his missionary work, Bae described himself and a party he took to North Korea as "warriors for Christ" and told of holding a prayer meeting on a beach.The postings have since been removed, as have all traces of Bae's involvement with a tour company operating out of China.In a videotaped sermon, also removed from the Internet, Bae talked of bringing 300 people to a coastal town in North Korea to emulate the biblical destruction of the walls of Jericho.Bae's family has acknowledged his deeply held religious beliefs but have suggested that his sympathy for North Korean orphans may have been behind his arrest.
TOKYO — Japan's nuclear regulator said Thursday that it is largely unknown what impact radioactive water leaking from the country's wrecked nuclear plant is having on the Pacific Ocean and the situation must be monitored more closely.Nuclear Regulation Authority Chairman Shunichi Tanaka said the current monitoring of the ongoing leaks at the Fukushima Dai-ichi plant was insufficient and he urged a more comprehensive effort to monitor contamination in the ocean near the plant.Also Thursday, Japanese fisheries association executives strongly criticized the plant operator over the unstoppable leaks, saying the situation could doom Japan's fishing industry.The plant suffered triple meltdowns after the massive earthquake and tsunami in March 2011. The plant's operator, Tokyo Electric Power Co., must constantly cool the reactors with water, and is struggling to contain the waste.TEPCO recently acknowledged the chronic leaking of radiation-tainted underground water into the Pacific, plus a 300-ton (300,000-liter, 80,000-gallon) seepage from one of more than 1,000 storage tanks. The leak was the firth and worst from a tank since the crisis began.The tank leak prompted the nuclear authority to upgrade its rating Wednesday to a level-3 "serious incident," from a level 1 on the International Atomic Energy Agency radiological event scale."We cannot fully stop contaminated water leaks right away. That's the reality. The water is still leaking in to the sea, and we should better assess its environmental impact," Tanaka said in a speech in Tokyo.Tanaka said his agency recently set up a team to collect data more systematically and comprehensively to assess the extent of contamination and evaluate the impact on the ocean.Scientists have said contamination tends to be carried by a southward current and gets largely diluted as it spreads into the sea.Fisheries officials are not convinced. The recent leaks aggravated the image of Japanese seafood in and outside the country, and consumers are even shunning fish proven to not be tainted, said Japan Fisheries Cooperatives Chairman Hiroshi Kishi."We think that contaminated water management by your company has completely fallen apart," Kishi said, as he confronted TEPCO President Naomi Hirose at the company's headquarters in Tokyo. "This deals an unmeasurable blow to the future of Japan's fishing industry and we are extremely concerned."Commercial fishing off the Fukushima coast has been mostly banned since the accident, except for limited catch of selected fish and deep sea catch.In a nation highly sensitive to food safety, there is no market for the fish caught near the stricken plant.
TOKYO — Japan's economic recovery gained momentum in July as manufacturing accelerated and consumer prices rose for a second straight month, despite weaker household spending and retail sales.The data released on Friday showed that the consumer price index rose 0.7 percent in July from a year earlier, the second straight month of gains. That suggests efforts to end demand-dampening deflation are progressing. The index rose 0.2 percent in June.However, the core index, which excludes food and energy prices, fell 0.1 percent.The Ministry of Economy, Trade and Industry said industrial output rose 1.6 percent from a year earlier, but 3.2 percent from the month before, suggesting the recovery is taking hold. It forecasts further expansion in August and September.The government's strategy is aimed at generating inflation that it says will help perk up demand, and, in response, investment and employment, ending years of stagnation. However, economists say that without matching increases in wages, the rising prices and planned tax increases could actually weaken consumer demand, undermining any economic rebound.Average household spending fell 1.4 percent in July from a year earlier, despite slight improvements in income and the jobless rate, which fell to 3.8 percent from 3.9 percent the month before.Retail sales fell 0.3 percent in July from a year earlier for the first decline in three months. Sales of clothing and other items sagged, while food sales rose.
TOKYO — Another foreign player is challenging Sadaharu Oh's single-season home run record in Japan and may get a fair chance to break it this time.With 30 games left in the season, Wladimir Balentien of the Yakult Swallows has 52 homers, just three shy of the record set by Oh in 1964.Former major leaguers Tuffy Rhodes and Alex Cabrera matched the record in 2001 and 2002, respectively, but saw an increase in walks as they attempted to break it.Randy Bass hit 54 homers in 1985, but fell short when the pitcher from the Yomiuri Giants, then managed by Oh, threw nothing but balls in the last game of the season, preventing Bass from tying the record.Knowing the problems faced by other foreign players in the past, Balentien — who is from the Dutch Caribbean island of Curacao — said he expects a different approach from pitchers as he nears the record."As the record nears, I know pitchers may be reluctant to throw strikes," Balentien said on Yakult's website. "But I'm concentrating on hitting as best as I can. I can feel the expectations of the team."Unlike Rhodes and Cabrera, Balentien has time on his side.Rhodes had several games left to break Oh's record in the 2001 season, but was walked in each at-bat in a late season series against the Hawks, then managed by Oh.Oh denied any involvement and the Hawks pitching coach said the pitchers acted on his orders.The situation resurfaced again the next season when Cabrera reached 55 with five games left. Once again, Cabrera faced the Hawks and got nothing to hit. Oh claimed he told his pitchers to throw strikes, but added that anyone attempting to break his record should do it by a lot.Oh is a legend in Japan. His 868 home runs, which surpassed Hank Aaron's 755, made him a national hero. The single-season home run record is also highly regarded. Former New York Yankees outfielder Hideki Matsui wore No. 55 in recognition of it. The closest Matsui got to breaking Oh's record was 50 homers in 2002, when he played for the Yomiuri Giants.Balentien played for the Seattle Mariners and Cincinnati Reds before signing with the Swallows in 2011. He hit a Central League-leading 31 homers in each of his first two seasons in Japan.The 29-year-old Balentien missed the first 12 games of this season because of a leg injury he picked up while playing for the Netherlands in the World Baseball Classic.The 73-year-old Oh is still involved in baseball as an honorary chairman for the Hawks, which play in the Pacific League. Interleague games are over so the Hawks won't be able to directly influence the outcome, but Oh's name still carries a lot of weight in Japan.Certain to complicate matters is the fact that Balentien's challenge of Oh's record comes in a season where there is controversy over a new, livelier baseball.In June, Japanese baseball officials admitted they introduced the new official ball this season without notifying players. The new ball has resulted in a dramatic increase in the number of home runs.Some will argue Balentien benefits from playing in one of the smallest stadiums in Japan. Tokyo's Jingu Stadium is just 101 meters (331 feet) down both lines. Osaka Dome, where Rhodes played, is 116 meters (380 feet) down the lines.
TOKYO — A crisis over contaminated water at Japan 's stricken nuclear plant worsened on Saturday when the plant's operator said it had detected high radiation levels near storage tanks, a finding that raised the possibility of additional leaks.The operator, Tokyo Electric Power Company, or Tepco, said it had found the high levels of radiation at four separate spots on the ground, near some of the hundreds of tanks used to store toxic water produced by makeshift efforts to cool the Fukushima Daiichi plant's three damaged reactors. The highest reading was 1,800 millisieverts per hour, or enough to give a lethal dose in about four hours, Tepco said.The contaminated spots were found as Tepco employees checked the integrity of the tanks after a leak two weeks ago released 300 tons of toxic water into the Pacific. That leak prompted Prime Minister Shinzo Abe to announce that the government would step in at the plant, which was crippled two years ago by a huge earthquake and tsunami, to help get it under control amid rising public fears of a second environmental disaster.Saturday's discoveries suggested that there may have been other leaks from the tanks, many of which appear to have been shoddily built as Tepco has scrambled to find enough storage space for the contaminated water being produced by the plant. However, Tepco said that it had found no evidence of fallen water levels in nearby tanks, making it unclear how much water, if any, may have leaked out, and whether any reached the Pacific, about 1,500 feet away.About 430,000 tons of contaminated water, or enough to fill 170 Olympic-size pools, are stored in rows of tanks at the plant, which appears to be running out of open space to put them all. The contaminated water increases by 400 tons every day as groundwater flows into the basements of the damaged buildings housing the three ruined reactors, which melted down in the worst nuclear accident since Chernobyl in 1986.Tepco must draw off that water to prevent it from overwhelming jury-rigged cooling systems that keep the reactors' melted cores from reheating and melting into the ground in a phenomenon known as the China syndrome. Tepco has struggled to safely handle and store all the water.
TOKYO — Another foreign player is challenging Sadaharu Oh's single-season home run record in Japan, but this time, the player may get a fair chance to break it.With 30 games left in the season, Wladimir Balentien of the Yakult Swallows had 52 homers, three shy of the record, which Oh set in 1964.Tuffy Rhodes matched the record in 2001, and Alex Cabrera matched it in 2002. Both, though, were walked more as they tried to break the mark.Randy Bass hit 54 home runs in 1985, falling one short of the record. In the last game of the season, the pitcher from the Yomiuri Giants, then managed by Oh, threw nothing but balls, preventing Bass from tying the record.Aware of the problems faced by foreign players in the past, Balentien, who is from the Dutch Caribbean island Curaçao, said he expected a different approach from pitchers."As the record nears, I know pitchers may be reluctant to throw strikes," Balentien told the Swallows' Web site. "But I'm concentrating on hitting as best as I can. I can feel the expectations of the team."During the 2001 season, Rhodes had several games left to break Oh's record, but he was walked in each plate appearance of a late-season series against the Fukuoka Daiei Hawks, then managed by Oh.Oh denied any involvement, and the Hawks' pitching coach said the pitchers acted on his orders.The next season featured a similar situation as Cabrera reached 55 with five games left. Facing the Hawks, he got nothing to hit. Oh said he told his pitchers to throw strikes but added that anyone attempting to break his record should do it by a significant margin.Oh hit 868 career home runs, which surpassed Hank Aaron's 755 in the major leagues and made him a national hero in Japan. The single-season home run record is also highly regarded. The former outfielder Hideki Matsui wore No. 55 in recognition of it.Balentien, 29, played for the Seattle Mariners and the Cincinnati Reds, appearing in 170 games and hitting 15 homers, before signing with the Swallows in 2011. He missed the first 12 games of this season because of a leg injury he sustained while playing for the Netherlands in the World Baseball Classic.Oh, 73, is still involved in baseball as an honorary chairman for the Hawks, a Pacific League team. There are no more interleague games this season, so the Hawks cannot directly influence the outcome of Balentien's chase.Still, Oh's name carries a lot of weight in Japan, and this season's controversy over a new, livelier baseball is certain to complicate matters.In June, Japanese baseball officials acknowledged that they introduced the new official ball this season without notifying players. Since the ball's introduction, there has been a drastic increase in home runs.Some will also argue that Balentien benefits from playing in one of the smallest stadiums in Japan: Jingu Stadium, in Tokyo, is just 331 feet down each line. Osaka Dome, where Rhodes played, is 380 feet down the lines.
TOKYO — Former Guns N' Roses drummer Matt Sorum was in a remote Japanese fishing village Monday to protest against its annual dolphin hunt.Sorum, who now leads his own group, is the latest celebrity to join the increasingly global campaign to stop the dolphin kill in Taiji, a quaint fishing village in central Japan made famous by the Academy Award-winning 2009 film about the hunt called "The Cove."The movie depicts how dolphins are herded into a cove and speared by fishermen for their meat. The fishermen say the hunt is part of their village's tradition and call Western critics who eat other kinds of meat hypocritical.The film features Ric O'Barry, who trained dolphins for the 1960s "Flipper" TV series and has devoted the latter part of his life to protecting dolphins and keeping them in nature.Sorum arrived in Taiji on Sept. 1, the day the annual dolphin hunt begins, with O'Barry and dozens of Japanese and Western conservationists."Like a bad nightmare, I'm watching it almost like a twilight zone, surreal, looking into my eyes in complete disbelief — what's going on in front of me," Sorum said, speaking by phone from Taiji after witnessing the hunt.Dolphin and whale meat is considered an eccentric delicacy in Japan, though not all Japanese eat it and not all Japanese know about the hunts. Some nationalist groups have used the controversy to highlight their own message, accusing O'Barry and other Westerners of interfering with Japanese culture.Over the weekend, nationalists in Taiji used loudspeakers to broadcast their message about the right to kill dolphins, and held a barbecue, presumably of whale or dolphin meat, at the cove, where Sorum and others opposing the hunt were watching."Our work here is about supporting the Japanese activists," O'Barry said. "You only hear about the blood and the guts, and it's being created by less than 50 men. It's not even the whole town of Taiji, and certainly not the country of Japan."Sorum, who has also played with Velvet Revolver, said he hoped to organize a rock concert in Tokyo around the theme of "celebrating the dolphin," bringing together Japanese and Western musicians, including his new band, Kings of Chaos."I'm going to bring a bunch of heavyweights, big rock stars," said Sorum. "The main thing is to get the Japanese kids."
TOKYO — Japan's nuclear regulator reiterated on Monday that it may have to consider discharging into the ocean water from the wrecked Fukushima nuclear plant that contains radiation below regulatory thresholds.Nuclear Regulation Authority (NRA) Chairman Shunichi Tanaka told reporters there was no evidence of new water leaks at Japan's crippled Fukushima nuclear power plant, following the discovery of high radiation levels in recent days.Tokyo Electric Power Co, the Fukushima plant's operator, is rushing to contain a radioactive water crisis from the steady accumulation of water used to cool melted fuel rods.
TOKYO — When Rakuten, Japan's leading e-commerce company, introduced its Kobo e-reader in Japan in July 2012, the company's chief executive, Hiroshi Mikitani, presented a gift to Yoshinobu Noma, the president of Kodansha, Japan's largest publisher.It was a T-shirt emblazoned with "Beat Amazon." Mr. Mikitani wanted to signal that the two companies had no intention of slugging it out in a print-versus-digital fight in Japan.The alliance did little to help them defend against Amazon. Four months later, Amazon brought its Kindle e-reader to Japan. It quickly became Japan's top-selling e-reader, gaining 38.3 percent of the market, according to the MM Research Institute, a data firm in Tokyo. Even though Rakuten's Kobo had beaten Kindle to market by nearly five months, it grabbed only 33 percent of Japan's e-reader sales during the same 12-month period. Sony, which had stated its goal of selling half of all e-readers by 2012, managed to hold only 25.5 percent with its devices.Amazon sells its Kindle in 14 countries, Japan being the very latest. Misao Konishi, an Amazon spokeswoman, declined to talk about the company's goals for the Japanese market, but she did offer some insight into Amazon's ambitions. "Every book ever printed, in every language, available to buy in 60 seconds," Ms. Konishi said. "There are many things to accomplish in order to achieve that vision in Japan."The Kindle's quick success is a stark contrast to the Japanese companies' efforts. Until Amazon showed up, e-readers failed to live up to expectations. Sony brought out the first reader using E Ink technology in Japan in 2004, the LIBRIe.Buyers of the LIBRIe, which like early Kindles showed black text on a white background, suffered from a convoluted marketplace that allowed them only to rent e-books, not buy them. Amazon, which developed its Kindle with digital books people could buy from — where else? — Amazon.com, found instant success after its introduction in the United States in 2007.Sony stopped selling its device that year. The company's subsequent e-readers, even after Sony developed a library of books to buy, have met with limited success.Japan isn't a big contributor to global e-reader sales, estimated at around 19.9 million units by IDC, a market research firm. MM Research said that a total of 470,000 devices were sold there last year, and that it expected sales to climb about 10 percent to 520,000 units in 2014.Amazon's victory over Sony and Rakuten, which got into the e-reader business when it bought the Toronto-based Kobo in November 2011, began with aggressive pricing. Amazon sold the Kindle Paperwhite for 7,980 yen, or about $80. Not only was its price about $40 less than it was in the United States, it also matched that of Rakuten's Kobo and Sony's PRS-T2.In a bid to gain market share, Rakuten dropped the price of its e-reader in July to to 5,480 yen, and will continue to focus on this basic model, even as the company launches the new high-end Kobo Aura HD in Europe and the United States in September.But Amazon wasn't winning just because of price. It also gave consumers another reason to prefer the Kindle. "The reason for the Kindle's success in Japan is the same as it was in America," said Munechika Nishida, author of "The Truth About the E-book Revolution" and a technology analyst. "The Amazon Web store is the easiest to use, the easiest to understand."Sony and Rakuten's e-readers are not technologically inferior to the Kindle, Mr. Nishida said, but buying e-books on the Kindle marketplace takes fewer steps. Rakuten and Sony's devices make browsing and purchasing more difficult, he said.The Japan Kindle store, which opened last October, offers more than 140,000 Japanese-language titles. It added 7,000 more titles in just the last 30 days. Kodansha now has 10,617 e-book titles available on the Kindle marketplace.
TOKYO — Leaving San Francisco, singer Chris Hart has made himself at home in "J-pop."His album of cover versions of Japanese pop tunes is rising on the charts. And the crooner is scoring on this nation's equivalent of "American Idol," being billed as a genius who understands the musical soul of Japan.His success highlights a music industry that's still booming, and increasingly eager to internationalize. It's even ready to eclipse the U.S. music world, where CD sales have plunged with the arrival of digital technology.Hart, 29, says he is living his dream. And he doesn't mind a bit that his fame has come so far from home."I am a part of the J-pop world now," he said in a recent interview, using the term for pop music in the world's third-biggest economy.Hart has won over Japan by focusing on adaptations of local hits such as "Home," a 2008 ballad popularized by singer Yusaku Kiyama about the joys of becoming a father.Hart's rendition, released as a single in May, surged to No. 13 on the Oricon music charts, Japan's equivalent of Billboard. A month later, Hart released his first album, "Heart Song," which reached third on Oricon.That's saying a lot, given the size of Japan's market.Japan's music industry is estimated at $4.42 billion, closely trailing the U.S. at $4.48 billion, although Japan has less than half the population, according to the International Federation of the Phonographic Industry, which tracks such data.While other countries have shifted to digital music, CDs still make up 80 percent of Japan's music sales, according to the Recording Industry Association of Japan. Only 34 percent of music sales are CDs in the U.S., and 58 percent is digital.Recent albums from established Japanese acts such as B'z and Southern All Stars are setting off a CD revival. AKB48 and other groups featuring young women, known as "idols," are boosting CD purchases among the younger crowd. The CDs sometimes come with concert tickets and other benefits, so some fans are buying multiple copies of the same one."Japanese people tend to want the physical CDs or the gifts and trinkets that come as perks with many albums. Music companies are getting creative," said Tomonobu Yonai, a spokesman for the recording industry group.Hart's career took off with an appearance in a popular Japanese TV show called "Nodojiman The! World," in March 2012, where foreigners compete in karaoke.Hart blew away the judges, mostly singers and celebrities who not only praised his technique but also his understanding of the lyrics and the emotions of the tunes. He was crowned "the world's best foreign J-pop singer.""I feel embarrassed to come on stage," said singer Masahiro Nakai after Hart covered one of his songs in his clear, smooth tenor. Akiko Wada, another singer, called him "just perfect."Hart started learning Japanese when he was 12. He wanted to study Korean because his aunt was of Korean descent, but his school offered only Japanese. He was quickly drawn to Japanese culture. A year later, he went on a home-stay program in Japan, where he fell even deeper in love with Japan.Hart started a rock band performing Japanese songs in San Francisco, while working over the years as a police officer and a clerk at a cosmetics company. In 2009, Hart stumbled on an opportunity to go back to Japan with a job at a vending machine company.He uploaded videos of himself singing in Japanese on YouTube. To his surprise, he got invited to be on the TV show.Although some music critics say Japanese tunes are bland and unsophisticated, Hart believes music is more personal and emotional in Japan, rather than focused on catchy riffs.That's why he prefers to call his fans "family." Hart has also made a point of adopting Japanese mannerisms, such as bowing."People feel more inclined to buy the album out of the support, like a friend," said Hart, wearing his trademark fedora and vest.In a recent outdoor concert in Tokyo, hundreds of people, some with children in their arms, crowded the stage as Hart sang in near-perfect Japanese."I think it's really special that somebody from another country sings Japanese songs because he thinks it is great music," said Akane Kawano, a 31-year-old receptionist.
NARAHA, Japan — In this small farming town in the evacuation zone surrounding the stricken Fukushima Daiichi nuclear power plant, small armies of workers in surgical masks and rubber gloves are busily scraping off radioactive topsoil in a desperate attempt to fulfill the central government's vow one day to allow most of Japan's 83,000 evacuees to return. Yet, every time it rains, more radioactive contamination cascades down the forested hillsides along the rugged coast.Nearby, thousands of workers and a small fleet of cranes are preparing for one of the latest efforts to avoid a deepening environmental disaster that has China and other neighbors increasingly worried: removing spent fuel rods from the damaged No. 4 reactor building and storing them in a safer place.The government announced Tuesday that it would spend $500 million on new steps to stabilize the plant, including an even bigger project: the construction of a frozen wall to block a flood of groundwater into the contaminated buildings. The government is taking control of the cleanup from the plant's operator, the Tokyo Electric Power Company.The triple meltdown at Fukushima in 2011 is already considered the world's worst nuclear accident since Chernobyl. The new efforts, as risky and technically complex as they are expensive, were developed in response to a series of accidents, miscalculations and delays that have plagued the cleanup effort, making a mockery of the authorities' early vows to "return the site to an empty field" and leading to the release of enormous quantities of contaminated water.As the environmental damage around the plant and in the ocean nearby continues to accumulate more than two years after the disaster, analysts are beginning to question whether the government and the plant's operator, known as Tepco, have the expertise and ability to manage such a complex crisis.In the past, they say, Tepco has resorted to technological quick fixes that have failed to control the crisis, further damaged Japan's flagging credibility and only deflected hard decisions into the future. Some critics said the government's new proposals offer just more of the same."Japan is clearly living in denial," said Kiyoshi Kurokawa, a medical doctor who led Parliament's independent investigation last year into the causes of the nuclear accident. "Water keeps building up inside the plant, and debris keeps piling up outside of it. This is all just one big shell game aimed at pushing off the problems until the future."Problems at the plant seemed to take a sharp turn for the worse in July with the discovery of leaks of contaminated water into the Pacific Ocean. Two weeks ago, Tepco announced that 300 tons of water laced with radioactive strontium, a particle that can be absorbed into human bones, had drained from a faulty tank into the sea.Contaminated water, used to cool fuel in the plant's three damaged reactors to prevent them from overheating, will continue to be produced in huge quantities until the flow of groundwater into the buildings can be stopped — a prospect that is months or even years away. At the same time, delays and setbacks in the enormous effort to clean up the countryside are further undermining confidence in the government's ability to deliver on its promises and eroding the public's faith in nuclear power.Officials and proponents of the cleanup say difficulties are inevitable given the monumental scale of the problems. But a growing number of critics say the troubles are at least partly a result of fundamental flaws in the current cleanup, and they wondered whether Tuesday's announcement might have been made with an eye to the International Olympic Committee, which will decide shortly on the site of the 2020 Summer Games.The cleanup efforts to date, critics said, were grandiose but ultimately ill-conceived public works projects begun as a knee-jerk reaction by the government's powerful central ministries to deflect public criticism and to protect the clubby and insular nuclear power industry from oversight by outsiders.
TOKYO — Tokyo Electric Power Co (Tepco), the operator of the stricken Fukushima nuclear plant, is still putting out questionable data on radiation leaks, causing confusion and a heightened sense of crisis, Japan's nuclear regulator said.The stakes have been raised as Japan makes a final pitch for Tokyo to host the 2020 Olympic Games, while a steady stream of bad news from Fukushima, the site of the worst atomic disaster in a quarter of a century, leaves officials frustrated by Tepco's missteps and miscalculations."As I've said before, Tokyo Electric has not been properly disclosing the situation about the contamination and the levels of contamination," Shunichi Tanaka, chairman of the Nuclear Regulation Authority (NRA), told reporters on Thursday."This has caused confusion domestically and internationally. Because of that, the Japanese government has a sense of crisis and I, personally, feel a little angry about it," he said."I wouldn't go as far as to say Japan's reputation has been made worse, but releasing incorrect information about the radiated water problem has created trouble around the world," Tanaka said.Japan this week pledged nearly half a billion dollars to contain leaks and decontaminate radioactive water stored at Fukushima that threaten the clean-up from the March 2011 earthquake and tsunami that crippled the plant and brought Japan's nuclear power industry to a virtual halt.Officials have been keen to assure the world that Tokyo will be safe during the Olympics in seven years, if chosen. Prime Minister Shinzo Abe flies to Buenos Aires later on Thursday from a Group of 20 meeting in St. Petersburg to lead Tokyo's final pitch before the Olympic committee. Madrid and Istanbul are the other contenders."We would like to host the 2020 Olympic and Paralympic Games here in Tokyo and welcome athletes, people affiliated with the events and visitors from all over the world," said Chief Cabinet Secretary Yoshihide Suga, adding that food and water in Japan is safe.Tepco has been criticized for its failure to prepare for the kind of disaster that struck two and a half years ago, and has been accused of covering up the extent of the problems since.The plant has been beset with power outages and other problems that have prompted experts to question whether Tepco can handle what is an unprecedented clean-up due to the amount of radioactive material on the site and its coastal location.The company's disclosure of problems at the site and the quality of its data have been a source of constant criticism."I have a certain expert knowledge of Tepco's data and their data is not reliable," Kayoko Nakamura, one of five NRA commissioners, said at Thursday's briefing.After repeated denials, Tepco has admitted that contaminated water has flowed into the Pacific Ocean, and it has discovered leaks from above-ground tanks used to store irradiated water after it has been washed over melted uranium fuel rods to keep them from overheating.Earlier this week, Tanaka said concerns about contamination in the Pacific were "misplaced."Tepco said on Thursday there is a possibility that some of the water that leaked from one storage tank has reached groundwater at the site.Measurable radiation from water leaking from the facility is mostly confined to the harbor around the plant, officials have said, and is not an environmental threat to other countries as the radiation will be diluted by the sea.Tepco also said on Thursday that the arm of a crane snapped while removing debris from the building housing the damaged No.3 reactor at the Fukushima plant. There were no injuries or damage to the building.
TOKYO — British authorities plan to prosecute Olympus, the Japanese manufacturer that was embroiled in a $1.7 billion accounting fraud two years ago, reviving a scandal after a Japanese court imposed modest fines and suspended sentences on several executives.Olympus, along with its British unit, Gyrus, a medical equipment company, will be prosecuted by Britain's Serious Fraud Office on charges of falsifying financial statements in 2009 and 2010 in a breach of Britain's Companies Act, the company said in a statement Wednesday.Olympus, which is based in Tokyo, admitted in late 2011 that it had operated a long-running scheme to cover up $1.7 billion in losses after its newly installed chief executive, Michael C. Woodford, uncovered irregular accounting practices at the company.The internal allegations led Olympus to fire Mr. Woodford, a British national. But he went public with evidence of wrongdoing and has since submitted evidence and testimony to British, American and Japanese investigators.The British investigation began in November 2011, but it has taken until now to collect the evidence, said a spokesman for the Serious Fraud Office. The Japanese and British authorities have been in contact over the investigation, the spokesman said.The first British court date was set for next week, and the case is likely to be heard in the fall. It was unclear what the maximum penalties could be if the company was found guilty.In Japan, a local court in July handed three Olympus executives, including Tsuyoshi Kikukawa, former president, suspended sentences and fined the company 700 million yen ($7 million). Olympus also was hit with separate fines of 192 million yen from Japan's Financial Services Agency and 10 million yen from the Tokyo Stock Exchange, which elected to keep Olympus stock listed.Olympus's limited censure by the Japanese authorities set off criticism among corporate governance experts that the company had been let off too lightly. It also highlighted the tendency here for criminal responsibility in corporate scandals to fall on individuals, often picked to take the blame for the sake of the company.Olympus, a leading maker of medical endoscopes and digital cameras, has appeared to move on. Last year, it settled a multimillion-dollar lawsuit brought by Mr. Woodford over discrimination and unfair dismissal. The company's share price, which plummeted after the initial revelations of fraud, has since recovered to prescandal levels.After revealing big losses in 2011, Olympus has also climbed back into the black, booking a net profit of 8 billion yen for the latest fiscal year through March, in contrast to a 49 billion yen loss the previous year.In its statement, Olympus said that it was difficult to predict the extent of penalties that might be imposed by British authorities and that any impact on its finances was unclear.
TOKYO — The Japanese master of whimsical animation, Hayao Miyazaki, has retired before. This time, he says he really means it.Miyazaki is one of animation's most admired and successful directors. He said Friday that at the age of 72, he now wants to do other things besides slaving away over his drawings to meet feature film deadlines."I know I've said I would retire many times in the past. Many of you must think, 'Once again.' But this time I am quite serious," he said."This will never happen again," Miyazaki said at the conclusion of a nearly 2-hour-long news conference in which he shared his thoughts on everything from war to Italian cuisine, one of his favorites.The co-founder of Studio Ghibli, who won an Oscar in 2003 for his masterful, disturbing critique of modern industrialism in "Spirited Away," said he hopes to work for another decade, but at a slower pace that might allow him to perhaps even take Saturdays off.Miyazaki's studio announced last week that he will stop making feature films following the release in June of his last film, "The Wind Rises."Among other things, he plans to work on his Ghibli Museum, where he says the exhibits need refreshing."I might even become an exhibit myself," he said.Miyazaki said he had nothing all that "cool" to say to his younger audiences. But of all his works, he especially treasures "Howl's Moving Castle," in which he sought to turn a virtual game world into drama."I wanted to convey the message to children that this life is worth living," he said. "This message has not changed."While avoiding the limelight, Miyazaki hasn't shied away from controversy. In the past few months, his outspoken opposition to efforts to revise Japan's pacifist constitution has drawn fire from rightists who favor a higher profile for the military.Miyazaki's heartfelt aversion to war is nothing new: He stayed away from the Academy Awards ceremony where "Spirited Away" won an Oscar for Best Animated Feature Film, saying he found it hard to celebrate "because of the deeply sad events taking place in the world" — a reference to the war in Iraq."The Wind Rises," Miyazaki's 11th feature film, is a fantasy-filled, fictionalized tale about the man who designed Japan's World War II fighter planes.Miyazaki's adoration of flying and flying machines clashes with his disgust over war making, casting protagonist Jiro Horikoshi in an ambivalent but sympathetic light. The animator's own father managed a factory making war plane parts during the war.Miyazaki's own career is emblematic of the combination of whimsy and passion combined with pragmatism that characterized many post-war Japanese success stories.It also centers on grueling hard work: Miyazaki has mostly eschewed computer graphics for painstakingly hand-drawn animation."You may wonder what we animation directors do, but I'm an animator first, and I have to draw. I have to take off my glasses like this..." he said, bending forward as if he was working at his desk. "It's quite strenuous."Miyazaki said he can no longer work 12- to 14-hour days; about seven hours is his limit, and delegating the work to others is just not his style."If I could have, I would have done that. But that's not how I work," he said. "I have to put the pencil down and just go home," he said."You just can't do anything about those problems resulting from aging," he said.Toshio Suzuki, Studio Ghibli producer and chairman, said the decision was a joint one."There's an end to everything," he said. "It's best not to wait to retire when one is already in a decline."Miyazaki's success has helped keep Japan one of the world's biggest markets for animation. His sale of worldwide distribution rights for Studio Ghibli's works to Walt Disney Studios in 1996 helped win him a global audience.One of the first to be distributed through that arrangement was "Princess Mononoke — The Phantom Princess," a 1997 film set in the 14th century about a girl raised by wolves that carried one of Miyazaki's signature messages, the need to live in harmony with nature.Miyazaki's rustic sensibilities differ markedly those of futuristic anime contemporaries like Osamu Tezuka, whose Astro Boy is a 1.35-meter (4-foot, 6-inch) robot with the heart of a little boy, built by a tormented scientist whose son died in a car accident.Miyazaki films generally portray a fantasy world in which technology is eclipsed by mysticism and nature. In "My Neighbor Tottoro," his exquisitely detailed animation brought to life the beauty and mystery of the Japanese countryside, with its deep, dark forests and brilliant green rice paddies."The Wind Rises" begins with a compelling portrayal of the destruction and infernos set off by the 1926 Great Kanto Earthquake.But much of his work is other-worldly: in announcing a Golden Lion for lifetime achievement award for Miyazaki in in 2005 the then-director of the Venice Film Festival, Marco Mueller, said Miyazaki was "a giant who blew down the walls in which Japanese animated cinema wanted to pigeonhole itself."Commenting by email on Miyazaki's retirement, Mueller said Friday that he believes the Ghibli legacy will be carried on by its younger artists."One thing is certain: the adventures of Miyazaki's Wonderland will never end," Mueller said.In "Spirited Away," which also won the Berlin Film Festival's Golden Bear award, 10-year-old Chihiro wanders away from her parents while on an outing and gets trapped in a fantastical water world of goblins, ogres and gods.Chihiro ends up working for a witch who runs a bathhouse for those otherworldly creatures and is horrified to find her parents transformed by a magic spell into pigs — creatures that seem to have a special fascination for Miyazaki.The future direction of Studio Ghibli, which Miyazaki founded with his producer Isao Takahata in 1985, will be up to the younger staff, Miyazaki said."I've always wanted to do something besides animation," he said. "There are so many things I want to do.""My idea of rest may not be the same as what others would think of. I think just lying around would be tiring."Associated Press writer Colleen Barry in Milan contributed to this report.
TOKYO — For decades, the Japanese have called Sadaharu Oh the world's true home run king. With 868 career home runs and many other hitting records to his name, Oh, now 73, is worshiped here as much as Babe Ruth is in America.A few foreign players in Japan's top league have threatened to surpass Oh's hallowed mark of home runs in a single season, 55. And each time, opposing pitchers refused to throw pitches anywhere near the strike zone in a blatant effort to protect Oh's record.But the culture of deference to Oh has seemingly ended. In a development that would have once seemed unthinkable, many Japanese fans are now rooting for Oh's record to fall, signaling the arrival of a generation that is more comfortable than ever with the notion of knocking off national heroes.And who is the slugger who might soon usurp Oh? Wladimir Balentien, from a tiny island in the Caribbean."I'm going for the top," Balentien, a native of Curaçao, in the Netherlands Antilles, told reporters after hitting his 52nd home run of the season last week for the Tokyo Yakult Swallows. "I always want to be No. 1."Balentien, a hulking outfielder who once played for the Seattle Mariners and the Cincinnati Reds, has been unstoppable this season. Though he missed the season's first 12 games with an injury, he has averaged a home run every two games and is hitting a league-best .340 with 111 runs batted in.He is the lone highlight for Yakult, which languishes in last place in Japan's Central League.With only three home runs to go to match Oh's feat and 26 games left in the season, Balentien, 29, has a more than good chance to beat it — and this time, the Japanese appear happier, or at least resigned, to let the record fall."Pitchers here will often avoid all-out confrontations anyway," said Suguru Egawa, a former pitcher for Yakult's crosstown rival, the Yomiuri Giants, who made his name in the 1980s as the only Japanese pitcher with the audacity to challenge foreign sluggers."That might be a no-go in the major leagues, but it's legitimate here. Then there's the fact that this is a very special record."Oh, though born in Japan, is a Taiwanese national, a fact often lost in the praise still piled on his celebrated career.If Balentien is successful, he will leave his mark in baseball-obsessed Japan with a new home run record. He will also underscore what experts of the game say is a gradual change in the long-cloistered world of Japanese baseball, a realization that the country cannot stay isolated from the rest of the globe.An online survey published late last month by the business daily Nikkei found that 69 percent of its 1,300 respondents said they were enthusiastic about Balentien's bid to surpass Oh, and 27 percent said they were resigned to a new home run king. Fewer than 1 percent of respondents said that Balentien needed to be stopped at all costs.Fans now boo pitchers who appear to be shying away from throwing Balentien strikes. This week, the Yakult Swallows added a "Coco Meter" — using Balentien's nickname — to count down to what would be a historic home run No. 56.Giants General Manager Tatsunori Hara said this week that his pitchers were prepared to "play hard and play fair" in the team's six remaining games against Yakult."I think the Japanese learned something when they saw that the Americans didn't prevent Ichiro from breaking any of their records," Robert Whiting, a journalist and an author of several books on Japanese baseball, said, referring to the Yankees' Ichiro Suzuki. "There was none of these shenanigans, and the fans cheered him on."Whiting added: "But I never expected to see this day. I can certainly say times have changed. We're living in a different world."Foreign-born players' efforts to break Oh's record date back to Randy Bass, a former Minnesota Twins first baseman who joined the Hanshin Tigers in 1983. In 1985, as Bass surged toward his 55th homer, he was repeatedly walked.
TOKYO — Traditionally, Japanese bow when greeting others. They do not tend to shake hands. But millions of them have started shaking their smartphones.They do it to activate Line, a two-year-old messaging application that lets people exchange information, send silly stickers and play games with their friends. It already has 230 million registered users — a milestone that Facebook did not reach until it was five years old.And it has not even penetrated the United States yet. Most Americans have never heard of its parent company, NHN Corporation, of South Korea.But hundreds of millions of smartphone users in Asia and patches of Europe and Latin America are spurning Facebook or Twitter, preferring instead to use Line to tell their friends about a new job, boyfriend or breakfast cereal. Now Line, not content with being the latest "big in Japan" craze, wants to transform itself into something bigger — the first global Internet company from Asia."We would like to turn Line into a common language for the world," said Akira Morikawa, chief executive of Line. "Our plan is to become the No. 1 online service."Bigger than Facebook? Bigger than Google? Yes, Mr. Morikawa said, in an interview at the company's headquarters on the 27th floor of an office tower overlooking the chaos of Shibuya Crossing, reputedly the busiest pedestrian intersection in the world.Mr. Morikawa's claims might sound like boastfulness, the pipe dream of any upstart hoping to be the industry's next big thing. But the company's growth is impressive, even if it still has only a small fraction of Facebook's billion-member network of users.American Internet giants may dominate social media, but Line has a critical advantage, Mr. Morikawa said. Unlike Facebook, Twitter, Zynga and even Google Plus, Line was originally conceived and created for smartphones, which already account for most of growth in Internet users. So the company does not have to wrestle with designing software that can leap from desktop computers to mobile devices.Mark Zuckerberg, the chief executive of Facebook, need only ask his sister Randi about it. She wrote in a blog post after visiting Tokyo this year that "all the cool kids are using Line."Noriko Suzuki, a 22-year-old office worker in Tokyo, said she feels that way. She said she sent about 50 messages a day via Line — including reports on her summer vacation, plans for an evening out and pictures of her lunch.Like other Line users, Ms. Suzuki often adds a digital "sticker," a cartoon image that could be anything from an exuberant teddy bear to a grimacing rabbit. It communicates feelings hard to convey in a text message. "If I'm angry, happy or crying, there's always a sticker," she said.Some of the stickers feature Line's own characters, including a bear named Brown and a rabbit named Cony, who engage in activities as varied as hugs and flatulence. Others show well-known cartoon figures like Hello Kitty or Marvel Comics heroes.Line says its users send more than 1 billion stickers per day. Facebook has taken notice; recently it added a sticker function to its messaging application. So has the rest of Silicon Valley. A number of messaging start-ups, including Path, MessageMe and GroupMe, have added stickers in recent months."If any app can make a giant like Facebook rethink their strategy, then that is the surest sign of the potential power of these services," said Neha Dharia, an analyst at Ovum, a telecommunications research firm. Ovum estimates that messaging apps will cost telecommunications companies more than $32 billion in lost revenue worldwide this year.The stickers may seem silly, but they were the first step in Line's plan to expand beyond cheap communications and turn itself into a broader media and entertainment platform. Many other companies' mobile applications, messaging and beyond, have yet to generate any revenue in the United States. Line gives some stickers away; others cost 170 yen (about $1.70) for a pack of 40. Sticker sales alone make about $10 million a month in revenue, Line says.Games are Line's biggest moneymaker, accounting for about $25 million a month in sales, or slightly more than half the company's revenue. Though games were added only about a year ago, offerings like Line Pop and Line Bubble quickly moved into the Top 10 lists on Google Play and the Apple App Store.
TOKYO — The Japanese central bank, declaring that the country's economy is recovering, voted Thursday to maintain its monetary stimulus program.Positive data have underscored the view that robust household spending and the feel-good mood generated by Prime Minister Shinzo Abe's pro-growth policies are gradually prompting companies to increase capital spending and hiring.The improved view of the central bank, the Bank of Japan, may heighten the case for Mr. Abe to go ahead with a planned sales tax increase, starting next year, a move seen as necessary to start reining in Japan's huge public debt.As widely expected, the central bank voted unanimously to maintain its policy of increasing its cash and deposits at an annual pace of 60 trillion to 70 trillion yen, or $601 million to $701 million."Japan's economy is recovering moderately," the Bank of Japan said in a news release. That assessment was an improvement from August, when it said the economy was "starting to recover moderately."The government is leaning toward increasing the sales tax as planned in April and cushioning the effects with fiscal stimulus. The central bank may also come under pressure to act, although it is in no mood to do so pre-emptively to counter the expected drag on growth.The bank's "upgrade seems appropriate because revised G.D.P. is likely to show that capital expenditure turned positive," said Shuji Tonouchi, senior fixed-income strategist at Mitsubishi UFJ Morgan Stanley Securities, referring to gross domestic product. "Our main scenario is that the B.O.J. will ease again around the time of the first tax hike next year. There are risks from the Middle East and overseas economies, but if the B.O.J. eases again, it will be for domestic reasons."Japan emerged from recession in 2012, and data for much of this year have shown the benefits of Mr. Abe's policies and the central bank's aggressive stimulus.Recent data have been particularly encouraging, with the jobless rate at the lowest level in almost five years, summer bonuses increasing and consumer prices rising at the fastest pace in nearly five years.Finance ministry data released Monday also showed a healthy increase in corporate investment, pointing to a sharp upward revision to second-quarter G.D.P. data due next week from the preliminary figure, which showed a 2.6 percent rate of expansion.That gives advocates of the tax increase ammunition to counter the views of opponents that Japan should delay or water down the increase to prevent the economy from faltering again.Unless Mr. Abe changes the plan, the sales tax will be raised to 8 percent from 5 percent in April and to 10 percent in October 2015. He will decide early next month, taking into account the central bank's business sentiment survey, due Oct. 1.The Bank of Japan has consistently called for fixing Japan's finances and has argued that the sales tax increase would not threaten the economic recovery or delay an end to deflation.At a news conference after the meeting, the bank's governor, Haruhiko Kuroda, said the central bank stood ready to take further steps to provide stimulus if the sales tax increase or other events derailed the economy on its path to the bank's inflation target of 2 percent.But for now, the central bank saw no need to take additional stimulus steps, with Japan's economy and prices moving in line with its forecasts, Mr. Kuroda told a news conference."Japan's economy is likely to continue recovering moderately, as a positive cycle of output, income and expenditure kicks in," he said.
TOKYO — Japan has increased security around a group of disputed islands it nationalized one year ago Wednesday amid strong protests from China, which also claims them and has been stepping up patrols of its own.Tokyo and Beijing are at odds over the uninhabited islands in the East China Sea, called Senkaku in Japanese and Diaoyutai in Chinese.Wednesday marks the first anniversary of Japan's purchase of several of the islands from their private owners — a sale China says was invalid. Both countries have since regularly sent coast guard vessels and aircraft to the area to assert their competing claims.Japanese Defense Minister Itsunori Onodera said surveillance had been increased in the area for the anniversary, but did provide details. No incidents were reported as of early Wednesday afternoon.The standoff, which shows no sign of abating, has deeply damaged diplomatic relations between the two Asian powers and heightened concerns of a possible military clash.Japan lodged a protest after eight Chinese vessels on Tuesday briefly entered waters Tokyo claims near the islands. On Monday, Japanese fighter jets were scrambled when a Chinese military aircraft believed to be a drone was spotted. Though the drone remained in international airspace, Japanese officials expressed concern about the increased activity.So far, Tokyo and Beijing have been careful to calibrate their actions to avoid a direct military conflict.But with neither side backing down or wanting to look weak, the dispute continues to simmer. In a statement that appeared to up the ante, Japanese Chief Cabinet Secretary Yoshihide Suga said Tuesday that Tokyo considered deploying personnel to the islands an option.No one currently lives on the islands, and China immediately slammed the remarks as provocative."If they do provoke, they must be prepared to take the consequences," Chinese Foreign Ministry spokesman Hong Lei said Tuesday in Beijing.Stationing public servants on the islands was a campaign promise made by Prime Minister Shinzo Abe's hawkish ruling party, which is also pushing to give Japan's military a more assertive role in international peacekeeping and in stepping up territorial defenses.The islands, also claimed by Taiwan, are about 2,000 kilometers (1,240 miles) southwest of Tokyo.Japan' coast guard said there have been more than 200 intrusions by foreign vessels into Japanese-claimed waters near the islands in the past year.
TOKYO/BEIJING — China said it would not tolerate provocation after Japan's top government spokesman said on Tuesday Japan might station government workers on disputed islands in the East China Sea to defend its sovereignty.Relations between the world's second- and third-biggest economies have been strained over the uninhabited isles which Japan controls but both countries claim. The isles are known as the Senkaku in Japan and the Diaoyu in China.A year ago on Wednesday, the Japanese government bought three of the isles from a private owner, inflaming anger in China where there were big anti-Japan protests over the purchase.Aircraft and ships from the two countries have played cat-and-mouse in the vicinity of the islands ever since, raising fears of conflict, perhaps sparked by an accident.Japan's Chief Cabinet Secretary Yoshihide Suga, speaking on the eve of the anniversary, said it was "extremely regrettable" that Chinese government ships had repeatedly entered what he described as Japan's territorial waters.The government was making "resolute but calm responses to defend our territory, territorial waters and airspace decisively", he said, adding: "Our country will never make a concession on the matter of sovereignty."Asked if Japan might station government workers on the islands, Suga said: "That is one option".Chinese Foreign Ministry spokesman Hong Lei expressed "serious concern" about those remarks."The Chinese government has an unshakeable resolve and determination to protect the country's territorial sovereignty and will not tolerate any provocative acts of escalation over China's sovereignty," he told a daily news briefing."If the Japanese side recklessly makes provocative moves it will have to accept the consequences."Relations between the neighbors have been soured for years by what Beijing says has been Tokyo's refusal to properly atone for wartime atrocities committed by Japanese soldiers in China between 1931 and 1945.In the latest incident off the islands, eight Chinese patrol ships entered what Japan considers its territorial waters near them on Tuesday, Japan's coastguard said. The ships later left.Hong said it was a normal, routine mission.Japanese Vice Foreign Minister Akitaka Saiki summoned China's ambassador in Tokyo and lodged a protest against the presence of the ships, a ministry official said.On Monday, Japan scrambled fighter jets when it spotted what appeared to be an unmanned drone aircraft flying towards Japan over the East China Sea.It was not clear what country the unidentified aircraft belonged to but Japan's Foreign Ministry had made an inquiry about it with the Chinese side, Suga said.Japanese Defence Minister Itsunori Onodera said on Monday that Japan would be on guard for the first anniversary of Japan's purchase of the islands."September 11 was the day when the flare-up of tension between Japan and China was triggered. I think a firm posture is being called for," Onodera said.China's official Xinhua news agency said it was up to Japan to take steps to improve relations."China will never give way to a bullying Japan as it did more than 80 years ago," it said in an English-language commentary, referring to Japan's invasion of China in the 1930s.
Japanese prosecutors have decided not to indict former officials of Tokyo Electric Power, the operator of the tsunami-stricken nuclear power plant at Fukushima, over their roles in the accident there in March 2011, Japan's public broadcaster reported Monday. Naoto Kan, who was prime minister at the time of the accident, will also not be prosecuted over his inability to prevent the multiple meltdowns and explosions that hit the plant's reactors, driving 100,000 people from their homes, according to the broadcaster, NHK. Prosecutors said that their decision was based on data provided on a voluntary basis, and on the opinions of experts, who suggested that the scale of the earthquake and tsunami that triggered the accident could not have been predicted. That finding, however, has been contradicted in various studies, including an influential parliamentary report that called the accident a "manmade disaster." A group of Fukushima residents who had sought indictments told NHK that prosecutors "had failed to respond to the voice of local residents."
If Davey Johnson were the nostalgic type, he might get worked up over what might be his last managing trip to Queens, where funky old Shea Stadium used to be."To me, it's still Shea," he said, in the current ballpark called Citi Field. "Shea was just a parking lot away."Great things happened while Johnson was managing a few yards down Roosevelt Avenue, winning a World Series in 1986, one of the great times ever for the Mets.Things are not so wonderful in Queens these days. The Mets succumbed, 9-0, Monday, as Gio Gonzalez allowed only a wrong-way single by pinch-hitter Zach Lutz in the seventh inning. Johnson was surprised to learn he has never managed a no-hitter in the majors. The Nationals, last year's division champions, kept their meager hopes of the postseason, raising their record to 74-69.Last winter, Johnson, now 70, was informed by the Nationals that this would be his last season as manager. He will not allow himself to be publicly sentimental because his job is still to goad the club toward the postseason. After all, he noted, the Mets were down in the sixth game against the Astros in the National League Championship Series in 1986 and facing elimination in the sixth game against the Red Sox in that World Series."You never know," Johnson said in his office Monday afternoon, talking about the times he has been home, between his five major league managing jobs, until the phone rang. The Netherlands, once. A few stints with American squads in the Olympics and the Baseball Classic. The Sanford River Rats, a college-level team in Florida in the summer of 2010. He has never worked in Australia, Johnson mused. But he could also have been talking about the variables in a game or a season that need saving.Johnson was ahead of his time, a computer guy in the mid -'60s, known for the 160 semester hours he accumulated for his degree in mathematics. One winter, he used the rudimentary computer of the Hoffberger brewing family that owned the Orioles so he could play 100 sample games with 15 lineups. (Blew out beer-sale records for an entire region, he has been known to add.)Jim Palmer, a Hall of Fame pitcher, recalled when Frank Robinson came over from the Reds in 1966 and immediately nicknamed Johnson, a brash young infielder, Dum-Dum because he always had theories.Now a broadcaster for the Orioles, Palmer recalled Dave McNally trying to nibble at the corners of home plate, only to have Johnson trot in from second base and ask if McNally had ever heard of "variable chance deviation theory."Palmer said in an e-mail: "It was a mathematical theorem that if correlated to baseball could be interpreted as if you are trying to hit the corner and missing in the middle. 'Aim for the middle, it may go to the corner,' " Palmer quoted his friend. "Davey was actually trying to help Mac. That is when I knew he would manage."Johnson and Billy Martin are the only managers to reach the postseason with four clubs. (For Johnson, it was the Mets, the Orioles, the Reds, and last year the Nationals, raising hopes not being fulfilled this year. For Martin, it was the Twins, the Tigers, the Yankees and the A's.)Martin hated computerized statistics. His position was, "I know all that stuff." Johnson recalled Monday that he and Martin used to trade rude hand gestures while managing against each other, but deep down, he said, they respected each other.Johnson has been around. He was a teammate of Hank Aaron's in Atlanta and Sadaharu Oh's in Tokyo when each of them passed Babe Ruth's career record of 714 home runs. He won three Gold Gloves, hit 43 home runs one season, played in four World Series and was the last out of the 1969 Series, in Shea Stadium, just before the hordes almost tore the place down in ecstasy.In 1986, he took stock of the talent and close finishes the two previous years."I just remember him saying we were going to win the World Series," said Keith Hernandez, now a Mets broadcaster, and an admirer of Johnson. "I thought, 'O.K.' That was something I wouldn't have done, but he put the challenge out there."Johnson emitted a thin smile when asked about his pronunciamento. It did not seem brash to him, then or now. He could platoon players the way Earl Weaver had done back in Baltimore, but he could also send out stars like Hernandez, Gary Carter and Darryl Strawberry."He is as good as it gets," said Ron Darling, who pitched for Johnson in 1986 and is a Mets broadcaster. "A renaissance man. He knows a lot of stuff. His biggest asset was knowing how to use his players — some every day, some sparingly."Sometimes, Johnson played sluggers like Howard Johnson or Kevin Mitchell at shortstop because that was how the cards were spitting out in his interior computer. "It was almost as if he was saying, You guys are so good, it almost doesn't matter," Darling said. "I probably didn't appreciate him, the way he treated you like a man if you got the job done." And he added, "I don't think I appreciated the way he could put a coaching staff together, with people like Mel Stottlemyre and Bill Robinson."A few Mets were developing bad habits and did not win another World Series after 1986, giving them a title of underachievers. But now, it mostly seems like good times.Johnson has been through dark times — the death of his daughter Andrea, a championship surfer, at 32, after long tribulations with schizophrenia, and the death of his wife's son Jake Allen, who suffered from birth defects, at 34. He is thin, probably in better health than a decade ago, having had a procedure for atrial fibrillation in 2010.Later that season, the Nationals called him in during an emergency, and he has stabilized the franchise.This spring, after being told the Nationals would hire a new manager in 2014, Johnson said his goal was "World Series or bust." That does not look possible, with Bryce Harper out with a hip injury, but as the man of variables said, you never know.
TOKYO — Ever since a group of out-of-work samurai pooled their pensions to found Onoda Cement 130 years ago, the company has had its ups and downs: industrialization, a crippling war, Japan's postwar economic miracle.But after domestic cement demand peaked in 1990, at the height of Japan's bubble economy, Taiheiyo Cement, the successor company, and the industry, fell into a seemingly permanent decline in a mature and shrinking Japan.Tokyo's victory on Saturday in the race to host the Summer Games for a second time, in 2020, is giving Taiheiyo a new lease on life.On Monday, a day after Japan reveled in the good news, the stocks of general contractors, property developers and other long-suffering construction-related companies surged in Tokyo, as investors anticipated a construction boom before the 2020 Olympic Games.Construction companies helped lead a 2.48 percent rise in the Nikkei index to 14,205.23, a one-month high. Taiheiyo's stock jumped more than 7 percent to its highest level in six years, while Taisei, the contractor that built Tokyo's Olympic Stadium in 1964, soared 14 percent. Both stocks continued their rapid ascent Tuesday morning."We expect Tokyo's success in bidding for the Olympics to become a very positive catalyst" for Japanese stocks, Hiromichi Tamura, a strategist at Nomura, said in a note to clients.Helping to elevate shares was a revision of Japan's second-quarter economic growth figures to an annualized rate of 3.8 percent on the back of strong capital investment. Preliminary estimates had shown growth of 2.6 percent.The government estimates that hosting the Olympics will increase the economy by 3 trillion yen over the next seven years, or 0.3 percentage points of Japan's economic growth a year.But that estimate is too modest, Robert Feldman, head economist for Japan at Morgan Stanley MUFG Securities, wrote in a report last week.He said that the impact would most likely reach 6 trillion to 8 trillion yen over the next seven years, or 0.7 to 0.8 percent of gross domestic product.The most visible impact will be in construction. Tokyo has promised to keep costs down by using as many as 15 "legacy" buildings, including three built for the 1964 Games. Still, it will build 22 more sites at an estimated cost of $3.1 billion.Tokyo's huge new Olympic Stadium, called the cycling helmet for its space-age design, will seat 80,000 people and cost at least $1.3 billion to build. It will feature a retractable roof – a first for an Olympic Stadium. The city also plans to spend $955 million on a waterfront Olympic Village complex capable of housing 17,000 athletes and trainers.Naoki Inose, the governor of Tokyo, has called the project "Tokyo's biggest housing development in decades."Investors hunted for more Olympics-related shares. Advertising and travel agencies gained on Monday, as did Japanese sports equipment makers, like Mizuno and Asics.Sagami Rubber Industries, which says it makes one of the world's thinnest condoms, with a thickness of only 0.022 millimeters, jumped more than 8 percent during Monday trade, and continued to climb Tuesday. Condoms have been distributed to Olympics athletes since the Seoul Summer Games in 1988. Last year, the London Games distributed more than 150,000 condoms to athletes, according to British media reports.Taiheiyo Cement is also poised to be one of winners of the Olympic rally.Analysts at Nomura said that building the stadiums for the Games would require more than three million tons of cement in 2016 through 2019. And total demand for cement could be even greater, as hopes for a tourist influx before the Games prompt developers to plow money into hotels and other commercial projects.The tide is already beginning to turn at Taiheiyo, as it taps reconstruction demand after Japan's tsunami and nuclear disasters.For the fiscal year through March, Taiheiyo's net profit surged 44 percent from a year earlier to 11.3 billion yen, or $114 million, and the company expects an additional 14.7 percent increase this year, to 13 billion yen.But how long will an Olympics-fueled rally last? Strategists at Nomura, who studied market patterns after past Olympic announcements, are optimistic. Their analysis shows that stock markets tended to perform well over the longer-term after a successful Olympics bid."Once strong investor interest in Olympics hosting-related stocks wanes, the stock market as a whole appreciates," Mr. Tamura said.
TOKYO — Japan's economy expanded much faster than initially thought in the second quarter, data showed Monday, adding to growing signs that a solid recovery is taking hold and strengthening the case for a planned sales tax increase next year.A marked improvement in capital expenditure led to an upward revision in April-June gross domestic product to an annualized 3.8 percent expansion from a preliminary 2.6 percent increase, according to data released by the Cabinet Office. The expansion, which roughly matched a median market forecast for a 3.7 percent increase, underscores the strength of Japan's recovery.It was the third consecutive quarter of increase after 4.1 percent growth in January-March. On a quarter-to-quarter basis, G.D.P. growth was revised up to a 0.9 percent increase from a preliminary 0.6 percent.Japan emerged from recession in 2012, and data for much of this year has shown the benefits of Mr. Abe's reflationary policies and the Bank of Japan's s aggressive stimulus program.Preliminary G.D.P. data for April-June fell short of market forecasts because of weaker-than-expected capital spending, casting doubt on whether the tax increase would proceed as scheduled.But capital expenditure was revised up to a 1.3 percent increase from the preliminary 0.1 percent decline, suggesting that improving business sentiment is prompting companies to spend more on plants and equipment.The government had cited revised G.D.P. data as among key factors in deciding whether to go ahead with raising the sales tax to 8 percent from 5 percent in April, and to 10 percent in October 2015. Mr. Abe is expected to make a decision early October.
MOUNT FUJI, Japan — They trudge up well-trod cinder paths by the thousands, headlamps glowing in the dark, and then settle in, shivering, to await and cheer the sun's blazing ascent over the horizon.Climbing Mount Fuji, Japan's most iconic landmark, is a group activity: Seldom is it climbed in solitude. The recent recognition of the 3,776-meter (12,388-foot) peak as a UNESCO World Heritage site has many here worried that it will draw still more people, adding to the wear and tear on the environment from the more than 300,000 who already climb the mountain each year.Safety is another concern. At least seven people died and 70 were hurt climbing Fuji In 2012, and traffic jams of climbers in the pre-dawn darkness can add to the risks, says Shomei Yokouchi, governor of Yamanashi, the area to the west. The official climbing season runs July to August, and the trek — nine hours round trip in good weather — is especially treacherous other times of the year.Mount Fuji's near perfect cone was created by an eruption thousands of years ago that buried earlier peaks, and pilgrims have been climbing it for centuries — though women have been allowed only since 1868. It towers over the Pacific coast, ringed by lakes, national parks, temples and shrines that are also part of the World Heritage site.The new status, granted in June, will likely help area businesses — a welcome boost given the economic decline in most of rural Japan. Local authorities are puzzling, however, over how to preserve the mountain's natural beauty while improving traffic access and other facilities to accommodate the anticipated increase in visitors.Some have suggested limiting access by raising tenfold the 1,000 yen ($10) climbing fee. But that might lead climbers to risk hypothermia by roughing it outdoors instead of staying in the 16 huts along the top of the trail, which charge up to $100 a night for cheek-by-jowl communal accommodations."With more foreigners visiting, we will need to think of improving the facilities," Gov. Yokouchi says, noting that the installation of composting toilets has helped. "They are cleaner than before and the smell's not so bad, but there are not enough of them."Then there's the litter.Each year 40,000 to 50,000 volunteers clean up garbage on the peak. Groups collected nearly 900 tons to prepare for June's World Heritage vote by UNESCO, the U.N.'s cultural organization.The designation is something to be proud of, says Hisataka Kurosawa, a 16-year-old high school student who recently joined a group of volunteers who climbed part of a trail and then scrounged around a car park near a visitor center, collecting several big bags worth of oil cans, cigarette butts, car parts and candy wrappers."It's getting polluted and so many people are running around. I'm a bit disappointed about that," he says.The volunteers were led by Toyohiro Watanabe, a former local government official who runs a civic group called Groundwork Mishima.It's not just the crowds that worry him. He also frets over acid rain from sea water mixed with emissions from factories on the coast. And over invasive plant species, such as the bamboo grass that grows thick along the roadsides, obscuring some of the litter tossed from passing vehicles.Global warming may be contributing to huge fissures on Fuji's slopes, prone to erosion and landslides, he says. "Although Fuji has a power of its own, it is being influenced by global warming and other factors," Watanabe says as he looks for trouble spots in some of the most frequented areas. "It is getting weaker."Though it last erupted in 1707, Mount Fuji remains an active volcano and Japanese seismologists watch it closely. The bigger risk, though, is from accidents.Fuji is hardly steep, but its high elevation and fickle weather can make it a hazardous climb. "There are rock falls, and sometimes people are unable to get out of the way," Gov. Yokouchi says.UNESCO has long acknowledged the risks to World Heritage sites, both from natural disasters and unsustainable levels of tourism. Even for a country as wealthy as Japan, tight budgets mean fewer resources available to support conservation.
SENDAI, Japan — Coming into the season, Masahiro Tanaka, the ace of the Pacific League's Tohoku Rakuten Golden Eagles, had a fairly impressive résumé. But it has now reached nearly unthinkable proportions.The 24-year-old Tanaka pushed his record to 20-0 last Friday with a 3-2 complete game victory over the Hokkaido Nippon Ham Fighters at the Eagles' stadium in Sendai. Dating to last season, Tanaka has 24 consecutive wins, a streak that matches the major league mark in the United States set by the New York Giants' Carl Hubbell in 1936-37.Max Scherzer of the Detroit Tigers created a stir this season by winning his first 13 decisions, and now has an eye-popping 19-3 record. But Tanaka has remained one step ahead.His latest victory got a big assist from Kazuo Matsui, a former Mets infielder, whose home run broke a 2-2 tie. Tanaka did the rest, and after recording the final out on a called third strike, he emphatically pumped his fist toward third base as the home crowd of 22,316 roared."It was a true team effort," Tanaka said. "In the future, I'll do my best to continue."It is his future that is now the source of considerable interest. It may take him to North America, perhaps as early as next season. News media outlets in Japan are suggesting that Tanaka will request the Eagles put him up for auction via the posting system later this year. Such a move will make him the most sought-after Japanese export since Yu Darvish, one of baseball's best pitchers, and a member of the Texas Rangers for the last two seasons. Still, any discussion of how well Tanaka might do in the major leagues inevitably summons all the difficulties that Daisuke Matsuzaka encountered after his first two seasons with the Boston Red Sox."Some people would say that he's not quite Darvish, but he might have a bit more extended success than Matsuzaka," said a major league scout who has seen Tanaka pitch multiple times and requested anonymity because he did not have permission from his parent club to speak publicly about a player he was evaluating.In his second season with the Rangers, Darvish leads the major leagues in strikeouts. As for Matsuzaka, he helped the Red Sox win a World Series in his first season in Boston, in 2007, and went 18-3 in 2008, but since then has struggled with injuries and his command. He spent most of this season in the minor leagues before being picked up by the Mets on a short-term deal.For now, Tanaka is excelling in Japan. Over 23 starts this season, Tanaka, a 6-foot-2 right-hander with a fastball that touches about 95 miles per hour, a sharp-breaking slider and a split-finger fastball, has compiled an earned run average of 1.24 while striking out 155 batters over 181 innings. This will probably be the third consecutive season his E.R.A. will end up below 2.00, and beyond that, he also had a streak of 42 scoreless innings this year."I've always liked his slider, but his split-finger has really come on in the last couple of seasons," the scout said. "He definitely has enough velocity to play at the major league level, and the other two pitches would compete for sure."Tanaka is also adept at extricating himself from jams. Teams were hitting a league-low .147 against him with runners in scoring position going into Friday's game, which ended with the tying run on third.Even more remarkable is that Tanaka is excelling during a season in which pitchers are at something of a disadvantage in Japan. Since the start of the season, rumors circulated that the Japanese teams were using a juiced ball. In June, the commissioner, Ryozo Kato, admitted that a ball of different specifications had been secretly put into play in an effort to induce more home runs, which had dropped significantly after a ball roughly matching that used in international play was introduced after 2010.Ira Stevens, the founder of ScoutDragon.com, an online database of Japanese baseball that is used by major league teams and scouts, said the dead ball, short as its life span was, had helped Tanaka learn how "to really pitch.""With the dead ball, Tanaka started going after batters," Stevens said. "He didn't fool around anymore."And now, with the lively ball, Stevens said, Tanaka is still taking the same aggressive approach. "It doesn't matter if his strikeouts are down, it's how he's pitching," Stevens said. "He's dominating."Tanaka will turn 25 on Nov. 1. Before entering Rakuten's rotation at 18 in 2007, he pitched for Komazawa University Tomakomai High School. For potential suitors, there is the risk that his best innings are behind him because high schools in Japan are known for putting pitchers through grueling regimens.As an example, during the popular two-week Koshien high-school baseball tournament in 2006, Tanaka threw 742 pitches over six appearances. That exceeded the 643 pitches thrown by Matsuzaka eight years before."For every Japanese player, high school experience is an issue," Stevens said. "Major league teams are aware that guys have overthrown."Yozo Tachibana, Rakuten's team president, told Kyodo News this month that he had asked Tanaka, who is under contract for two more years, to stay with the club for the 2014 season. Tachibana also acknowledged that Tanaka had previously mentioned his intention to move to the major leagues.The Golden Eagles are in first place, with a five-game lead, in the Pacific League through Tuesday's games. A pennant would be the first in the nine-year history of the team, which is owned by the Internet shopping mall Rakuten.The area around the city of Sendai was ravaged by the earthquake and tsunami that struck the Tohoku area in 2011. If this is indeed the last season in Sendai for Tanaka, a victory in this year's Japan Series would certainly make his leaving less painful."What I really want is a championship," Tanaka said. After that, North America could beckon. Perhaps in time for the 2014 season.
TOKYO — Japan has not ruled out stationing government officials on islands at the center of a territorial dispute with China, the top cabinet secretary said Tuesday, as a fleet of Chinese patrol ships entered disputed waters amid tensions in the year-old maritime standoff.The fight over the uninhabited islands in the East China Sea, known as Senkaku in Japanese and Diaoyu in Chinese, has tainted relations between the two countries even as they continue to depend on each other for trade.On Tuesday, seven Chinese patrol ships entered waters around the islands, the latest of many such incursions into the area administered by Japan, according to the Japanese Coast Guard. A day earlier, the Japanese spotted a drone aircraft in the islands' vicinity and scrambled fighter jets. Japan has not confirmed what nation controlled the drones but has approached China over it, the government said.The episodes prompted a stern response from Japan's chief cabinet secretary, Yoshihide Suga, who told reporters that Japan stood prepared to make "a calm but resolute response to defend our territory."Asked whether Japan might station officials on the islands to defend Japanese territory, Mr. Suga said the move was "one option" under consideration."Our country will never make a concession on the matter of sovereignty," he added.An effort by either country to forcibly control the islands could lead to an escalation of the conflict, analysts have warned. They also worry that a small, unintended episode at sea as Japanese and Chinese boats chase each other near the islands could lead to a wider conflict. Open hostility between China and Japan, an important American ally in the region, also risks drawing in the United States.Prime Minister Shinzo Abe of Japan came to power in December on campaign promises that initially included a reference to placing government officials on the islands. But shortly before the voting, Mr. Abe said that he would put off a decision on the matter.He also did not include that promise in his official campaign platform for separate elections in July. However, a policy document issued by his ruling Liberal Democratic Party around the same time mentions the need for Japanese officials to be based on the island, underscoring the government's shifting stance.The territorial dispute, which has lasted for decades, flared last year after the Japanese government bought three of the five islands from their private owner. The move drew outrage from Beijing, which saw it as an effort by Japan to solidify its claims. Japan said at the time that it was acting to pre-empt Japanese nationalists from trying to take more provocative steps to assert control.
TOKYO — Japan on Thursday hanged a 73-year-old man convicted of murder and robbery, the country's sixth execution of the year.The Justice Ministry said the hanging was carried out in Tokyo. The man had shot to death a restaurant owner in 2004, stealing his bag containing 400,000 yen ($4,000) in cash.Japan executed three inmates in February and two in April. There are 132 inmates currently on death row.All executions in the country are done by hanging.Human rights groups have widely criticized Japan for continuing capital punishment, but polls show the public supports the system.Japan's government releases few details about executions, and inmates are not informed of their pending execution until immediately before it is carried out.
TOKYO — With the Olympics headed to Tokyo, Japanese government officials are raising concern after a New Zealand woman with a traditional Maori tattoo was recently denied entry to a bathhouse.Public baths commonly ban tattoos because they are considered an anti-social statement or a sign of possible involvement with organized crime.Chief Cabinet Secretary Yoshihide Suga told reporters that he thinks "it is important to respect the cultures of foreign countries, considering we will host the 2020 Tokyo Olympics and expect many visitors ... to come to Japan."Japanese media reported that Maori language lecturer Erana Brewerton was in Japan for an academic conference, and was turned away when she tried to go to a hot spring in Hokkaido on Sept. 8.
BEIJING — China's military told the United States this week not to support Japan, nor let it do as it pleased, over a group of disputed islands in the East China Sea, the Chinese Defense Ministry said on Friday.Ties between the world's second- and third-biggest economies have been strained over the uninhabited islands, controlled by Japan but claimed by both countries. The isles are known as the Senkaku in Japan and the Diaoyu in China.A year ago on Wednesday, the Japanese government bought three of the islands from a private owner, inflaming anger, and setting off big anti-Japan protests, in China.Aircraft and ships from the two countries have played cat-and-mouse in the vicinity of the islands ever since, raising fears of conflict, perhaps sparked by an accident.Wang Guanzhong, Deputy Chief of General Staff of China's People's Liberation Army, said during scheduled talks with U.S. counterparts in Beijing that China was determined to defend its territory, but had all along exercised restraint."This issue should not become a problem between China and the United States, and China hopes that the United States does not become a third party in this issue," the Defence Ministry quoted Wang as telling U.S. Under Secretary of Defense for Policy James Miller."The United States should maintain a consistent stance and policy, not send wrong signals nor support and connive with the relevant country to do as they please," Wang added.He said China hoped the United States would handle the issue appropriately to ensure it did not affect mutual strategic trust.The ministry cited Miller as saying in response that the United States did not take a position on the sovereignty issue, called for all sides to exercise restraint and supported China to use diplomatic means to resolve the matter.China has long harbored suspicions about U.S. interest in the dispute as the U.S.-Japan security treaty commits the United States to intervene in defence of Japan if there is an attack on Japanese-administered territory.The United States also has a hefty military presence in Japan, including on the southern island of Okinawa, which is close to the disputed islands.
He wears a maroon-and-white jersey manufactured by Adidas, leads a hyperactive offense with title aspirations and is the starting quarterback at A&M.Except his name is not Johnny Manziel.Less than three miles from Texas A&M's Kyle Field, where Manziel, the Aggies' Heisman Trophy-winning quarterback, hopes to overwhelm — or at least irritate — No. 1 Alabama on Saturday with his legs, his throwing arm and perhaps his vocal cords, quarterback Kobe Miller has been leading A&M Consolidated High School."I don't really get much attention from fans," he said.Miller, a senior who has spent his entire life in College Station, understands that it is a fluke for him to share a position in the same city as one of the most famous and polarizing athletes in the country.Their circumstances could not be more different, after all. Miller, 17, can grab a sandwich without being stalked by an inquiring public. He is in the process of applying to colleges. He is not in the habit of signing autographs, and even if he were, nobody would try to sell them."He's a superstar," Miller said of Manziel. "Everyone loves him because he's done such great things. I've been an A&M fan since I was born."What they do share is a scheme. David Raffield, the coach at A&M Consolidated, has Miller run the same style of up-tempo, spread offense that Manziel operates under Coach Kevin Sumlin at Texas A&M. In fact, the offense at A&M Consolidated predates Sumlin, who arrived in College Station before the start of last season."We're a big-time passing football team," said Raffield, adding that his teams had not huddled since 2004, back when he was coaching at Cypress Falls High School in Houston. "Our kids can call our own plays. Our wide receivers and quarterbacks love this thing. We're flying."In their own way, the A&M Consolidated Tigers are a bunch of mini-Manziels, doing their own thing just a deep route from the college campus. They won their first two games this season, each by the score of 44-41. In their opener against Copperas Cove on Aug. 30, the Tigers stole a victory with a last-second kickoff return that was featured on national sports highlight shows. Against Waco Midway on Sept. 6, A&M Consolidated had 49 offensive snaps in the first half."We practice going 100 miles an hour," said Miller, who is 6 feet 2 and 205 pounds. "We're never going fast enough."Heading into Friday night's game against Austin Westlake, Miller had completed 64.5 percent of his passes for 665 yards."He really understands the system," Raffield said.Scoring lots of points is the cool thing to do in College Station, which is home to two large public high schools. College Station High School, which opened in 2012 after years of enrollment increases at A&M Consolidated, was 2-0 before Friday's game against Aldine Davis. Cole Whittlesey, a junior quarterback, helped lead the Cougars to a 70-20 victory over Waco Reicher Catholic last week."He's a scrambler," said Steve Huff, the coach at College Station.For players and coaches at both high schools, there often seems to be little separation between themselves and Texas A&M. Daniel Havens, an alumnus of A&M Consolidated, is a freshman long snapper for the Aggies. Huff said his young son had become good friends with one of Sumlin's sons. Raffield, the coach at A&M Consolidated, has studied film with the coaches at Texas A&M.For Miller, in particular, the roots run deep. His mother, Terry Fossum, is the vice chancellor for global and corporate partnerships at Texas A&M, and his father, Matthew Miller, is the director of one of the university's medical research facilities.Last season, Miller took limited snaps as the backup quarterback. He studied coverages and worked on his technique. There are a lot of very good high school quarterbacks in Texas. When it comes to starting jobs, seniors have a decided advantage."The biggest thing was that I was held to varsity expectations and was not allowed to make J.V. mistakes," Miller said. "It made me a better competitor."Recruiters have not been pounding on his door — not yet, anyway. He hopes to generate more interest from college programs as the season moves along, with A&M Consolidated aiming to be in contention for a state championship.Miller has never met Manziel, College Station's resident celebrity, though he does have tickets to Saturday's blockbuster against Alabama. The offense with Manziel at the helm will look familiar to Miller: the zone reads, the route combinations, the snap cadences."A lot of the concepts are similar," Miller said. "Of course, they execute it really well."At the same time, Miller is his own man, intent on charting his own course. He said he would love to play in the Ivy League or at an academically oriented university like Rice. He wants to study engineering. His favorite class is Advanced Placement chemistry. (Raffield described him as a "rocket scientist.")And while Manziel has popularized the No. 2 in much of East Texas, Miller has chosen to wear the No. 5 this season in homage to his favorite college quarterback: Braxton Miller of Ohio State.
TOKYO — Former major leaguer Wladimir Balentien hit his 56th and 57th home runs on Sunday, breaking the Japanese single-season record set by legendary slugger Sadaharu Oh 49 years ago.Balentien hit the record-breaking three-run homer in the first inning of Sunday's game, sending the ball over the left-field wall at Tokyo's Jingu Stadium to give his Yakult Swallows an early lead over the Hanshin Tigers. He then added a solo shot in the third for No. 57 to help the Swallows to a 9-0 win.Oh set the mark of 55 in 1964.Balentien's record comes in a season which has seen attempts to reform the game to make it more exciting. In June, Japanese baseball officials acknowledged that they introduced a new ball this season without notifying players. The new ball has resulted in a dramatic increase in home runs.
TOKYO — Crews were cleaning up wrecked houses and assessing damage Tuesday in the wake of a powerful typhoon that lashed Japan with torrential rains, leaving at least two people dead.Typhoon Man-yi weakened into a tropical storm by late Monday, though violent winds persisted into the night.Dozens of people were injured and thousands of homes damaged. In the popular tourist destination of Kyoto, where 260,000 people were ordered to evacuate to shelters, the Katsura river remained flooded at midday Tuesday.Man-yi moved offshore of the northern island of Hokkaido late Monday, followed by torrential rains.Train services and flights had mostly returned to normal by early Tuesday in most areas following disruptions over the three-day holiday weekend.At least two people were reported dead and five others missing, police said.Police and disaster management officials said the body of a 72-year-old woman was dug out of the debris of her home, which was smashed by a mudslide the night before in Shiga prefecture, east of Kyoto. A 77-year-old woman was found dead in a mudslide in Fukui prefecture.Hundreds of thousands of people were ordered to evacuate across Japan.The Meteorological Agency said the storm dumped an "unprecedented" amount of rainfall in Kyoto and two neighboring prefectures — as much as 8 centimeters (3 inches) per hour.Tourists in Kyoto were taken to safety on boats towed by rescue workers on a flooded riverside street near the scenic Arashiyama area.The government set up an emergency task force to assess damage and support rescue efforts, said Prime Minister's Office official Hikariko Ono. Kyoto and Shiga prefecture asked the Defense Ministry to mobilize relief teams.More than 100 people were injured across the country by Monday evening, public broadcaster NHK said, citing its own tally. A man was missing after he went to check fish traps in a river in Fukushima prefecture. A 41-year-old woman and her daughter, a fifth-grader, were missing in Mie, central Japan, apparently swept away by a swollen river.As a preventive step, workers at the crippled Fukushima Dai-ichi nuclear power plant, about 250 kilometers (155 miles) northeast of Tokyo, were pumping out rainwater that was pooling around hundreds of storage tanks containing radioactive water to minimize the risk of flooding or of potential leaks from the tanks mixing with rainwater seeping into the ground or flowing to the sea.Plant operator Tokyo Electric Power Co. said Tuesday that it moved 1,130 tons of rainwater to the ground outside of a 30-centimeter-high (1-foot-high) concrete dike around the tanks. The water was thought not to be tainted by radiation. Any rainwater containing radioactivity exceeding an allowable limit was pumped into extra tanks, TEPCO said.The government's Nuclear Regulation Authority, however, said the pumping and release of the rainwater into the environment was possibly "an event" subject to reporting under nuclear safety rules. Regulators said they were checking TEPCO's report that the radioactivity of any released water was within allowed discharge limits.Recent acknowledgements by officials that contaminated water is leaking from the plant have triggered safety concerns.At Japan's Monju test reactor site in Fukui, which is currently off-line, an emergency data transmission system went down, apparently due to storm damage, regulators said Monday, an indication of risk management issues at Japanese nuclear facilities apart from the Fukushima crisis.
TOKYO — It was a day few thought would arrive. Japan's single-season home run record had fallen — to a foreigner.On Sunday night, the former major leaguer Wladimir Balentien, an outfielder for the Central League's Tokyo Yakult Swallows, hit his 56th home run, pushing him past Sadaharu Oh, Tuffy Rhodes and Alex Cabrera.When his three-run blast reached the left-field seats at Meiji Jingu Stadium, the announced crowd of 30,319 went into a frenzy.Balentien was not done. In his next at-bat, he hit No. 57."I am so happy now," Balentien, 29, a native of Curaçao, said after his team's 9-0 victory against the Hanshin Tigers.With the record being highly cherished in Japanese sports, foreign challengers have faced unsportsmanlike actions, some of which had links to Oh, perhaps the most popular player in Japanese history.Going into the last game of the 1985 season, the Tigers' Randy Bass had 54 home runs. But the Yomiuri Giants, then managed by Oh, walked him four times.In 2001, Rhodes, then with the Kintetsu Buffaloes, repeatedly saw pitches out of the strike zone down the stretch against the Fukuoka Daiei Hawks, a team that Oh managed, as Rhodes attempted to surpass 55.The next year, Cabrera, with the Seibu Lions, received similar treatment.Over the last few weeks, Japan's sports newspapers speculated on whether Balentien, who spent three seasons in the majors, with the Seattle Mariners and the Cincinnati Reds, would see any pitches in the strike zone. It proved to be a nonissue. Balentien was challenged repeatedly, not only by the Tigers but also by the Carp during a three-game series earlier last week.Oh congratulated Balentien on breaking his record. "I am looking forward, like all baseball fans, to his final total for the season," said Oh, as reported by the public broadcaster NHK.Masahiro Tanaka, the right-handed pitcher for the Rakuten Eagles, who on Friday ran his record to 21-0, wrote on Twitter: "Balentien is unbelievable!"Balentien missed the first 12 games of the season after injuring his leg while representing the Netherlands in the World Baseball Classic. Since then, he has been knocking balls out of the park about once every other game.Balentien's progress has been charted with the Coco Meter, a reference to his nickname, on the team's Web site. Outside the stadium Sunday, fans took photographs in front of a similar meter erected at an entrance.For last-place Yakult, there have been few positives this season. Balentien, who leads the league with a .338 batting average, is the main attraction.After the game, Balentien did a victory lap through the outfield, raising his hands as the crowd roared. Balentien's mother, Astrid, was among the fans."I was so glad," she said after the game. "I was the most glad mom in the world for God blessing me with Balentien, with Coco."Balentien said he could not have been more pleased."I think this is the best present I could give her forever," he said.
TOKYO — Eiji Toyoda, a member of Toyota's founding family who helped create the super-efficient "Toyota Way" production method, has died. He was 100.Toyoda, a cousin of the Japanese automaker's founder Kiichiro Toyoda, died Tuesday of heart failure at Toyota Memorial Hospital in Toyota city, central Japan, Toyota said in a statement.Eiji Toyoda served as president from 1967 to 1982, engineering Toyota's growth into a global automaker. He became chairman in 1982, and continued in advisory positions up to his death.He spent his early years on the shop floor, and helped pioneer Toyota's reputed just-in-time production to cut waste and empower workers for continuous improvement or "kaizen."A graduate of the prestigious University of Tokyo with a degree in mechanical engineering, he joined Toyoda Automatic Loom Works in 1936.Toyota started out as a loom maker, founded by Kiichiro Toyoda's father Sakichi. Eiji Toyoda's father was Sakichi's brother.During his years at the helm of what is now the world's biggest automaker, Eijji Toyoda led the development of the Toyota Corolla, which has become one of the best-selling cars of all time. He also pushed Toyota to develop luxury vehicles, which later became the Lexus brand.One of Japan's most respected businessmen, Toyoda was also one of the main figures to forge Toyota's partnership with General Motors Co. to set up a joint plant in Fremont, California called NUMMI, New United Motor Manufacturing, in 1984. NUMMI closed in 2010.Toyoda is survived by his three sons, Kanshiro, Tetsuro and Shuhei, all executives at Toyota affiliates. A private family funeral is planned.
TOKYO — Eiji Toyoda, who helped steer Toyota Motor Corp's global rise and pioneered the automaker's vaunted production system, died on Tuesday, the Japanese automaker said. He was 100.Toyoda, cousin of the automaker's founder, died of heart failure in Toyota City, the company said in a statement.A taciturn engineer, Toyoda served as president between 1967 and 1982. He was chairman until 1994 and remained an honorary advisor at Toyota up until the time of his death.Over his career, Toyoda presided over Toyota's rise in the U.S. market from the launch of the Corolla in the late 1960s to the decision to begin making cars in the United States in the late 1980s.Toyoda was also instrumental in developing what became the automaker's much-imitated method of producing cars with as little waste as possible and continual quality improvements, a system that became known as the "Toyota Way".In 1950, company founder Kiichiro Toyoda sent Eiji, a graduate of the University of Tokyo, to Ford Motor Co's massive Rouge Plant to learn about car making from the company that had pioneered mass production.In a story that is still shared at Toyota training sessions, Toyoda returned to Japan impressed with U.S. materials and machinery but convinced that he could make improvements to Ford's world-famous production system."Japan's automobile industry facilities and engineers are good but our machine tools are inferior. If we can solve this problem, we can manufacture good and economic vehicles that are equal to America's," Toyoda wrote after his month and a half of training at Ford's major factories.At the time of his death, Toyoda was being treated at a hospital the company had first founded as a clinic for its factory workers in 1938.
TOKYO — Each day before dawn, the world's largest fish market comes to life in frantic activity, a last holdout of an older, quainter Japan.Workers in rubber boots slosh through inch-deep water, while others dart by on motorized carts carrying plastic-foam boxes with every manner of creature that can be hauled from the sea, from dagger-shaped silver sardines and spider-like crabs to the deflated protoplasmic blobs of mysterious deep-sea predators. In one corner, auctioneers loudly hawk the huge frozen torsos of prize tuna laid in rows on the floor. Nearby, fishmongers in open-air stalls carve the tuna flesh into ruby-red bricks for sale to sushi bars and grocers.Soon it will be gone. The city is planning to spend $4.5 billion to relocate the market — nicknamed Tsukiji for the neighborhood that surrounds it — to a modern, climate-controlled distribution center on a manufactured island in three years. The move is part of a broader face-lift Tokyo is planning before the 2020 Olympics.For the many who have opposed the change, the relocation will bring not only the loss of a historic, 78-year-old marketplace, but also another blow to a vanishing way of life. Tsukiji has been a place where merchants haggled face to face, and where even the lowliest fishmonger displayed the obsession with freshness that helped Japan bring sushi to the world. Its passing is part of a broader transformation, away from the tiny mom-and-pop shops specializing in everything from tofu to rice cakes that have been increasingly replaced by big-box supermarkets and fast-food chains.Officials say they want to redevelop the market's approximately 50 acres of land — valued in the billions of dollars — into high-rise apartment buildings and a tunnel that would connect Tokyo to the islands that will house new Olympic sites. They, and many who work at the market, also say the move is necessary to keep up with changing times, as the same fast-food chains and supermarkets that have changed Tokyo's urban landscape have increasingly shunned Tsukiji as too expensive and slow.Opponents counter that the relocation is yet another example of the skewed priorities of Japan's development-happy bureaucrats, who they say want to tear down what has become one of the city's most popular tourist destinations to enrich big construction companies and real estate developers."Tsukiji was the beating heart of the sushi culture that spread across the world," said Kazuki Kosaka, a former local assembly member who opposed the relocation. "And now it will be redeveloped into condominiums."When moving Tsukiji was first proposed 14 years ago, it spurred widespread opposition, even leading to rare street protests. They were led by so-called middle wholesalers, the traditional middlemen who buy from big wholesalers and sell to restaurants and other retailers; they feared the new market would allow large corporate wholesalers to squeeze them out. In 2001, the plan appeared doomed after the discovery of toxic contaminants at the new site, which had housed a refinery for converting coal into natural gas.But city officials were undeterred, chipping away at opposition by offering subsidies to help pay for the move. Last year, the union representing the middle wholesalers, who number about 700, switched its position and came out in favor of the move, which is considered a done deal barring some last-minute reprieve.After delays, Tokyo says it is on track to complete the yearlong cleanup of the new site by March. Workers there now spend their days scraping off several feet of contaminated topsoil to replace it with clean dirt. But critics fret that the cleanup will not convince skeptics that seafood whose value lies partly in its pristineness is safe."The Tokyo government is using the Olympics as an excuse to distract people from the contamination issue," said Makoto Nozue, 76, who has bought and sold tuna at the market for six decades. "Tsukiji is a globally known brand name and a cultural treasure. Why throw this away?"
SAPPORO, Japan — The road to Japan's energy future runs through a cluster of low buildings in this city, the largest on the northern island of Hokkaido.Here, working on their own and in collaboration with American scientists, researchers are studying sediment cores containing methane hydrates, icy constructs of water molecules with the explosive gas methane trapped within.Hydrate-containing sediments are found in large amounts around the world, both under the sea and to a lesser extent in permafrost. If they can be tapped safely and economically, they could be an abundant source of fuel, especially for countries like Japan that have few energy reserves of their own.The Japanese researchers' work has already borne fruit: in March, the government announced that it had successfully produced methane from hydrates in sediments under the Pacific Ocean. The effort, conducted from a drilling ship in the Nankai Trough about 100 miles east of Osaka, was the world's first hydrate production test in deep water.But scientists say there is still much that is unknown about the unusual compounds, sometimes referred to as "flammable ice," and that the commercial production of gas from them is still far-off. "We need to know more about the physical properties of hydrates themselves, and of the sediments as well," said Hideo Narita, the director of the research laboratory, part of the National Institute of Advanced Industrial Science and Technology, which is financed largely by the government.Further research, here and at labs around the world, will help scientists better understand the environmental impact of hydrate production, including the possible release of methane, a potent greenhouse gas, into the sea or atmosphere. There is also the potential for subsea landforms to become unstable when hydrates are removed.Timothy S. Collett, a research geologist with the United States Geological Survey, said that despite all the talk about their potential as an energy resource, "hydrates are largely still a scientific issue."The research poses special challenges because hydrates form under high pressure, caused by the weight of all the seawater or rock above them, and that pressure must be maintained when the sediment cores are analyzed. If it is not, the hydrates within quickly dissociate into water and gas, and the sediments "look like chocolate mousse," said Carlos Santamarina, a professor at Georgia Tech.In the mid-2000s, Dr. Santamarina designed the first instruments "that could determine the properties of the sediments without destroying them in the process," he said. He and other American researchers traveled to Japan this year for tests using his instruments and others in the Sapporo lab.Methane hydrates have bedeviled petroleum engineers for decades, as they can form in subsea pipelines and obstruct flows. They played a small but unwelcome role during efforts to stop the Gulf of Mexico oil spill in 2010, quickly clogging a huge steel box designed to funnel the oil safely to the surface.Running into hydrates while drilling can also complicate exploitation of conventional oil and gas reserves. But for years, scientists have considered that hydrates might be an energy source in themselves.Hydrates can sometimes appear as clumps of ice on the seafloor. However, for energy production, researchers are most interested in those that form in sediments. They are created when methane — which is produced by microbes, or heat and pressure, acting on organic matter — migrates upward in the sediments and mixes with water under specific conditions of temperature and pressure.The icy substance forms in the microscopic spaces between the sediment grains, often in substantial amounts."You have a lot of methane, you have a lot of water, and guess what, they're going to form hydrates," said Carolyn Ruppel, the chief of the geological survey's hydrate research project, which focuses on the potential impact on climate and seafloor stability, as well as energy.Sandy sediments, with bigger grains, are preferred over clay. "They're very permeable, so it's easy to get the hydrates out," Dr. Ruppel said.
OKUMA, Japan — Japanese Prime Minister Shinzo Abe ordered the operator of the country's crippled nuclear power plant on Thursday to scrap all six reactors at the site instead of just four already slated for decommissioning and to concentrate on tackling pressing issues like leaks of radioactive water.After taking a firsthand look at the Fukushima Dai-ichi plant, however, Abe insisted that radioactive water had been contained at the complex and said he would fend off "rumors" regarding Fukushima's safety.Following a three-hour tour of the plant, Abe instructed its operator, Tokyo Electric Power Co., to decommission the No. 5 and 6 reactors, which survived the March 2011 earthquake and tsunami. The disaster caused three other reactors to melt and damaged a fuel cooling pool at another. TEPCO has been unsure about what to do with the two surviving reactors, leading some to believe that it may be hanging on to hopes of resuming their operation."I told (TEPCO) to ensure decommissioning of reactors No. 5 and 6 so that they can concentrate more on dealing with the accident," Abe told workers and reporters as he wrapped up the tour at the plant's emergency command center.TEPCO President Naomi Hirose told Abe that a decision on the reactors would be made by the end of the year, the prime minister said.Abe said he urged TEPCO to ensure it has enough funding on hand to take care of urgent work needed to clear the way for the plant's decommissioning, and that Hirose promised to obtain 1 trillion yen ($10 billion) in addition to a similar amount it has already set aside.Decommissioning multiple melted reactors is an unprecedented challenge, and experts say Fukushima's cleanup will be far more difficult than after the Three Mile Island nuclear accident in the United States in 1979.The prime minister said he stood by the reassurance about Tokyo's safety that he gave to the International Olympic Committee before the city of 35 million was awarded the right to host the 2020 summer games earlier this month."One of the main purposes of this visit was to see it for myself, after I made those remarks on how the contaminated water has been handled," Abe said.Officials have acknowledged that radiation-contaminated groundwater has been seeping into the Pacific Ocean since soon after meltdowns and explosions crippled the plant following a massive earthquake and tsunami.Abe said he was convinced that all of the contaminated water had been contained."In light of that, I will work hard to counter rumors questioning the safety of the Fukushima plant," he said.Abe was shown some of the 1,000 tanks containing radioactive water, water treatment equipment and an underground chemical dam being installed along the coast — steps meant to contain the water leakage, which experts say is a major obstacle for the decades-long cleanup process.Wearing hazmat coveralls, a face mask and an orange helmet, Abe rushed with his entourage from one site to another, spending only several minutes at each.Abe's adamant reassurance to the IOC that the leaks are "under control" has backfired at home, as many Japanese believe he was glossing over problems at the plant.Thursday's plant visit was Abe's second since taking office in December, when he took his first tour on a bus.Hours before the IOC chose Tokyo to host the 2020 Olympics, Abe gave a speech declaring that radioactive contaminants from the leakage had no impact on seawater outside the bay near the plant. Tokyo was not at risk, he insisted. Fukushima is about 250 kilometers (160 miles) northeast of the capital.Senior TEPCO official Kazuhiko Yamashita told opposition Democratic Party of Japan lawmakers last week that the water situation was "not under control," appearing to contradict Abe. DPJ leaders said they would demand that Abe explain his remarks to the IOC.TEPCO later said Yamashita was referring to isolated incidents and had not contradicted Abe's comments.The most heavily radiated water pools inside the reactor and turbine basements, where waste cooling water that leaked out of melted reactors has gathered, have mixed with groundwater seeping through cracks in the damaged buildings, generating 800 tons of contaminated water per day.Much of the water is being pumped out and partially treated — half is recycled as cooling water, the other half stored in tanks. The plant has 350,000 tons of water kept in the 1,000 tanks.The chairman of Japan's Nuclear Regulation Authority, Shunichi Tanaka, has proposed using a new water treatment machine capable of removing all radioactive elements apart from less toxic tritium so the water can be eventually released into the ocean. That equipment, which Abe saw during Thursday's tour, is under repair due to corrosion, and tests are to resume later this year.The government is funding the development of more advanced water treatment equipment and paying for a costly ice wall to surround the reactor and turbine buildings and prevent them from contaminating outside groundwater.
TOKYO — Prime Minister Shinzo Abe said Tuesday that he would raise Japan's sales tax next year as planned in a bid to tackle the country's enormous debt, sweeping aside concerns that an increase might put the brakes on the country's nascent economic recovery.To buffer against a slowdown, Mr. Abe also announced a stimulus package of roughly 6 trillion yen, or $61 billion, that would pump back into the economy much of the 8.1 trillion yen in revenue the government expects to raise during the first year of the tax increase.In a televised news conference, Mr. Abe said he would stick to a plan put in place by the previous government to raise the sales tax rate next April to 8 percent from 5 percent, citing the need to "maintain confidence" in Japan's fiscal health and pay for the country's growing number of elderly citizens."If we raise taxes now, would consumption slump, and would the Japanese economy sink back into the deep valley that is economic morass and deflation?" he said. "I pondered these questions until the very end. But there is no road left for us but to grow our economy and to rebuild our finances at the same time."By combining a tax increase with government stimulus, Mr. Abe is signaling to global investors that Japan will start taking concrete steps to rein in its colossal debt and that it is prepared to take ample measures to shore up the economy.Earlier this year, national debt topped 1 quadrillion yen, or $10 trillion, for the first time — more than twice the size of Japan's economy and larger than the economies of Germany, France and Britain combined. That level of borrowing raises concerns that investors could one day lose confidence in Tokyo's ability to service its debt, which could set off a crisis with grave consequences for the global economy.Mr. Abe "hopes to have his cake and eat it too," Tobias Harris, an associate at Teneo Intelligence, a financial advisory company based in New York, said in a note. "By going through with the tax increase, he will signal to investors and the international community that his government is serious about tackling Japan's deficits and debt. But by returning most of the revenue to businesses and individuals he will show that his government is still focused on triggering sustainable growth."The sales tax increase, which would begin April 1, is set to be followed by a second increase in October 2015 that would take the rate to 10 percent, though the plan allows the government to review the state of the economy before raising the tax again. Even the higher rate would still be lower than the average of 18 percent among nations in the Organization for Economic Cooperation and Development, of which Japan is a member.Mr. Abe's decision comes as Japan's long-underperforming economy shows signs of sustained growth, bolstered by the aggressive monetary policies of the Bank of Japan — policies pushed by Mr. Abe. The stance of the Bank of Japan, the central bank, has also helped weaken the yen, which has been a boon to the country's exporters.Earlier Tuesday, the bank's Tankan survey showed that sentiment among Japan's big manufacturers had improved in the three months through September, for the third consecutive quarter. Last month, the government revised upward Japan's gross domestic product growth rate for the April-June quarter to an annualized 3.8 percent, far higher than its initial reading of 2.6 percent, thanks to robust capital investment.Consumer prices rose 0.9 percent in August from a year earlier, indicating that Japan is emerging from 15 years of deflation, the damaging decline in prices that has sapped the country's ability to grow. A successful bid by Tokyo to host the 2020 Summer Olympics has added to hopes of a Japanese economic resurgence.Mr. Abe has pressed Japanese companies to respond to the economic upswing by swiftly raising wages and expanding employment. He worries that if there is no flow of wages from the corporate sector, households will be hit by a one-two punch of a higher sales tax and rising prices, freezing personal consumption.
TOKYO — Japan's flagging antinuclear movement received an unexpected new recruit this week when one of the nation's most popular figures, former Prime Minister Junichiro Koizumi, made a very public about-face from his previous embrace of atomic power.In a speech to business executives in Nagoya on Tuesday, Mr. Koizumi surprised many in the solidly pro-nuclear audience by saying that Japan should rid itself of its atomic plants and switch to renewable energy sources like solar power. His remarks were reported in the Tokyo Shimbun newspaper on Wednesday.As a pro-growth prime minister from 2001 to 2006, Mr. Koizumi had backed the business lobby by calling for Japan to become "a nation built on nuclear power," calling it cheap and clean, and sided with the Tokyo Electric Power Company in deciding to end tax-supported subsidies for solar panels. But he said in Tuesday's speech that he had reversed his stance after the nuclear accident at Tepco's Fukushima complex two and a half years ago, which left at least 83,000 people homeless and forced a multibillion-dollar cleanup that has been riddled with mistakes and accidents."There is nothing more costly than nuclear power," Mr. Koizumi, 71, was quoted as saying. "Japan should achieve zero nuclear plants and aim for a more sustainable society."Mr. Koizumi spoke on the same day that his son and political successor, Shinjiro Koizumi, 32, was named to a top cabinet post overseeing the recovery of northeastern Japan from the triple disaster that struck in March 2011, when a devastating earthquake and tsunami set off meltdowns at three Fukushima reactors.Tuesday's appeal was a rare return to public view by the retired prime minister, who rose to power with his uncanny ability to read the public zeitgeist and inspire voters with calls for radical change. Since retiring from politics four years ago, Mr. Koizumi has remained largely out of sight, refusing interviews or most requests to appear on television.In the last month, local media reported that Mr. Koizumi had begun saying in private that he now opposed nuclear power, but Tuesday's speech, before a crowd of 2,500, was one of his first public statements.It is unclear how big a lift, if any, the proclamation will give Japan's antinuclear movement, which appeared to crest last year when tens of thousands of demonstrators gathered weekly outside the prime minister's residence. While public opinion polls still show that more than half of Japanese oppose restarting the nation's idled nuclear plants, the protests have dwindled to a few dozen die-hards. Opposition to nuclear power also failed to become an election issue last December, when voters handed a landslide victory to the pro-nuclear Liberal Democratic Party.On Tuesday, Mr. Koizumi said that antinuclear sentiment remained a potentially potent political force beneath Japan's deceptively placid surface. He called on the Liberal Democrats and the current prime minister, Shinzo Abe, Mr. Koizumi's former political protégé, to tap that power in motivating the nation to overcome the Fukushima disaster."If the Liberal Democratic Party were to adopt a policy of no nukes, the public mood would rise in an instant," Mr. Koizumi was quoted as saying. "The Japanese are masters at turning a pinch into a new chance."
TOKYO — Secretary of State John Kerry, in his first remarks about Iran since Prime Minister Benjamin Netanyahu of Israel warned the United States to be wary of talks with the country, said on Thursday that the United States would negotiate with Tehran only if it provided proof that it would not pursue nuclear defense programs."Our hope is that there is a way forward," Mr. Kerry said at a news conference here after a meeting with Defense Secretary Chuck Hagel and the Japanese defense and foreign ministers. He added that he could assure Israel that "nothing we do is going to be based on trust. It's going to be based on steps," in which Iran must prove it is not going to pursue a nuclear program, or it will face a cold shoulder from the United States. "A country that generally wants to have a peaceful program does not have difficulty proving that it's peaceful," he said.At the General Assembly of the United Nations this week, Mr. Netanyahu called Iran's new president, Hassan Rouhani, "a wolf in sheep's clothing, a wolf who thinks he can pull the wool over the eyes of the international community," and he suggested that he would fool the United States about his nuclear ambitions.Mr. Kerry said "it would be diplomatic malpractice of the worst order" to not attempt a diplomatic solution to the longstanding conflict with Iran before pursuing a military one.President Obama recently had a 15-minute call with Mr. Rouhani, the first time the presidents of the two countries have spoken since the Islamic revolution in 1979.
TOKYO — The Bank of Japan maintained its huge monetary stimulus on Friday and upgraded its view on capital expenditure, encouraged by growing signs that the benefits of its aggressive policy action to escape deflation were broadening.After a two-day review, the central bank reiterated its view that Japan, the world's third-largest economy, was recovering moderately, suggesting that no additional monetary policy measures were needed to counter the pain from next year's sales tax increase."Capital expenditure is picking up as corporate profits improve," the Bank of Japan said in a statement.That was slightly more optimistic than last month, when it said capital spending was showing signs of a pickup.As widely expected, the Bank of Japan kept intact its April commitment to double base money via asset purchases to meet its target of lifting inflation to 2 percent in roughly two years.The policy review followed Prime Minister Shinzo Abe's decision on Tuesday to proceed with a planned increase in the sales tax to 8 percent in April, from 5 percent, and cushion its impact with a ¥5 trillion, or $51 billion, stimulus package.The Bank of Japan expects the sales tax increase to shave about 0.7 percentage point off growth. For now, it sees no need to expand its stimulus further, confident that the Japanese economy can withstand the hit."I don't think the B.O.J.'s view that the sales tax hike won't derail the recovery is too optimistic," said Junko Nishioka, chief Japan economist at RBS Securities."But the 2 percent inflation remains a distant goal," she said. "Core consumer inflation could hit 1 percent early next year. But it's an uphill battle from there."Japan's economy has now grown for three successive quarters as Mr. Abe's reflationary policies bolstered household spending and drove down the yen, benefiting exports, with annualized growth of 3.8 percent from April to June outpacing many Group of Seven nations.Big manufacturers' sentiment has risen to its highest in nearly six years, the B.O.J.'s "tankan" survey for the September quarter showed, underscoring its view that the economy is on track for a moderate recovery.
TOKYO — The diverging fortunes of two of the leading smartphone providers in Asia were demonstrated on Friday when Samsung Electronics of South Korea predicted better-than-expected quarterly earnings, while HTC of Taiwan reported its first loss.Samsung, which is benefiting from its status as a leading maker of semiconductors as well as smartphones, said it expected to post operating profit of 9.9 trillion won to 10.3 trillion won, or about $9.2 billion to $9.6 billion, in the third quarter, up from 8.06 trillion won a year earlier. Sales are expected to rise to a range of 58 trillion to 60 trillion won, from 52.2 trillion won a year earlier.The outlook contrasts strikingly with the report from HTC. The company posted a net loss of 2.97 billion Taiwan dollars, or about $101 million, in the third quarter, after net income of 3.9 billion Taiwan dollars a year earlier.Both companies are feeling pressure on the low end of the phone market, where new competitors, mostly in China, are doing well in what is the fastest-growing segment of the market. HTC has focused on premium models, however, despite the demand in the lower end of the market, where Lenovo, ZTE and Huawei, all Chinese companies, are growing rapidly.Samsung, however, has strength at the top. It also has a diversified mix of products that provide additional cash. Samsung is not only the biggest maker of smartphones, it is the leading maker of memory chips. It sells chips to other companies, like Apple, in addition to supplying them to its own smartphone production lines."Samsung's diversity of profit streams plus strength and scale in all tiers of smartphones helps them to continue to grow profits," Mark Newman, an analyst at Sanford C. Bernstein, wrote in a note to clients.Samsung did not provide an explanation of its growth, but analysts said the company was probably benefiting from a recent increase in the price of memory chips after a fire at a factory owned by a Samsung rival, SK Hynix, in Wuxi, China.While the torrid pace of sales of high-end smartphones like Samsung's Galaxy S4 has eased somewhat, the company sells a range of lower-price devices, too. This positions it to benefit from expected strong growth in low-price and midrange smartphones, analysts say.Samsung's numbers were preliminary; final results are expected to be reported at the end of the month.Over the last few years, the performance of Samsung has been roughly inverse to that of HTC, whose problems continue to deepen. Though HTC previously forecast a quarterly loss, the number reported on Friday was even bigger than analysts had expected. The company's flagship smartphone, the HTC One, has failed to catch on with high-end users, who have favored devices from Samsung and Apple.HTC's sales plunged to 47.1 billion Taiwan dollars in the third quarter from 70.2 billion dollars a year earlier.According to Gartner, a research firm, the company's share of the worldwide smartphone market fell to 2.6 percent; in 2010 and 2011, it flirted with double-digit percentages of market share.Horace Dediu, an independent telecommunications analyst in Helsinki, Finland, said it could be difficult for HTC to recover. When other phone makers posted their first quarterly losses, it was only a few years before their handset businesses were sold. Others got out of the phone business entirely.What Mr. Dediu referred to as the "post-traumatic life expectancy of phone vendors" has been shortening. Motorola lasted five years; Nokia and BlackBerry only two."Once you hit any bump in the road, you are essentially derailed," he said. "In the phone space, you hit one bad quarter and you are out."Only one major cellphone maker, LG of South Korea, has recovered from a deep crisis in its phone-making division, Mr. Dediu said. But LG's smartphone arm is just one part of a diversified conglomerate, like Samsung, helping it to ride out the dips.HTC has also suffered from internal discord, and a series of executives have quit the company in recent months. One of the company's top design executives, Thomas Chien, was arrested in August in connection with a police investigation of theft of trade secrets from HTC.Cher Wang, HTC's chairwoman, said in a recent interview that Mr. Chien, who could not be reached for comment, was trying to recruit HTC employees for a new company he was planning to form.She insisted that the executive departures would have no effect on the company's operations, saying that all of the HTC material that the employees were accused of taking had been recovered."In terms of technology, it's not going to affect us," Ms. Wang said. "It will not have any detrimental effect on us."The worse-than-expected results will put pressure on HTC to find a business partner, Mr. Dediu and other analysts said. There has been speculation that the company could link up with one of the growing Chinese companies looking to expand outside their home territory."The question is whether anyone in China needs them now," Mr. Dediu said.
TOKYO — In a widely watched decision, a court in Kyoto on Monday ordered a far-right group to pay $120,000 in damages to an elementary school for ethnic Koreans after the group staged demonstrations using slogans that the court characterized as racist.The ruling, by the Kyoto District Court, is one of the first court decisions in Japan to address a recent proliferation of street protests using hate speech against ethnic minorities, usually Koreans and Chinese. Most of the protests appear to have been organized by a vocal new group called the Zaitokukai, whose Web site says has almost 14,000 members.The Zaitokukai is the most extreme part of a new generation of ultranationalists known as the "Net right" because it uses the Internet to organize. While the group represents a tiny fringe in this otherwise law-abiding nation, its members have recently drawn attention for marches in Tokyo's ethnic Korean neighborhood of Okubo, during which they shouted anti-Korean slogans. In June, several marchers were arrested after a confrontation with counterprotesters turned into fistfights, a rare occurrence in usually peaceful Tokyo.While some Japanese have compared the Zaitokukai to the skinheads or neo-Nazis of the West, sociologists say its members lack the same sort of clear race-based ideology and usually draw the line at violence. Rather, they say, members tend to be young Japanese men who feel disenfranchised by such personal failures as an inability to get a stable corporate job and then take out their resulting frustration by blaming foreigners.In the Kyoto case, members of the Zaitokukai held protests outside the Kyoto No. 1 Korean Elementary School between December 2009 and March 2010 and called the students spies and cockroaches, school officials said. As the marchers shouted through bullhorns, parents rushed to block them from entering the school, and teachers led the children in songs to drown out the insults, school officials said.According to the suit filed by the school against members of the Zaitokukai, several children have since complained of stomach pains from anxiety and stress. In the suit, the school sought $300,000 in damages.Zaitokukai members said the group was protesting the school's unauthorized use of a neighboring city park for assemblies and other school activities. It also criticized the school for having a pro-North Korean stance, as many ethnic Korean schools in Japan do. This is a legacy of the years after the 1950-53 Korean War, when many ethnic Koreans in Japan felt obliged to take sides, and the socialist North was seen as more politically progressive than the then-authoritarian South.In his ruling, the court's presiding judge, Hitoshi Hashizume, said the group's actions were illegal because they constituted racial discrimination. In addition to having to pay damages, members of the Zaitokukai were ordered to stay more than 600 feet from the school, which has since merged with a similar school in Kyoto.
TOKYO — Cashmere sweaters at Uniqlo. Gourmet coffee and ice cream at 7-Eleven. These incongruously premium offerings by two of Japan's biggest mass retailers are part of a strategy to raise profit margins by enticing thrifty shoppers to splurge on little luxuries.Plans by Fast Retailing, the Uniqlo brand owner, and by Seven & I Holdings, which includes the 7-Eleven chain, to increase customer spending are being challenged, as Prime Minister Shinzo Abe's aggressive economic stimulus program for Japan has done little to loosen the purse strings of the country's traditionally frugal consumers.While Mr. Abe's policies have lifted the stock market and encouraged spending on luxury goods, overall retail sales have grown only tepidly since he was elected last year.A sales tax increase could also dent consumer spending once it takes effect in April. After luring customers through discounts and promotions, Fast Retailing and Seven & I hope to counter a further slowdown in spending through their value-for-money offerings."When it comes to day-to-day spending, people are still in penny-pinching mode," the president of Seven & I, Noritoshi Murata, said after the company reported a record operating profit for the first half of its accounting year. "We can't see any impact from Abenomics.""Japan has a lot of people with money to spend," he added. "If we make things of quality, of value, and at a reasonable price, we can breathe some life into the market."Uniqlo in Japan accounts for two-thirds of the sales and 80 percent of the profit of Fast Retailing, which is expected to report a record operating profit for the full year ended Aug. 31. But profit margins are likely to have been squeezed. Uniqlo, the company's biggest brand, had double-digit growth rates in sales and customer traffic in Japan during the second half, but spending per customer fell more than 5 percent.The cashmere V-necked sweaters and cardigans are aimed at changing this pattern. Priced at ¥5,990, or $62, and ¥7,990, respectively, the items are expensive by Uniqlo standards but come at a much lower price than luxury designer wear.Whether customers will buy, however, remains uncertain.Taketo Yamate, an analyst at Credit Suisse, said that shoppers accustomed to Uniqlo's discounts would be unwilling to pay more for premium items. "It's possible that the pricing policies will face bigger challenges than the market's optimism suggests," Mr. Yamate said. He forecast an 8 percent drop in Fast Retailing's operating profit in the current financial year.The success of Seven & I's premium brands may have encouraged Fast Retailing. Seven & I, the operator of Japan's biggest convenience store chain, sells luxury home-brand food and drinks made by companies like Meiji Holdings and Kirin Holdings.It has also rolled out "Seven Cafe," a freshly brewed coffee similar to the daily brew offered by Starbucks, that has increased sales of accompanying sandwiches and snacks.Seven & I estimates that sales of its private brand, Seven Premium, will account for more than 10 percent of total sales this year and will rise 50 percent over the next two years.Other retailers have also taken notice."The economy has improved, but wages haven't gone up," said Masato Nonaka, president of the low-price casual clothing chain Shimamura. "It's said that expensive goods are selling, but that's not fashion wear, it's luxury watches and such.""The preference for low-priced clothing isn't really fading, but there's a move towards buying slightly better things, so we'll add products that are one or two notches above low-priced goods," he added.
TOKYO — The operator of Japan's wrecked nuclear plant said Monday that a pump used to cool one of the damaged reactors had stopped, possibly because of human error, in the latest problem at the facility.The operator, the Tokyo Electric Power Company, or Tepco, said it was able to use a backup pump to restart cooling immediately on Monday morning.The stopped pump served the No. 1 unit, one of three reactors at the Fukushima Daiichi plant that were destroyed in March 2011 when a huge earthquake and tsunami knocked out cooling systems. The fuel cores in the overheating reactors melted down, causing violent explosions that destroyed the reactor buildings.The pump that halted on Monday was in a makeshift cooling system that dumps hundreds of tons of water daily onto the three damaged reactor cores. Tepco said the shutdown might have been due to a faulty electric switchboard, a problem that halted the cooling systems before.However, the Nuclear Regulation Authority, the government's nuclear watchdog, gave an alternate explanation in a news release, saying a worker might have accidentally shut down the main pump by hitting the stop button during a routine check.The incident is the latest in a string that has undermined public faith in the ability of Tepco to handle the plant's cleanup.
One of the last of the old-style circuits, a high-speed track with changes of elevation and just about every kind of corner, the Suzuka circuit where the Japanese Grand Prix runs on Sunday near Nagoya, in central Japan, is the favorite racetrack of most of the Formula One drivers.The 5.8-kilometer, or about 3.6-mile, figure-eight track has 18 corners, including the incredible Esses in the first sector, where the tires have lateral loads of 3g or more in every corner, while the fastest corner on the track is Turn 15, known as 130R, which is taken at 130 kilometers an hour and with a lateral load of 4g. The cars reach speeds of more than 300 k.p.h. at three spots on the lap.The race this year is the 25th to be held at Suzuka, where the Grand Prix has been run every year since 1987, except in 2007 and 2008, when it was moved to Fuji.But the same aspects of the track that make it a favorite for the drivers also make it one of the most challenging for car setup. The drivers, mechanics and engineers must find the best compromises for the car to work through the variety of conditions."This is a very challenging track layout for car setup and you need to find a good overall car balance," said Pastor Maldonado, a driver at the Williams team. "The tires need to be operating within the right temperatures and pressures, aero efficiency must be good, and mechanically you need to have the right setup. Without these elements coming together you feel a noticeable drop in performance and you can pay a high penalty in terms of lap time."Because of the track flow from corner to corner, however, the track has the lowest traction needs of any. The rough surface can create some problems for the tires, but more wear comes from the great variety of corner styles, and especially the high-speed ones. The corners generate a higher level of lateral energy in the tires than any other circuit, which puts a great deal of heat into the tires. There is no long straight to reduce that heat, so tires temperatures can reach up to 110 degrees Centigrade, or 230 degrees Fahrenheit.If the car is not set up correctly, the high stress can cause blistering of the tire rubber. Pirelli has provided the teams with its hardest tires for the race, the medium and hard compounds."It's a track that exposes any weakness in your car or setup," said Alan Permane, the track-side operations director for the Lotus team. "So we'll be working hard as always to get things spot on."Despite the track being high-speed, with some very fast corners, it requires high downforce settings. The front end of the car needs to be strong to avoid understeer, with particular attention to the front-wing setting to remove understeer through the long "Spoon" corner and to help with steering through the Esses. The rear wing is set for high downforce levels similar to those of Silverstone or Barcelona."Sector 1 is dominated by the level of downforce and fuel loads, while Sector 3 is dominated by drag," said Xevi Pujolar, the chief race engineer at the Williams team."The layout leads to high average corner speeds, second only to Silverstone, as well as high average overall speed and power sensitivity," he added.There are only two heavy braking areas, and much of the lap is spent cooling the brakes, which means that teams must work at keeping them warm.Because the track has virtually every kind of corner possible, the engine, like the tires, is put to the test."Engines need to deliver across the entire power spectrum without sacrificing driveability and responsiveness," said Rémi Taffin, the head of track operations for Renault. "The high-speed corners such as the Esses also subject the internals of the engine and lubricant systems to high lateral g-forces — it's a very thorough workout for the RS27, so we will use fresh engines here."But the drivers enjoy the track, both for the challenge and to show their talent."It's a track that really allows a driver to demonstrate his feel for the car," said Romain Grosjean, a driver at the Lotus team. "Not only is combination of corners pretty relentless — so you never really get a rest — but the way the layout flows together means that the smallest mistake can make a big difference to your time.""Get it right, and the feeling is amazing," he added. "Get it wrong, and you just want to keep trying again and again until you have it nailed."Or as Lewis Hamilton, the former world champion driver at the Mercedes team, put it, "Suzuka is one of the few circuits we have left in Formula One with the authenticity of a real old-school circuit.""If you touch the grass at any point, it's going to spin you off into the wall," he added. "So it's a much more demanding circuit in terms of precision, positioning and turning points for each corner. It's a real racetrack where you have to think ahead as a driver."
TOKYO — When SoftBank, the Japanese telecommunications provider, announced last week that it had agreed to buy a 51 percent stake in a Finnish mobile game company for $1.5 billion, many people in both industries reacted with disbelief.Suddenly Supercell, a three-year-old game developer in Helsinki with only 100 or so employees and two successful games, was worth $3 billion. The investment in Supercell, the developer of Hay Day and Clash of Clans, reflects the growing global ambitions of Asian companies like SoftBank in mobile gaming, the fastest-growing part of the game business.Japanese companies like Sony, Sega and Nintendo dominated the early days of the console era of video games. American companies like Electronic Arts were the driving force in the extension of console gaming to the PC. Now, even as Sony and its main console rival, Microsoft, prepare to sell their newest devices, the PlayStation 4 and the Xbox1, other companies in Japan and across Asia are positioning themselves to take a leading role in mobile games."Who has $1.5 billion to invest in a company like Supercell?" said Bertrand Schmitt, chief executive of App Annie, a mobile analytics firm based in Beijing. "There are not so many players in the West who could do this."Eight of the 10 biggest merger-and-acquisition transactions involving game companies this year have been initiated by buyers based in Asia, according to Digi-Capital, an investment bank that specializes in games. These include the Supercell deal, in which SoftBank was joined by a subsidiary, the Japanese game company GungHo. The list does not include the management buyout of Activision Blizzard, the world's biggest video game publisher, in which a Chinese Internet company, Tencent, took part.The growth of mobile gaming is upending the longstanding business model of the business, which was based on the sale of games — and the devices to play them. The new approach is to give away games away for smartphones and then to earn revenue from in-game purchases, advertising and other add-ons. While the so-called free-to-play model has spread to much of the rest of the world, it was mostly pioneered in Asia."If the U.S. and Europe are great conceptually, the leading Asian markets are masters of the science of making money from mobile," said Tim Merel, founder of Digi-Capital.In September, two Asian countries, Japan and South Korea, together accounted for a whopping 62 percent of worldwide revenue from games on the Google Play mobile app store, according to App Annie. The United States represented 15 percent of sales.Over all, Asia accounts for half of the revenue in the mobile game business, and this will grow to two-thirds in 2016, according to Digi-Capital.Asia's leadership in free mobile games is explained by a variety of factors. In 2000, China banned the sale of consoles, because violent video games were considered a corrupting influence on youth. Though the government recently moved to ease restrictions, many Chinese players have gotten used to alternative kinds of games.In Tokyo and other crowded Asian cities, mobile games make a convenient distraction during subway journeys. In Japan, rudimentary mobile games, offered by wireless operators like NTT DoCoMo, were already popular before smartphones and app stores arrived on the scene.So, while it is hard to imagine a mobile network operator in the United States or Europe following SoftBank's move, analysts said the investment might have made sense for that company, which also recently bought the United States cellphone operator Sprint for $21.6 billion."There's no way a Deutsche Telekom or a Verizon could spend $1.5 billion for half of a small game company in Finland," said Serkan Toto, an independent technology analyst in Tokyo. "Their shareholders would absolutely slaughter them."SoftBank shareholders did not. In fact, the stock price barely budged. But the dynamics of the mobile business are different in Japan.Though many of the recent mergers and acquisitions initiated by Asian buyers involve Asia-based targets, SoftBank's purchase of a controlling stake in Supercell is not the first deal for a Western mobile game company. In 2010, DeNA of Japan acquired Ngmoco, based in San Francisco. In 2012, Tencent took a sizable minority stake in Epic Games, based in North Carolina."All of the Asian players are trying to crack the Western market," said Will Luton, author of the book "Free 2 Play: Making Money From Games You Give Away" (New Riders, 2013), and a consultant based in Bristol, England.Not all of these deals worked out well. Last year, a Japanese social networking and gaming company, Gree, shut down OpenFeint, a mobile game platform, only a little more than a year after it had spent $104 million to buy it.Mr. Luton and others say Supercell and SoftBank might be a better fit. Supercell and GungHo — which was founded by Taizo Son, brother of the SoftBank founder, Masayoshi Son — will be able use each other's games to market their own creations in places where they have not had a strong presence. GungHo's biggest hit, Puzzle & Dragons, for example, is hugely popular in Asia but not as widely played in Europe. The companies, which have cooperated on promotions in the past, will now be able to deepen their ties.Even though the United States is a smaller mobile gaming market, adding Supercell could help SoftBank flesh out the appeal of Sprint, said Thomas Husson, an analyst at Forrester Research."The value of the acquisition goes beyond potential revenues in the mobile gaming sector," he said. "I think the rationale for SoftBank is that powerful gaming content will fuel its overall mobile Internet and app strategy and enable them to globalize some of their initiatives in the light of the Sprint acquisition."
Unless the typhoon season disrupts the schedule of the Nippon Series, Masahiro Tanaka will take the ball for the Pacific League's Tohoku Rakuten Golden Eagles in Game 1 on Saturday night, looking to continue one of the most remarkable runs by a pitcher in professional baseball, and doing it in a region desperate for positive events in the years after a devastating earthquake and tsunami.So far, nothing has been able to disrupt Tanaka, who finished the regular season 24-0 with a 1.27 earned run average and a save, then was 1-0 with a shutout and a save in the playoffs after Rakuten won its first Pacific League title. In the regular season, he faced 822 batters and gave up only six home runs. Even more impressive, his performance came in a season marked by a juiced-ball controversy: Wladimir Balentien of the Tokyo Yakult Swallows hit 60 home runs to shatter Sadaharu Oh's cherished record of 55 homers, set in 1964.Regardless of the issues surrounding the ball, Tanaka and Balentien combined to make this one of the most memorable seasons in Japanese baseball. While Balentien vacations at his home in Miami, Tanaka is still pitching, and major league scouts are still watching.Tanaka is expected to be the focus of an intense bidding war. Teams like the Yankees, the Red Sox, the Blue Jays, the Mariners, the Dodgers, the Rangers and the Angels are expected to submit posting bids with the hope of then negotiating a multiyear contract with him, perhaps exceeding the six-year, $56 million deal that Yu Darvish received two years ago.The old posting system, in which a player could negotiate only with the highest-bidding team, is in the process of being restructured to give the player more choices about which team he can play for. So far, Tanaka has not declared that he will ask to be posted after the Nippon Series, Japan's version of Major League Baseball's World Series, but many expect him to.One veteran scout in Japan, who asked not to be identified because he was not permitted to speak publicly about players, said that Tanaka's fastball ranged from 90 to 97 miles per hour and that his splitter and slider were exceptional, to both left-handed and right-handed batters.The scout noted that Tanaka, who will turn 25 on Nov. 1, had the ability, like many of the best pitchers, to "dial it up" in critical situations. The fastball gets a little extra jump and the split-finger fastball additional bite.The command on his curveball and changeup are average, the scout said, and Tanaka faced the ace of the opposing team only four times this season. But who is quibbling?"He won't go 24-0 in M.L.B.," another player evaluator said. "But he is a talent."While Tanaka set records from the mound by becoming only the fourth pitcher in Japan to go undefeated while still throwing enough innings to qualify for pitching titles — he is the only one to do it with more than 15 wins — Balentien made his mark with his bat. Along with his record-setting homers, he batted .330.In a departure from previous years, when opposing pitchers either were ordered not to pitch to foreign-born players on the verge of breaking Oh's record or refused to do it on their own, Balentien saw enough strikes to break the record.But he was still walked 103 times in 547 plate appearances. "I think at times he was a little frustrated," said his agent, Yoshi Hasegawa. "But then the fans made it clear they wanted to see him hit home runs, and that made an impact, and he was able to do it."Hasegawa said Balentien, who played for the Seattle Mariners and the Cincinnati Reds before going to Japan, is signed for three more years and is reveling in the experience. But when his contract expires, he will be 32 and may try to return to M.L.B."Maybe in the end, he will come back," Hasegawa said. "He's still young, and that is a long-term dream of his."Balentien's march into history was mostly celebrated in Japan, a clear indication that times have changed. According to Jim Small, Major League Baseball's vice president for Asia, the success of Japanese players in the United States, combined with the popularity in Japan of the World Baseball Classic, has brought a more open, international approach to their game, and Balentien, who is from Curaçao, was generally embraced for his feat."I think there was genuine excitement and happiness here (at least from Swallows fans) to see him break the record," Small wrote in an e-mail. "Japan has changed a lot in the last 10 years."Small, who has lived in Japan for 10 years, also said the success Tanaka had brought to Rakuten was measured in more than just his unblemished record. Rakuten plays in Sendai, a city devastated by the 2011 earthquake and tsunami, which damaged the team's stadium. The area has not recovered fully, but its underdog team, led by Tanaka, is looking to overthrow the popular and mighty Yomiuri Giants of the Central League in the Nippon Series."You have to put what he did in context because of what that team did," Small said in the e-mail. "It was their first league title and has absolutely galvanized that region. Tens of thousands of people are still in shelters and more than 100,000 had to leave the area to find work elsewhere. It is a seriously depressed area. Tanaka and the Eagles have given people there so much to be happy about. It is truly amazing."
TOKYO — An earthquake with a magnitude of 7.1 struck off the coast of Fukushima early Saturday, triggering tsunami and evacuation advisories for a wide swath of Japan's Pacific coast, but recorded waves were far smaller than the destructive tsunami that hit the region in 2011. The Tokyo Electric Power Company, which operates the Fukushima Daiichi nuclear plant, crippled by the 2011 tsunami, said that it had temporarily pulled workers back from the waterfront to a fortified building at the plant but that there were no immediate signs of fresh damage.The quake struck around 2:10 a.m. local time about 200 miles off the coast, rattling much of eastern Japan. About 40 minutes later, tsunami waves measuring up to 1.3 feet hit the coasts of Fukushima, Miyagi and Iwate, according to Japan's Meteorological Agency. No major injuries or damage from either the quake or tsunami was reported.A magnitude 9.0 quake in March 2011 triggered tsunami waves as high as 32 feet, and the water reached four times that height as it raced up mountainsides. Almost 20,000 people died.The tsunami also caused meltdowns at three of the six reactors at the Fukushima Daiichi plant, prompting more than 100,000 people to flee their homes. Recent storms have threatened efforts to contain contaminated water at the site, where a cleanup that has been plagued by problems continues. Workers were bracing Saturday for more rain from twin typhoons off the coast.
NAGOYA, Japan — Kohei Nawa stepped into a dark room on a recent day here to survey the white mountains that form his new installation, "Foam."Something had gone awry with the pumps that generate the froth, transforming this bowling-alley-turned-gallery into a scene from a sci-fi film. But the billowing shapes were getting out of hand: one foamy peak mushroomed and hit the ceiling, creating a column of lather, massive and transient. Mr. Nawa frowned."We need to fix this," he said. "It's out of control."This unruly installation marks a new direction for Mr. Nawa, the 38-year-old artist whose meticulously-planned sculptures and slick installations have made him one of Japan's most sought-after artists.His signature works to date have featured a series of taxidermied deer and other objects adorned with beads of crystal glass. To create them, Mr. Nawa painstakingly maps out where to place each sphere, studying how each reflects and distorts the textures of the deer's coat. ("There is no arbitrariness to this method," he notes in a catalog for his largest exhibit to date, "Synthesis," at the Museum of Contemporary Art Tokyo in 2011.)Represented by Scai the Bathhouse, one of Tokyo's top galleries, he has become a creative force here, his projects spilling over into the realms of architecture, fashion and retail. His "PixCell-Deer#24" is part of the Metropolitan Museum of Art's permanent collection.But "Foam," the recent headlining installation at Nagoya city's Aichi Triennale, was particularly tricky to pull off. "Did you know foam behaves differently depending on the temperature and humidity?" he asked, his voice tinged with amusement and exasperation. Still, he is in talks with overseas galleries for a possible permanent installation.Mr. Nawa is part of a new generation of artists whose work is helping to bring a more nuanced view of Japanese art and popular culture overseas, one that moves beyond the cultural stereotypes of candy-cute manga and anime. Mr. Nawa professes to having "almost zero interest" in either genre; two years ago, he took part in a group exhibition at the Japan Society Gallery in New York called, "Bye Bye Kitty!!!" — a rejection of Japan's cult of cute, as symbolized by Sanrio's bubble-headed Hello Kitty.To Mr. Nawa, that era is long gone. "Maybe there was a time when artists benefited from, or used Japanese stereotypes in their work," he said. "But I think my generation no longer feels the need to identify with, or try to represent, Japan."Instead, it is through Mr. Nawa's melding of 3-D modeling, traditional craftsmanship and almost industrial-scale production that he exudes a sense of what has come to define Asia: a love of the newest technology, paired with a deep reverence for the possibilities of manufacturing. Mr. Nawa worked for close to three years to craft "Manifold," a hulking 13-meter-, or 43-foot-tall steel and aluminum monstrosity of spheres and pipes, whose two hundred parts were cut, welded, cast and assembled in workshops in China, South Korea and Japan.Born just outside the ancient capital of Kyoto in 1975 as the youngest of three children to schoolteacher parents, Mr. Nawa studied at the Kyoto City University of Art, and counts the art of Buddhism and Japan's native Shintoism as among his early influences. In 1998, Mr. Nawa studied at the Royal College of Art in London, where he was drawn to sculptors like Antony Gormley and his depictions of the human body.Mr. Nawa soon found inspiration in life's tiniest building blocks. A central concept in his work is what he calls the "PixCell," a portmanteau word that combines the idea of a cell with that of a pixel, the smallest unit of a digital image. By covering the surface of a taxidermied deer with glass beads, he says, he is "PixCellizing" it. It is his take, he says, on our obsession with viewing and filtering the world through pixels — on digital cameras, on our smartphones, online — which at once distorts and illuminates the world we live in.
TOKYO — After tantalizing investors with signs of a financial turnaround in the spring, Sony said on Thursday that it swung back to a loss in its summer quarter as strong sales of smartphones were not enough to overcome a dismal performance by the company's Hollywood arm.Sony cited the box office flop of the movie "White House Down" as a crucial reason for the weakness in the studio division, which also struggled with an unfavorable comparison against the comparable period a year earlier, when sales were lifted by "The Amazing Spider-Man."The problems in Sony's movie unit contributed to a net loss of 19.3 billion yen, or $197 million, in the most recent quarter, which ended Sept. 30. A year earlier, Sony posted a loss of 15.5 billion yen.While Sony was expected to post weak results in the most recent period, the company surprised analysts by downgrading its outlook for the full fiscal year, which ends in the spring. The company said it now expected operating earnings of ¥170 billion, down from a previous forecast of ¥230 billion.Adding to the company's woes, Sony reported weaker-than-expected sales of televisions, raising concerns that the electronics division would continue to drag down results even if the movie business, which is more volatile, bounces back. That prompted a sharp sell-off in the company's stock on Friday morning in Tokyo, where shares were down more than 10 percent at one point.Atul Goyal, an analyst at Jefferies, said Sony ought to borrow a page from the playbook of another Japanese electronics company, Panasonic, which this week raised the forecast for its annual operating profit after getting out of most consumer electronics businesses and focusing on selling to other companies instead.For Sony, "their electronics business is in a death spiral and the value is in an exit," said Mr. Goyal, who downgraded his recommendation on the stock from buy to hold.Investors have been looking for an increase in sales from the Sony PlayStation 4 game console, which is scheduled to go on sale in the United States and Europe this month."This set of results does remind that Sony without the PS4 or Xperia smartphones is still faced with a difficult situation profitwise," said Damian Thong, an analyst at Macquarie Capital Securities.In Sony's fiscal first quarter, which ended June 30, the company surprised investors on the upside, as strong sales of smartphones bolstered its results. The mobile division did well in the most recent quarter, too, showing a sales increase of 39 percent, helped by the weakness of the yen.But the motion picture division did poorly. The company was also hurt by lower revenue from television licensing and home entertainment businesses.Sony's Hollywood division has been the focus of Daniel Loeb, an investor whose hedge fund company, Third Point, owns a 6.5 percent stake in Sony. Mr. Loeb, in a letter to Sony management in May, complained about what he described as lax financial controls at Sony Pictures.Sony's board has rejected Mr. Loeb's proposal for a partial spinoff of the company's entertainment arm. Sony has scheduled a Sony Entertainment investor day for Nov. 21 at the studio's headquarters in Culver City, Calif., following up on a commitment to Mr. Loeb by Kazuo Hirai, the Sony chief executive, for more transparency about the unit's operations.Before the recent downturn in the entertainment division's results, investors focused their attention on the electronics business. The weakness in electronics persisted in the most recent quarter, when television sales were weaker than expected. While a weak yen has generally helped Sony, the company said a recent decline in the value of some developing countries' currencies had, in turn, contributed to the weakness in TVs.Mr. Hirai has made a turnaround in electronics a priority since he became chief executive last year, with smartphones featuring prominently in his plans. A new model, the Xperia X1, "has caused quite a stir globally," Yoshinori Hashitani, vice president of investor relations, said in a conference call.In the most recent quarter, Sony posted overall sales of ¥1.78 trillion, up from ¥1.6 trillion a year earlier, but the results were helped by the weakness of the yen, which increases the value of repatriated earnings from exports. In constant currency terms, sales fell 9 percent from a year earlier, Sony said.
One day after he threw 160 pitches in a complete-game loss in Game 6 of the Japan Series on Saturday, Masahiro Tanaka went back to the mound and threw 15 more pitches to get the save in Game 7.Tanaka, who could be the top free agent on the Major League Baseball market if he elects to leave Japan, faced five batters in the ninth inning as the Rakuten Eagles defeated the Yomiuri Giants, 3-0, on Sunday. But the 175 pitches over two days could raise alarms for some of the major league teams interested in signing him.According to a scout who watched Tanaka pitch in the Japan Series but who asked not to be identified because he was not authorized to speak publicly about him, the volume of pitches is of some concern."I am worried about his arm," the scout said.Major league teams prefer to keep their pitchers on strict pitch counts and would most likely not allow someone to throw 160 pitches, and certainly not allow them to throw again the next day, for fear of injury. Japanese pitchers often throw significantly more pitches than their major league counterparts.The scout said Tanaka, who gave up two hits and struck out two on Sunday, was throwing between 92 and 94 miles per hour, slightly lower than his usual velocity, which ranges from 90 to 96 m.p.h. His pitches were, perhaps predictably, up in the strike zone.In Japan, it is considered an honor for the No. 1 pitcher to be on the mound for the final out, and Rakuten's manager, Senichi Hoshino, especially wanted Tanaka to have the privilege after his record-setting season. Tanaka went 24-0 in the regular season with a 1.27 earned run average and won 30 consecutive starts dating to August 2012.Several American teams, including the Yankees, the Boston Red Sox, the Los Angeles Dodgers, the Chicago Cubs, the Los Angeles Angels and the Texas Rangers, have been scouting Tanaka closely and are expected to bid heavily if the Eagles post him, as many expect they will.The 160-pitch effort probably would not dissuade teams from bidding on Tanaka, who turned 25 on Friday. Throwing 15 pitches the next day could lead whatever team wins the posting bid to ask for a medical exam.The Eagles' championship, their first, was celebrated in Sendai and the Tohoku region, which is still suffering from the earthquake and tsunami that devastated the area on March 11, 2011.
TOKYO — Secrecy has served Samsung Electronics well. Keeping its rivals guessing has helped Samsung, the South Korean technology giant, build a formidable lead in the smartphone industry, where it now sells more than one in three handsets worldwide.This summer, however, Samsung suffered from an unusual loss of confidence among investors — caused partly by uncertainty over its strategy. Investors question what it intends to do with the $50 billion it has built up by selling all of those Galaxy S4's and Note 3's, and the chips in them. From early June through mid-July, Samsung's stock lost about one-fifth of its value.Foremost in many investors' minds is the future of the smartphone business, which provides about two-thirds of Samsung's earnings.The summer sell-off was also caused by concerns that smartphones were about to become commoditized, widely available and interchangeable. As differences in design and technology become less pronounced, companies like Samsung and its archrival, Apple, might lose their ability to charge a premium for high-end models, which now provide most of the profit in the industry.Though the share price has recovered, Samsung is trying to address lingering doubts. It has invited 350 analysts and institutional investors to a Seoul hotel on Wednesday for a rare gathering with the company's top management. While other big technology companies routinely hold such analyst days, it is Samsung's first since 2005, and only the second in its history."In the past, they thought it was enough just to have rising earnings," said Byun Han-joon, an analyst in Seoul for KB Investment and Securities. "Now they realize they need to be more investor-friendly."Company officials, including the chief executive, Kwon Oh-hyun, are scheduled to take to the stage in Dynasty Hall at the Shilla Seoul hotel — owned by another company in the Samsung industrial group — for a day of presentations of a variety of subjects, including Samsung's financial situation and the outlook for mobile phones, memory chips, display screens and other products."It will be a great chance to give investors better understanding on Samsung and to discuss its latest strategy and vision for 2020," the company said in a statement.After Samsung reassured shareholders with two strong quarterly financial reports, its stock price rebounded and is back near its highest levels. While smartphones remain highly profitable, the company also is benefiting from a recent surge in the price of memory chips.Samsung is the biggest maker of memory chips, accounting for about one-third of global output. It also makes display screens and other major components of smartphones. This separates it from Apple, which outsources the purchase of smartphone parts and their assembly, and other phone makers that have fallen on hard times, including BlackBerry, Nokia and HTC."There is still a perception gap around the Samsung model and how they can keep making money while all the others are crashing down," said Sundeep Bajikar, an analyst at Jefferies, a brokerage firm, who is based in San Francisco.Many analysts say that, rather than crashing, Samsung will continue to make a lot of money, with semiconductors contributing a growing share of earnings. Now investors want to know what Samsung intends to do with all that cash.Mark Newman, an analyst in Hong Kong for Sanford C. Bernstein, predicts that Samsung's cash pile will soar to $77 billion next year and $160 billion in 2017. Apple, by comparison, has $147 billion in cash.Yet Samsung investors have seen little of it. The percentage of net income the company has paid out in dividends or stock buybacks fell to 5 percent last year from 50 percent in 2004, Mr. Newman wrote in a note to investors.He said that is one reason the company's stock price has lagged. Despite the recent rebound, Samsung trades at a significant discount to Apple, in price-to-earnings ratios. It has less than half the market value of Apple, despite higher revenue."The company needs to either return cash or convince investors of the next profit driver after memory — preferably both," Mr. Newman said.Others say it would be smarter for Samsung to invest its money in semiconductors, a highly capital-intensive business, and in other potential growth areas."I think their dollars or won are best invested in disrupting their competition," Mr. Bajikar said."Samsung will continue to look for ways to be more open to shareholders," the company said in its statement about analyst day.
TOKYO — From the moment in September when Tokyo won the tight race to host the 2020 Summer Olympics, locals have been unleashing ideas — some far-fetched, others tantalizingly imaginable — of what the city will offer the more than 10 million spectators expected to attend the Games.Self-driving cars are a given, auto enthusiasts say, perhaps reserved to whiz V.I.P.'s on designated lanes through the traffic-choked capital. To help hoi polloi navigate the city, buses powered by fuel cells will be commonplace, the futurists say. Older people in the graying country might wear robot suits to get around. Next-generation translation services, streamed through wearable technology, will help locals communicate with foreign guests. And perhaps there will be some climate engineering to ease the heat and wretched humidity of the Tokyo summer.But there are also worries about the future. Tokyo, with 13 million people, is one of the world's most disaster-prone cities — earthquakes, typhoons, tsunamis and storm surges. Experts worry about the effects shifting weather patterns will have on the Tokyo Bay section where many of its new Olympics venues will be built."There's no city in the world like Tokyo," said Hiroyuki Hayashi, a spokesman for the government's "FutureCity" initiative, which was introduced in 2010 to explore future approaches to urbanization. "It leads in both possibilities and challenges."Tokyo fancies itself a city of the future. A similar theme resonated the last time it hosted the Summer Olympics in 1964. It had climbed out of the ashes of World War II and was presenting a shining new image to the world with multiple subway lines, a modern airport and its bullet train system, then the fastest in the world. The country demonstrated its emergence as a technological leader by broadcasting the Olympics live by satellite for the first time.This time, Japan wants to show a vibrant country, re-emerging from the pain of decades of recession to reclaim its position as a driving force in high technology.For Hisashi Taniguchi, chief executive of the Tokyo-based robotics company ZMP, the Olympics will be the catalyst Japan needs to leap ahead of other countries in building driverless cars. Google and BMW are also working on autonomous car technology, which experts say is safer and cleaner and leads to fewer traffic jams because of computer-controlled efficient driving. Although big Japanese automakers like Nissan, Toyota and Honda are also working on the same technology, as are smaller Japanese companies like ZMP, the technology has not yet been showcased by a Japanese carmaker in any major way.The Olympic Games would bring heavy traffic on well-defined routes like those from the athletes' village to Olympic venues on Tokyo's waterfront. A fleet of 100 or more self-driving cars and vans could shuttle athletes and V.I.P.'s, Mr. Taniguchi said, and would be easier to place in the Tokyo waterfront's wide roads than in the congested center of the city."With such a well-defined target, driverless cars seem a lot more realistic," Mr. Taniguchi said. His RoboCar uses laser range finders, infrared distance sensors and image processing to spot obstacles and maneuver its way through traffic.The risk is that while the technology might be ready in seven years, regulators in Japan are not known for acting quickly. Tokyo officials will not definitively rule out the driverless car idea, though they point to a list of regulatory hurdles before the technology is allowed.The country wants to showcase other transportation technology, too. Hino Motors, together with its parent company, Toyota Motor, plans to release a new fuel cell-powered bus in 2016 that reduces greenhouse emissions. And while the Japanese do not expect to be riding the nation's magnetically levitating train that zooms at 300 miles an hour until 2027, government officials have suggested that the operator make at least part of the line available to visitors to the Games.Tokyo has also promised the Games will be green, or at least carbon-neutral with efficient natural-gas turbine power stations and solar parks across the country.Then, of course, this being Japan, there are the gadgets.Takahito Iguchi, founder of Telepathy, a start-up, envisions a Games where visitors could constantly live-stream what they see with wearable devices like the company's Telepathy One headset, which floats a microprojector and camera in front of one eye. The first version is expected this year, giving it time to catch on.NTT DoCoMo, Japan's largest cellphone carrier, has introduced "instant translation" glasses that use cameras, text recognition technology and translation software to render Japanese signs, menus and whatever else its wearers see into the visitors' language. The company also plans to have its cellphone service ready to process data 100 times faster than current networks.The futurists also envision wireless charging stations everywhere, flexible displays that will turn a variety of surfaces into information hubs and television featuring "super hi-vision" that is 16 times the level of detail of current high-definition TVs."Japan still has great technology, and the Olympics gives people like us license to suggest wild ideas," Mr. Iguchi said.For some living in Tokyo, preparation for the Games is less about chasing utopian dreams and more about addressing the grave challenges the city faces. For all the talk of renewable energy, the nuclear crisis at Fukushima, 160 miles north of Tokyo, is not yet under control. There is a big question mark over Japan's future energy policy. Much of the city's newest developments are centered on the vulnerable coast.Tokyo must spend the next seven years retrofitting its older buildings with Japan's advanced earthquake technology, strengthening the city's flood gates and updating its aging expressways, experts say. Tokyo could show the way forward in urban renewal, too. It recently used advanced "stealth demolition" technology — jacking down a building rather than blowing it up — to raze an old skyscraper in central Tokyo.The aging population is also a challenge for Japan. Though the Olympic committee promotes Tokyo as a center for youth culture, one in five Tokyoites are already 65 or older, and the government estimates that ratio will rise to one in four by the time the Olympic torch arrives. Current forecasts suggest that demographically, 2020 could be Tokyo's last hurrah; after that, the city's population could enter a long decline.The robot maker Cyberdyne thinks its robotic suits will help older Japanese and visitors get around during the games. Its Hybrid Assistive Limb is a battery-powered pair of legs that anticipates and augments body movements. Since 2010, the company has leased about 400 suits to 170 hospitals and nursing homes in Japan.Some Tokyoites are concerned that the city's remaking will go too far. The redevelopment of some of Tokyo's most beloved neighborhoods is already underway, including the relocation of Tokyo's Tsukiji Fish Market. Some question whether the city of 13 million really needs an expensive new 80,000-seat Olympic Stadium — wildly futuristic in design as it is — when its population is expected to shrink.Christian Dimmer, an urban designer and assistant professor at Tokyo University, said that if Tokyo's population was declining, it could ill afford the white elephants that have come to haunt previous Olympic hosts."It's important to understand that the Games are a means to achieve a more resilient, self-reliant society and not as an end in itself," he said. "That would be a terrible waste of resources."
NAGASAKI, Japan — Keiichi Mushiake slowly pushes back the red velvet curtains of a brand new viewing hallway in a fisheries research lab near Nagasaki, to reveal, behind a plate glass window, a dimly lit round pool. Sleek, dark, shadowy objects are darting in circles around the emerald green waters.There are 48 fish in the pool, averaging 110 centimeters, or 3.6 feet, in length and 18 kilograms, or 40 pounds, in weight. A similar pool nearby holds an additional 41.Security is tight at the tuna aquaculture research center, opened in 2011 at the Seikai National Fisheries Research Institute here. Access to the tank area is strictly limited. Signs inside and outside the viewing hall forbid photography."We're trying to protect our technology," said Mr. Mushiake, the institute's director.The center is part of an intensive effort to develop bluefin tuna farming on an industrial scale — an effort which pits sushi-loving Japan in fierce competition with South Korea, Australia and Spain.The research center's two pools, measuring about 20 meters, or 65 feet, across, and six meters, or 20 feet, deep, are the first in the world built on land for the specific purpose of harvesting fertilized Pacific bluefin tuna eggs.Built with 2.1 billion yen, or $21.2 million, provided by the Japanese Fisheries Agency, the pools started operating in May, with an estimated annual operating budget of ¥70 million to ¥100 million, Mr. Mushiake said."We're trying to keep kuro-maguro available" while reducing and ultimately phasing out the catch of wild fish, said Mr Mushiake, using the Japanese name for Pacific bluefin.Of all the types of tuna, Pacific bluefin is the most prized in Japan. According to government figures, Japanese consume 70 percent of the world's annual Pacific bluefin tuna catch, or about 21,000 tons last year, mostly as sushi or sashimi.The global value of the market is unclear, but the average price of a whole wild bluefin tuna is $40 to $50 per kilogram, while the price for farmed fish ranges from $12 to $30 per kilo, according to a 2007 report by the U.N. Food and Agriculture Organization.The price depends on the quality of the fish, the way it is caught and the season it is caught — winter being best — said Shigeru Miyashita, director of the fisheries laboratory at the Wakayama campus of Kinki University, who likened it to another favored Japanese delicacy, high-quality Kobe beef.With global environmental protection treaties such as the Convention on International Trade in Endangered Species leaning toward listing Pacific bluefin tuna as an endangered species, finding a better way to farm the fish has become of national importance.The farming of Pacific bluefin is not new. Japan has 140 established farms, including 60 in the Nagasaki area alone, growing the fish from age three months to adulthood.The scale of production, however, has always been limited by the supply of fingerlings. Pacific bluefin are highly sensitive to their environment: Getting them to spawn in a completely artificial environment has never been achieved — and when they do spawn the loss rate of fertilized eggs is extremely high.This is the problem that the Nagasaki research center, and a sister facility on Amami-Oshima Island in Kagoshima Prefecture — which has been working on Pacific bluefin research since 1995 — are trying to solve.The challenges are multiple and complex. For starters, the fish are sensitive to harsh weather."In years where there are many typhoons, we've seen cases where farmed kuro-maguro do not spawn," Mr. Mushiake said.In addition, the skin of Pacific bluefin is delicate and human contact can be fatal, he said; the farmed fish are susceptible to viral diseases such as iridoviruses, which can damage their spleen; at an early stage of their development they are prone to devour any food in reach, including one another; and if they are disturbed by external factors, such as loud noises, they have a tendency to go into a potentially fatal hyperactive "speed burst," in which they may swim into the pool walls and break their own necks.
For a look at what climate change could do to the world's food supply, consider what the weather did to the American Corn Belt last year.At the beginning of 2012, the Agriculture Department projected the largest corn crop in the country's history. But then a savage heat wave and drought struck over the summer. Plants withered, prices spiked, and the final harvest came in 27 percent below the forecast.The situation bore a striking resemblance to what happened in Europe in 2003, after a heat wave cut agricultural production for some crops by as much as 30 percent and sent prices soaring.Several researchers concluded that the European heat wave was made more likely by human-caused climate change; scientists are still arguing over the 2012 heat blast in the United States. Whatever their origin, heat waves like these give us a taste of what could be in store in a future with global warming.Among those who are getting nervous are the people who spend their lives thinking about where our food will come from."The negative impacts of global climate change on agriculture are only expected to get worse," said a report earlier this year from researchers at the London School of Economics and a Washington think tank, the Information Technology and & Innovation Foundation. The report cited a need for "more resilient crops and agricultural production systems than we currently possess in today's world."This may be the greatest single fear about global warming: that climate change could so destabilize the world's food system as to lead to rising hunger or even mass starvation. Two weeks ago, a leaked draft of a report by the United Nations climate committee, known as the Intergovernmental Panel on Climate Change, suggested that the group's concerns have grown, and that the report, scheduled for release in March in Yokohama, Japan, is likely to contain a sharp warning about risks to the food supply.The tone is strikingly different from that of a report from the same group in 2007, which discussed some risks, but saw global warming as likely to benefit agriculture in many important growing regions.In the years since, new scientific research has checked those assumptions.For one, a group of young scientists has pioneered more sophisticated ways of analyzing the relationship between agriculture and climate. People like David Lobell at Stanford and Wolfram Schlenker at Columbia have used elaborate statistical techniques to get a detailed picture of what heat does to crop yields. Their work suggests that rising heat stress in some major growing areas is already putting a drag on production, and raises the possibility of much more serious effects as global warming continues.Scientists had long hoped that the effect of heat and water stress on crops might be offset by the very thing driving global warming: the sharp increase of carbon dioxide in the air. The gas is the main food supply for plants, and a large body of evidence suggested that the ongoing rise could boost crop yields.But a lot of that evidence came from tests in artificial environments like greenhouses. Younger scientists, who insisted on testing crops in open-air conditions more closely resembling the real world, found that the bump in yield, while certainly real, was not as high as expected. And it may not be high enough to offset other stresses from global warming.None of this work can be called definitive — experts say we need more studies, in more types of crops, under a wider variety of growing conditions. Because the body of science is so incomplete, our forecasts of future food supply are primitive, and that means the Yokohama report will certainly not be the last word.The scientists writing the intergovernmental panel's report appear to have taken the recent science seriously. The draft suggests they intend to serve notice on world leaders that the risks could be substantial.Those political leaders have tended to take the security of the food supply for granted, until a crisis hits.The biggest food scare of this young century occurred in 2007 and 2008. Several years of lagging agricultural production, caused in part by weather extremes, collided with rising demand. Prices for major grains more than doubled, entire countries slammed the door on food exports, panic buying ensued in many markets, and food riots broke out in more than 30 countries.Rich countries tripped over one another to help poor countries and their small farmers, pledging $22 billion. But a recent report by the Group of 8 industrialized nations found that only 74 percent of the money has been disbursed, and some aid groups say the food supply is once again falling on the world's priority list.The good news is that agriculture has a tremendous capacity to adapt to new conditions, including a warming climate. Crops can be planted earlier, and new varieties that are more resistant to climate stress can be developed.But experts say the research needed to make all this happen is getting short shrift."Our past successes in agriculture have lulled many of those in decision-making positions into a false sense of security," said L. Val Giddings, a fellow with the Washington think tank and a co-author of its report. "It's been so long since any of them were actually hungry."CLIMATE UPDATE In its report in September on the physical science of climate change, the intergovernmental panel had embraced the idea of a global carbon budget, limiting emissions to no more than a trillion tons of carbon — a limit that will be approached within a few decades. On Monday, the panel issued several corrections to its calculations, as it often does with reports undergoing final review.The most important change is that human emissions of carbon from 1870 to 2011 are now calculated at about 515 billion tons, instead of 531 billion tons. The new figure does not alter the panel's argument that more than half the carbon budget has already been exhausted, but it does create slightly more room for future emissions.
The documentary filmmaker Amir Bar-Lev has made features about the fog of war and the follies of the fine art world, but he had always wanted to make a movie about a music scene. Last year he was given that chance and then some.In December, Mr. Bar-Lev was one of two film directors invited to oversee coverage of "12-12-12: The Concert for Sandy Relief," a sprawling, six-hour event for which a who's who of rock and pop performers gathered at Madison Square Garden to raise money for victims of Hurricane Sandy.Organized by the media moguls Harvey Weinstein, James L. Dolan and John Sykes, the concert brought together artists like Paul McCartney, Bruce Springsteen, Alicia Keys and Kanye West, and raised more than $50 million in a single night for the Robin Hood Foundation's Hurricane Sandy relief fund.Nearly a year later, a nonfiction feature about that event, also called "12-12-12" and directed by Mr. Bar-Lev and Charlie Lightening, recalls the rapid efforts that led to the concert's creation, and the backstage maneuverings and occasionally productive chaos that yielded some memorable musical moments.Though New Yorkers and their neighbors may share a reputation for stubbornness, Mr. Bar-Lev said in an interview, "it was a night that not only belied the notion that we are self-interested and self-absorbed," but also showed that "it's a great place to be in a disaster."Arriving at the Ziegfeld Theater in Midtown Manhattan on Friday evening for a gala premiere of "12-12-12," the filmmaker and some of the musicians who participated in the concert recalled how they had been recruited.Mr. Bar-Lev, whose documentaries include "The Tillman Story" and "My Kid Could Paint That," said that he was approached by Mr. Weinstein to film the concert about 10 days before the event, and that he had to hustle to find other directors and cinematographers who would fan out across the arena to record the concert. (Mr. Bar-Lev said there were 23 cameras in total, including those used in the live television broadcast.)When he and his squad went to work, Mr. Bar-Lev made an unexpected discovery: "There was another crew trying to make the same film," he said. "Paul McCartney had his own team, and we started glowering at each other in the first days of shooting, and that tension built and built."This initially strained relationship with Mr. McCartney's film crew, led by Mr. Lightening, boiled over into "a real finger-pointing, passionate argument," Mr. Bar-Lev said, and then "a hug, ensued, literally, and we decided to make the same film."Mr. Bar-Lev said he realized: "This is the Beatles. I don't want to get in an argument with these guys."Speaking from Osaka, Japan, by phone, Mr. Lightening affirmed Mr. Bar-Lev's account of the events "100 percent," adding that though there were "a few frictions at the beginning, in the long run I think it's all worked out for the best."Mr. Lightening, who has been filming Mr. McCartney on tour since 2008, said that he and Mr. Bar-Lev were "the perfect yin and yang.""He filled in things that I was missing, and vice versa," Mr. Lightening said. "You think about how many egos were in that building, and all of them got left at the door."Mr. Weinstein said in a telephone interview that the tensions between the directors had been productive, enabling them to capture candid behind-the-scenes moments like Mr. McCartney singing the theme song from "The Monkees," or Eric E. Schmidt, the executive chairman of Google, offering personal tech support when a donation website for the concert becomes overwhelmed by high traffic."The idea was not to get the manufactured stuff, but to go in there and capture these moments that, God knows, you don't even want people to see, but they're funny," Mr. Weinstein said."Eric Schmidt, he should pay us to be in this movie," he added. "The guy is the biggest rock star in America."Ms. Keys, a native New Yorker, said that her home had lost power and heat after Hurricane Sandy swept through the region at the end of October 2012, and that she knew other people who had been displaced by the storm.As a composer and performer of the song "Empire State of Mind," a pop anthem about the resilience of New York, and its sequel, "Empire State of Mind (Part II) Broken Down," Ms. Keys said it was only right that she participate in an effort to help rebuild it."I already feel an obligation to my city, because this is where I grew up, where I learned all my lessons," she said. "I am responsible to the city."Roger Waters, a former member of Pink Floyd and a solo artist, took it as a point of pride that he had been asked to play at "12-12-12," having been absent from other historical benefits like Live Aid and the Concert for New York City, which followed the Sept. 11 attacks."In the last three years, I've gone from not being asked to being asked," Mr. Waters said. "There's a pecking order in these things."Mr. Waters, whose "12-12-12" set included a duet with the Pearl Jam frontman Eddie Vedder on the Pink Floyd song "Comfortably Numb," said that he had chosen songs from his catalog that he believed audiences would most easily recognize."The concert is going to go on for longer than most infants live in the third world, so you've got to keep it short and just do greatest hits," he said. "Certainly, the first 100 rows is a bunch of rich people who probably don't care about music anyway. All you can do is keep it short and concise, and try and be as entertaining as possible."What he learned from the "12-12-12" experience, Mr. Bar-Lev said, was that as a director, "you have to have an idea for a story, but you can't be intrusive and you have to be very open to what's being presented to you — it's improvising."Perhaps that is why, Mr. Bar-Lev said, he next wants to make a documentary about the Grateful Dead.
TOKYO — Like many professional photographers, Irwin Wong, who shoots pictures for Japanese magazines, relies on digital single-lens reflex cameras for the bulk of his work — "bulk" being the operative word."It's a beastly camera to carry around," Mr. Wong said of his Nikon D800, which weighs 2.2 pounds, and a whole lot more when used in combination with a selection of interchangeable lenses. "You can't replace a DSLR for work. But it's just not that much fun."To lighten his load, and to inject a bit of levity into his photography, Mr. Wong this year bought a new camera, the Fujifilm X-E1, to supplement his Nikon. He liked that one so much that he added another Fujifilm model, the X100S.He is not the only member of the unofficial Fujifilm fan club. Over the last decade, as rival Eastman Kodak was descending toward bankruptcy — it recently emerged from Chapter 11 proceedings — Fujifilm was transforming itself from a maker of 35-millimeter film into a provider of digital imaging technologies.These include a new line of digital cameras, the X series, that blend Fujifilm's digital technology with retro aesthetics reminiscent of cameras from 60 or 70 years ago. At a time when sales of other cameras are slumping, the X series is selling briskly."Fujifilm once looked a lot like Kodak," said Christopher Chute, an analyst at the International Data Corporation in Boston. "Based on some different decisions, they have gone in very different directions."Fujifilm still makes film, but it now accounts for less than 1 percent of the company's sales. The entire imaging solutions division, which includes the company's cameras, generates a mere 13 percent of revenue. Most revenue comes from businesses like pharmaceuticals, medical equipment and office machines, in which Fujifilm has a partnership with Xerox.Like other camera makers, Fujifilm has seen sales of low-end cameras suffer from the rise of the smartphone, which has put a basic point-and-shoot into every owner's pocket. Even sales of more expensive DSLRs, a business dominated by Nikon and Canon, have started to weaken this year. Analysts say a maturing of DSLR technology, which makes upgrades less essential, may be to blame.The Camera and Imaging Products Association, a trade group whose members include Fujifilm, Nikon, Canon and other Japanese camera makers, says overall shipments of digital cameras plunged 39 percent in volume, and 26 percent in value, from January through September.Camera makers have tried various things to stem the slide. Some have equipped cameras with smartphone-style features, including Wi-Fi and mobile operating systems like Android, so people can share photos more easily. Sony recently introduced a new kind of camera that clips onto a smartphone.The X series is a different response. These cameras fit into a category called mirrorless, which has been a relative bright spot for the industry. Shipments of "nonreflex interchangeable lens" cameras, which include some of the Fujifilm X-series devices and other mirrorless cameras, declined only 13 percent in volume and 5 percent in value from January through September, the trade association said.Fujifilm said in its most recent quarterly earnings announcement that sales of "such high-end models as the X series proceeded smoothly." The company says it has sold more than 700,000 X-series cameras since the first model, the X100, was introduced in 2011.The name refers to the fact that these cameras do away with the internal mirror that, in reflex cameras, allows the user to compose through the lens while the shutter is closed. With mirrorless cameras, the photographer composes with the LCD screen or a separate viewfinder.The concept is not entirely new. The venerable Leica rangefinder, which predates the SLR, is technically a mirrorless camera. But compact, digital mirrorless cameras are a more recent innovation. Along with Fujifilm, brands like Olympus, Sony and Nikon have also added mirrorless models to their lineups over the last few years.
TOKYO — In a widely watched ruling, Japan's Supreme Court on Wednesday called last year's parliamentary elections out of compliance with the Constitution because of inequalities in the size of voting districts, but stopped short of declaring the results invalid.The court, the nation's highest, was ruling on 16 separate lawsuits that had been filed by lawyers in different courts around Japan seeking to nullify results in December's lower house elections, which returned to power the Liberal Democratic Party of Prime Minister Shinzo Abe. Those lawsuits sought to invalidate the results on the grounds that the number of voters in some districts, mostly rural ones, was far fewer than in other mostly urban districts, giving rural voters greater power in Parliament.Earlier this year, two of those lawsuits won unprecedented decisions by lower courts that declared invalid the results in two districts. While there had been growing expectations that the Supreme Court might take a similarly activist stance on an issue that has long bedeviled Japanese elections, the judges did not go that far.Instead, the court declared the elections to be "in a state of unconstitutionality" while requiring no remedial action beyond vaguely urging lawmakers to fix the problem. That is the same ruling that the court has made in several similar cases going back more than two decades.The court suggested that stronger action was unnecessary because Parliament had already taken steps to shrink the gaps in district sizes, and is considering new legislation that would further reduce those inequalities.Still, the lawyers who filed the lawsuits noted that yawning discrepancies in the size of election districts remain, with the largest district having 2.43 times more voters than the least populated district in the December elections. Some political scientists have blamed these differences for making Japan resistant to change despite its long decline, and say they empower conservative rural voters at the expense of urban residents, who might be more willing to challenge vested interests."This ruling does not answer our argument" about the need to fix the district inequalities, said Hidetoshi Masunaga, one of the lawyers who filed the lawsuits. "In this regard, today's ruling was completely inadequate."
TOKYO — A surge in car shipments lifted Japanese exports in October to the biggest annual increase in three years, data showed Wednesday, suggesting a gradual pickup in global demand would help build a sustainable recovery.The 18.6 percent increase in exports in the year that ended in October was well above the median market forecast of a 16.5 percent rise and accelerated from a 11.5 percent gain in September, figures from the Ministry of Finance showed.Significantly, the volume of exports also rebounded, rising 4.4 percent from a year earlier in a sign that the global economy is gradually picking up, mainly on strength in advanced nations.Although the yen has fallen about 14 percent against the dollar so far in 2013, export growth has largely failed to meet early expectations. A weaker yen makes Japanese goods less costly in world markets.The Japanese economy has been humming along nicely this year, helped by Prime Minister Shinzo Abe's monetary and fiscal expansionary policies. Still, problems with weak capital spending and depressed global demand have somewhat clouded the outlook.The October data should provide some relief for the government, which is hoping a recovery in overseas demand will cushion the blow from a sales tax increase planned for next April, which could crimp private consumption"U.S. private-sector demand remains strong and European economies appear to be bottoming out," said Takeshi Minami, chief economist at the Norinchukin Research Institute in Tokyo. "If advanced economies recover, Japanese exports can rise more."
TOKYO — The Bank of Japan maintained its ultra-loose monetary policy on Thursday and reiterated that the economy was recovering moderately, in a nod to signs of an increase in exports that is key to sustaining the momentum generated by Prime Minister Shinzo Abe's stimulus policies.As widely expected, the Japanese central bank maintained the monetary framework it put in place in April, which aims to achieve 2 percent inflation in about two years by increasing the supply of money through aggressive asset purchases."Japan's economy is recovering moderately," the Bank of Japan said in a statement announcing the decision. That assessment was unchanged from the one it made last month. "Exports have generally been picking up," reflecting a moderate recovery in overseas economies, it said.The Japanese economy slowed in the quarter from July through September as exports and household spending moderated, although analysts expect the economy to accelerate this quarter as consumers try to beat an increase in the sales tax next April.Weak exports have been a major concern for Bank of Japan officials, who hope the global economy will pick up in time to make up for the expected downturn in household spending after the tax increase.The central bank is watching global economic conditions and appears to be ready to ease monetary policy again if its inflation goal is threatened."I don't see a big risk of emerging economies' worsening sharply from current levels," Haruhiko Kuroda, the bank's governor, said at a news conference held to explain the bank's thinking.
TOKYO — Japan's foreign minister on Sunday refused to recognize China's newly claimed air defense zone over disputed islands, signaling that Japan would not back down as tensions increased in the maritime dispute.China on Saturday said its "air defense identification zone" would give it the right to identify and possibly take military action against aircraft near the islands in the East China Sea. The uninhabited islands are administered by Japan but claimed by China and Taiwan.China's announcement appeared to be the latest step in what analysts have called a strategy to chip away at Japan's claims of control of the islands. Japan has long maintained a similar air defense zone over them.The Japanese foreign minister, Fumio Kishida, called the Chinese declaration a dangerous escalation that could lead to what many military analysts most fear in the tense standoff: a miscalculation or accident that could set off an armed confrontation and drag the United States into the conflict."It was a one-sided action and cannot be allowed," Mr. Kishida told reporters, according to Japan's Kyodo News. It could also "trigger unpredictable events," he warned.The Chinese Ministry of Foreign Affairs promptly rejected Mr. Kishida's objections. "The Japanese side's irresponsible comments about China's demarcation of an East China Sea air defense identification zone are totally wrong," a spokesman for the ministry, Qin Gang, said in comments published on its website on Sunday.In a statement on Saturday, Defense Secretary Chuck Hagel warned that the American government viewed the Chinese move "as a destabilizing attempt to alter the status quo in the region." He also reaffirmed that the United States would stand by its security treaty obligations to aid Japan if it were attacked.For now, the United States and Japan appear to be trying to determine how serious China is about policing its newly declared zone, or whether the declaration is a political gesture to try to appease nationalist sentiments. However, it is equally unclear how Japan would respond if China tries to enforce it. Mr. Kishida did not say whether Japan would take any countermeasures, like increasing patrols in the airspace over the islands, known as the Senkaku in Japan and the Diaoyu in China.Mr. Qin dismissed criticisms from Secretary of State John Kerry and Mr. Hagel, and said the Chinese Foreign Ministry had complained to the American ambassador to Beijing, Gary Locke, about their remarks."The United States really should not take sides on the question of sovereignty over the Diaoyu islands," Mr. Qin said.In a sign of the heightened tensions, Japan's Defense Ministry said on Saturday that it had scrambled two F-15 fighter jets to intercept a pair of Chinese surveillance planes approaching the islands. It said the Chinese planes turned back without incident.A spokesman for the Chinese Ministry of National Defense accused Japan of using its defense zone to harass Chinese military planes."This is seriously impeding freedom of flight, and could very easily trigger a safety accident or unexpected incident," said the spokesman, Col. Yang Yujun.By setting up a competing air defense zone, China may be trying to show that its claim to the islands is as convincing as Japan's, Japanese officials said. They said China appeared to have a similar objective last Thursday, when Chinese coast guard officers boarded a Chinese fishing boat near the islands.When hailed by a Japanese coast guard vessel, the Chinese coast guard crew said it was monitoring fishing in Chinese waters, Japan's coast guard said.
TOKYO — Matching China's stern language with warnings of his own, Prime Minister Shinzo Abe of Japan vowed on Monday to defend his nation's airspace after China declared an air defense zone over a disputed group of islands in the East China Sea.Speaking in Parliament, Mr. Abe called China's move an unacceptable effort to change the status quo with threats of force. He described it as a dangerous ratcheting up of tensions in the standoff over the uninhabited islands, which are administered by Japan but also claimed by China."We are determined to defend our country's air and sea space," Mr. Abe said. "The measures by the Chinese side have no validity whatsoever for Japan."China and Japan have been locked in an escalating war of words and nerves over the islands for more than a year. China's declaration on Saturday that it would identify and possibly take military action against aircraft flying near the islands follows a long period of frequent dispatches of Chinese coast guard ships and aircraft to the area to challenge Japan's control.Mr. Abe's effort to draw a line in the sand reflects his promises to lead his nation in standing up to China, which has eclipsed Japan as Asia's top economic power. Since taking office in December, Mr. Abe, an outspoken conservative, has raised defense spending for the first time in a decade, and has increased military ties with the United States.Japan has repeatedly signaled to China since Saturday that it has no intention of yielding control of airspace over the islands, known as the Senkaku in Japan and the Diaoyu in China. On Monday, the Japanese vice foreign minister, Akitaka Saiki, summoned China's ambassador to Japan, Cheng Yonghua, to demand that China repeal the air defense zone, the Foreign Ministry said in a statement.Mr. Cheng replied that the Chinese air zone was not aimed at a specific country and would not affect civilian air traffic, according to Kyodo News. In Beijing, a Chinese Defense Ministry spokesman said that Japan had "no right to make irresponsible remarks," because Japan has maintained a similar air defense zone over the islands, the state-run news agency Xinhua reported.As the standoff has escalated, Japan has also sought to bind itself more closely to the United States, which has been the guarantor of Japanese security since the end of World War II. On Monday, the top Japanese government spokesman and chief cabinet secretary, Yoshihide Suga, said that Japan would work with the United States to urge China to allow aircraft to continue flying freely near the islands, which lie between Okinawa and Taiwan.
TOKYO — Japan's economy is gaining momentum, data for October showed, with consumer prices excluding food and energy rising 0.3 percent from a year earlier. It was the biggest gain since 1998, but household spending remained tepid as incomes slipped from the same month a year before.The various indicators released on Friday suggested that the very loose monetary policy and stimulus strategy of Prime Minister Shinzo Abe are helping end Japan's long bout of deflation.Industrial output rose 0.5 percent in October, the second monthly advance, driven by increases in the production of machinery used to make computer chips and other industrial products, plastics and cellphones.The government reported that the core consumer price index, excluding food costs, rose 0.9 percent from the year before. Including both food and energy, prices rose 1.1 percent.Japan's jobless rate remained flat in October, though the number of jobs available rose slightly.Further improvement is expected in November, aided by strength in housing construction and exports."Business conditions in the Japanese manufacturing economy improved for the ninth consecutive month and at a rapid pace in November, driven for the most part by an expansion of both foreign and domestic demand," said Claudia Tillbrooke, an economist at Markit, who compiles its purchasing manager's index for Japan. That index rose to 55.1 in November, from 54.2 in October. A reading above 50 suggests expansion.The government and central bank have set a target for attaining a 2 percent inflation rate within two years. So far, economists say, most of the increase in prices has come from a weakening in the Japanese yen, which erodes consumer spending power and increases costs in yen terms for imports of fuel, food and industrial components.Overall household spending, which accounts for nearly two-thirds of Japan's economic activity, rose 0.9 percent in October. Excluding housing costs, spending fell 1.5 percent from the month before and 0.3 percent from September. Workers' incomes fell an average of 1.3 percent in October.
WASHINGTON — Even as China scrambled fighter jets to enforce its newly declared air defense zone, the Obama administration said on Friday that it was advising American commercial airlines to comply with China's demands to be notified in advance of flights through the area.While the United States continued to defy China by sending military planes into the zone unannounced, administration officials said they had made the decision to urge civilian planes to adhere to Beijing's new rules in part because they worried about an unintended confrontation.Although the officials made clear that the administration rejects China's unilateral declaration of control of the airspace over a large area of the East China Sea, the guidance to the airlines could be interpreted in the region as a concession in the battle of wills with China."The U.S. government generally expects that U.S. carriers operating internationally will operate consistent with" notice requirements "issued by foreign countries," the State Department said in a statement, adding that that "does not indicate U.S. government acceptance of China's requirements."The decision contrasted with that of Japan's government this week, when it asked several Japanese airlines, which were voluntarily following China's rules, to stop, apparently out of fear that complying with the rules would add legitimacy to Chinese claims to islands that sit below the now contested airspace. China's newly declared zone, experts say, is intended mainly to whittle away at Japan's hold on the islands, which it has long administered.On Saturday, a Japanese Foreign Ministry official said, "We will not comment on what other countries are doing with regard to filing flight plans." It was not immediately clear if the Obama administration had notified Japan, a close ally, of its decision.An official at Japan's Transport Ministry said it had no immediate change to its advice to Japanese airlines.The American decision drew criticism from some quarters. Stephen Yates, a former Asia adviser to Dick Cheney when he was vice president, said it was "a bad move" that would undercut allies in the region that take a different stance.But Strobe Talbott, a former deputy secretary of state under Bill Clinton and now president of the Brookings Institution, said it was important to avoid an accident while drawing a firm line. "The principal option is to be extremely clear that disputes" over territory "must be resolved through diplomacy and not unilateral action," he said.American officials said they began having talks with airlines on Wednesday and characterized the guidance Friday as simply following established international air protocols independent of any political deliberations. The American announcement came on the same day that Chinese state news media said that China sent jets aloft and that they identified two American surveillance planes and 10 Japanese aircraft in the air defense zone the country declared last weekend.Although there was no indication that China's air force showed any hostile intent, the move raised tensions. The Chinese had also sent jets on patrol into the contested airspace the day before, but Xinhua, the state-run news agency, indicated that the planes on Friday were scrambled specifically to respond to foreign jets in the area.Earlier in the week, the United States sent unarmed B-52s into the area, and they proceeded unimpeded. China then appeared to back down somewhat from its initial declaration that planes must file advance flight plans or face possible military action.The administration's decision on Friday underscored the delicate position President Obama finds himself in, drawn into a geopolitical dispute that will test how far he is willing to go to contain China's rising regional ambitions.China's move thrust the United States into the middle of the already prickly territorial clash between Beijing and Tokyo, a position the administration had avoided for months even while reiterating that the mutual defense treaty with Japan covers the islands. After the Chinese declaration last weekend, American officials feared that, if left unchallenged, the Chinese action would lead to ever greater claims elsewhere in the Pacific region.
KOCHI, Japan — Hideki Matsuyama has become the first rookie to claim the Japanese tour's money title with a win at the Casio World Open.Matsuyama turned pro in April and has won five tournaments on the Japanese tour this season. In seven PGA Tour-sanctioned events, Matsuyama has six top-25 finishes. He plans to compete on the PGA Tour in 2014.Matsuyama shot a 70 in the final round Sunday at Kochi Kuroshio Country Club to finish at 12-under 276, one stroke ahead of Yuta Ikeda. The 21-year-old college student received $390,000 for Sunday's win, bringing his earnings this season to slightly more than $2 million.
NIIGATA, Japan — Seeking broader international support for opposing China 's claims to airspace over the East China Sea, Japan has asked the United Nations agency that oversees civil aviation to look into whether the newly created Chinese air defense zone could endanger civilian airliners, the Foreign Ministry said Saturday.The ministry said that it submitted a proposal for the agency, the International Civil Aviation Organization, to examine whether China's move could threaten the order and safety of international aviation in the area. Though the organization can make only nonbinding recommendations, Japan appears to be hoping that the heightened international scrutiny will force China to back off its declared intent to control the airspace with military measures if necessary.China's new "air defense identification zone" covers a broad section of sea that includes islands claimed by both nations, and overlaps with a zone claimed by Japan since the late 1960s. Japan views the zone, which China declared last week, as a new move to gain control of the islands, known as the Senkaku in Japan and Diaoyu in Chinese.China has said its new zone would not affect civilian air traffic, and was aimed instead at stopping Japanese military aircraft from entering airspace that it says rightfully belongs to China. However, China says that all aircraft, including commercial flights, must submit a flight plan before entering the zone.While the United States military continues to fly into the zone without notifying China, Obama administration officials said Friday that they were advising American airlines to comply with the Chinese requirement in order to ensure their safety.
TOKYO — A basement sushi restaurant whose octogenarian chef features in a documentary and an eatery serving potentially poisonous blowfish gained three-star ratings in the Michelin guide to Tokyo launched on Tuesday, Michelin said.The city held onto its crown as the Michelin guide's gourmet capital, with the most starred restaurants for the seventh straight year, a status likely to lure still more of the Asian tourists who say Japan's tasty treats are a key attraction.Tokyo also gained the distinction for the most restaurants with the coveted three-star rating, the guidebook's top honor, although the number dipped to 13 from 14 last year.But 21 restaurants gained stars for the first time and the total climbed to 281 from 242 in 2012, ranging from restaurants featuring broiled eel to Korean grilled meat and European fine-dining establishments."Tokyo proves how dynamic is Japanese gastronomy today," said Michael Ellis, international director of the Michelin guides, in a statement.Among the restaurants gaining the three-star accolade was "Sukiyabashi Jiro Honten," a 10-seat counter basement restaurant in the upscale Ginza area, whose master chef, 86-year-old Jiro Ono, has been in sushi since his teens and was featured in the 2011 documentary "Jiro Dreams of Sushi".Another winner was "Usukifugu Yamadaya," which serves fugu, blowfish which can be fatal if improperly prepared.Tokyo has seen tourist numbers rise sharply this year and is basking in having been named host the 2020 Summer Olympics. It was the favorite tourist destination of 52 percent of 4,000 Asian respondents to a survey released on Tuesday by the Development Bank of Japan.Among those who had visited Japan more than once, 58 percent gave Japanese food as the reason they chose it.The first Michelin restaurant guide, aimed at drivers in the early days of motoring, was published by the tyre company in 1900. The star-rating system was introduced in the 1920s.Following is a list of the 13 top-rated Tokyo restaurants, and one in the nearby Shonan coastal area, according to the Michelin guide.
TOKYO — U.S. Vice President Joe Biden said on Tuesday that Washington was "deeply concerned" by China's attempt to change the status quo in the East China Sea by creating a new air defence zone and said he would raise the matter with China's leaders.Biden, speaking in Tokyo on an Asian trip that will take him to Beijing and Seoul as well, also called for better cooperation between Washington's Asian allies Japan and South Korea, as well as between those U.S. allies and China.Tensions in the region have spiked since China announced the creation of an Air Defence Identification Zone and said all aircraft flying through the zone - which overlaps with Japanese-controlled islands also claimed by China - should file flight plans with Chinese authorities.
TOKYO — General Motors says it's in Japan for the long haul despite sales of Cadillac and Chevrolet models barely surpassing 1,000 vehicles a year.There has never been much appetite in Japan for left-hand drive gas guzzling U.S. autos, and there are many informal barriers to foreign automakers making it here.But GM executives see a glimmer of hope in the fact sales of its luxury nameplates have doubled in the past three years.The automaker is trying to lure Japanese buyers with the new Cadillac CTS and Chevrolet Corvette, which it says boast better quality and mileage.GM Japan Managing Director Sumito Ishii declined to give a sales target Wednesday, but said part of the Detroit automaker's sales strategy is to approach buyers who may not have preconceptions about GM.General Motors Co. has also begun to offer models with the steering wheel on the right, which is standard in Japan."We have just begun our fight," Ishii told reporters at the Foreign Correspondents Club in Tokyo. "We offer attractive qualities that you can't find in Japanese and European cars."Ishii and Gregg Sedewitz, director of sales and marketing, said the cars represent American luxury and are synonymous with risk taking, coolness and Hollywood celebrities.The Cadillac CTS comes packed with the latest technology, such as a lightweight structure and a direct injection turbo engine, and sells for 5.99 million yen ($59,900) and 6.99 million yen ($69,900).The Corvette, which ranges from 9.29 million yen ($92,900) to 11.59 million yen ($115,900) including the convertible models, is the greenest Corvette ever, delivering 12.3 kilometers per liter.They go on sale in Japan from April and May next year.Japanese consumers have historically favored European imports and home-made cars over American models, including luxury brands.Annual sales of the Lexus, the luxury offering from Toyota Motor Corp., the world's top automaker, total about 40,000 vehicles in Japan. Annual sales for the BMW are about that same number.Sedewitz acknowledged there was "no magic bullet" to boost sales volume in Japan."The numbers speak for themselves," he said. "We are in it for the long term."
TOKYO — Japan and the 10-member Association of Southeast Asian Nations are set to call for freedom of airspace over the high seas in a communiqué at next week's Tokyo summit, a move directed at China's aviation defence zone, Kyodo news agency said.A draft of the joint statement also expresses the resolve of Japan and ASEAN to bolster cooperation in maritime security, Kyodo said on Friday."The Air Defence Identification Zone is already an international issue. The meeting would lack edge if a strong message could not be issued (on the matter)," Kyodo quoted an unnamed Japanese diplomatic source as saying.Japan and four members of ASEAN -- Vietnam, the Philippines, Brunei and Malaysia -- all have territorial disputes with China in either the East or South China Seas.The Tokyo summit to mark the 40th anniversary of Japan's ties with the ASEAN comes after China last month declared an air defence identification zone in an area that includes islands at the heart of a territorial dispute with Japan, triggering protests from Tokyo, as well as Washington and Seoul.In announcing the new air defence zone, China warned it would take "defensive emergency measures" against aircraft that failed to identify themselves properly in the airspace, raising regional tension.Kyodo said a draft of the summit's statement stresses the importance of the freedom of aviation over the high seas and pledges Japan and ASEAN to contribute to the peaceful development of international aviation order. The three-day Tokyo summit is scheduled to start on December 13.Japan's ties with China deteriorate sharply in September 2012 when it purchased from a private owner three disputed islands in the East China Sea, called the Senkaku in Japan and Diaoyu in China.China claims almost the entire oil- and gas-rich South China Sea, overlapping with claims from Taiwan, Malaysia, Brunei, the Philippines and Vietnam. The last four are members of the 10-member Association of Southeast Asian Nations (ASEAN).Japan Prime Minister Shinzo Abe, who returned to power last December for a rare second term, promising to stand tough in the island dispute, visited all 10 ASEAN nations over the past year, but has not held an official summit meeting with Chinese President Xi Jinping.
NAHA, Japan — Storage tanks at the Fukushima nuclear plant like one that spilled almost 80,000 gallons of radioactive water this year were built in part by workers illegally hired in one of the poorest corners of Japan, say labor regulators and some of those involved in the work."Even if we didn't agree with how things were being done, we had to keep quiet and work fast," said Yoshitatsu Uechi, 48, a mechanic and former bus driver, who was one of a crew of 17 workers recruited in Okinawa and sent to Fukushima in June 2012 - among the thousands of workers from across Japan who have put together the emergency water tanks and stabilized the plant after three reactor meltdowns that were triggered by the March 2011 earthquake and tsunami.The Okinawa crew was recruited by Token Kogyo, an unregistered broker, and passed on to work at the Fukushima plant under the direction of Tec, a larger contractor which reported to construction firm Taisei Corp, records show. That practice of having workers hired by a broker but managed by another contractor is banned under Japanese law to protect workers from having their wages skimmed and to clarify who is responsible for their safety.In September, Okinawa labor regulators sanctioned Token Kogyo after investigating a complaint by Uechi and concluding the broker improperly sent workers to Fukushima, said an official with knowledge of the order, which was not made public. The official said Token Kogyo did not have the required license to dispatch workers. Japan's labor laws also prohibit third-party brokers from sending workers to construction jobs like the tank assembly where the Okinawa crew was employed. The sanction is a written order to improve business practice.At Fukushima, the workers from Okinawa were told by a Tec supervisor to lie to the plant's operator, Tokyo Electric Power Co, and say they were employed by Tec, according to Uechi, three other workers, employment documents and a recording of a workplace briefing reviewed by Reuters."People didn't have contracts, so when they weren't needed any more, they were cut immediately," said Uechi. Other members of the Okinawa-hired crew confirmed details of his account, but asked not to be named.Tokyo Electric, or Tepco, declined to comment on the specifics of the Okinawa crew, citing a need to protect the confidentiality of worker complaints brought to its attention and an inability to confirm relevant facts. Taisei declined to comment in detail, saying it "appropriately instructs its sub-contractors and tightly monitors its network of contractors."Token Kogyo declined to comment on Uechi's case but confirmed it had sent some workers to Fukushima from Okinawa. Tec did not respond to repeated requests for comment.Uechi complained to Tepco about work conditions at Fukushima in a series of phone calls beginning in August 2012, he said. He described his concerns about the quality of work at the plant in interviews with Japan's Chunichi newspaper and the Associated Press this year. The illegal employment practices and the sanction against Token Kogyo have not been previously reported.Tepco has promised to improve working conditions in an unprecedented nuclear decommissioning project expected to take more than 30 years. [ID:nL4N0J31FR] The company said last month it would more carefully monitor sub-contractors and double the pay for thousands of workers after a Reuters report found widespread abuses, including falsified employment records, skimmed wages and a lack of worker contracts. [ID:nL4N0HS0UJ]"Ensuring all workers at Fukushima are being employed appropriately is a very high priority that has a direct relation to our ability to bring a close to the accident," Tokyo Electric said in a statement. "We are working with all our contractors and others to ensure that laws and regulations are observed."Yosuke Minaguchi, a lawyer who has represented Fukushima workers, said problems in enforcing labor standards in the nuclear clean-up could threaten its completion."I have seen many younger workers drop out of the clean-up after they had their wages skimmed or after facing dangers that were not explained to them," he said. "Without stronger labor protection, there's no way the decommissioning project will succeed."Since the 2011 disaster, huge volumes of radioactive water have built up at the Fukushima site, with some leaking into the nearby Pacific Ocean. As an interim measure, Tepco rushed an order for steel tanks that could be put together quickly after being shipped in parts and assembled on site.These bolted-style storage tanks, each as tall as a 3-storey building, were intended to last only until 2016, giving Tepco time to have a purification system in place so contaminated water could be cleansed and safely discharged.In August, one of the tanks was discovered to have leaked about 300 tons of water, raising global alarm over Japan's handling of the crisis and prompting the government to order that the makeshift, bolted tanks like those assembled by the Okinawa crew be replaced by sturdier, welded tanks.Weeks later, radiation at the ground near one of the tanks spiked to a level so high that it would have caused radiation sickness within an hour if a worker had been directly exposed. That spike, after an apparent leak of radioactive water, occurred in the same area where Uechi and the Okinawa crew had been working - an open space known as H3 on an elevated plain above Fukushima's four wrecked reactors."Yes, we did a shoddy job," said one of Uechi's co-workers, who didn't want to be named as it could jeopardize his job prospects. "The quality of what we did was low, but what else would you expect? We had to race to finish up the tanks." The worker quit after only a month at Fukushima due to the fear of radiation. He now works on a construction site in Okinawa.Uechi says he spent much of his six months at Fukushima complaining about work standards and working conditions and being ignored. He said workers building the storage tanks last year never felt able to call attention to defects.In one example, Uechi said workers were rushed to apply caulking to seal the tanks even when it was raining and snowing. "It didn't make any sense, because the caulking wouldn't get to the metal. It would float out," Uechi said. Tepco said it could not confirm details reported by Uechi, but said workers should not have been working on sealing the tanks in the rain because it could have made the sealant in the tanks more prone to fail.Token Kogyo, the broker that recruited Uechi and other workers, operates in the suburbs of Naha, the largest city on Okinawa island, a 2-1/2 hour flight southwest of Tokyo. The firm is involved in building work on the island and targets seasonal workers willing to travel to construction jobs in Japan's larger cities, job ads issued by the company and posters on the building housing the firm show.As of September, government data showed there were fewer than six job openings for every 10 seeking work in Okinawa. By contrast, there were as many as 12 openings for every 10 workers in Fukushima prefecture, where mass evacuations have hobbled the reconstruction effort.Uechi, who has three school-age children, said he was lured by the promise of pay that would be more than twice the minimum wage in Okinawa. He and the other workers were only told they were going to the Fukushima nuclear plant at the job interview.Workers were housed three or four to a small room, and work conditions were tough. The day would start with breakfast at 5 a.m. at a highway rest-stop now housing workers. Protective suits were hot in summer, and the work was cold in winter. Five of the 17 of the Okinawa hires quit in the first month. Only three, including Uechi, lasted until December, he said.The Okinawa crew were all paid without any documentation before Uechi complained to Tepco, which ordered Taisei to investigate. As a result, Tec supervisors brought the Okinawa crew into a room in August 2012 and asked them to fill out a confidential survey requested by Tepco on work conditions.On a recording of that meeting which Uechi said he made, a person he identified as a Tec supervisor is heard telling workers they should report that they were receiving hazard pay and were employed by Tec. That was untrue as they had been hired by Token Kogyo and paid for their early work at Fukushima by the broker, Uechi said and his bank records show."When it comes to our sub-contractors, we register them all as Tec," the supervisor is heard to say. "If you want to say that's a forgery, then, yes, it's a forgery."Uechi declined to fill in the form as instructed, and continued to complain to Tepco. Later that month, Tec gave Uechi a contract until end-December and increased his pay to 16,000 yen ($160) a day from 13,000 yen. It was not clear if other workers were given contracts, though Uechi said others were given a similar pay rise.Uechi said he was sent home with almost three weeks left on his contract. He was told that was because Taisei had lost a bid for a new job at the plant. Taisei declined to comment on that matter. Tepco said it was "not in a position to know the details of the contract terms."In January of this year, when Uechi pressed his complaints with regulators and began speaking to reporters about his experience, Tec Chairman Yasushi Ogawa visited Okinawa and handed Uechi 1 million yen ($9,800) in cash. Ogawa said this was for "unpaid wages and compensation," Uechi said. He said Ogawa asked him not to complain to Taisei again at that meeting.Uechi accepted the payment but pressed Tec to provide a breakdown of the money for tax purposes. Reuters reviewed a recording of the meeting Uechi said he had made and a document he said Ogawa asked him to sign when handing over the money.Tec referred all questions to Ogawa. Reached by phone, Ogawa said he could not comment until mid-December at the earliest, and might not be able to comment at all on the case.For his part, Uechi is preparing to go back to Fukushima.He hopes to find a job in the decontamination around the plant that is being undertaken so tens of thousands of evacuees can return home. His unemployment benefits ran out in June and his family needs the money, he said.
TOKYO — Yoko Ono says her own bitter experience in Japan during World War II inspired her to support WhyHunger's "Imagine There's No Hunger" campaign to fight childhood hunger around the world.The 80-year-old widow of John Lennon said Thursday that she believes he would be happy to see his song "Imagine" used by WhyHunger and Hard Rock to raise support for their child nutrition and sustainable farming efforts in 22 countries."My husband and I really wanted to do something for the world, especially for the children," Ono told reporters gathered at the Hard Rock Cafe in Tokyo's flashy Roppongi district. "Children have pride, too, so they don't beg you, but they are in pain and they are starving."Popular Taiwanese rock band MayDay turned out to support the project, playing their own rendition of "Imagine."Ono, who was born into a wealthy family, experienced hunger like many other Japanese who fled Tokyo during wartime bombing raids. Some she knew starved to death or died from eating poisonous mushrooms they collected in the hills."I remember being hungry and I know it's so difficult to just be hungry," she said. "One day I didn't bring a lunchbox. The other kids asked, don't you want to eat? I just said, no, I'm not hungry."Ono said she was grateful for what she has learned through her involvement in the "Imagine There's No Hunger" program, which works with local community groups to help grow food to alleviate hunger and promote self-sufficiency."I'm going to be 81 in three months," Ono said. " I love learning because it gives me power and wisdom."
Joe Biden on Press Freedom in China: While on an official visit to China, Vice President Joseph R. Biden Jr. criticized China's treatment of journalists and urged the Chinese government to allow for more freedoms.BEIJING — Chinese leaders pushed back at visiting Vice President Joseph R. Biden Jr. on Wednesday over what they assert is their right to control a wide swath of airspace in the bitterly contested East China Sea. But the Chinese also indicated that they had not decided how aggressively to enforce their so-called air defense identification zone, which has ignited tensions with Japan.Shuttling from one feuding neighbor to the other, Mr. Biden arrived here from Tokyo to urge China's president, Xi Jinping, to show restraint in the zone, which Mr. Biden said the United States regarded as illegitimate and a provocation.After five and a half hours of meetings, in which Mr. Biden laid out the American case against China's action and Mr. Xi made a forceful counterargument, senior administration officials said: "President Xi took on board what the vice president said. It's up to China, and we'll see how things will unfold in the coming days and weeks."Mr. Xi's response suggested that China and Japan may be able to manage a standoff that had threatened to escalate dangerously, with China scrambling fighter jets over islands that are claimed by both countries."I was very direct about our firm position and our expectations in my conversation with President Xi," the vice president said in a speech to business people on Thursday morning. He urged China to refrain from "taking steps that will increase tension" and to communicate better with its neighbors.Mr. Xi, who cultivated personal ties to Mr. Biden when he was China's vice president, sounded a more upbeat note about the broader relationship, though he conceded "regional hot-spot issues keep cropping up."He welcomed a somber-looking Mr. Biden as "my old friend" and said nothing directly about the air defense identification zone.As Mr. Biden was meeting with Mr. Xi, a senior White House official issued blunt criticism of China's broader human rights record, saying that even Americans doing business here were not secure."The Chinese people are facing increasing restrictions on their freedoms of expression, assembly and association," said the national security adviser, Susan E. Rice, speaking at a human rights meeting in Washington. "This is shortsighted."For Mr. Biden, China's sudden action last month upended what was meant to be a tour of Asia with a wide-ranging agenda. Instead, he has had to walk a fine line: defending an ally and rebuking a potential adversary, while preventing a spat over the islands from mushrooming into a wider conflict.A day earlier in Tokyo, Mr. Biden condemned China's action as an effort to "unilaterally change the status quo" and said it had raised "the risk of accidents and miscalculation." He promised to raise those objections with Mr. Xi in Beijing.Mr. Biden stopped short of calling on China to rescind the zone, something it is highly unlikely to do, given the nationalist sentiments that have been animated by its standoff with Japan. The American military has ignored the zone, sending B-52 bombers last week to fly through it.Shortly after Mr. Biden arrived, the Chinese Foreign Ministry said the new air defense identification zone was a fact of life that the world needed to accept. The spokesman at the ministry, Hong Lei, described it as a "zone of cooperation, and not confrontation."Since the zone was announced on Nov. 23, 55 airlines from 19 countries had provided China with flight information, he said. The Federal Aviation Administration has advised civilian aircraft to comply with China's request. The F.A.A.'s guidance, which officials said was routine, unsettled Japanese officials, who had instructed their carriers not to identify themselves to the Chinese. But Mr. Biden's strong words, combined with his appeal to China's top leader, appear to have smoothed over that flap."The vice president seems to have put them back on track," said Michael J. Green, an adviser on Asia in the George W. Bush administration. "Beijing may not like it, and he probably did not want his trip to be all about this, but he had to send a strong message of dissuasion."Mr. Xi's sanguine words were calculated to send a different message, according to China experts. "A reason for Xi's tone is a desire to make U.S. allies, especially Japan, uneasy about U.S. support by suggesting subliminally that the U.S.-China relationship is more important than other relationships, and the U.S. is keeping it sound despite China-Japan relations," said Jeffrey A. Bader, a former China adviser to President Obama.
TOKYO — Support for Japanese Prime Minister Shinzo Abe slid in opinion polls after his ruling coalition steamrolled through parliament a tough secrecy act that critics fear could muzzle media and allow officials to hide misdeeds.Shrinking support could push Abe, who took power last year pledging to revive a stagnant economy, to softpedal his security policies until next year's budget is enacted and a sales tax hike from April is safely navigated, some analysts said.Abe was quick to defend his action, but said he should have taken more time to explain the bill carefully."With humility and sincerity, I must take the severe opinion from the public as a reprimand from the people. I now look back and think with regret that I should have spent more time to explain the bill carefully," Abe told reporters on Monday."But there have been no rules on designating, releasing, and preserving state secrets. That is where the real problem is."Support for Abe's government fell 13.9 points to 54.6 percent in a poll by broadcaster JNN, the lowest since he took office, although backing for the main opposition Democratic Party rose just 0.9 point to 6.8 percent and was dwarfed by the 30.3 percent who backed Abe's ruling Liberal Democratic Party."Abe's support tends to drop when he shows his 'Abe color'," said Nihon University professor Tomoaki Iwai. "But he knows that. I think he will focus on the economy for a while."A survey by news agency Kyodo showed support for Abe's cabinet fell 10.3 points to 47.6 percent, its first drop below 50 percent in a Kyodo poll since Abe began his rare second term.His first 2006-2007 term ended when he quit after a year marked by a big election loss, deadlock in parliament and ill health.About 82 percent of the respondents to the Kyodo poll, conducted on Sunday and Monday, wanted the secrets act - which some critics have likened to Japan's harsh authoritarian regime before and during World War Two - to be revised or abolished."During the parliament deliberations, there were expressions of concern such as 'Secrets will be multiplied endlessly', 'People will be deprived of their right to know', and 'Daily life will be threatened'," Abe said."But such things will never, ever happen."Abe has said the secrecy act is vital to convince allies such as the United States to share intelligence as he sets up a U.S.-style National Security Council to streamline foreign and security policy.Top government spokesman Yoshihide Suga told reporters the drop was not unexpected. He attributed the decline to public misunderstanding of the law's content and said the government would continue to explain it to gain support.The upper house of Japan's parliament late on Friday approved the state secrets act, which toughens penalties for leaks and broadens the definition of official secrets, despite protests by thousands of demonstrators near parliament and criticism from a broad swathe of media and intellectuals.The law provides jails terms of up to 10 years for public servants or others leaking state secrets. Journalists and others in the private sector convicted of encouraging such leaks could get up to 5 years if they use "grossly inappropriate" means to get information.Top officials will be able to designate special state secrets in four categories - defense, diplomacy, counter-terrorism and counterespionage - that can be kept secret for up to 60 years, and in some cases, longer.A weekend survey by the Asahi newspaper also showed Abe's support rate falling, by three points, to 46 percent. In another poll by public broadcaster NHK, support for Abe's cabinet dropped 10 points from a month earlier to 50 percent.Past governments have stretched the limits of Japan's U.S.-drafted pacifist constitution but Abe wants to go further, including by easing a self-imposed ban on exercising the right to collective self-defense, or aiding an ally under attack.
SAGA, Japan — The bulldozers started up with a rumble this year in this bucolic corner of southern Japan, unleashing a construction frenzy — and a sinking feeling of déjà vu.The traffic cones and "under construction" signs alongside Saga's roads and waterways are about the only visible change brought about by "Abenomics," Prime Minister Shinzo Abe's much-lauded plan to put Japan back on the path to growth. Residents here say the building boom is a throwback to Japan's troubled 1990s, when far-flung regions across the country tried to build their way back to prosperity.And they worry that, like previous attempts, growth will not last."How long before all this winds down again? That's what everyone's worried about," said Masataka Matsuo, a construction worker reinforcing an irrigation ditch several miles away from the city center.Japan has been the world's surprising growth story this year, largely outpacing other major industrialized countries with a bold set of policies that are lifting its economy after years of deflation. So far, it has been Mr. Abe's bid to pump the nation's banks with money — together with his promises of wide-ranging market reforms — that have garnered much of the investor spotlight.But some economists say that Japan's recovery has become dangerously dependent on large-scale public works spending, remembered here for adding to Japan's debt burden, fueling pork-barrel politics and riddling the country with little-used roads, bridges and dams.On Thursday, the government announced new stimulus spending of 5.5 trillion yen, much of it for public works, in a bid to offset any negative public reaction to a coming increase in a national sales tax.Still, pouring money into infrastructure projects will do little to lift Japan's growth potential in the long term, some economists warn. And with limited evidence that monetary easing is in fact lifting the real economy, growth "risks falling off a cliff" when government outlays sputter, said Chotaro Morita, chief strategist at SMBC Nikko Securities in Tokyo.Recent figures seem to support this view. In the three months through September, consumer spending grew a mere 0.2 percent from the last quarter and capital investment was flat, despite the easy money available under Japan's ultra-loose monetary policy. Net exports fell 0.6 percent.Even the rise of the stock market — up almost 50 percent since the start of the year largely because exporters' earnings are higher — has not helped average people spend more.Instead, it has been government spending on public works that has lifted growth, expanding at a rapid clip of 6.5 percent from the previous quarter, the latest numbers show. Overall, growth for the quarter was revised to just 0.3 percent from the previous three months, down from an initial reading of 0.5 percent."Japan's growth engine has been massive government spending," Ryutaro Kono, economist for BNP Paribas, said in a recent note.Saga, a small prefecture of about 850,000 people, knows all about government largess. Construction was abundant here during the Lost Decade 1990s, as Japan sought to fend off recession with a huge public works drive that in some years topped the entire military budget of the United States.Saga built a new airport, dammed nearly all its river systems, and opened a 200-acre landscaped park with a shiny visitor center and almost 100 historical buildings. At the peak of the building frenzy, one in nine workers in Saga worked in construction.But from the early 2000s, a reformist prime minister started to reduce spending, leaving regions like Saga in the lurch. The Democratic Party, which took the country's helm in 2009, declared that Japan would further shift its resources "from concrete to people." By 2012, public investment had declined to a third of its peak in 1998. Almost a fifth of Saga's construction companies closed or went out of business. The local economy plummeted.
TOKYO — Japanese tennis star Kei Nishikori has enlisted the help of Michael Chang as he looks to break into the top 10 in 2014.Chang will join Nishikori's coaching staff for 17-20 weeks, Nishikori's management team announced on Wednesday.The 41-year-old American will act as an advisory coach to the 17th-ranked Nishikori, with full-time coach Dante Bottini remaining in his current role. Nishikori has been training with Chang for the last two weeks in California.The 23-year-old rose to No. 11 last season and has contributed to a rejuvenation of tennis in Japan. He won his third career title in Memphis in February.Chang became the youngest man to earn a Grand Slam singles title when he won the French Open in 1989 at 17.
TOKYO — Japan will set up a new amphibious military unit and deploy unarmed surveillance drones in its southwest, where it faces a row with China over disputed islands, according to drafts of the nation's latest defence plans seen on Wednesday.Prime Minister Shinzo Abe ordered the defence policy review after returning to office last December, pledging to strengthen the military and boost Japan's global security role.The new defence guideline and military build-up plan, to be approved by the government next week, follow China's declaration in November of a new air defence identification zone in an area that includes the disputed isles, triggering protests from Tokyo, as well as Washington and Seoul.The drafts of the two plans were made available at a meeting of ruling Liberal Democratic Party (LDP) lawmakers and shown to reporters. Final versions of the defence guideline, which lays out Japan's defence policy for the next 10 years, and the build-up plan, called the mid-term defence programme and covering a five-year period, will be unveiled next Tuesday.Citing Japan's concerns about what it calls Beijing's attempts to change the status quo with force, the guideline says Japan will "respond calmly and resolutely to the rapid expansion and step-up of China's maritime and air activities."Underlining the tensions between the world's second and third-largest economies, China's Foreign Ministry said China was not a threat to any country and that it was watching Japan's moves."China is closely watching Japan's security strategy and policy direction. Japan's unreasonable criticism of China's normal maritime activities and its hyping up of the China threat has hidden political motives," ministry spokesman Hong Lei told a daily news briefing.Japan plans to set up an amphibious unit designed to take back the remote islands in case of invasion and boost the number of fighter jet squadrons at its Naha base on Japan's southern island of Okinawa to two from one to maintain air superiority.One squadron usually consists of 20 fighter jets.It also plans to procure unmanned surveillance planes and establish a unit of E-2C early warning aircraft at the Naha base, the draft of the build-up plan said.E-2Cs, routinely used to keep watch in the area surrounding the disputed islands called the Senkaku in Japan and Diaoyu in China, are currently based in northern Japan's Misawa base.Japan will also bolster its overall capability to respond to missile attacks in the face of improvement in North Korea's ballistic missile technology, the guideline draft said.But it stopped short of a call to acquire the capability to strike enemy targets - a controversial and costly step that would further stretch what Japan dubs its "purely defensive" defence posture allowed under decades-old interpretations of its post-World War Two pacifist constitution."North Korea has repeated conduct that heightens regional tensions ... Its nuclear and missile development, along with provocative words and deeds against us, represent a grave and imminent threat to our country's security," the draft said.Japan's concerns over a rising China and unpredictable North Korea were also echoed in the country's new national security strategy, a draft of which was also made available.In a move likely to raise red flags among Abe's critics, who say the hawkish leader is a nationalist ideologue, the draft strategy document calls for "cultivating love of country" and expanding "security education" in institutions of higher learning. Putting more patriotism in school curricula was the aim of a revision of a law on education enacted during Abe's first 2006-2007 term, which ended when he abruptly quit in the face of a parliamentary deadlock and ill health.As expected, the security strategy draft also said Japan will review its self-imposed ban on weapons exports, a move that could reinvigorate Japan's struggling defence industry.Japan in 1967 drew up "three principles" on arms exports - banning sales to countries with communist governments, those involved in international conflicts or those subject to United Nations sanctions.The rules eventually became almost a blanket ban on arms exports and on the development and production of weapons, stifling Japanese defence contractors and making it difficult for them to keep up with cutting-edge arms technology. Recent governments have made some exceptions including for joint development with the United States.
TOKYO — A court in South Korea on Thursday dismissed a lawsuit from Samsung Electronics in which the company had sought to block sales of certain Apple phones and tablet computers in South Korea.The ruling, by the Seoul Central District Court, is the latest twist in a global patent fight between the two companies, which dominate the smartphone and tablet businesses. For Samsung, the setback on its home turf follows a legal victory last year, when the court in Seoul, the South Korean capital, ruled that Apple had infringed on other Samsung patents.In the decision Thursday, the court said Apple had not infringed on Samsung patents relating to mobile messaging technology. It rejected Samsung's claim for 100 million won, or $95,000, in damages and a ban on sales in South Korea of older iPhone and iPad models."We are glad the Korean court joined others around the world in standing up for real innovation and rejecting Samsung's ridiculous claims," Apple said in a statement.Samsung said it would not back down in its disputes with Apple."We are disappointed by the court's decision," Samsung said in a statement. "As Apple has continued to infringe our patented mobile technologies, we will continue to take the measures necessary to protect our intellectual property rights."In a patent case in the United States, a jury in San Jose, California, ruled last month that Samsung should pay Apple an additional $290 million in damages, on top of previous awards.But Samsung has also scored legal victories in some countries, like Germany, where a court in the city of Mannheim dismissed an Apple patent claim against Samsung on Wednesday.Separately, the Obama administration recently upheld a ban on the sale of certain Samsung mobile devices in the United States, which had been ordered by the United States International Trade Commission. Previously, the administration had vetoed a commission order to ban the sale of some Apple products.
TOKYO — Leaders from Japan and 10 Southeast Asian countries on Saturday pledged to cooperate in ensuring freedom of navigation during a summit overshadowed by concerns over China's growing assertiveness in the region.A joint statement issued after the summit meeting refrained from an explicit mention of China's recent declaration of a maritime air defense zone over the East China Sea. But it was the backdrop behind the promise to cooperate to ensure "freedom of overflight and aviation safety in accordance with universally recognized principles of international law.""To the Chinese, we are calling on the withdrawal of all the measures that violate these general principles," Japanese Prime Minister Shinzo Abe said. He said Japan would stick to its decision advising airlines to continue their operations as they had before China's announcement."Raising tensions in this region is to nobody's advantage," Abe said in a nationally televised news conference showcasing what he called Japan's "special partnership" with the Association of Southeast Asian Nations.The summit marks 40 years of ties between Japan and ASEAN, a resource-rich region of more than 600 million people. Abe has visited all 10 ASEAN countries in the past year, seeking to boost both security and business ties, a warm contrast to frosty relations with China.Earlier Saturday, Tokyo pledged 2 trillion yen ($1.9 billion) in aid to Southeast Asian nations over the next five years to help close the region's development gap and improve its disaster preparedness. It also promised another $100 million to support the Japan-ASEAN Integration Fund.The Japanese side listed on its "urgent agenda" assistance for improved maritime security and more effective coast guards, help with cybersecurity and counterterrorism, closer communications connections and improved disaster preparedness and management.Much of Asia suffered under Japanese occupation in World War II, and Southeast Asian leaders have been wary of a potential resurgence of Japanese militarism.But like Japan, several ASEAN countries have territorial disputes with China that remain potential flashpoints.China's sudden declaration last month of the air defense zone over islands in the East China Sea that are claimed by both Japan and China raised hackles across the region. Some worry China might follow up with a similar zone in contested areas of the South China Sea."ASEAN's role as a center of economic growth depends on freedom of the seas and the air," Abe said.Japan has been expanding investments across Southeast Asia, especially since 2012, when anti-Japanese riots flared in China after Tokyo nationalized a group of uninhabited islands claimed by both countries.Associated Press writers Miki Toda and Koji Ueda contributed to this report.
TOKYO — Japan and Southeast Asian nations called on Saturday for freedom of the high seas and skies, amid heightened tensions over China's new air defense zone in the East China Sea.The statement, issued at a regional summit in Tokyo, also called for disputes to be resolved by peaceful means.China's recent announcement of an air defense zone over islands in the East China Sea, which are claimed by both Tokyo and Beijing, triggered protests from Japan, United States and South Korea.China is also locked in territorial rows with other Asian nations over wide swathes of the South China Sea, including waters claimed by several members of the Association of Southeast Asian Nations (ASEAN). Beijing has said it might set up a similar air defense zone there as well.U.S. and Chinese warships narrowly avoid collision in South China Sea last week, the U.S. Pacific Fleet said in a statement on Friday.
TOKYO — Business confidence at Japan's major manufacturers rose to a six-year high, according to a quarterly central bank survey released Monday, amid optimism over Prime Minister Shinzo Abe's economic recovery program.The Bank of Japan's "tankan" business confidence index rose to 16 for large manufacturers from 12 in September, and the best showing since 2007. Abe has made monetary easing, public works projects and structural reforms the key planks of his three-pronged economic plan, dubbed "Abenomics."The yen has fallen dramatically after he took office a year ago, which helps Japan's automobile and electronics exporters by increasing overseas income when repatriated. The bank surveyed 10,509 companies, which responded between Nov. 14 to Dec. 13.But economists say Japan still faces major economic challenges, including a bulging public debt and shrinking population.Large companies said they expect to increase capital spending by 4.6 percent in the fiscal year through March 2014. That was slightly lower than expected, said Hiromichi Nishi, assistant general manager at SMBC Nikko Securities."So the effect is mixed and subdued," he said.The sentiment index among non-manufacturing companies, including construction and services, jumped to 20 from 14, according to the survey.The "tankan" showed that they are expecting the dollar to trade at mid-90 yen levels, but it has been rising to about 100 yen lately, meaning earnings results could turn out better than expected, Nishi said.Still, analysts say Japan needs drastic structural reforms to keep solid growth going.
Hello, Japan's Champion Speaking ...: At the All-Japan Phone-Answering Competition, thousands of office workers compete for recognition as a paragon of courtesy, pleasantry and efficiency.SENDAI, Japan — The contestants roll their shoulders and lick their lips. The audience holds its breath. At the center of attention on stage at an expansive convention hall: a single telephone.It rings. The annual All-Japan Phone-Answering Competition for office workers has begun."How may I help you today?" a young contestant in a checked vest and skirt uniform says in Japanese after she picks up the phone, her hand visibly shaking. She chirps through the salutations in the high-pitched voice preferred by Japanese bosses for decades. She nods and bows, smiles and then grimaces in what appears to be nervousness and sheer effort. "I'm always at your service," she says.For over a half-century, office workers from companies across Japan have gathered each year to battle it out for the title of Japan's best phone answerer.The competition, which is dominated by women, is an impressive showcase of feminine politeness and eloquence, but it is also a reminder of the clerical positions Japanese women — often referred to as "office ladies," or "O.L.'s" — still serve in Japanese offices.This year, a record 12,613 office workers from across Japan sought to compete in the national contest. Sixty finalists made it, all but four of them women.Now in its 52nd year, the contest has surged in popularity in recent years. That is a puzzling development in a digital age dominated by emails and instant messaging and one in which Japanese women — ever so slowly — are finding more opportunities in the workplace.Organizers of the event, which now draws over twice the number of contestants as it did a decade ago, attribute that popularity to the enduring importance of politeness here, as well as a growing concern among some employers that younger Japanese are forgetting their basic manners.The rise of outsourcing and professional call centers, now almost a 700 billion yen ($6.85 billion) industry in Japan, has created a new industry based on professional phone answering, they say."Opportunities for voice communication are decreasing every year, yet the number of contestants keeps increasing. That shows Japan's commitment to phone manners will never fade," Masayuki Yamamura, president of NTT East, one of the event's corporate sponsors, said at the opening ceremony.Formal phone answering is serious business in Japan, with many rules intended to head off offensive or awkward moments. A search on Amazon's Japanese website found more than 60 books specifically on phone manners, and dozens more on business etiquette in general. Most appeared to be aimed at women, like "How to Talk Like a Workplace Beauty."A polite office worker picks up calls during the first or second rings; if, for unavoidable reasons, the caller is left waiting for three rings or more, an apology is in order. The conversation itself is carried out in a formal, honorific spoken form of language — peppered with exclamations like "I'm horrified to ask this request, but ..." At the end of the call, the receptionist must listen for the caller to hang up before putting down the receiver. Hanging up first is a serious faux pas.Some experts explicitly tell women to speak in a higher voice than usual to sound feminine and energetic. "Think of the musical scale — do, re, mi, fa — and imagine speaking in fa," says Akiko Mizuki, a business manner expert on AllAbout.com."It's very difficult to be polite but effortlessly so. If you sound like a robot, you can't put the caller at ease," said Keiko Nagashima, manager at a call center for SBI Securities in Tokyo, which has been sending workers to compete in the competition for the last five years.Ms. Nagashima's protégé, Mika Otani, trained six months for the competition by writing out sample answers and practicing in front of a mirror to make sure she was properly opening up her larynx and articulating. But Ms. Otani, 26, does not plan to simply follow tradition. She considers herself a modern woman and shuns the high-pitched voice. As more women have taken on professional positions in recent years, she said, there has been a backlash against overly squeaky voices."I work at a financial institution, so I don't want to sound like a cartoon character," Ms. Otani said before the competition.
TOKYO — A U.S. Navy helicopter made an emergency landing near Tokyo on Monday, injuring two crewmembers, U.S. and Japanese officials said.Kanagawa prefectural police said the helicopter was carrying four crewmembers when it made the emergency landing at a landfill near Misaki Port, just west of Tokyo.Footage on public broadcaster NHK showed the helicopter on its side, with its rotor blades apparently torn off and lying on the ground. There was no sign of fire.U.S. Forces Japan spokesman David Honchul said two injured crewmembers from the MH-60 helicopter were taken to a hospital for treatment. Kyodo News agency said one suffered a broken leg and the other had bruises.The cause of the accident and other details were not immediately known, Honchul said.Chief government spokesman Yoshihide Suga said no damage was reported in the surrounding area.Accidents involving the U.S. military in Japan are highly sensitive. In August, a U.S. HH-60 military helicopter crashed on the southern island of Okinawa, killing one crewmember and triggering calls for tighter safety measures.In 2004, a CH-53 helicopter crashed into a university building on the island, triggering a huge anti-U.S. base uproar although there were no civilian injuries and the crew survived.About 50,000 American troops are stationed in Japan, about half of them on Okinawa.
TOKYO — A year into Prime Minister Shinzo Abe's economic revival plan, the message from Japan's industrial heartland and economists is clear: Mr. Abe has yet to fulfill his pledge to stage the nation's comeback as a global economic dynamo.Mr. Abe's recipe of massive money printing, fiscal stimulus and pro-growth policies has already made it into economic vernacular as "Abenomics" and won praise for its initial "print and spend" stage.But the longer it takes Mr. Abe and his team to follow through with powerful incentives for businesses to take chances, innovate and grow, the bigger the risk that Japan will slide back into the stagnation that has dogged it for the past two decades. And with more debt than ever.The first two arrows of Mr. Abe's "three arrow" plan reversed crippling yen strength, buoyed market and business sentiment, sent prices moving up after 15 years of deflation and set Japan on course to outpace most of its peers for two years in a row.Yet Mr. Abe swept to power in December 2012 promising much more, namely to defy the gravity pull of Japan's aging and shrinking population with sweeping reforms to secure sustained, broad-based growth.On that count, Abenomics has barely left the starting blocks.A trip to Japan's western manufacturing hub around Osaka shows there is a long way to go before the benefits of Abenomics start trickling down from exporters, shareholders and high-end retailers."We just frown when we hear about Abenomics on the news over lunch. We're not feeling any effects of it," says Shigeru Yamada, 50, president and owner of Yamada Manufacturing in Daito, Osaka Prefecture, which is home to Panasonic, Sharp and an ecosystem of smaller suppliers.Mr. Yamada says his firm has replaced a 24-year-old metal-folding machine with a new one, its first big investment in seven years, and will be receiving state assistance for that under a simplified government subsidy plan. Beyond that, nothing has changed for the family firm that employs 15 people and has won awards for its production process.The company expects a loss this year and it has yet to see big manufacturers' optimism reflected in its order books.Small and medium-sized companies account for 70 percent of Japan's corporate jobs and 40 percent of the value of manufactured goods and parts, so growth will suffer for as long as many of those businesses struggle.And Japan needs growth to maintain high living standards, cope with swelling ranks of pensioners and deal with the world's biggest public debt burden.To that end, Mr. Abe's government targets real growth of 2 percent a year, more than double the average over the past two decades and more than double Japan's present potential — or the speed at which an economy can grow without excess inflation.In economists' terms, that potential can rise only as a result of an increase in capital, labor or a greater productivity in using them.The International Monetary Fund believes 2 percent is possible provided that Japan tackles all three with deregulation, higher taxes and labor market overhauls that bring more women and older people into the work force while easing curbs on immigration."If everything that we are suggesting is introduced as a package, then medium term potential growth could increase from around 1 percent to 2 percent," said Giovanni Ganelli, senior economist with the I.M.F. office in Tokyo.That is a big if.Skeptics point out that the 18-24 age group is a third smaller than two decades ago and say that nothing short of a miraculous burst of innovation will do, given that increasing immigration remains a political and social taboo.But while Mr. Abe has been telling audiences from London's City to Wall Street that "Japan is back," at home many plans aimed at lifting the economy's metabolism have been watered down, delayed or shelved.
WASHINGTON — The U.S. has blacklisted four senior members of a Japanese crime syndicate in an effort to disrupt illicit activities and undermine their financial stability.The Treasury Department's action targets members of Yamaguchi-gumi, the largest and most prominent syndicate. They're accused of drug trafficking, human trafficking, extortion, prostitution, fraud and money laundering in Japan and abroad.Japanese gangs are known as "yakuza" and are entrenched in many areas of the economy.President Barack Obama identified yakuza as transnational criminal organizations in 2011. Treasury has so far designated 10 individuals and three groups.The individuals blacklisted include third-in-command Tadashi Irie, fourth-in-command Hirofumi Hashimoto, the gang's Chubu region leader Toshio Masaki and the chief of a subsidiary gang in Northern Osaka, Shoroku Ishida.
TOKYO — Japan's defence budget will grow 2.2 percent in the next fiscal year from April, Defence Minister Itsunori Onodera said on Friday, posting the biggest rise in nearly two decades.The budget increase comes as tension between Japan and China simmers over tiny islands they both claim.Japan's defence spending next year comes in at 4.78 trillion yen ($45.86 billion), up 2.2 percent on the year, Onodera told reporters after meeting Finance Minister Taro Aso. That would be the biggest percentage rise in 18 years and mark the second consecutive year of growth.The Defence Ministry has said, however, much of the budget growth next year will be linked to higher cost of equipment imports due to a weaker yen, and the end in March of temporary pay cuts for government workers aimed to help finance reconstruction after a 2011 earthquake and tsunami.Saddled with hefty public debt, Japan had cut its defence spending for 10 straight years through to 2012, before Prime Minister Shinzo Abe, who returned to power a year ago pledging to bolster Japan's defence posture, raised defence expenditure by 0.8 percent this year."This is quite satisfactory for the Defence Ministry. We will carry on defending Japan's safety securely," Onodera said.In the latest flare-up in tension between Japan and China, Beijing last month declared a new air defence identification zone in an area that includes disputed East China Sea islets, triggering protests from Tokyo as well as Washington and Seoul.The budget decision comes on the heels of new defence guidelines and military build-up plans, unveiled this week, which call for a 2.6 percent rise in defence spending for five years starting next April.Asked if the 2014/15 budget was enough to implement the five-year build-up plan, Onodera said: "I believe we have received enough. But there is a precondition of tight fiscal situation. We need to work hard to cut costs and streamline whenever possible when it comes to equipment and training."The government is in the final stages of compiling next year's draft budget, which will be approved by Abe's cabinet on December 24.The Defence Ministry's initial budget request, submitted to the Ministry of Finance in August, has been trimmed by 0.7 percent.Items in the budget request include 69.3 billion yen for four of Lockheed Martin's F-35 fighter jets, 73.3 billion yen to build a destroyer with improved capability to detect submarines and 77.3 billion yen to buy four P-1 patrol planes made by Kawasaki Heavy Industries.Japan also plans to allocate 300 million yen for research on surveillance drones and tilt-rotor aircraft, with an eye to procuring them in the year starting April 2015, the budget request showed.Japan hopes that tilt-rotor aircraft such as the Osprey and unmanned aircraft including Northrop Grumman Corp's Global Hawk will help it better defend remote islands, including the contested East China Sea isles, called the Senkaku in Japan and Diaoyu in China.The Osprey, built by Boeing Co and Textron Inc's Bell Helicopter unit, can fly as quickly as a plane but lands like a helicopter. In the five-year build-up plan, Japan aims to buy 28 F-35s, 17 tilt-rotor aircraft and three drones.When costs associated with the realignment of U.S. forces in Japan are included, defence-related spending next year will reach 4.88 trillion yen, up 2.8 percent from this year, sources with direct knowledge of the matter told Reuters. ($1 = 104.2300 yen)
TOKYO — The governor of Tokyo, who led his city's winning bid to host the 2020 Olympic Games, resigned Thursday amid a scandal involving more than half a million dollars that he received from a hospital operator during an election.Since the scandal broke last month, the governor, Naoki Inose, had denied that the money was for political purposes, saying it was a personal loan. However, inconsistencies in his explanations, often given at news conferences where he perspired profusely, only helped add to calls for his resignation.This week, those calls reached the top tiers of government when members of the governing Liberal Democratic Party began expressing concerns about possible disruptions to Tokyo's preparations for the Games. After the resignation, Prime Minister Shinzo Abe sought to reassure voters, and the world, that there would be no such impact."The people of Japan are all of one mind in wanting to make 2020 the best Olympics," said Mr. Abe, who also campaigned for the Games. "This will not be affected" by the resignation.Despite weeks of denials and convoluted accounts, Mr. Inose was never able to explain fully why he had received the huge sum in cash from the hospital company, Tokushukai, during his election race to become governor last December.While he said it was a personal loan that he had returned without spending, the Tokyo city assembly was preparing to launch an inquiry into whether the money was a bribe to help the company get building permits for new hospitals. With Mr. Inose's resignation, that investigation may now move into the hands of the Tokyo prosecutor's office.Adding to the suspicions was the fact that the hospital company's owner gave Mr. Inose the money immediately after meeting him for the first time.
TOKYO — In a brazen gun attack that shocked a country tough on firearms, the head of a nationwide dumpling restaurant chain was shot dead in front of his company's headquarters on Thursday.The restaurant executive, Takayuki Ohigashi, 72, the president of Ohsho Food Service, was shot at close range in a parking lot in the western city of Kyoto early Thursday, according to the police and news reports. An employee found him slumped beside his car and alerted the authorities. Mr. Ohigashi was pronounced dead at a nearby hospital.His attacker remains at large, and the Kyoto Prefectural Police said it had set up a special unit to investigate the killing.The armed attack was unusual in Japan, which severely restricts access to firearms and is often held up as an example of what strict gun regulations can achieve. Most of the 250,000 registered guns in Japan are hunting rifles, obtainable only after extensive background checks and training, according to the National Police Agency. The agency recorded four gun-related murders last year, and only 44 gun-related robberies and attempted robberies.At the scene of Thursday's killing, the police found Mr. Ohigashi's wallet with cash still in it and did not suspect robbery, according to news reports. Mr. Ohigashi was known to arrive early at work, and investigators believe that he may have been ambushed, the reports said.Mr. Ohigashi ran a fast-food chain called Gyoza no Ohsho, or King of Dumplings, started in 1967 by his brother-in-law. The chain has about 660 restaurants across Japan. Mr. Ohigashi took the helm of the company in 2000 and is credited with using aggressive cost-cutting to turn around restaurants struggling to make a profit in Japan's deflationary economy.At a board meeting, the company named the managing director, Naoto Watanabe, 58, as its new president. It also opened its restaurants as usual on Thursday, though local news media reported that restaurant workers expressed fear and dismay at the shooting.Most gun crime in Japan takes place among the yakuza, the notorious organized crime groups, which are known to have access to smuggled firearms. Of the four victims of last year's gun-related murders, three were known gangsters.
TOKYO — Japan's central bank decided on Friday to hold steady on its aggressive monetary stimulus program and said the nation's economy continued to recover moderately. Economists expect the bank to expand its asset-buying program next year to counter any ill effects of a scheduled sales tax increase.Japan's all-out monetary stance underscores how its policy trajectory is diverging from that of the United States, where the Federal Reserve said in the past week that it would start winding down its bond-buying program with growing confidence in the country's economic growth.But in Japan, officials at the central bank, the Bank of Japan, are determined not just to kick-start growth but to pull the country out of years of deflation, or falling prices. Haruhiko Kuroda, the bank's governor, has committed to a goal of reaching 2 percent inflation in the next two years — a tall order for a country with a shrinking population where it has become the norm for prices, wages and profits to languish.Japan could be helped in its quest for growth by the Fed's move, with the long-anticipated announcement of a winding down further strengthening the dollar against the yen. That helps to buoy the prospects of Japanese exporters, which have already benefited from a weakening home currency. On Friday, the yen dipped to 104.44 against the dollar, its weakest level in five years.Exporters have led a spectacular stock market rally this year. The Nikkei 225-share average closed at its highest level in six years on Friday, rising 0.1 percent to end at 15,870.42. In the past year, the Nikkei has jumped more than 60 percent."Japan's economy is expected to continue a moderate recovery as a trend," the central bank said in a statement.Still, Prime Minister Shinzo Abe has warned that for Japan to stage a full recovery, corporations must share more of their wealth by raising wages and spending more on investment. Recent data have shown that companies remain cautious about putting their higher earnings back into the economy. Japan's gross domestic product grew 0.3 percent in the third quarter from the previous three months, the government said earlier this month, revising down a preliminary reading of 0.5 percent.Mr. Abe has also promised to introduce pro-market reforms to raise Japan's growth potential, part of a strategy known as Abenomics."We must stand together in our resolve to beat deflation," Mr. Abe told a meeting of government officials, corporate executives and labor union members to discuss wages and labor issues.To get money flowing again in the economy, Mr. Kuroda unleashed an aggressive program in April to buy government bonds and other assets, and committed to doubling the money supply in two years. On Friday, the bank's policy board voted unanimously to maintain the rate of increase in its cash and deposits at 60 trillion yen to 70 trillion yen, or $574 billion to $670 billion, a year.Many economists expect the bank to go further next year to counter any negative economic fallout from a planned increase in Japan's sales tax in April, from 5 percent to 8 percent. The government has also expressed concerns that higher taxes could blunt consumer spending and economic growth, and it has introduced a ¥5.4 trillion public spending package as a cushion.The bank should watch out for the expected surge in demand ahead of the tax raise, followed by an inevitable slump, Mr. Kuroda said at a news conference. "But fundamentally," he added, "moderate recovery will continue."He also said he expected Japan's consumer prices to rise at pace of more than 1 percent by the end of the year, from 0.9 percent in October. Much of that rise has been driven by the weaker yen, which is pushing up the price of energy and other imports.
TOKYO — Japan's Emperor Akihito surprised the nation last month when palace officials announced plans for his funeral. His wishes for a relatively modest one — and the act of planning ahead — were widely seen as a good example in this rapidly aging country.Akihito, who turns 80 on Monday, is still active, making an official visit to India in November with his wife, the 79-year-old Empress Michiko. But concerns have grown since he had heart bypass surgery nearly two years ago on top of prostate cancer earlier.After an expert panel discussion for more than a year, the palace announced that Akihito would be cremated, and his remains placed in a mausoleum smaller than those of his predecessors, with Michiko by his side at the Imperial compound in western Tokyo. Akihito's cremation breaks a 400-year burial custom of the world's oldest monarchy, as he wishes to trim cost, space and burden on the people, officials said.The revelation of the couple's life-end plans was well received in the world's fastest-graying nation, where 20 years from now one in three people will be senior citizens. Eroding traditions and changing demographics mean many of them lack younger relatives to look after their affairs or their graves."I really empathize with their feelings," said Setsuko Imamura, a former part-time kimono-dressing instructor who turned 79 this month. "We cannot simply compare the imperial couple's situation with us commoners, but their concerns make sense."Imamura has been planning for her life's end for some time. A year after her husband died of cancer in 2010, she sold their house in Hamamatsu in central Japan, and moved to a retirement home in western Tokyo, near her niece. She has sorted out her finances, written a will and selected her favorite kimono for her burial, all kept in a box. She doesn't want a ceremony.Now, she is trying to reserve a spot in a group tomb, which would cost 300,000 yen ($2,900) per participant. That way her remains wouldn't be abandoned, and disposed of as waste. And someone, living members of the group or their relatives, would visit the tomb and lay flowers."My husband and I didn't have children, so we had agreed not to leave anything behind, and that's how I want to live through the end," she said. "I don't want to trouble anyone."Imamura represents a growing segment of Japan's expanding elderly population, particularly women who often outlive their husbands and are likely to die alone with no one to arrange their funeral or settle their affairs.A 2011 national survey by Ibaraki Christian University sociology professor Kenji Mori showed that only about 60 percent of Japanese had a gravesite with relatives to take care of it. The majority considered funeral ceremonies an obligation, and about 40 percent worried the arrangements would cause trouble for relatives and neighbors.More and more Japanese in their 60s and 70s are planning for their own deaths, just like Akihito and Michiko. A majority in Mori's survey said funeral ceremonies should reflect the wishes of the dead, a new way of thinking encouraged by companies in the now-booming "end-of-life" business.Funerals used to be send-off rituals conducted by neighbors or families of the dead, but now the rituals are affected by business incentives and have lost their traditional meaning, Mori said.Toshiko Sasaki, an executive at the Institute of Community Association Network, which runs retirement facilities and aging society research, said Japan's rapid aging, low birthrate and weakening community and family ties have caused many elderly people to feel isolated and abandoned. Well into the second half of the 20th century, the oldest son, even after marriage, often lived with his parents until their death."Family ties have changed so much," Sasaki said. "People now consider funerals and graves should reflect their own thoughts rather than for families or ancestors."Books on how to write "ending notes" have become best-sellers and "ending activity" seminars abound, organized by funeral homes, tombstone stores and even supermarket chains, like Aeon Co. Cemetery tours are also available."Life after retirement is long and many people are healthy and active. I think they want to take care of their concerns early on so they can enjoy the rest of their lives without lingering uncertainty," said Kazuhiro Yoshida, a spokesman for Aeon's funeral-related services.The 2008 Oscar-winning film "Departures," about a man who prepares bodies for funerals, inspired many Japanese to think and talk more openly about the topic.At the high-tech temple Daitokuin, where indoor graves are operated by Nichiryoku Co., visitors can pray for up to eight of their loved ones at one of about two dozen card-operated booths, each housing a tombstone with changing nameplates for each family.Nichiryoku and other companies also provide an after-death house-cleaning service for people who die on their own. Masahiko Muraki, an executive of Nichiryoku, said he expects the need for the service would grow in coming years."People finally started realizing there is so much to do," he said. "It's not just about funeral and grave. We're all responsible for deciding the process leading up to the end of our lives."
TOKYO — Japanese Prime Minister Shinzo Abe on Wednesday moved close to winning approval from the island of Okinawa on a replacement for a U.S. air base, a move that would resolve a nearly 20-year-old deadlock that has strained ties with Washington.A deal with officials in Okinawa would be an achievement for Abe, who has promised a more assertive Japanese military at a time when the U.S.-Japan security alliance has been tested by tension with China over disputed islands in the Pacific.The potential breakthrough came at a meeting between Abe and Okinawa's governor, Hirokazu Nakaima, who has held an effective veto over long-delayed plans to build a new U.S. Marine air base to replace the Futenma base.Nakaima praised Abe for offering a range of concessions to address various worries, including promises of larger budget outlays on Okinawa over the next seven years and the prospect of a tighter environmental controls over U.S. bases."What has been offered is surprising and splendid," Nakaima told Abe, adding later that he would make a final decision on approving construction of a new base on Friday.The United States and Japan agreed in 1996 to close the Futenma base but plans for a replacement stalled in the face of fierce opposition in Okinawa, which hosts more than half of the U.S. forces in Japan. Okinawa was occupied by the United States until 1972.Japan's ties with the United States were strained when then-Prime Minister Yukio Hatoyama sought to keep a campaign promise to move the U.S. base off Okinawa. U.S. officials have said the new Marine facility needed to be on the island.The Futenma base has been a lightning rod for criticism because of its location in a densely populated area. The proposed replacement base would be built on the Henoko coast near the town of Nago, removed from the more crowded southern tip of Okinawa.Activists living in tents have been staging a protest near the site of the proposed Henoko base for almost 10 years and have promised demonstrations if Nakaima approves construction.In April, the United States and Japan announced a plan to close Futenma as early as 2022.Abe said the government would study whether that plan could be accelerated and would begin negotiating an agreement with the United States that could allow for more local oversight of environmental issues at U.S. bases. That would mark the first change to the bilateral Status of Forces agreement that has applied to U.S. military activities in Japan since the 1960s."We have never even had a discussion of this kind," Abe told reporters. "We want this to produce a solid result."Although Abe remains generally popular, Okinawa handed his Liberal Democratic Party one of its few defeats in July elections. In addition to anger over the issue of U.S. bases, sugar farmers in Okinawa also oppose Abe's plans to join the Trans Pacific Partnership trade agreement.
TOKYO — The governor of Okinawa signed off Friday on the long-awaited relocation of a U.S. military base, a major step toward allowing the U.S. to move forward with plans to consolidate its troops on the southern Japanese islands and move some to Guam.An Okinawa official confirmed that Gov. Hirokazu Nakaima approved the Japanese Defense Ministry's application to reclaim land for a new military base on Okinawa's coast. It would replace the U.S. Marine Corps base in Futenma, a more congested part of Okinawa's main island.Nakaima's decision could still face court challenges and protests. Opponents want the base moved off Okinawa completely."What the governor has done is unforgivable," said Yuichi Higa, the head of the assembly in Nago city, where the new base is to be built. "Residents who are opposed will surely resort to the use of force, such as blocking roads to stop this from happening."The decision was politically difficult for Nakaima, because of the local opposition, and came only after Japanese Prime Minister Shinzo Abe met with him in Tokyo on Wednesday and offered him a package that included increased financial assistance for Okinawa.The U.S. has had a major military presence in Okinawa dating from the end of World War II. About half of the 50,000 American troops in Japan are based in Okinawa, and many residents complain about base-related crime, noise and the risk of accidents.The new base would be built in a part of Nago city called Henoko. It is part of an agreement to move 9,000 Marines off Okinawa, including transferring 5,000 to Guam. The original agreement to close the Futenma base was signed in 1996, but it has been delayed repeatedly.
TOKYO — The 20-somethings in jeans sipping espresso and tapping on laptops at this Tokyo business incubator would look more at home in Silicon Valley than in Japan, where for years the surest signs of success were the gray suits of its corporate salarymen. But for those hoping the nation's latest economic plan will drag Japan from its long malaise, the young men and women here at Samurai Startup Island represent a crucial component: a revival of entrepreneurship.The signs of that comeback are still new, and tentative enough that the statistics on start-ups and initial public offerings have not caught up. But analysts and investors report that hundreds of new Internet and technology-related companies have sprung up in the last two to three years, creating an ecosystem of incubators like Samurai Startup Island and so-called accelerator new venture investment funds, which invest in early-state start-ups in hopes of cashing in.Some top universities — the same ones that have long defined success as a job in an established company or elite government ministry — have begun not only to create their own incubators and venture funds, but also to develop curriculums on birthing start-ups. And while some young entrepreneurs say real progress will come only if Prime Minister Shinzo Abe acts as promised to shake up Japan's hidebound corporate culture, they say the stock market rally and broader optimism created by the economic plan known as Abenomics are already making it easier to find investors and customers."This is the beginning of something that could rejuvenate Japan," said Mitsuru Izumo, the founder of Euglena Corporation, a biotechnology start-up valued at $1 billion, and one of the country's most prominent new entrepreneurs. "If we don't unleash our youth, then Japan will become too weak to survive another blow like Fukushima. Entrepreneurship is Japan's last chance."For years, sagging entrepreneurial spirit has been cited as a major reason for Japan's inability to save itself from a devastating deflationary spiral. The nation that produced Sony, Toyota and Honda has created few successors.Although Japan has a long tradition of entrepreneurship in blue-collar trades like manufacturing, it has had only limited success in extending that to more knowledge-based industries like software or computing, at the forefront of the digital age and where competitors like South Korea have sped ahead.A decade ago, under then-Prime Minister Junichiro Koizumi's effort to revive the economy, Japan appeared to embrace young entrepreneurs. But the resurgence was mostly snuffed out when the most prominent of these newcomers, a brash young Internet mogul named Takafumi Horie who roared around Tokyo in Ferraris, was imprisoned for securities fraud. For other young entrepreneurs, his guilt or innocence was not the story. They saw his downfall as a cautionary tale of how Japan's graying establishment would crush those who challenged its rules.The Samurai Startup Island, in a low-rent office district built on a landfill on Tokyo Bay, is at the vanguard of what many hope is a new generation of innovators, and a world apart from Japan's highly conformist corporate world. The most prominent of several start-up incubators that have sprung up in Tokyo, it offers a variety of services, including free legal advice, cheap office space, espresso machines and bunk beds for all-nighters.On a recent afternoon, dozens of young Japanese sat at long wooden tables in the airy loftlike space. Ceiling-high scrolls of scowling samurai warriors and paintings of pink cherry blossoms adorn the walls.The eclecticism is intentional, said the Island's creator, Kentaro Sakakibara. Entrepreneurs must seek inspiration in Japan's historical figures, particularly bold, but selfless, samurai, he said. He advised avoiding the flashy consumption and public hubris of Mr. Horie to make entrepreneurship more palatable to Japan's proudly egalitarian society.
TOKYO — The governor of Japan's Okinawa on Friday approved a controversial plan to relocate a U.S. air base to a less populous part of the southern island, but said he would keep pressing to move the base off the island altogether.The nod from Okinawa, long a reluctant host to the bulk of U.S. military forces in Japan, is an achievement for Prime Minister Shinzo Abe, who has promised a more robust military and tighter security ties with the United States amid escalating tension with China.Skeptics, however, said it remained far from clear whether the relocation - stalled since the move was first agreed by Washington and Tokyo in 1996 - would actually take place given persistent opposition from Okinawa residents, many of whom associate the U.S. bases with crime, pollution and noise.The approval came a day after Abe visited Tokyo's Yasukuni Shrine, seen in parts of Asia as a symbol of Japan's past militarism, infuriating China and South Korea, and prompting concern from the United States about deteriorating ties between the Asian neighbors.Okinawa Governor Hirokazu Nakaima told a news conference he had approved a central government request for a landfill project at the new site, on the Henoko coast near the town of Nago. His approval for that project, required by law and a first step to building the replacement facility, was the last procedural barrier to eventually replacing the U.S. Marines Futenma air base in the crowded town of Ginowan."The government has recently met our requests in compiling a plan to reinvigorate Okinawa. We felt that the Abe government's regard for Okinawa is higher than any previous governments'," Nakaima told a news conference.The governor, however, added that he still believed the quickest way to relocate the Futenma air base would be to move it to an existing facility with runways outside Okinawa.About 2,000 people gathered in front of the Okinawa government building to protest against Nakaima's decision, with a few hundred of them staging a sit-in at the lobby of the office building, Jiji news agency said.The United States and Japan agreed in 1996 to close the Futenma base but plans for a replacement stalled in the face of opposition in Okinawa, which hosts more than half of the U.S. forces in Japan. Okinawa was occupied by the United States after Japan's defeat in World War Two until 1972.In a statement, U.S. Defense Secretary Chuck Hagel welcomed the approval of the landfill permit, and said that the Pentagon "remains committed to working with the government of Japan to build a strong and sustainable U.S. military presence with less impact on the people of Okinawa."U.S. defense officials, speaking to reporters on the condition of anonymity, said the move was an important step forward in U.S. efforts to further strengthen U.S.-Japan ties and rebalance U.S. foreign policy toward Asia."We look forward to continuing our work with Japan to implement our consolidation plan on Okinawa, and continuing our progress with relocating Marines to Guam and elsewhere in the Pacific," Hagel said in his statement.Japan's ties with the United States were strained when then-Prime Minister Yukio Hatoyama, who took office in 2009, sought to keep a campaign promise to move the U.S. base off Okinawa.The Futenma base has been a lightning rod for criticism because of its location in a densely populated area.Activists living in tents have been staging a protest near the site of the proposed Henoko base for almost 10 years and have promised demonstrations if Nakaima approves construction.An election for the mayor of Nago next month could prove problematic if incumbent Susumu Inamine - who opposes the plan - is re-elected, while the central government could face a dilemma if demonstrators try to block construction."There are so many potential wild cards, so much that has to be done, that every small decision moves the process forward but by no means guarantees a final conclusion," said Brad Glosserman, executive director of Pacific Forum CSIS, a Honolulu-based think-tank.In April, the United States and Japan announced a plan to close Futenma as early as 2022.Abe said the government would study whether that plan could be accelerated and would begin negotiating an agreement with the United States that could allow for more local oversight of environmental issues at U.S. bases.That would address Nakaima's call to revise the bilateral Status of Forces agreement that has applied to U.S. military in Japan since 1960 but has never been officially revised.Abe's government has also earmarked 348 billion yen for Okinawa's economic development in the draft budget for the year from April, a 15.3 percent increase from this year.
TOKYO — A long-simmering dispute between the United States and Japan over the fate of a Marine base on Okinawa seemed to have been resolved on Friday when the governor of Okinawa gave his approval to move the base to a remote area.The agreement would bolster efforts by the Pentagon to rebalance American military forces across the Asia-Pacific region and by the Japanese prime minister, Shinzo Abe, to raise his country's strategic posture and check the growing military influence of China.An official document approving a landfill on which much of the base would be built was stamped by the governor of Okinawa, Hirokazu Nakaima, and sent to the local branch of the Ministry of Defense, Kanako Shimada, a prefectural official, said on Friday.Mr. Nakaima's approval was a breakthrough after what had been longstanding opposition on Okinawa to the plan to move the Marine Corps' Air Station Futenma, on the prefecture's main island to the north of the island.The original agreement to move the base, which is in a heavily populated area, was reached in 1996 after the gang rape of an Okinawan schoolgirl by American servicemen.That fueled a local protest movement in Okinawa that advocated ousting the Marines from the island and even suggested that Okinawa declare its independence from Japan. Then there were concerns about the effects of building a new base in an environmentally sensitive area on the island's coast.The concerns delayed further progress on the agreement. A 2009 pledge by Yukio Hatoyama, who briefly served as prime minister, to move the base off Okinawa, perhaps to another part of Japan, confused the issue even more.But since his return to the prime minister's office a year ago, Mr. Abe had pressed Okinawan officials to finally give the go-ahead. In a meeting on Wednesday in Tokyo, Mr. Abe unveiled a set of measures to reduce the burden of the American bases on Okinawa, together with promises of financial support to the prefecture, Japan's poorest.That cleared the way for Mr. Nakaima's approval of a landfill for the new base, Camp Schwab-Henoko Bay in the north.For Mr. Abe, the approval comes at a time of increasing tensions with China that have led him to enhance security ties with the United States and to envision a bigger military role for Japan in the region.Senior Defense Department officials said they viewed the agreement as critical to the Pentagon's new strategy in the Asia-Pacific region.The approximately 18,000 Marines now stationed on Okinawa will drop to about 10,000 once the new base is completed over the next decade.During that time, facilities are to be built that would shift about 5,000 Marines to Guam, and plans are underway eventually to deploy about 2,500 Marines in Australia.Those movements, Pentagon officials said, would create a more militarily useful distribution of Marines across the region, allowing them to be closer to a broader swath of territory as required for traditional security missions or disaster relief efforts.Prolonged delays and uncertainty over the base in Okinawa had undermined the Obama administration's plan for a strategic rebalancing in Asia.A senior Pentagon official called the Okinawa agreement the "most significant" breakthrough in moving the American military to "a very operationally sustainable, distributed lay-down in the Pacific.""This sends a clear signal to the region that the alliance is strong, capable," added the official, who requested anonymity because the agreement had not been formally announced.The certainty of a continued Marine presence, according to Pentagon officials, demonstrates to other regional allies, as well as rivals, that the United States has the resolve to maintain its security presence despite its budget difficulties and fatigue from wars in the Middle East.Another benefit, officials said, is that the United States and Japan could now focus on broader security issues.With an agreement in place, "We can focus on the larger strategic issues on our plate," another senior Defense Department official said.Senior Pentagon officials acknowledged that additional hurdles could arise over the 10-year timetable required to replace Futenma with the new base at Henoko Bay, which is near a small existing installation called Camp Schwab. Staunch opposition to the base remains, and about 2,000 protesters gathered at the Okinawa prefecture offices on Friday after the agreement became known. Some pushed into the building's lobby, occupying it, according to reports by the NHK television network.Indications of a breakthrough surfaced earlier this week, when Mr. Abe reached a deal with Mr. Nakaima over environmental protection issues involving the new American base.Officials in Washington credited a series of high-level meetings, including recent talks with the Japanese involving Vice President Joseph R. Biden Jr. and Defense Secretary Chuck Hagel.
TOKYO — Policy makers at Japan's central bank broadly agreed that the economic recovery would remain on track as an improving job market fueled consumer spending, but some expressed worry about the pace of growth, according to the minutes of a meeting in November.In the meeting's minutes released Thursday, two policy board members of the central bank, the Bank of Japan, voiced concern about a large contribution from inventories and a fall in wages in the country's latest data for gross domestic product."This may be indicative of a downward shift in growth, instead of merely a temporary slowdown," one member said, referring to the third-quarter G.D.P. data.Differing views of the pace of growth could make it difficult for the Bank of Japan to present a united front next year, when gross domestic product could dip sharply in the second quarter after a planned increase in the national sales tax.In the quarter from July through September, Japan's economy grew 0.3 percent, slower than the 0.9 percent growth in the previous quarter as consumer spending and exports weakened.Many economists say G.D.P. growth has already picked up as exports have improved.But an increase in the sales tax to 8 percent, from 5 percent, in April is expected to cause a temporary contraction, which will be a test of whether the central bank can ride out pressure to ease policy further.At its meeting on Nov. 20 and 21, the Bank of Japan's board voted unanimously to maintain its pledge of increasing base money, or cash and deposits at the central bank, at an annual pace of 60 trillion to 70 trillion yen, or $580 billion to $670 billion.The Bank of Japan made this pledge last April to meet its target of 2 percent inflation in two years.Many members said consumer spending and domestic demand were contributing to broad gains in consumer prices, the minutes showed.However, one member expressed doubt that the Bank of Japan could meet its price target, because long-term inflation expectations are controlled by economic fundamentals, the minutes showed.Haruhiko Kuroda, the central bank's governor, said on Wednesday that consumer inflation would exceed 1 percent in the first half of next year and help the central bank achieve its goal of changing the public's perception that deflation would persist.
FUJISAWA, Japan — Panasonic used to make televisions, refrigerators and computer monitors in this suburb of Tokyo. Now, six years after closing its factories in Fujisawa, the company is building homes on the site, which is sandwiched between Mount Fuji and the Pacific.With several partners, Panasonic plans to erect 1,000 houses in Fujisawa, using them to showcase its clean-energy technologies. The first batch, sheathed in protective plastic cladding bearing the name of the company's residential division, PanaHome, is nearing completion."After shutting the factories, we thought, What is the latest contribution that we can make to society?" said Hiroyuki Morita, the Fujisawa project leader. "We reached the conclusion that doing something for the environment was very important."Like other troubled Japanese electronics giants, Panasonic is trying to get its own house in order. Consumer electronics like those that were once made at Fujisawa provided the foundation for Japan's postwar economic miracle. But in recent years, South Korea and Silicon Valley have moved to the fore in technological innovation and marketing, while China has taken the lead in manufacturing.So Panasonic is trying to reinvent itself as a provider of less visible but more profitable industrial technologies. It is focusing on two areas: homes and automobiles, where it supplies battery cells to makers of electric cars, like Tesla Motors.Panasonic is not the first Japanese electronics giant to back away from the consumer business, but the transformation — if it succeeds — would be particularly striking. Others, like Toshiba, Hitachi and NEC, were just going back to their roots as providers of industrial equipment like power turbines, mining tools or telecommunications gear. Panasonic, founded by Konosuke Matsushita in 1918, started as a maker of consumer lighting fixtures.Panasonic's biggest Japanese rival in consumer electronics has long been Sony, which is sticking with smartphones, TVs, cameras and other devices despite tough times. And even Sony has been doing better with some behind-the-scenes products, like sensors for smartphone cameras, than with some of its own branded electronics.In October, as Sony reported a loss for the most recent quarter, Panasonic posted a net profit of 61.5 billion yen, or nearly $590 million, and raised its earnings forecast for the full year."We believe Panasonic has turned the corner into sustainable profit expansion in nonconsumer electronics businesses," Damian Thong, an analyst at Macquarie Securities, wrote in a note to clients.Panasonic once tried to match Sony move for move. In the heyday of Japan's dominance in consumer electronics, in the 1970s and '80s, it was the brand that people chose when they really wanted a Sony Walkman or Trinitron TV but could not quite afford those brands.In 1990, a year after Sony acquired Columbia Pictures, Panasonic, then known as the Matsushita Electric Industrial Company, bought another American entertainment business, MCA. But Panasonic, which is based in Japan's down-to-earth second city, Osaka — Sony has its headquarters in the more worldly capital, Tokyo — struggled to make sense of Hollywood. Only five years later, it sold MCA to the Seagram Company.Since then, the decline in the Japanese electronics industry has claimed several onetime stalwarts, including Sanyo, which was started by a brother-in-law of Mr. Matsushita's in 1947. Panasonic took over what was left of the company in several stages, from 2008 through 2011.After it acquired Sanyo, Panasonic accelerated its restructuring, cutting tens of thousands of jobs from the combined group, closing factories and getting out of several unprofitable businesses. The company's president, Kazuhiro Tsuga, has announced plans to stop making plasma televisions and consumer smartphones and to scale back output of digital cameras. In September, Panasonic said it planned to sell a majority stake in its health care business to Kohlberg Kravis Roberts, the private equity firm. In November, it said it would stop making printed circuit boards, which are used in smartphones and other devices, at four of its plants in 2015.
SENDAI, Japan — Seiji Sasa hits the train station in this northern Japanese city before dawn most mornings to prowl for homeless men.He isn't a social worker. He's a recruiter. The men in Sendai Station are potential laborers that Sasa can dispatch to contractors in Japan's nuclear disaster zone for a bounty of $100 a head."This is how labor recruiters like me come in every day," Sasa says, as he strides past men sleeping on cardboard and clutching at their coats against the early winter cold.It's also how Japan finds people willing to accept minimum wage for one of the most undesirable jobs in the industrialized world: working on the $35 billion, taxpayer-funded effort to clean up radioactive fallout across an area of northern Japan larger than Hong Kong.Almost three years ago, a massive earthquake and tsunami leveled villages across Japan's northeast coast and set off multiple meltdowns at the Fukushima nuclear plant. Today, the most ambitious radiation clean-up ever attempted is running behind schedule. The effort is being dogged by both a lack of oversight and a shortage of workers, according to a Reuters analysis of contracts and interviews with dozens of those involved.In January, October and November, Japanese gangsters were arrested on charges of infiltrating construction giant Obayashi Corp's network of decontamination subcontractors and illegally sending workers to the government-funded project.In the October case, homeless men were rounded up at Sendai's train station by Sasa, then put to work clearing radioactive soil and debris in Fukushima City for less than minimum wage, according to police and accounts of those involved. The men reported up through a chain of three other companies to Obayashi, Japan's second-largest construction company.Obayashi, which is one of more than 20 major contractors involved in government-funded radiation removal projects, has not been accused of any wrongdoing. But the spate of arrests has shown that members of Japan's three largest criminal syndicates - Yamaguchi-gumi, Sumiyoshi-kai and Inagawa-kai - had set up black-market recruiting agencies under Obayashi."We are taking it very seriously that these incidents keep happening one after another," said Junichi Ichikawa, a spokesman for Obayashi. He said the company tightened its scrutiny of its lower-tier subcontractors in order to shut out gangsters, known as the yakuza. "There were elements of what we had been doing that did not go far enough."Part of the problem in monitoring taxpayer money in Fukushima is the sheer number of companies involved in decontamination, extending from the major contractors at the top to tiny subcontractors many layers below them. The total number has not been announced. But in the 10 most contaminated towns and a highway that runs north past the gates of the wrecked plant in Fukushima, Reuters found 733 companies were performing work for the Ministry of Environment, according to partial contract terms released by the ministry in August under Japan's information disclosure law.Reuters found 56 subcontractors listed on environment ministry contracts worth a total of $2.5 billion in the most radiated areas of Fukushima that would have been barred from traditional public works because they had not been vetted by the construction ministry.The 2011 law that regulates decontamination put control under the environment ministry, the largest spending program ever managed by the 10-year-old agency. The same law also effectively loosened controls on bidders, making it possible for firms to win radiation removal contracts without the basic disclosure and certification required for participating in public works such as road construction.Reuters also found five firms working for the Ministry of Environment that could not be identified. They had no construction ministry registration, no listed phone number or website, and Reuters could not find a basic corporate registration disclosing ownership. There was also no record of the firms in the database of Japan's largest credit research firm, Teikoku Databank."As a general matter, in cases like this, we would have to start by looking at whether a company like this is real," said Shigenobu Abe, a researcher at Teikoku Databank. "After that, it would be necessary to look at whether this is an active company and at the background of its executive and directors."Responsibility for monitoring the hiring, safety records and suitability of hundreds of small firms involved in Fukushima's decontamination rests with the top contractors, including Kajima Corp, Taisei Corp and Shimizu Corp, officials said."In reality, major contractors manage each work site," said Hide Motonaga, deputy director of the radiation clean-up division of the environment ministry.But, as a practical matter, many of the construction companies involved in the clean-up say it is impossible to monitor what is happening on the ground because of the multiple layers of contracts for each job that keep the top contractors removed from those doing the work."If you started looking at every single person, the project wouldn't move forward. You wouldn't get a tenth of the people you need," said Yukio Suganuma, president of Aisogo Service, a construction company that was hired in 2012 to clean up radioactive fallout from streets in the town of Tamura.The sprawl of small firms working in Fukushima is an unintended consequence of Japan's legacy of tight labor-market regulations combined with the aging population's deepening shortage of workers. Japan's construction companies cannot afford to keep a large payroll and dispatching temporary workers to construction sites is prohibited. As a result, smaller firms step into the gap, promising workers in exchange for a cut of their wages.Below these official subcontractors, a shadowy network of gangsters and illegal brokers who hire homeless men has also become active in Fukushima. Ministry of Environment contracts in the most radioactive areas of Fukushima prefecture are particularly lucrative because the government pays an additional $100 in hazard allowance per day for each worker.Takayoshi Igarashi, a lawyer and professor at Hosei University, said the initial rush to find companies for decontamination was understandable in the immediate aftermath of the disaster when the priority was emergency response. But he said the government now needs to tighten its scrutiny to prevent a range of abuses, including bid rigging."There are many unknown entities getting involved in decontamination projects," said Igarashi, a former advisor to ex-Prime Minister Naoto Kan. "There needs to be a thorough check on what companies are working on what, and when. I think it's probably completely lawless if the top contractors are not thoroughly checking."The Ministry of Environment announced on Thursday that work on the most contaminated sites would take two to three years longer than the original March 2014 deadline. That means many of the more than 60,000 who lived in the area before the disaster will remain unable to return home until six years after the disaster.Earlier this month, Abe, who pledged his government would "take full responsibility for the rebirth of Fukushima" boosted the budget for decontamination to $35 billion, including funds to create a facility to store radioactive soil and other waste near the wrecked nuclear plant.Japan has always had a gray market of day labor centered in Tokyo and Osaka. A small army of day laborers was employed to build the stadiums and parks for the 1964 Olympics in Tokyo. But over the past year, Sendai, the biggest city in the disaster zone, has emerged as a hiring hub for homeless men. Many work clearing rubble left behind by the 2011 tsunami and cleaning up radioactive hotspots by removing topsoil, cutting grass and scrubbing down houses around the destroyed nuclear plant, workers and city officials say.Seiji Sasa, 67, a broad-shouldered former wrestling promoter, was photographed by undercover police recruiting homeless men at the Sendai train station to work in the nuclear cleanup. The workers were then handed off through a chain of companies reporting up to Obayashi, as part of a $1.4 million contract to decontaminate roads in Fukushima, police say."I don't ask questions; that's not my job," Sasa said in an interview with Reuters. "I just find people and send them to work. I send them and get money in exchange. That's it. I don't get involved in what happens after that."Only a third of the money allocated for wages by Obayashi's top contractor made it to the workers Sasa had found. The rest was skimmed by middlemen, police say. After deductions for food and lodging, that left workers with an hourly rate of about $6, just below the minimum wage equal to about $6.50 per hour in Fukushima, according to wage data provided by police. Some of the homeless men ended up in debt after fees for food and housing were deducted, police say.Sasa was arrested in November and released without being charged. Police were after his client, Mitsunori Nishimura, a local Inagawa-kai gangster. Nishimura housed workers in cramped dorms on the edge of Sendai and skimmed an estimated $10,000 of public funding intended for their wages each month, police say.Nishimura, who could not be reached for comment, was arrested and paid a $2,500 fine. Nishimura is widely known in Sendai. Seiryu Home, a shelter funded by the city, had sent other homeless men to work for him on recovery jobs after the 2011 disaster."He seemed like such a nice guy," said Yota Iozawa, a shelter manager. "It was bad luck. I can't investigate everything about every company."In the incident that prompted his arrest, Nishimura placed his workers with Shinei Clean, a company with about 15 employees based on a winding farm road south of Sendai. Police turned up there to arrest Shinei's president, Toshiaki Osada, after a search of his office, according to Tatsuya Shoji, who is both Osada's nephew and a company manager. Shinei had sent dump trucks to sort debris from the disaster. "Everyone is involved in sending workers," said Shoji. "I guess we just happened to get caught this time."Osada, who could not be reached for comment, was fined about $5,000. Shinei was also fined about $5,000.The trail from Shinei led police to a slightly larger neighboring company with about 30 employees, Fujisai Couken. Fujisai says it was under pressure from a larger contractor, Raito Kogyo, to provide workers for Fukushima. Kenichi Sayama, Fujisai's general manger, said his company only made about $10 per day per worker it outsourced. When the job appeared to be going too slowly, Fujisai asked Shinei for more help and they turned to Nishimura.A Fujisai manager, Fuminori Hayashi, was arrested and paid a $5,000 fine, police said. Fujisai also paid a $5,000 fine."If you don't get involved (with gangs), you're not going to get enough workers," said Sayama, Fujisai's general manager. "The construction industry is 90 percent run by gangs."Raito Kogyo, a top-tier subcontractor to Obayashi, has about 300 workers in decontamination projects around Fukushima and owns subsidiaries in both Japan and the United States. Raito agreed that the project faced a shortage of workers but said it had been deceived. Raito said it was unaware of a shadow contractor under Fujisai tied to organized crime."We can only check on lower-tier subcontractors if they are honest with us," said Tomoyuki Yamane, head of marketing for Raito. Raito and Obayashi were not accused of any wrongdoing and were not penalized.Other firms receiving government contracts in the decontamination zone have hired homeless men from Sasa, including Shuto Kogyo, a firm based in Himeji, western Japan."He sends people in, but they don't stick around for long," said Fujiko Kaneda, 70, who runs Shuto with her son, Seiki Shuto. "He gathers people in front of the station and sends them to our dorm."Kaneda invested about $600,000 to cash in on the reconstruction boom. Shuto converted an abandoned roadhouse north of Sendai into a dorm to house workers on reconstruction jobs such as clearing tsunami debris. The company also won two contracts awarded by the Ministry of Environment to clean up two of the most heavily contaminated townships.Kaneda had been arrested in 2009 along with her son, Seiki, for charging illegally high interest rates on loans to pensioners. Kaneda signed an admission of guilt for police, a document she says she did not understand, and paid a fine of $8,000. Seiki was given a sentence of two years prison time suspended for four years and paid a $20,000 fine, according to police. Seiki declined to comment.In Fukushima, Shuto has faced at least two claims with local labor regulators over unpaid wages, according to Kaneda. In a separate case, a 55-year-old homeless man reported being paid the equivalent of $10 for a full month of work at Shuto. The worker's paystub, reviewed by Reuters, showed charges for food, accommodation and laundry were docked from his monthly pay equivalent to about $1,500, leaving him with $10 at the end of the August.The man turned up broke and homeless at Sendai Station in October after working for Shuto, but disappeared soon afterwards, according to Yasuhiro Aoki, a Baptist pastor and homeless advocate.Kaneda confirmed the man had worked for her but said she treats her workers fairly. She said Shuto Kogyo pays workers at least $80 for a day's work while docking the equivalent of $35 for food. Many of her workers end up borrowing from her to make ends meet, she said. One of them had owed her $20,000 before beginning work in Fukushima, she says. The balance has come down recently, but then he borrowed another $2,000 for the year-end holidays."He will never be able to pay me back," she said.The problem of workers running themselves into debt is widespread. "Many homeless people are just put into dormitories, and the fees for lodging and food are automatically docked from their wages," said Aoki, the pastor. "Then at the end of the month, they're left with no pay at all."Shizuya Nishiyama, 57, says he briefly worked for Shuto clearing rubble. He now sleeps on a cardboard box in Sendai Station. He says he left after a dispute over wages, one of several he has had with construction firms, including two handling decontamination jobs.Nishiyama's first employer in Sendai offered him $90 a day for his first job clearing tsunami debris. But he was made to pay as much as $50 a day for food and lodging. He also was not paid on the days he was unable to work. On those days, though, he would still be charged for room and board. He decided he was better off living on the street than going into debt."We're an easy target for recruiters," Nishiyama said. "We turn up here with all our bags, wheeling them around and we're easy to spot. They say to us, are you looking for work? Are you hungry? And if we haven't eaten, they offer to find us a job."
TOKYO — Faced with a shrinking population, Japan is trying to woo women back into the labor force through child care and other policies. But women are now rarely found in leadership positions, although women around the world are increasingly making advances:
